From the "GOSFILMFOND" cinematheque
The Suram Fortress
Cinematheque of the People's Commission
Georgia, 1922
Novel - legend by
DANIIL CHONKADZE
Written and directed by
IVAN PERESTIANI
Director of Photography
B. SAVELYEV
Author's dreams...
The serfs.
Bastards!
In the evening Maria finds out that she just became a widow.
There is no justice!
Neither in Heaven or on Earth!
Your reward is in Heaven.
The landowner
... a month later...
I sold your children to the priest, you'll bring them to his place tonight.
Maria decides to run away with her children.
I'm taking the children to their new master.
At Imereti.
Dishonored.
The slave owners, the Zereteli Princes.
You have been talking to the servants again!
The dog faithful to its masters.
Tonight you will kidnap that lady's baby.
And you will take him to my sister in Tbilisi.
You must come tonight at our masters' garden.
Under the moonlight.
Waiting uselessly.
At Tbilisi
Princess Muhranskaja's palace.
The Duke sent him here for being educated.
The baby's name is Durmishhan.
A few years after...
Spring is coming.
The bells call the people to pray and repent.
Maria's children, who ran away to Tbilisi,
Had grown up and they are helping their mother.
The marketplace in the ancient Tbilisi.
Recluse.
She didn't confess for ten years now.
The secret was becoming a heavy burden.
Follow her and see where she lives.
The secret of confession wasn't respected.
The master discovered where his servants were hiding.
Tie them up!
The master's entertainment.
This is infamous and shameful!
I'm leaving!
Mother...
Kill him!
Revenge.
Farewell, my country.
Many years have passed.
The Duchess’s pupil, the maidservant Vardua.
Anna's son, Durmishhan. She drowned, and he was adopted by the Duchess Muhranovskaja.
Do you really love him that much?
I'll see that you get married, but first
I'll help you to become independent.
You hope to become a merchant?
I'll give you some money and a horse...
Go and find your happiness.
In the morning.
He's coming!
You must swear that you'll never forget me.
Hey, Durmishhan!
She had a bad feeling about his departure.
This is how these two men met
Brought together by a tragic destiny.
In Suram Osman-Agi had a little daughter.
Her name was Gajane.
They are coming!
After lunch.
Following desert roads she went to see the witch.
At the witch.
Take a look here.
Poor me!
As a matter of fact...
After leaving everything in Durmishhan's hands,
Osman, who appreciated him very much, gave him his daughter to marry.
Georgian party.
Caucasian dance.
Female dance.
Georgian fight.
...I am guilty of getting married...
... without your blessing...
That night.
Mother, teach me your ways, so that I can have my revenge.
Dozens of years have passed...
Time was flying,
Durmishhan became a respected merchant
One day a visitor arrived to see him in Tbilisi.
During the conversation the guest mentioned the famous witch named Vardua.
Forgotten...
They loved their only son very much, they were spoiling him
At the Mzheti palace.
My King, here's what we've seen along our borders.
At Ardagan in the Kura valley the Turks were descending.
Rebuild all our fortresses in the mountain passes!
Rebuild the fortress of Suram
Near the fortress walls.
There were only a few more bricks to lay.
It's the second time this happens.
This is a bad sign.
The wife and his child said goodbye to Durmishhan as he was leaving for a long trip to buy some merchandise.
Take good care of our son!
The fortress was being rebuilt for the third time.
The Tsar gathered The Council of Nobles and Wise Men of the People.
It came crumbling down three times, we'll rebuild it again
My Tsar, go to Vardua, she knows everything.
Take her advice
The Tsar accepts the proposal.
Avlabar.
Vardua's courtyard.
It has always been like this
Sit here!
Listen, at Suram there is Durmishhan, the merchant
He's got a son
...It already happened anyway... we have to close this boy into the walls...
Near the coasts of Anatolia Durmishhan was being attacked by pirates.
Back at home a tragedy is taking place.
Obscurity, ignorance, superstition
Bad news
She was going mad.
He is here.
He is high up there my son, Zurab!
I will find that evil woman!
Give me a horse!
He is high up there my son, Zurab!
Did you tell them to close my son into the walls?
Evil woman, what did he ever do to you?
Take a good look at me, Durmishhan!
Vardua?
Hold me in your arms, my love, the way you did a long time ago.
Time erases the past, relentlessly.
Only some old ruins are the witnesses of a dark age in which a beautiful country was fighting for freedom.
THE END translated and subtitled by finix http://radical-finix.blogspot.com
Recording:
"Guilde Internationale du Disque"
Prelude and Isolde's death by R. Wagner conducted by Carl Bamberger
Music as indicated by Luis BUNUEL
An Andalusian Dog
Director
Writers
Cast
Cinematography
Once upon a time ...
Eight years later.
Around three in the morning...
Sixteen years before.
In spring...
The End
Such was McTeague.
Such was Mother
McTeague.
Filled with the one idea of having her son enter a profession and rise in life ... the chance came at last to
Mother McTeague.
His mother's ambition was fired ... and Mac went away with the dentist to learn his profession.
Mac learned dentistry, after a fashion, through assisting the charlatan .... and, years later, on Polk
Street in San Francisco, "Doc"
McTeague was established.
"Have a seat, Marcus."
"Trina, Mac's the strongest duck you ever seen -- by damn!"
"That's Maria ... she keeps Mac's place clean. She's cuckoo in the head."
"Buy a ticket in the lottery?"
"-- just a dollar!"
"Go 'long with you!
Lotteries is against the law!"
"-- the butcher in the next block won twenty dollars the last drawing!"
"Mac, old pal, I wantcha to shake hands with my cousin, Trina Sieppe.
She's my sweetie!"
"Don't you hurt her too much, Mac."
"So long, Mac, I got to do some work yet ... at the dog hospital."
"Don't do anything I wouldn't do .... you know!"
"I guess I'll have to pull them three teeth and make you a bridge."
"Oh no! That will cost too much, won't it?"
For the first time in his life, McTeague felt an inkling of ambition to please a woman.
During the next two weeks Trina was a daily patient.
"Ether ... not so dangerous as gas."
So Mac administered the ether.
But below the fine fabric bred of his mother, ran the foul stream of hereditary evil ... the taint of generations given through his father.
Terrified at his weakness,
McTeague threw himself once more into his work with desperate energy ... until he finished.
"Oh, Mac's all right ... by damn!"
Trina was to come no more.
His dream was gone.
The following Sunday,
Marcus took Mac to the Cliff House.
"What's the matter with you these days, Mac ... huh?"
"It's ... it's ... Miss Sieppe!"
"You mean ... that you, too --"
"She's been the first girl I've ever known.
I couldn't help myself!"
"-- I was so close to her -- "
"-- an' smelled her hair --"
"-- an' felt her breath!"
"Oh! ... you don't know!"
"Well ... what are we goin' to do 'bout it?"
"I'll give her up to you, old man --"
"-- by damn!"
"Friends for life --"
"-- or ... death!"
"I'm ... much ... obliged,
Marcus. I'm much ... obliged!"
Then, with unselfish friend- ship for his "pal", Marcus took Mac to Oakland the next Sunday ... that he might again be with Trina and meet her folks.
"Mac, this is Trina's father!"
"Sure glad t' know ya, Mr. Sieppe."
"Mommer!"
"Doc,...shake hands with my cousin, Selina."
"Here's where we shell out, Mac."
"Gimme four bits!"
"I ain't got no money with me ... only a dime!"
What a day that was for McTeague ... what a never-to-be-forgotten day!
Weeks passed and March rains put a stop to their picnics ... but Mac saw
Trina every Wednesday and
Sunday.
"Let's go over and sit on the sewer."
"-- 'Hearts and
Flowers'?"
"No ... but, 'Nearer My
God to Thee'."
"Say, Miss Trina,... why can't us two get married?"
"Why not? Dontcher like me well enough?"
"Then ... why not?"
"Because!"
First .... chance had brought them face to face; now .... mysterious instincts, as ungovernable as the winds of the heavens, were knitting their lives together.
"Let me go alone .... please!"
"-- you may ... you may come Sunday!"
"Can't I kiss ya again?"
"I've got her! By God ...
I've got her!!"
Trina and Mac became engaged. The event was celebrated with a theatre party.
"I liked the lady best ... who sang those sad songs."
"I liked pest ... der yodlers!"
"I liked best ... the fellow who played 'Nearer My
God to Thee' ... on the beer bottles."
"Behave!"
And afterwards, there was to be "some- thing to eat" at Mac's dental parlors.
"Your lottery ticket has won five thousand dollars!"
"Oh! .... there's a mistake!"
"On presentation of your ticket .... you will receive a check for five thousand dollars!"
"What will you do with all this money,
Trina?"
"Get married on it .... for one thing!"
"Can't we go into your parlors and celebrate?"
The party ended late. Mac and Marcus gave up their rooms to Trina, "Der
Mommer" and little
"Owgooste".
"Oh, Mac! Think of all this money coming to us .... just at this moment."
"Come along, Mac. We've gotta sleep with the dogs tonight you know."
"What a damn fool
I was --"
"-- if I'd a' kept
Trina, I'd a' had ... five thousand bucks!"
"-- damn the luck!"
Trina and Mac were married a month later in the photographer's rooms that
Mac rented for their future home.
-- and then they viewed the gifts.
-- and then, for two full hours, they gorged themselves.
-- then, came the farewell.
"Doctor ... be good to her! Be very good to her ... won't you?"
"Der's nuttin' to pe
'fraid of! Go to your husban'."
The early months of married life wrought changes.
Since her lottery winning,
Trina feared their good luck might lead to extravagance; and her normal instinct for saving became a passion.
"I haven't no small change, Mac."
For quite some time,
McTeague had his eye on a little house .... that they might be by themselves.
"What d'yer think?"
"We can't afford such extravagance. Thirty- five dollars ... and the water extra!"
In the new order of life, Trina reduced
Mac's visits to Frenna's
Saloon to one night a week.
"Say, Mac .... when are ya gonna pay me that money you owe me?"
"Huh? Do ... I ... owe ... you ... any money?"
"Well, you owe me ... four bits! I paid for you and Trina that day ... at the picnic!"
"You oughta have told me before."
"I'm ... I'm much obliged to you, Marcus."
"-- and you never paid me for sleepin' in my dog hospital the night you was engaged, either!"
"Do you mean ... I ....
I shoulda paid for that, too?"
"Well,... you'd a' had to pay four bits for a bed anywheres!"
"What's the matter with you lately, Marcus?
Is there somethin' I've done?"
"All I know is ... that
I been soldiered out of my girl --"
"-- an' out o' my money!"
"Do I get any o' them five thousand bucks from the lottery?"
"It ain't mine to give!"
"You're drunk! ... that's what you are!"
"Am I gonna get some o' that money?"
"-- I'm through with you!!"
"He broke my pipe!!"
"-- he can't make small o' me!"
"He broke my pipe! --"
Marcus' attack was soon a forgotten incident. Mac's moods of wrath always faded in Trina's company.
"-- Mommer wants ... me --"
"-- wants ... US --"
"-- to send her fifty dollars."
"Well, I guess we can send it ...... can't we?"
"I wonder if Mommer thinks we're millionaires?"
"Trina, you're gettin' to be a regular stingy!
You're gettin' worse and worse every day!"
"But .... fifty dollars is fifty dollars!"
"Well, you got a lot saved up ... and besides, you still got all o' your five thousand."
"Don't talk that way,
Mac! That money is never ... never going to be touched!"
"If Mommer really needs the money so badly .... she'll write again."
Trina's miserly attitude grew steadily through the following months ... but her brusque outbursts of affection kept her tolerable to the slow-thinking McTeague.
"Well .... bygones is bygones, ain't they,
Mac?
"Sure!"
"Well ... how's business,
Doc?"
"-- plenty o' money?"
"-- lots to do?"
"Everythin' just fine .... huh?"
"We've got lots to do -"
"-- but we haven't got no money!"
"Well,... I'm goin' away.
Goin' in cattle ranchin with a English duck."
"Comin' back? Why,...
I ain't never comin' back."
"I came t' say
'goodbye'."
"I guess we won't never see each other again."
"I guess so."
"Good luck .... t' you both!"
"Goodbye! That's the best thing I ever heard
Marcus say."
So Marcus had left .... left for good. Never again should they be disturbed by him.
"Why .... it isn't possible!"
"Well .... I ain't gonna quit for just a piece o' paper!"
"Go on, Mac! Get all the money you can before they make you stop."
"It's MARCUS .... that's done it! --"
"-- damn his soul!!"
Only little by little did the McTeagues understand the calamity that had befallen them.
"I got ev'rythin' fixed, an' ready an' waitin' ... an' nobody's ever gonna come any more."
"That's the way to rub it out ... by me crying on it."
"If...I...ever...meet...
MARCUS SCHOULER!"
"If...you...ever...do!"
With the stopping of
McTeague's practice, the grind began. Trina sold everything; she worked at toy whittling that her money might remain untouched.
"They fired me!"
"Isn't there another surgical instrument factory in town?"
"Yes...there's...there's two more."
"We're losing money every second you sit here! --"
"-- and we cannot afford it!"
"They paid you ... didn't they?"
"-- always money!"
"Better gimme a nickel for carfare --"
"-- it's a long walk --"
"-- an' it's gonna rain."
"A big fellow like you ... 'fraid of a little walk!"
"You oughta taken a car."
"You're goin' to catch your death o' cold!"
"Two straight, Joe."
"It kind o' disagrees with me."
"Aw ... hell! You'll die ... if you stand 'round soaked like that."
Gold was her master .... a passion with her, a mania, a veritable mental disease.
"Did you get a place?"
"Did you ... get caught ... in the rain?"
"Wouldn't even gimme a nickel ... for carfare!"
"I didn't know it was going to rain."
"Didn't I tell you it was?"
"You ain't gonna make small o' me .... all the time!"
"Did you ... get a place?"
"Gimme back the money
I gave ya!"
"I ... paid ... the grocery bill with it."
"I don't believe ya!"
"Why, Mac ... do you think
I'd lie to you?"
"Did you ... get a place?"
"Ain't that fine?"
"Ain't it lovely?"
"I won't have you yell at me ... like that!"
"You're gonna do ... just as I tell you ... after this ... Trina McTeague!"
"Yes! ... I been drinkin' whiskey!"
"I'm beat out ... an'
I don't wanta be bothered!"
"I wonder where he got the money ... to buy the whiskey?"
As time went on, Mac's idleness became habitual.
His dislike for Trina increased with every day of her persistent stinginess.
"I'll get some money and come back."
"You with all that money .... an' me with nothin'. Come'n!"
"Don't you love me any more, Mac?"
"Sure I do!"
As Trina's greed grew, Mac's ambition waned .... and died. They sank lower and lower that Trina might still save from her meager earnings.
"That's three days old.
It's hardly fit for dogs."
"Where's my change?"
"Two bits ... out o' a dollar?"
"Do you think I'd ... cheat you?"
Mac's meal was eaten and finished in silence.
For the first time in his life he had thoughts.
"So long!"
"Kiss me goodbye, Mac?"
"Why don't you bring some of your fish home sometimes?"
"It might save you a nickel."
"I think I'll take them birds o' mine along."
"Sell 'em?"
"You ought to get at least five dollars for them."
"Maybe ... six dollars!"
"Well ... so long!"
"- how I've slaved, and starved for you."
Mac never returned after that day .... so
Trina took employment as a scrub-women.
And with all her gold, she was alone .... a solitary, abandoned woman.
"Say, Trina ... lemme in, will ya?"
"I ain't had nothin' t' eat since yesterday mornin'."
"I'll see you starve before you get another penny ... of my money!"
"I wouldn't let a dog go hungry!"
"Not ... if he'd bitten you?"
"If I had hold o' you, I'd --"
"I want that five thousand!"
"I bet ... it'll rain tomorrow."
McTeague had been missing from San Francisco for weeks, when --
The Fugitive.
"-- I know 'um well!
I can identify 'um!"
"-- an' that five thousand he got away with .... belongs to me!"
"There ain't a man o' you big enough t' stop me from goin'!"
"Lord love you, come
'long then. He's been reported headin' for
Death Valley."
That night desolation lay still around Mac. Every nerve cried aloud for rest, yet every instinct seemed goading him to hurry on.
"Damn you! Come on, will ya .... an' have it out!"
"If it gets much hotter ...
I don't know!"
"God! .... what a country!"
And for days, on Mac went .... chasing the receding horizon that always fled before him.
The last water hole.
"It's impossible to cross
Death Valley! There ain't enough water for one man an' his mount .... let alone eight!"
"We've got to circle
'round the Valley."
"Like hell I will! I ain't sworn in."
"I'll do ... as I please!"
"Go on then ... you damn fool! But I ain't got nothin' t' do with it!"
"If you catch him, put these bracelets on him an' bring him in!"
McTeague was headed for the very heart of Death
Valley .... that horrible wilderness of which even beasts were afraid.
"It's goin' to be worse than ever today."
"By damn ... if he ain't got no water with
'um, I'll be in a bad way."
But hatred and the greed for gold kept
Marcus up .... and closer and closer he came.
"What did ya do with that five thousand?"
"Got any water?"
"Is all the water we got ... on the saddle?"
"He ate some loco-weed.
We'd better finish him ... t'ain't right to let 'um suffer."
"There's no water ... within a hundred miles o' here!"
"We...are...dead...men!"
"Even if we're done for, I'll take some o' my truck along."
"I ain't so sure 'bout who that money belongs to!"
"-- an' don't try and load that gun either!"
"Don't you lay your fingers on that sack!"
{1318}{1470}A picture with a smile -|and perhaps, a tear.
{1584}{1728}"Charity Hospital"
{1789}{1910}The Woman -|whose sin was motherhood.
{2966}{3000}Alone.
{3124}{3154}The man.
{7670}{7710}His morning promenade.
{8246}{8292}"Awkward ass."
{9860}{9912}"Pardon me, you dropped something."
{13955}{14013}"Is that yours ?"
{14057}{14103}"What its name?"
{14305}{14340}"John"
{18703}{18877}Five years later...
{20147}{20210}"Put the quater in the gas meter."
{21912}{22004}"You know what streets we worked today ?"
{26201}{26270}All`s well...Job number 13.
{27148}{27167}Off duty.
{29578}{29632}The woman -|now a star of great prominence.
{30053}{30112}Professor Guido, impressario.
{30410}{30504}"Read what the critics say... wonderful!"
{32485}{32610}Charity -|to some a duty, to others a joy.
{40613}{40662}Enter - his brother.
{41194}{41232}" You wicked boy."
{41436}{41491}"Go lick`im."
{41713}{41781}"If your kid beats my brother,|then i`m going to beat you."
{43726}{43821}"And you wouldn`t strike this man,|would you?"
{44516}{44671}"Remember - if he smites you on one cheek,|offer him the other."
{45334}{45365}A successful retreat.
{45990}{46062}"Oh, well, I guess he`s not in.".
{46483}{46581}"This child is ill. Get a doctor at once!"
{46731}{46823}"I must go now, but I`ll return."
{47040}{47145}The country doctor.
{48000}{48032}"Say `ah`."
{48573}{48601}"Louder!"
{49254}{49323}"Are you the father of this child?"
{49401}{49426}"Well - pràctically."
{49513}{49565}"Explain yourself."
{50547}{50630}"This child needs proper care and attention."
{50843}{50897}"I`ll attend to the matter."
{51541}{51744}Convalescence
{52082}{52151}The proper care and attention.
{52356}{52452}Country Orfan Asylum
{52916}{52994}"Ask him where the kid is."
{53125}{53237}"Ask him if he`s got any belongings."
{53300}{53375}" Tell him it`s none of his business."
{60083}{60116}Night.
{63375}{63553}"You don`t charge for a baby in arms ?"
{64197}{64369}$1000 Reward|Lost child wanted...
{67928}{67975}Dawn.
{70316}{70357}Dreamland.
{71962}{71991}Shopping.
{72503}{72553}Off for a spin.
{72797}{72826}Sin creeps in.
{72858}{72908}Welcome to our city.
{73211}{73248}The trouble begins.
{73385}{73426}"Vamp him."
{73667}{73698}Innocence.
{74237}{74277}Getting flighty.
{74440}{74480}Her sweetheart arrives.
{75083}{75126}Jealousy.
{78571}{78696}The End
{78712}{78785}translation
TARTUFFE
Great is the number of hypocrites on earth!
And many are the forms in which they appear - !
Many a time we unsuspectingly sit next to them...!
For see - - -
Perhaps Your Honour would write the letter to the Notary today - - ?!
- - The letter to the Notary - -
My dear Notary!
I have learned from information gathered by my faithful old house-keeper that my grandson is leading a most unworthy and dissipated life, having become an actor -
- against my will.
I therefore have decided to leave my entire fortune to the good old lady who attends to my household.
Now for the letter-box!
- - ring to your heart's content - !
Your grandson! The actor!!
Grandfather!
Out with you!
But Granddad!
Get out, I say!
Someone's been handing you too much 'soft soap' -
Get out, I say!
Perhaps the young gentleman would call again some other day - !
You, who witnessed this scene, may rest assured that I shall not give in without a struggle - -!
- I shall come back and release my granddad from this humbug!
The Touring Cinema!
The grand Touring Cinema -!
We want no cinema!
But fair lady -!
Fair lady -
What will you show - ?
A story of Saints and Sinners -!
Wait a minute!
A cinema! A cinema!
What nonsense!
Whereas, as a rule, day-in, day-out,
I only consider my master's well-being!
- - I shall come!
I shall be back in a minute.
The title of the comedy - -
Tartuffe - or the play of Mr Orgon and his well beloved friend.
Persons in the play:
Voilà! the play can begin!
Elmire is expecting her husband back from a long journey.
The carriage is in sight.
Dorine, I am so happy!
Elmire, if you knew how happy I am!
Then kiss me!
To kiss is to sin, so teaches my friend Tartuffe.
Tartuffe? Who is your friend Tartuffe?
A saintly man! He comes here!
I hurried on to prepare all for his reception!
Hullo, Pierre, Jean, Jacques!
Clear out all this rubbish!
Mr Tartuffe does not approve of luxuries!
I do not recognise him - -
- - it's like a religious mania!
I'll bring him to his senses!
There is a quaint looking fellow waiting outside the house.
He says he is expected.
You fool! And you didn't ask him in?
For heaven's sake put the lights out.
Tartuffe does not approve of extravagance!
What an alarming looking fellow!
Hullo, - Jacques -
Jean, Pierre, Camille!
Tartuffe does not approve of so many servants, and so - -
- - you shall leave - -
You - - and - -
- - and you - -
Go, all of you!
Oh, dear sir, for twenty years
I have been in your service - -
Don't send me away -!
You shall stay - -
- to wait on Mr Tartuffe.
In the morning,
Mr Orgon personally sets the breakfast table for Mr Tartuffe - -
First our morning prayer -!
Forgive me, my brother!
Sinful frivolity!
I just found the master's wallet - -!
Received 500 Thaler from Mr Orgon for the poor - Tartuffe
Received 700 Thaler from Mr Orgon for the poor - Tartuffe
Received 2,000 Thaler from Mr Orgon for the poor - Tartuffe
Where is this Tartuffe?
I must talk to you.
Please be sensible, will you - ?
Gently, you'll wake him -
My God, what do you look like?
How unkempt - - and neglected you are - -!
About the vanity of earthly things.
The love of your wife and other persons must be next to nothing compared with the love you owe me.
Your holy friend Tartuffe.
This fellow is imposing on you!
Wait till you know him - -
- and you will look up to him as I do!
Think how happy we were - -
I love you!
I love you!
There, now you've disturbed him -!
My brother, I fear you are cold - -?
Very well. I will try to get to know your friend Tartuffe!
Send him to me!
Oh, convince her and convert her to your way of thinking!
If you are a true friend of my husband's - then quit this house and go away from here - -
You are forcing my husband into religious fanaticism -!
Dear lady -
- Heaven sent me to you -
...In that case - - pray - - forgive me - - -
The impudent fellow!
Call my husband immediately!
I won't have my friend slandered -!!
- - and if I were to give you proof - ?!
- - I will put him to the test - and you, without being seen, shall be my witness!
Right, make whatever arrangements are necessary!
His blind credulity forces me to take this step -!
Dear Mr Tartuffe! I beg your pardon that I broke off our conversation in this way.
I should like to talk over one or two things with you.
Will you take a cup of tea with me this afternoon?
Mrs Elmire
I accept your suggestion merely in order to convince you!
Very well.
We will see how he stands the test -!
Here he comes!
Oh, that you would but believe my words - -
Spare me this masquerade!
I believe in him -!
- - I wish to - - confess to you - - why I asked you to leave us this morning.
I fear I too might fall under the spell of your personality.
- I fear - I love you!
I felt a draught!
Is it a sin to love you, a saint?
I have listened to your confession.
I shall pray for you!
Now, do you believe in him?
Yes - but he must never know -
- - that I induced you to listen.
Oh, my Lord!
Have mercy on the unhappy woman!
There is no other way.
I must risk all to save my husband!
I must see you... alone!
Send Dorine to bed early tonight!
Oh, my Lord, give me the strength to rescue my husband from the clutches of this hypocrite.
When Dorine went to bed - -
I herewith bequeath to my faithful friend,
Tartuffe, my entire fortune.
I implore you, ask no questions, oh my master, but come with me!
Look, that you may be cured!
I am so afraid my husband might come in?
Him??! He is obediently writing his last will and testament in my favour!!!
Are we not sinning - ?
Who sins in secret, does not sin -!
You say that, a Saint?!
- I - a Saint?!
Now, are you convinced, Orgon?!
Oh, my Lord, I thank you for helping me regain my husband's love!
From this time forth, all hypocrites are called - Tartuffe!
Often they sit beside you -
- without your knowing it - - -!
Just like that Tartuffe -
- - you are stealthily trying to obtain possession of my grandfather's money -!!
Stealthily - ?
Poison
A slow but sure poison -
Your role played out! Go pack your boxes!!
Tartuffe!
Tartuffe!
Was I blind?
How could I trust that awful person??
Dear Grandfather, none of us is proof against hypocritesl!
And therefore you - do you know - - who is sitting beside you???
THE END.
The Joyless Street
Director: Georg Wilheim Pabst
Screenplay: Willy Haas
After the novel by Hugo Bettauer
Cast:
Film company: Sofia-Film-Produktion GmbH (Berlin)
Producers: Michael Salkin & Romain Pinès
Act 1
Vienna 1921
Melchior Street
Tomorrow morning: frozen meat from Argentina
The tyrant of Melchior Street: Josef Geiringer.
In the cellar of a house on Melchior Street lives the Lechner family.
Marie has not yet arrived with the margarine.
On the first floor of the same house, Councillor Rumfort lives with his two daughters, Grete and Mariandl.
Cabbage again!
Mariandl, if you eat your cabbage, you will have meat tomorrow.
Marie, The daughter of the Lechners.
What, no margarine! You street urchin! 
I am going to the butcher, Father.
You have to stand in line all night long.
My beloved Egon, please, let me be with you.
You said that we would get married.  I would rather go on the streets
As long as I could get out of this hell.  I love you eternally, Mizzi.
What's going on?  You must get in line for the butcher!
What a crowd!  I should call the police!
Mrs. Greifer, the owner of the Merkl Hotel.
Under cover of her fashion store, she operates a dating club.
What, a winter coat?  But have you paid for the dress yet?
You haven't earned anything for the week!
But Madam, I have been so kind to the men. What else can I do?
Madame, may I have this evening free?  I have to stay in line for the butcher.
While this happened at #1 Melchior Street, at #7 Melchior Street, Mr. Alonso Canez de Valparaiso arrived at the Hotel Carlton with $10,000 dollars in his pocket, and a firm intention to make half a million dollars in three weeks.
General Director Rosenow.
Mr. Canez, the business partner.
My wife and my daughter, Regina.
I've got something important for you.
Vienna is freezing. Vienna needs coal.
Only the Petrowitz mines can deliver.
Mr. Egon Stirner, my private secretary...
We will start a rumor of a strike.
After the stock falls, we will buy at a low price.
Once the rumor is denied, the stock will go back up.
We will sell at a profit of a half a million in gold.
My solicitor, Dr. Leid, and his wife.
Make it short. You are about to propose to me...
... certainly, because of my wealth.
Leave it.  Whatever you say, I won't believe you.
What should I do for you to believe me?
Well, you should become rich, or I should become poor.
Then I will believe you.
I am madly in love with you!
May I take your young man, Regina?
I'd like you to show me where you've been just before with Regina.
Now say to me what you said to her.
Not here, Egon...
I prefer a dark and secluded house
Like a real prankster...
I know a small hotel on Melchior St. where we can share some beautiful moments.
You can put on a false beard and I will put on a veil so we will not be recognized.
Go home without me.
I still have many details to discuss with Canez.
You can use this opportunity to enrich yourself, if you wish...
The way you flirted with Canez was really scandalous.
So, my dear Canez, I will show you the fine nightlife of Vienna.
End of Act 1
Act 2
To the beautiful and joyous Vienna!
And its beautiful women, who are the envy of the world!
Mr. Councillor, come to me immediately!
Otherwise we will lose our seats!
Six hours later, most of the people in the queue realized that there was not enough meat for them.
I don't dare return home without meat.
Just before, two girls knocked at the cellar window.
This is my husband.
Cut it and give her a half.
Without work and without a home for three months...
The hotel owner allowed us to sleep in the stable.
Keep the whole piece!
I don't need it as much as you.
After all, I can return home.
End of Act 2
Act 3
Decree of the Austrian Federal Council
The corps of officials will be disbanded.
The resigning officials will receive two years pay.
Egon Stirner
Let me stay with you, Egon!
Be reasonable, my child, I cannot keep you here.
I will give you everything you need to be happy!
These days you need money to be happy.
Don't you get enough salary for us to live happily together?
You stupid girl!  You don't understand a thing!
Then explain it to me!
Here is an example: tomorrow, if I have 100 dollars
I can earn $500 on the stock exchange, and the next day $1000!
If it makes you happy, I will get $100.
Trebitsch, the owner of the office.
Well, Miss Rumfort, you seem tired today.
Is it a result of how you spent last night?
Do you need a small tip?
This time invest in something secure, like English, or American notes.
No, I should better place it in things that will go up quickly.
How about Petrowitz shares?  They will certainly go up.
We start the rumor. When the stock falls, we get the market. Then...
... we make a 100% profit.
This means that we are rich people!
We must celebrate it, because we have suffered for so long!
What is this? The Councillor's daughter dressed so poorly?
Go immediately to Mrs. Greifer and buy a new coat!
At the Carlton
Two members of the American Red Cross
Well, Davy! Do you like Vienna?
Isn't it a beautiful city with beautiful women?
Of course, James. But we didn't come here for that.
We are here to help Vienna to cope with its misery.
And I am not staying in the hotel!  As soon as tomorrow
I will find for myself a place in a modest quarter.
Has Mrs. Lia left?
She wanted to see the first act of the opera, she will rejoin us...
When a lady arrives, let her straight in.
End of Act 3
Act 4
This is too expensive for us.
Did I ever press you, if you couldn't pay immediately?
Mrs. Greifer, some private clients ...
I wanted to ask if Mrs. Greifer would do a favour for my fiancée...
Midnight
Wait for me in the small parlour.
At the Carlton:  A moment of anguish.
The opera must have finished by now!
Do you want to bet, Dr. Leid, that your wife will arrive in the next 10 minutes?
Dear Doctor, something has happened to your...
Something terrible... She was found in a Hotel at Melchior Street strangled and robbed.
It's all done! Petrowitz shares are for $200!
The investigation.
I could not see well in the semi-darkness, but he had a moustache and a beard.
And could you recognize him?
Maybe...
I reckon, he went to Greifer.
The matter does not concern you, Mrs. Greifer.
I must spend a little time with your customers.
The gentleman was with us that evening at the hotel next room ...
This is a lie ...
Arresting me? Sir, you are joking!
So, can I make a phone call from here?
Please excuse me, Consellor.  You are free.
Excuse me, but this lady is my Consulate Secretary.
Don't be afraid, my darling.  With me you are safe.
Arrest that man, down below in the street.
We were forced to free him right now.
End of Act 4
Act 5
I have waited here for an hour!
I am ready to flee with you.
Flee? Why?
But you are about to be arrested!
Arrested? For God's sake, why?
Because you robbed and murdered Lia Leid in order to invest in the stock market.
Regina, how could you think such a thing?
You don't love me, otherwise you would not lie to me!
Well, are you still going to tell me that you don't have a boyfriend?
I will not remain here any longer!
Go to the streets where you belong, you little tramp!
I will not let you put your foot in my office!
Petrowitz shares have fallen 10 points.
You must sell them now in order to save something!
That is far too expensive.
Your coldness and your indifference are unbearable.
Do you really have no wish at all?
I would like to go to Greifer tonight.
I've lost all at the stock market and now I am in debt.
But, Dad, we will not die of hunger.  You still have your job.
No, not since yesterday.
Now I would like to have my job.
Well, now we should consider letting a room.
Today, my father lost all he had in the Stock Market.
Then you probably need money.
Can you lend me a little?  We have nothing at home.
Alas, I have nothing myself.
But tomorrow a very rich uncle is coming to me for a cup of coffee.
I will introduce you to him, if you want to come for coffee.
I heard that you are looking for a waiter.
Room to let.
Marie, what has happened to you?  Why are you so silent and never laugh?
I wish to be in the same hotel room as we were yesterday.
Look at Rosenow.  She is a dream mistress.
So noble, so aristocratic!
Why did you want to be here
Nothing. Just to look at the room.
Marie, I don't understand.  Do you have a secret?
I have a secret and I will tell it to you...
Last night, soon after you left...
I saw a woman murdered in the next room...
First I heard a scream.
And then I saw it...
I recognized the man!
Who was it?
A certain Egon Stirner
End of Act 5
Act 6
The following afternoon.
The first tenant arrived at the Rumforts.
I am lucky to find a room with such a charming hostess.
It's a very nice room.  How much does it cost?
Dear Miss Rumfort, I get $60 a month for accommodation, and I am going to earn something as well.
I hope we will become good friends.
Miss Rumfort, it is my great displeasure to inform you... that your father owes us.
This is all that we have.
Take it, but say nothing to my father.
I do not want to upset him.
The "clandestine" room of the matchmaker Greifer.
He is already here.  Be very kind to him.
Mr. Canez, you need not worry at all.
My business in Vienna is finished.  I am leaving tomorrow.
I called you in order to help in solving the murder of Lia Leid.
... and she told me the name of the murderer.
It is Egon Stirner, the secretary of Rosenow.
Then she ran away, and I haven't seen her since that night.
Moving in.
Lieutenant, we don't need your charity.
We don't lack anything.
Grete, I can't any longer.  The cabbage is bad.
- I want to eat ... eat meat!
I need your help...
My sister wants to eat, and I have nothing to give her.
Although you haven't been kind to my uncle,
I will be pleased to help you one more time.
Let me introduce myself: Pyotr Orlov, formerly supervised the stables of His Majesty the Tsar...
...and now the chief waiter for Mrs. Greifer.
As an aristocrat, I will tell you straight:
You mesmerized me!
You are one of the most charming women I have ever met.
My word of honour!
I have a small private party next night. You must come.
End of Act 6
Act 7
Have you packed your suitcase?
Yes, you have to leave until the scandal is over.
But why should I leave?
Bank Employee Suspected of Murder.
We have just learnt, that a bank employee, Egon Stirner, was arrested for the murder of Lia Leid, while preparing his escape.
More details tomorrow.
Extracts from the Stirner case
Date: 29 Oct 1921
I plead not guilty.
I really had an appointment with Lia Leid at the scene of the crime.
We discussed a stock market trade that would soon make me rich. 
Since I did not have the necessary capital, she proposed to sell her jewels for cash.
I accepted this proposition.
After an hour, I left alone, so that she would not be seen with me.
She was in good health and in a good mood.
And why did you wear this false beard that night?
A romantic whim of the murder victim.
The "small private party"
... well, you see, I cannot quite offer you everything, you want from me.
We all have been with these hanky-panky girls.
I asked you for a cute little girl, and you gave me this!
I am sorry, sir.
I have to address some psychological problems!
It cannot go on like that, but I will help you again.
I am going to have a live performance shortly. You will be in it, agreed?!
Are you angry at me?
I will get someone to repair the glass.
And I tell you that the little Mariandl took two cans of preserves from the cupboard.
You lie!
A Rumfort doesn’t steal!
I must kindly ask you to leave this room.
Oh well, pal, you must pack your bags.
Boy, you know neither the world nor the women.
You don't know, either, how these poor Viennese girls earn their living.
Let me give you a friendly suggestion.
I will take you to some places in Vienna where you can learn what these women are like.
We must apologize to the Lieutenant, and tell him that he may remain here.
They left.  What will we do, father?
He must eat properly!
End of Act 7
Act 8
Things are better for us.
The hotel owner has allowed us to live in his attic.
Why do you stare at this place every night?
It will be better, if you return to your parents.
You are ill.
Wait, I will cook you hot soup, so you feel better.
Mother, bring me a newspaper.
Will you lend me an egg and some wood, neighbour?
The case of Lia Leid is over.
The proof is overwhelming against Egon Stirner even though he still claims his innocence.
I committed a crime and must pay for that. Forgive me.
I was anxious to see you one last time.
Forgive me the sorrow I have caused you. Marie
Now I believe in your innocence.
I have left my parents.  I love you.
Please repeat your confession in the presence of the accused.
Can you forgive me?
I have always loved only you.
End of Act 8
Act 9
Miss Grete Rumfort, Melchior Street, Vienna
$60 cheque.
Where is Grete?
I believe, Grete is at Mrs. Greifer's.
Change quickly!
Be-gin! Be-gin! Be-gin!
Can you hear what is going on inside?
Wait!  We will also "be-gin" soon!
Why have you done this?
Probably, for the same reason as the other girls: otherwise I and my family will starve to death.
Starve!  And how about the $60 for rent ...?!
Listen to me! She is innocent.
Get out of my way, I've seen enough!
I was sent here to relieve the misery, and I see nothing but glitter, luxury and immorality!
One cannot open a door without seeing misery in all its nakedness.
It's all my fault.
$60 cheque.
The child is starving.
I am too weak to feed him.
Maybe the butcher will give me something, if I kindly ask him.
Please, give me just a little, my child is starving.
Yes, I have enough meat...
... but none for you!
He was killed by young women!  With the meat hatchet!
The attic is on fire.
Save the child!
Ripped with SubRip 1.17 and Verified by CdinT cdint@hotmail.com
I deliver perfection... and don't brag about it! :D
In the great Gold Rush, Alaska was the hope and dream of men, the ruthless siren of the Far North, beckoning thousands to her icy bosom.
Beckoning thousands to her unknown regions.
Chilkoot Pass was the great barrier to the gold fields.
Over this Pass men faced untold misery and hardship.
Many lost their lives.
Some fell by the wayside, others lost courage and turned back.
But the brave went on.
Far into the icy north, deep into the silent nowhere, came an undaunted lone prospector.
And somewhere in that nowhere was another lone prospector.
With cheerful optimism our little Columbus descended, then stopped, stepped, slipped and slid.
"Now let me see", thought the little fellow.
"Before I know where I am,
I must get there."
There in that frozen wilderness a dream came true, and a lone voice shrieked into the solemn sky,
"Eureka! I've found it, a mountain of gold!"
But the elements laughed, roared and thundered.
In that raging nowhere was a lone cabin, and another lone man,
Black Larson, an unmitigated, predatory scoundrel.
Out of the lashing storm came the Little Fellow to find shelter and perhaps a little hospitality.
There he sat, resting his weary bones as the icy wind howled through the knothole.
"Come here", said Larson.
"What are you doing?"
"Eating, obviously."
"Get out."
"Go on!"
"Get out!"
The wind also was giving
Big Jim his troubles.
Big Jim was the noble type.
He had suffered.
Oh, how he loved to suffer.
He suffered about everything.
"Get out", said Black Larson.
"Or I'll fill you both full of lead."
"Now then, the pair of you, get out!"
"Out!"
That kind of noise
Jim don't tolerate.
"I'll stay right here, understand?"
"Right here", said Big Jim.
"Yes, sir, he'll stay right here", said the Little Fellow.
"Understand? We stay right here."
And stay they did, for days and nights.
The cabin moaned and groaned.
Two men walked and never talked, hunger gnawed their bones.
"I must have food!" yelled Big Jim.
"I must have food!"
"What are you eating?"
Said Black Larson.
"Nothing."
"Open your mouth!"
"Liar! It's that candle."
"That?" said the Little Fellow.
"How revolting."
"If I thought you were holding out on me, I'd slit your gizzard!"
"One of us must brave that storm, if we're to get food."
"Come here, the pair of you."
"We'll cut the cards and the low man goes."
"You're the man", said Jim.
"Goodbye, good luck."
"Don't forget to bring home the bacon."
Somewhere in that nowhere, the law was looking for Black Larson.
Desperate with hunger and here it was Thanksgiving Day.
Nevertheless there was something to be thankful for.
"Not quite done yet, give it two more minutes."
"Come on, come on", said Big Jim.
After scouring the country for food, the Little Fellow had to admit he had seen nothing, not even a field mouse.
From the pangs of hunger,
Big Jim was becoming delirious, hysterical.
In fact he was a pain in the neck.
"Food, food!" he thundered.
"I can put another shoe in the pot."
"No, no, anything but that!"
Poor Jim, he couldn't take it.
"What's the matter?"
Said the Little Fellow.
"I thought you were a chicken."
"Well, build up the fire", said Big Jim.
"What's the matter with you?"
Said the Little Fellow.
"Come, my pretty bird", said Big Jim.
"Don't be childish."
"Hey, quit it.
Don't be foolish, it's me!"
"You!" said Jim.
"I'm sorry. I must be crazy."
"You're telling me", said the Little Fellow.
"You go inside. I'll take the gun in case you lose it."
Chicken or no chicken, the Little Fellow looks appetizing to Big Jim.
Meanwhile Black Larson stumbled onto Big Jim's mountain of gold.
Then came the parting of the ways,
Big Jim to his mine, our hero to his fate.
"Goodbye", said the Little Fellow.
"It's been a great pleasure knowing you."
Treachery awaited Big Jim at his mountain of gold.
Big Jim looked deep into the eyes of Black Larson and saw there the soul of a skunk.
Caught in a maelstrom of desperate deeds,
Black Larson swept on to impending doom.
And out of a dream in that frozen waste, a city grew.
And humanity warmed it with living, loving and desiring.
Georgia.
Jack was a ladies' man.
Georgia was quick and impulsive, proud and independent.
In the evening Georgia worked as a dancehall girl.
Jack had lots of appeal for Georgia.
Perhaps that's why she resented him.
Out of the night came the Little Fellow, towards the dancehall, that beacon light of pleasure, that retreat of lost dreams.
"Georgia, why aren't you nice to Jack?"
"I believe he really likes you", said the girl.
"He likes everybody", said Georgia quite audibly.
"I'm bored with this place", she continued.
"I'd give it all up if I could find someone honest and worthwhile."
"Don't worry,
I'll find him someday."
Then she turned and looked and looked and looked.
"Kinda fresh, ain't ya?"
Thought Jack.
"Get down off that high horse."
"Me and you are gonna dance."
"Hey there, pan out a tune."
"Just a moment,
I said we're gonna dance."
"I beg your pardon", said Georgia.
To show her utter contempt for Jack, she picked out the most deplorable looking tramp in the dancehall.
"Hey you, come here."
"Yes, you. Do you want to dance?"
"You see, I'm very particular about whom I dance with."
And there he stood, the dauntless cavalier, guarding... her sanctuary.
"If you wanna make a hit with your lady friend",
"you should put your hat on straight, like this!"
"Take that you... Ouch!"
"Huh! Very good."
"Didn't know me own strength", said the Little Fellow.
Hank Curtis' cabin was a stone's throw from the dancehall.
Hank was a mining engineer who lived alone and occasionally went on long expeditions into the Far North.
Hank was kind and human, and our hero cold and hungry, and the beans smelled good and the coffee was steaming hot.
So the Little Fellow devised a way of getting breakfast.
Big Jim recovered from the blow he received from Black Larson but lost his memory.
Hank's partner arrives.
Both are ready to leave on a long expedition.
Hank informs his partner that the Little Fellow is to look after the cabin while he's away.
"Goodbye", said Hank.
"And don't forget to feed the mule."
Since that night in the dancehall the Little Fellow hadn't seen Georgia, but an incident was to bring them together again.
There she stood, her loveliness lighting the room, filling his soul with the music of romance for which he was so ill-fitted.
As she introduced her friends, his heart began to sing.
As they warmed up by the stove, he excused himself to get firewood.
And in that cabin his secret was revealed, his love for Georgia.
And the girls giggled and laughed, perhaps in order to hide their pity.
For in the world of the dancehall it wasn't wise for the girls to reveal their hearts.
And so they thought they'd have a little fun with him.
There in the gloaming they sat, their faces alight with mischief, but all the while his heart was singing.
And so she fooled and flirted and stroked his hair.
He knew she was fooling, but he was happy.
For she was near him, holding his hand, smiling at him.
"Nice place you have here", said Georgia.
"I hope you will invite us again."
What if she were fooling?
He was enjoying the warmth of her attention.
And the lady was enjoying the warmth of his chair.
And now she was leaving.
The light of her loveliness would be gone.
And he would be left with an emptiness, to return to his bleak, lonely existence.
"Pardon me", said the Little Fellow,
"But, uh..."
He was lost for words.
"Would you really like to come again?"
"Of course", said Georgia.
"What do you say, girls?"
"We'll come for dinner
New Year's Eve", said the ladies.
"Very well", said Georgia.
"We'll come to dinner
New Year's Eve."
Of course at that moment
Georgia would forget her gloves!
For the next few days the Little
Fellow hustled and shoveled in order to buy that New Year's dinner.
The eve of a new year.
New hopes and new dreams.
And there was Georgia, caressing him with her smiles and tender glances.
And the girls called for a speech.
But he was too happy to speak.
All that mattered was Georgia was there. Georgia!
So he muttered and stuttered and finally said,
"I can't make a speech but I'll do a dance."
And a dance he did, with the rolls.
Should auld acquaintance be forgot
And never brought to mind
Should auld acquaintance be forgot
And days of auld lang syne
For auld lang syne
My dear
For auld lang...
In the midst of all their revelry the vague memory of a promise crept into Georgia's mind.
"Let's go up and visit the Little Fellow", she said.
"We'll have some fun with him", said Jack.
"We'll send Georgia in first, then give him a scare."
"Oh, forget it", said Jack.
"How about giving me a little attention?"
A day or so later in the Recorder's office,
Big Jim tried to convince the assayers that he had a mountain of gold.
"Where is this place?" they said.
But Big Jim's memory had failed him.
All he knew was that it was near the cabin.
"The cabin, that's it!"
"F I could find my way to the cabin
I could find the mine."
"But I can't remember."
"Hey!" said Jack,
"Georgia's been looking for you."
The Little Fellow knew otherwise.
How dare that cad mention her name so lightly?
For two pins he'd give him another thrashing.
However being a little underweight he would ignore the insult.
But it was true.
Georgia had been looking for him.
Georgia had written him a letter.
And as he went looking for Georgia, so Big Jim went looking for him.
"You, you!" said Big Jim.
"You! The very man
I've been looking for!"
"The cabin, the cabin! Where is it?"
"Answer me, I say!"
"Can't you speak, man? Tell me!"
"Where's the cabin? Where is it?"
"At last I shall find my mountain of gold."
"To your feet man, quick!"
"You're coming with me!"
"Take me to the cabin and I'll make you a millionaire!"
"Georgia! Just a moment", said the Little Fellow.
"Georgia, you don't have to explain.
I understand."
"I love you.
I'll take you away from this life."
"I'm going away, and when I return",
"I shall come back."
Exhausted and footweary, they arrived at the cabin.
"Ah!" said Big Jim,
"it won't be long now."
"Bring in the eats and tomorrow we'll start for the mine.
"Here, take a swig of this.
It'll put hair on your topcoat."
"My, this is a heavy lamb chop", said the Little fellow.
Then fate - it's always fate - played its little joke, and again the elements laughed, roared and thundered, but through it all our heroes soundly slumbered.
Then came the dawn.
The Little Fellow awoke, blissfully ignorant of what happened the night before, but feeling definitely conscious of "the morning after".
"Oh well, may as well tidy up and get breakfast."
"This is the worst liver attack
I've ever had."
"Feel that rocking?"
"It's the stomach."
"It's not the stomach."
"Let's go to the other side."
"We'll see how far it will go over."
"Something must be missing underneath."
"I'll go outside and see what it is."
"Now", said Big Jim,
"don't get excited."
"Take it easy, don't move, don't breathe!"
"I said don't breathe, stupid."
"You can be most annoying at times."
"If you'll only be cool, be calm", said Big Jim,
"We have nothing to worry about."
"Now show a little character!
Where's your willpower?"
"Now listen,
I've got a very good idea."
"Hold your hands like this, then I can get out first."
"You see what I mean?"
Said Big Jim.
"Your mind is chaotic.
You have no psychology."
"You have no control."
And Big Jim discovered his claim!
"Now we shall be rich", said Jim.
"We shall be millionaires!"
And so they were.
Now they were homeward bound and they were leaving the hardship and toil of Alaska to live in the land of milk and honey.
To live, laugh and indulge themselves in the lap of luxury.
They were famous, and sought after by the press.
In their cabin deluxe they were welcomed and waited upon.
The reporter wanted to write the Little Fellow's life story,
"From Rags to Riches", and he graciously consented.
And Big Jim was manicured.
"Not the nails", said he,
"the corns".
The reporter thought of a good idea, to have the Little Fellow pose in his mining clothes.
It would make a human story.
Georgia...
There she was in the steerage.
Neither knew of the other's presence.
Georgia overheard the officer say there was a stowaway aboard.
"You!" said Georgia.
"I thought I'd never see you again."
And then she mistook him for the stowaway.
The officer was going to put him in irons.
But Georgia pleaded for him and said she would pay his fare.
"Heck!" said the Captain.
"That's no stowaway."
"That's Big Jim's partner, the multimillionaire."
Then of course there were apologies.
The Little Fellow gathered himself together.
James, the valet, was told to prepare for an extra guest.
"Pardon me", said the reporter,
"but who's the lady?"
"Buzz buzz buzz!"
"Oh, you don't say!
Well, congratulations."
"This will make a great story, and with a happy ending."
And so it was.
A happy ending.
Subtitles by Sionann O'Neill
Subtitling: TVS - TITRA FILM
MEZHRABPOMRUS 1927
THE GIRL WITH THE HAT BOX
Written with the goal of promoting the issue of public loans, this comedy, one of Barnet's first works, is interesting for its lyricism and for its new way of presenting characters.
Natasha Korostelyova and her grandfather lived in a small house in Moscow's suburb.
Every day Fogelev, the railroad clerk, rushed after the object of his hopeless love.
Natasha and her grandfather made hats at home.
I'm afraid, Natashenka, that you'll soon fly away from me!
You mean marriage?
Don't be afraid!...
Every morning Natasha brought the ordered hats to Moscow...
From his remote village
Ilya Snegiryov was coming to Moscow dreaming to enter the worker's faculty.
MADAME IRENE, HATS, was the shop for which Natasha worked.
Marfushka, the shop owner's servant.
Madam, the house committee is here!
One of the apartment's rooms of Mrs Irene was registered under Natasha's name but it was in fact occupied by Nikolay
Matveevich Trager, Irene's husband.
And where's Natalya Korostelyova, the tenant registered here?
Darling, you should spend the night here sometimes!
The house committee is bothering us again!
I'd like to know your turnover.
I'm the tax assessor.
Idiot! It's the tax assessor!
In search of housing.
Excuse me, is there a room for rent anywhere?
Ilya Snegiryov spent all nights at the railway stations.
For heaven's sake, what do you want from me?
Excuse me, I...
Incidentally...  dropped a rouble... searched... I have nowhere to sleep...
What were you dreaming of, Natasha?
Poor boy, he has no place to sleep.
In search of another meeting.
Madame Irene's home was preparing to receive guests.
I can get you a room if you want.
Ilya Snegiryov. small farmer.
Single...
...Married.
Natalya Korostelyova. Milliner.
Single...
...Married.
You asked, I got it fixed : here is my husband!  He's gonna live in my room.
I'll let nobody in! Though you're registered in this room, it is not yours!
You'd better not offend my wife!
Is it her room or not?
Where is it?
Well, here's our tenant... and she's just got married!...
May I ask you to go into the next room!
It's falling.
Good-bye "husband"!
I'll visit you some day...
The first night went perfectly.
Mr and Mrs Trager declare war.
I declare that tenant Natasha Korostelyova, de facto, doesn't intend to inhabit her room.
On the basis of all above mentioned it is obvious that Ilya Snegiryov, inhabiting the room, turns out to be her so-called husband and, thereby, is entitled to be evicted from the apartment that I'm responsible for.    N. Trager
Nothing, but lottery bond...
Irene darling! give me some money...
I'm broke! heads and tails...
You're still indebted to me for my work.
Pay this trollop!
STATE LOTTERY LOAN
Stop singing!
Madame, the house committee has come to see the new tenant!
And where is your, so to speak, wife?
I'm here!
Lend me 30 kopecks for the return ticket till tomorrow...
Fogelev still hoped that
Natasha would come with the last train.
I'm late for the last train!
...The last train swept his last hope away...
Aren't you sleeping?
Yes, I am!
I'm afraid! A mouse is running!
My God! A rat!
In the morning...
Let's listen now to the first winning numbers of the state lottery loan...
10.000 roubles prize goes to the bond 7219, serial number 05...
25.000 roubles prize... goes to the bond n掳 1419963, serial number 03...
Natasha's address! Quick!
She won 25.000 roubles with my lottery bond!
Natasha's address!!
Working with a round jack.
Going to the station for a newspaper...
I love you!
Natashka, marry me!
Give me back the bond!
It is a dear souvenir to me...
I left it in Ilya's room.
Here's your bond!
You won 25.000 roubles!
Farewell...
I wanted to say...
I agree, I'll...
... be your wife!
Now I don't agree!...
Farewell!
I request to dissolve my marriage with citizen N. P. Korostelyova, she won 25.000 roubles and people could consider that I'd married her for money.
Ilya Snegiryov
I agree - - - -
Your wife wanted money instead of bond...
It's for me the uttermost pleasure!
The lottery bond is in her hands!
Give me back the bond!
Before it's too late, Fogelev decided to make an offer to Natasha.
Sign the divorce petition...
I DO NOT agree - - -
Why are you making fun of me?
- - - N. Korostelyova
Here's your bond!
Idiot! Go and buy one hundred bonds!
THE END
www.scifi-world.org
RUSClCO Company presents a new project: the first in the national history film in a fantasy genre by Yakov Protazanov, "Aelita" , based upon Alexei Tolstoy's novel of the same name.
The film is released with frame-by-frame cleaning of the picture and in a new musical arrangement using the works of composers
Alexander Skryabin,
Igor Stravinsky and Alexander Glazunov.
On December 4, 1921 , at 18:27 European Standard Time, all the radio stations on Earth received a strange message.
Anta... Odeli... Uta...
Anta... Odeli... Uta...
Anta... Odeli... Uta... ln charge of the Moscow radio station was engineer Los (N.M. Tseretelli).
Pass it immediately to the bureau of deciphering.
At the evacuation center of the Kursky
Railway Station.
Among the employees of the center was Natasha, engineer Los' wife.
Red Army soldier Gusev (l.P. Batalov) arrived from the front for recuperation.
The deciphering bureau failed to make out the mysterious radio.
- Couldn't it be a radio from Mars to our inventors?
Los' close friend and colleague - engineer Spiridonov (N.M. Tseretelli)
Anything's possible! Perhaps they on Mars got worried about you and me!..
Come here, happy newlywed.
Your wife is calling again. l can leave earlier today.
Come and meet me.
Anta... Odeli... Uta... 18-27
All Los' brain power and energy have been devoted to one task - to the trip to Mars, and in his imagination he often pictured...
Aelita the Queen
(Yu.l. Solntseva). lkhoshka, Aelita's favorite servant
(A.F. Peregonets ).
Tuskub the Ruler (K.V. Eggert).
Gor, keeper of the planet's energy
(Yu.A. Zavadsky).
A model of the apparatus built by Gor for observing the life on other planets. lt's a great discovery, but let it remain a secret... for everybody!..
Show me other worlds...
No one will know about it.
All right... ln the evening l'll meet you at the tower of radiant energy... ln the evening
Only to you l'll show the life on a neighboring planet.
Time to go back.
Tuskub may come and see us.
Touch my lips with yours, like humans do... on Earth.
Spiridonov spent all evenings at his friend's place, working with him on building a spaceship to fly to Mars. lf only we could find the source of energy that would overcome
Earth's gravity!..
From the first day Gusev had become the infirmary's favorite.
Nurse Masha (V.G. Orlova)
"Love me or not, honey!.."
" A soldier got no money!.." ln 1921 the railways had no lack of passengers.
Comrade Erlikh and his wife, Yelena
We don't provide quarters.
Go to the women's section.
You're so...
Get out of here!
What the cheek!
Victor, l have the address of an old acquaintance... Let's give it a try!..
That day they were distributing food rations at the evacuation center. l'm not angry... about the past,
Yelena. lntroduce me to him as your brother.
White bread...
Victor Karlovich Erlikh
Who's that character writing to you?
You're so charming that l cannot believe you would be so cruel to me...
You're jealous, aren't you?
The food Erlikh brought made it possible to have a feast that was rare for Moscow, and remember "the beautiful past" .
What the hell! lt's sour, this wine! l remember the wine we had before...
Oh!.. Before, all human relationships were so sensitive, delicate...
Yes... Before we had order...
The days went on... Los stubbornly continued his experiments.
After each failed experiment,
Los went on dreaming...
Anta, Odeli, Uta
Excuse me!.. l'm the Chairman of the House Committee, l do my duty.
You'll have to vacate your laboratory for a new tenant.
You know, we have met before.
Do you remember?..
This is Erlikh, our new tenant.
At the evacuation center, an active preparation for a show was going on.
Join us... We're having such fun!
Yelena was successfully carrying out her husband's instructions.
On the day of the show, Natasha received a food ration at the club.
As a Soviet functionary,
Erlikh was doing fine.
To Mr. Pavlov - one sack of sugar. l've brought sugar... We must hide it!
Hurry!.. l told you we could pluck that goose.
The evacuation center's people decided to outdo the academic theatres.
Comrade Gusev is our chief assistant director.
The chocolate is real! l have to go home. l got a lot of work.
At the distribution center, an unpleasant discovery was made.
The center's manager went for help to the Chief of the Criminal lnvestigation. lnvestigate it and, if necessary, search Erlikh's apartment. l've got talent. By God, l've got it... l'll prove to you!
Citizen Kravtsov, l repeat it again: l'm not hiring you. l believe you're incompetent.
For the lndian ink, it was necessary to go to Spiridonov.
Got tired, comrade?... l sympathize. l sympathize with you very much. l know everything... l found it in your coat's pocket...
You're lying. You're lying all the time!..
The night seemed agonizingly long after that first quarrel.
Would you like to go to a ball and have fun in spite of all the comrades?
To engineer M.S. Los.
The administration of Volkhovstroi thanks you for almost a year-long work...
Will you go?
Kravtsov decided to investigate on his own the case of the lost sugar.
The meeting place of "businessmen" ...
All tickets are sold out.
You'll make good money!
What a miser! ln a whole week, just one medallion!..
Each reminder of the mysterious radio made his fantasy work with a new force.
For many days now Aelita could not see Earth and...
Today is the meeting of the elders.
No one will know if you go to the tower.
How dare you hide from me the apparatus built by Gor?!
You're a queen, but we're the rulers.
The tower will remain closed.
So, by the decision of the elders, a third of the living workforce is put into cold storage for keeping.
All the workers - the population toiling for the " elders" , never left their dungeons.
The first third to the cold storage!
The first third!
Are you avoiding me, Aelita?..
Your thoughts are occupied with an Earthman..
Wait for me here. l'll come out to you.
Martians were not alien to a feeling of jealousy...
You're in love with an Earthman.
You will never see him! l'm leaving with you all the designs of my "interplanetonef" .
Save them. This is the work of my life.
Are you going alone?
How about Natasha?!
Natasha was impatiently waiting for her husband...
Let's go to the ball. There'll be a most select society there. l'm sure your husband won't mind.
Let's go!.. To spite him!..
Let's have fun!
Anta, Odeli, Uta lllegal ball of the " select society" .
The ball's organizers talked Natasha into having supper with them. l thought you were at the station seeing off your husband going on a trip.
My ravishing, my dear.
Stay at least for half an hour.
Well, a quarter of an hour. l have to leave today. l regret l couldn't say goodbye to you. l may be on this business trip for a long time. Yours, L.
The only joy for Los was the realization that he, too, could take part in the great work of building the new Russia.
Slowly, yet inevitably, life was taking its normal course, and there was less and less work at the evacuation center...
Allow me to go and see off this torturer...
Moscow. March 3, 1922. lt's been over 2 months since your departure, and in this time you've sent me only 3 postcards. lf it's the end...
Krasnopresnensky District
SOVlET
MARRlAGE
REGlSTRY OFFlCE
With the evacuation center closed,
Natasha went to work in a kindergarten.
Los' business trip was coming to an end.
To engineer M.S. Los.
The administration of "VOLKHOVSTROl" thanks you for your 6-month work.
Dear friend! lt's been 2 months now since l left Russia... for good. l feel ashamed to admit it, but the ways and habits of the past proved stronger than me... l hid your designs in the fireplace in your room, where...
And the dream took hold of him again. ln his dreams Los disguises himself as Spiridonov. lt's strange... He hasn't showed up for two months, and today he appears as though he fell from another planet.
The new crime was promising new laurels for Kravtsov.
A suspicious character.
We must found out who he is.
At one of the out-of-the-way outskirts of Moscow.
Kravtsov at his work.
Don't touch it! By this glove l'll find the criminal.
The absence of foreign and home fronts, as well as the enforced inaction, burdened Gusev. l can't do nothing! l've established four republics, and now l'm going sour here...
Hot on the trail. l'm arresting you on a charge of...
Do you have a warrant?!
About the flight... l'll go with my great pleasure!...
Think it over, comrade. lt's a lot of risk and very little profit...
The heights l'm reaching! l'm flying to Mars tomorrow!
On the eve of the flight, the last workers were let to go home.
Next morning Moscow was celebrating one of the great Revolution days.
Where a good detective cannot ride, he will walk.
Five minutes before the flight.
- We're flying! We're flying!
Engineer Spiridonov, you're under arrest for unauthorized return to the RSFSR and murder of engineer Los' wife.
Some Pinkerton! Couldn't tell a false beard and a wig. ln that case... Engineer Los, you're under arrest for... living under someone else's disguise.
This projectile is coming from Earth!
The observatory will fix the time and place of the projectile's fall.
The aliens from Earth must be destroyed.
You must not do harm to the aliens from Earth.
They'll be destroyed! We won't let the plague of earth mutiny onto Mars! l know the time and place of the projectile's fall.
The " elders" did not leave, waiting for the Observatory's report.
Hurry to meet the guests from
Earth and bring them to me.
The moment indicated by Chief
Astronomer was nearing.
Comrades, are you from the militia?..
A man here must be arrested.
May l introduce myself? Commander
Gusev from the Budyonny Cavalry.
Tuskub! Tuskub!
This is an Earthman!
Comrade Tuskubov, allow me, by my mandate, to arrest the criminal Los who arrived on your territory.
Touch my lips with yours, like you do it on Earth...
Do you recognize this necklace,
Tuskub?!
"Love me or not, honey!.."
" A soldier got no money!"
You're mine! We'll be ruling over everybody here together!
Never! Never will l forgive myself for raising my hand against you!
Aelita, on the " elders'" orders, this Earthman is under arrest.
The free speech of free men has won over the " elders'" thousand-year hypnosis.
Comrades! Only you can help yourselves!
We had the same situation.
Everything began with...
October 25, 191 7
...following our example, comrades, form one working family of the Union of Soviet Socialist
Republics of Mars. l'm with you! l will lead you! l don't believe her... lt's not for the masters to make revolutions!
You've got power.
Lay down your arms, you will never need them again on Mars.
Victory! The troops are on our side!
Open fire on the insurgents!
Drive them back to the dungeons! l alone will reign and rule now!..
ANTA, ODELl, UTA
Buy tires by
ANTA, ODELl, UTA
Buy tires by
ANTA... ODELl... UTA!!
We're exposing the mysterious radio - it's our tires trademark.
We're going to the Far East Front.
Our train will be in an hour.
And l've been dreaming again...
Half an hour ago l killed my wife...
But l'm not running away, no... l'll go back to her...
We can't leave the man like that.
He may need help! l was insane when l was shooting at you... l'll be thanking providence all my life for having missed.
Do you still have any doubts?..
No, l believe you... Forgive me.
By the order of a court investigator, you're under arrest.
Enough of dreaming. A different, real work is awaiting all of us!
THE END www.scifi-world.org
LEAVES OUT OF THE BOOK OF SATAN
Four stories by Edgard Hoyer
Adapted for film by Carl Th. Dreyer directed by Carl Th. Dreyer cinematography by George Schneevoigt
So goes the legend of Satanas:
And God said to Satan, the fallen angel:
"You fell because you wanted what even I did not want.""
"In your pride you tempted men..."
"Satan, you shall continue your wicked work amongst humanity."
"Go out among them, take their shape.""
"And whoever yields to your temptation shall be judged by me.""
"And whenever your temptations are resisted, -
- you shall be relieved of
1000 years of your punishment.""
The first story.
Thirty years after the birth of christ.
It happened during the last days -
- of the wanderings of christ upon this earth.
On the second day before aster -
- the priests and the scribes were gathered in the house of caiphas.
The teachings of christ had offended the scribes, and Satanas, -
- who found the ground prepared for his evil seeds, -
- took the form of a Pharisee and went to caiphas.
Satanas - Helge Nissen.
Caiphas.
On the same evening, Jesus and is disciples were guests -
- in the home of Simon the leper.
Jesus - Halvard Hoff
But Satanas found easy ears with the priests and the scribes, -
- who feared the favour Jesus had won with the people for is miracles.
I am just out of Bethany, where everybody speaks of Jesus.
After the raising of lazarus from the dead, -
- Jesus is hailed everywhere as if he were a king. but Satanas is secretly grieved to see that the seed he has newly sown -
- is already beginning to bloom..
If we let him go on in this manner, everybody will believe him in the end -
- and our temples will stand empty.
The anointment of Jesus. and the woman poured ointment on the feet of Jesus -
- and dried them with her hair.
Why was this ointment not sold for three hundred pence -
- and the money given to the poor? but Jesus reproved Judas, saying:
"Let her alone.""
"For the poor ye have always with you, but me ye have not always."" but the scribes claimed with one voice -
- that caiphas should let Jesus be seized and slain.
Your will shall be satisfied.
Woe to him, who opposes us.
He must die!
Why do you believe in him?
God's son is what he calls himself.
The devil"s son is what he is. and you have been tied by the power of the devil.
We shall meet tomorrow at noon-tide outside the Golden Gate.
I know you will come.
The next day was the first day of the festival of the unleavened bread.
Judas had spent a sleepless night, -
- harassed by the doubts put in his head by the Pharisee.
But towards noon he felt -
- as if a will stronger than his own -
- directed his steps towards the Golden Gate.
I mean no ill by you. only the salvation of your soul.
But on this day the disciples had come to Jesus and asked im:
"Where wilt thou that we prepare for thee to eat the pass-over?"" and Jesus answered: ""Go into the city, and there you shall meet -
- a man carrying a pitcher of water. follow him.""
You suffer, and it is his fault. he promised you a Messias ingdom. but he is not God"s son, only a man. An impostor.
He is doomed.
He must die. and Israel's God has chosen you for his tool.
I cannot do it.
I will not do it.
Swear not. I know you will.
I shall expect you at the well -
- when the Romans sound the second change of the watch.
And when the hour had come, -
- he sat down to eat, and the disciples with im. and when they were eating, he said:
""Verily I say unto you, -
- one of you will betray me.""
Master, is it I? and he broke the bread, dipped it, and gave it to Judas, saying:
"That thou doest, do quickly."" and Jesus blessed the cup. the hymn. and having sung the hymn. -
- Jesus and the disciples went out to Gethsemane. but at the same hour, -
- men of the Jewish temple guard went out at the bidding of caiphas -
- to seize Jesus, and
Roman soldiers accompanied them.
Lord, where are you going?
We are tired. et us stay here. and Jesus rose from is prayer and went back to the disciples, -
- but found them asleep with sadness.
How am I to know Jesus?
The kiss of friendship shall be the sign. and Jesus prayed:
"Abba, my ather, if it is possible, take away this cup form me."" but Jesus said:
"The hour is near -
- when the Son of Man will be betrayed by the sinner."" and Jesus asked:
""Who are you searching for?"" but Jesus asked once again:
""Who are you searching for?"" and Jesus said:
"Judas, are you betraying me, the Son of Man, with a kiss?"" but Satanas, the fallen angel, whose whole heart was set -
- upon finding favour again in the eyes of the lmighty, -
- he was grieved to see his evil work completed. and his grief was deeper, because it had fallen to his lot -
- to deliver the son of God into the hands of human tormentors. but the Lord"s voice was heard:
"Continue thy evil doings."
Setting: Seville in Spain.
Setting: Seville in pain.
Time: 16th century.
In the 16th century, the Spanish
Inquisition was at the height of its power. countless are the reports from those days -
- about the horrors of the torture chambers of the Inquisition. the noble don Gomez de castro, who, much to his own satisfaction, -
- was a diligent student of the modern sciences, astronomy and astrology. don Gomez de castro -
Hallander Hellemann. his daughter Isabella, receiving instruction in mathematics and history -
- by the learned monk don Hernandez y Argote
Isabella - Ebon Strandin don Hernandez - Johannes Meyer.
José, the butler.
José - Nalle Haldén.
My nephew, count Manuel, intimates that -
- he has been granted leave from his duties in the war -
- and will pay us a visit.
In vain, don Hernandez subjects himself to the strictest penances. his thoughts always dwell upon Isabella. the Grand Inquisitor.
Satanas - Helge Nissen. don ernandez has become so engrossed by his desire for Isabella -
- that even the holy saint at the foot of the cross -
- to his eyes assumes the figure and expression of Isabella.
My son, why do you not put yourself at the service of the Inquisition?
Remember: for the Inquisition, nothing is unattainable. a few days later. count Manuel de errera. count Manuel - Hugo Bruun. circumstances that I cannot explain -
- have compelled me to take this decision.
It is with grief that I leave this house, -
- whence I take the most cherished memories of my life. for Isabella and Manuel the weeks passed as if in children"s play. and the day came when Manuel must resume his duties in the war.
At the same time, -
- don Hernandez swore unqualified allegiance to the Inquisition.
Swear that you will be ready to serve God ...
... and will be prepared to give up anybody, -
- even your father and mother, sister or brother, -
- to the holy punishment of the Inquisition. the horoscope.
Look, Saturn is opposite its own sign - in the death house.
My last hour is near!
In the antechamber of the Grand Inquisitor.
Be not surprised. José is a faithful friend of the Inquisition.
You are right, José.
He who pretends to read God"s will in the stars is a heretic.
You have heard José"s evidence. don Gomez is a heretic. and a heretic"s daughter is a heretic, too.
It will be your first task to bring them both -
- safely behind the walls of the Inquisition prison.
Is your belief no greater? have you already forgotten your oath?
When the shadow on don Gomez" sundial showed -
- that the day was drawing to its end ... he torture chamber of the Inquisition. untie him. the trial is over, for the present. the trial is over for ever.
God, have mercy on the poor sinner. the Inquisition Prison.
I order you to continue the trial in the torture chamber.
I am not master of myself in the presence of this woman.
What is the body of a heretic to me, as long as her soul be saved?
How strange!
Next morning, the sun rose like on any other morning.
... the court sentences Isabella to be burned at the stake ...
But the lord left Satanas no time for contemplation.
With inexorable severity, the words of doom rang in his ears: continue thy evil doings.
Setting: Paris.
Time: utumn 1 793.
On the 21st January, 1 793, -
- Louis XVI was beheaded as a victim to the Republic of iberty.
Many hands were now busily erecting the guillotine -
- for Queen Marie Antoinette. during the night between the 1st and 2nd August 1793, -
- the unfortunate queen was removed from the prison -
- in the temple to the conciergerie, -
- called
""the Prison of the condemned"".
Marie Antoinette - Tenna Frederiksen. and the queen was made to sign a receipt -
- evidencing that she had been duly handed over -
- to the prison ward of the conciergerie. one month later,- on the 5th eptember 1 793, -
- the Paris convent enacted the sinister law -
- instituting the Army of the Revolution. accompanied by guillotines, this army in small detachments -
- was to make a circuit of the French provinces -
- to incarcerate and execute
""all suspicious characters"".
The music room of chambord castle. count de chambord - Viggo Wiehe. countess de chambord -
Emma Wiehe. carefree youth.
Lady Geneviéve de chambord -
Jeanne ramcourt.
The guillotine is coming!
The guillotine is coming!
In times like these, each man is nearest to himself. these itinerant tribunals -
- with authority to pass and execute death sentences on the spot, -
- were presided over by a people"s commissar, -
- whose only qualification was that he must know and show no mercy. the people"s commissar -
Emil Helsengreen.
Joseph, I know you will grant your master his last wish.
Promise that you will lead my wife and daughter into safety, -
- and that you will for ever remain a loyal friend to them.
Joseph - lith Pio.
""here is thus indisputable evidence that the count the chambord -
- has been the actual leader of a conspiracy -
- to help the former Queen of rance, the Widow capet, -
- to flee the country."" an escape in the night.
In the conciergerie.
After a wearisome couple of days" travel, -
- the fugitives from chambord were approaching their temporary goal:
Paris.
Joseph had succeeded in obtaining a forged passport -
- made out to citizeness Grandet and her son and daughter, -
- by which they hoped to be admitted undetected into Paris.
In the taproom of the Parisian
"Taverne Pitou"", -
- Michonnet, the popular singer, -
- was admired and applauded for his rendering of ""a Marseillaise"", -
- which in those days had just become popular in Paris.
Old Pitou - Viggo indstrom.
On the high road.
At the city gates.
Erneste durand, -
- up to quite recently a footman in the service of count de chambord, -
- is now heart and soul engrossed in the new political ideas.
Satanas - Helge Nissen.
I deserve no thanks, for I merely did my duty.
But if you wish to make me glad, then please bestow upon me -
- the medallion with your daughter"s image as a keepsake, -
- which I know you always wear.
I give it to you gladly, -
- for you have the right to claim the best from me.
Have no fear! I promise that I will not give them away.
They have always been kind to me.
Why should I return evil for good?
They are the coming men, -
- and meet here every night to discuss the political news.
In the conciergerie.
Nothing at that time was abused as much as the motto:
Liberté - Egalité - Fraternité
It was printed everywhere.
Even the tattooer used it for his art.
Believe me: hat fellow will go a long way.
With his gift of the gab -
- he is certain to reach the highest posts in the state.
What was I two months ago?
A servant like yourself.
Now I belong to the inner circles of the Jacobin club -
- and am on the point of securing a seat in the convent.
You may go as far, if you will. his card admits you to the sessions of the Jacobin club.
Be there tomorrow, -
- when I shall introduce you to some of my political friends.
At the conciergerie -
- the dregs of the imprisoned women gathered almost daily -
- below the window of Marie ntoinette"s cell, -
- whence they hurled the lowest insults at the poor queen.
That wicked witch is the cause of all our misery.
Why don"t they make her a few inches shorter?
Here I have kept the latest issue of ""Pére duchesne"".
I suggest we give it to her Majesty.
By now she must be fed up with the history of the Passion of christ.
PÉRE dUcHESNE
The tyrant is dead, but his wench and cursed brood are still alive.
You will not have peace before they are destroyed.
Watch out! Freedom is at stake!
Some time has elapsed.
Through Erneste"s influence -
- Joseph already belongs to the most trusted henchmen of the Jacobins.
Why don"t you pluck up the courage to propose to her?
You forget that you have means and ways to force her. do you think she wants herself or her mother adorned -
- with the collar of the guillotine?
At the conciergerie.
For Marie Antoinette all secular ties have been severed -
- save the one which forever will bind a mother to her child.
At her bosom she kept her son"s portrait and a lock of his hair, -
- both successfully smuggled into the prison -
- in an old yellow glove.
Although Joseph now belongs to the Revolution with all his heart, -
- he does not for one day fail to visit his former masters, -
- who, thanks to him, have been accorded tolerable conditions.
This period of terror so brutalized the human mind -
- that even children devoted themselves -
- to playing with the guillotine.
The accused.
The public prosecutor.
The audience.
The judge. citizen cat is guilty of contempt of the Republic -
- by having worn in public the white colour of the court, -
- and so he must catch it in the neck!
In the meantime Joseph had a long interview -
- with the countess de chambord.
The subject matter was known to no one, -
- and no one must know.
On the way to the guillotine.
You have given ample proof of your loyalty -
- and endangered your life for our sake.
Joseph, you know I hold you in great esteem as a generous friend.
But you know, too, -
- that anything more than friendship between us is impossible.
Long live liberty!
But on the same evening a poor cripple, -
- whom an evil fate had even made deaf and dumb, -
- paid a visit to Fouquier-Tinville, the public prosecutor.
Fouquier-Tinville -
Vilh. Petersen.
Countess de chambord and her daughter Geneviéve -
- are hiding under the name of
Grandet in t. Antoine Street, -
- and are on the point of fleeing the country.
Meanwhile, preparations for the flight -
- were in progress in t. Antoine Street.
The cripple had achieved his object, -
- but there was no exultant joy of victory in his eyes.
For he was Satanas, disguised in the cripple"s poor clothes.
Satanas who must tempt mankind in obedience to the divine doom.
With Fouquier-Tinville.
You ask about our names.
Read them in our passports.
My child,
I am too old to tell lies.
Yes,
I am the countess de chambord, -
- and the young lady at my side is my daughter, Lady Geneviéve.
But you, citizen ...
... you whom we all considered a good patriot ...
You wanted to help the aristocrats flee, did you? countess de chambord and her daughter Geneviéve -
- are hiding under the name of
Grandet in t. Antoine treet.
Now I understand.
You are the real informer who sent the letter.
There are problems which are hard nuts to crack, -
- even to a Fouquier-Tinville.
Now, speak up. did you or did you not send the letter?
You shall not in vain have shown devotion to the Republic.
The office of police prefect falls vacant in the immediate future, -
- and I shall see that it is given to you.
Judas' reward falls to Judas.
On the 14th October 1793 -
- Marie Antoinette was taken before the Revolutionary ribunal.
The trial lasted two days.
When she returned to her cell -
- during the night between the 15th and 16th, -
- the jury had unanimously sentenced the Queen of the French to death.
On concorde Square -
- the executioner and his assistants dressed Marie Antoinette"s death bed.
While the day was slowly dawning, -
- Marie Antoinette wrote her famous, tear-stained letter -
- to her sister-in-law,
Princess Elisabeth.
The letter which has passed into history as -
- ""Marie Antoinette's Testament"".
October 16th
4:30 a.m.
This letter to you, my dear sister, will be my last.
I have just been sentenced, not to a disgraceful death, -
- for it is disgraceful only to criminals, -
- but to leave this earth to join your brother, -
- innocent like him ...
In another cell, not far off, -
- another woman was writing.
To Joseph Gilvert from Lady Geneviéve de chambord
At this moment I can hear the death-cart rumble into the yard -
- to take my mother to the scaffold.
These lines are my last appeal to you.
Erneste is the soul of a conspiracy to liberate the queen.
Help him and I shall forgive you, and bless you in my last moment.
Take this to Joseph, with my final farewell.
Of the miserable clothes left to Marie Antoinette, -
- at one time the most beautiful lady in France, -
- she had dressed this morning as if for an occasion.
It is her you have to thank -
- for me making a traitor of myself to the Republic.
Yes, I remember the young woman well. Where is she now?
She has been beheaded?
Who was callous enough to hand that child over to the executioners?
Be quick! The way is clear.
Remember your promise to Genevieve, -
- and do not think of yourself.
But of wounded vanity, in the flare of a moment"s anger, -
- Joseph forgets his solemn vow to Geneviéve and the queen, -
- whose fate had been entrusted to him.
Now she is being prepared for death out there.
Is that good enough for you?
Three women"s faiths have been betrayed by you.
Three lives you have wasted.
Murderer is your true name, just like Satanas is mine.
Eternal damnation to you, -
- who dragged me into your ruin. eternal damnation!
In the agony of despair,
Satanas pauses in his wanderings, -
- which, paved as they are with dashed hopes, -
- seem to carry him further away from his eternal salvation.
For him there is no mercy.
Anew is heard the voice from above: continue thy evil doings!
Setting: Finland.
Time: Spring 1918.
Everyone knows the marvellous picture of Finland -
- symbolized by a young woman, fighting the Russian eagle.
Was not fresh life given to this picture -
- when the Red insurrection made its way from Russia -
- across the Finnish frontier?
Our last story takes place in the little town of Hirola, -
- which was partly occupied by the Reds in the spring of 1918.
The White eadquarters. corporal Matti receives orders from his commander -
- to lay telephone and telegraph wires -
- across to the railway station of Hirola. corporal Matti - christian Nielsen.
If you will not be mine, -
- I shall inform on your husband to the Red tribunal.
Next day. corporal Matti on his way to Hirola.
Thank God you came.
That means we shall get real coffee again soon, doesn"t it?
Siri goes into the woods to gather bark -
- for baking with flour.
Matti and his men proceed to Hirola. hat"s Mother.
Go and meet her - hurry up.
The Red tribunal.
In this story from our own time, -
- Satanas is represented by the
Russian monk Ivan, -
- who has rushed to the aid of his Finnish ""Red"" brothers -
- against the
"Bloodhounds of the White Guard"".
Satanas - Helge Nissen.
I am afraid we shall have to acquit him.
Let him have a bullet when you get into the woods.
And now for a bite to eat.
Ivan has turned the schoolroom of Hirola into a lecture hall, -
- and there is always a devout audience -
- when he gives his social lectures.
Rautaniemi has fought a fierce battle with his own conscience, -
- but it is as if a power beyond his own control drags him -
- towards the school house of Hirola.
Now I know how to avenge my father.
Take me to your commander at once.
I want to join the Finnish army.
The Red catechism
You need only fear one God: your own will
You need only obey one law:
The one you make yourself with the blood of the rich.
Where do you live?
I no longer have a home.
You must give an address anyway, -
- where the body may be sent if you are killed.
It makes no difference to me -
- as long as I am buried in Finnish soil.
May the pact you are making now be a blessing to you.
One evening, about a week later, -
- just after the last train had left Hirola.
In the Red headquarters -
- important discussions were in progress on the same night.
I"ll tell you. The Whites have established a connection -
- by telephone and telegraph, to the station.
We must catch Paavo off his guard -
- and force him to draw the Whites into an ambush.
The Reds.
I must be off to the inn, and get hold of the boys. oftly!
It is not time yet.
Red outpost.
Send that telegram to the Whites.
The Reds have occupied the railway line.
You can waylay them -
- if you go by the main road through the wood along the river.
The Reds ...
If you don"t obey my command, your husband will be shot. don"t do it, Siri.
You are now going to die, -
- but even the worst of sinners has a claim -
- to be comforted by religion.
The inn.
Naimi cannot wait for Matti any longer and goes over to the station, -
- well armed with hand grenades, to meet a contingency. does she now belong to me?
Not yet.
In a few seconds, your husband will have drawn his last breath.
Will you not reconsider, while there is still time? dear God! Give me the strength to resist the temptation.
Your husband"s life can no longer be spared ...
... but there is still time to save the lives of your children.
This is my last warning.
If you refuse, your children will be dead in the next instant.
Well? do your duty.
Forgive me, Paavo.
I did it only ... for Finland"s sake.
Siri"s simple heroic deed released Satanas -
- from a thousand years of his doom.
But the doom pronounced by the ord -
- was written with the characters of eternity, -
- and its words urge Satanas on to new goals, new fates.
THE HOLY MOUNTAIN premiered on December 17th, 1926.
The reconstruction was based on two nitrate copies: a tinted version from the
Bundesarchiv-Filmarchiv, Berlin, and another one in black & white from the Fondazione Cineteca Italiana, Milan.
The intertitles were - when available - taken from the copy of the Bundesarchiv-
Filmarchiv or corrected electronically.
Missing titles were added with the aid of the censor's certificate..
..from December 16th, 1926 that the
Deutsche Filminstitut -- DIF provided.
The restoration took place in 2001 in collaboration with..
..the Bundesarchiv-Filmarchiv, Berlin, the Fondazione Cineteca Italiana, Milan.. and the Friedrich Wilhelm
Murnau Foundation, Wiesbaden.
Lab: L'Immagine Ritrovata, Bologna
Friedrich Wilhelm Murnau Foundation
Those well-known sportsmen..
..who participated in the making of
THE HOLY MOUNTAIN..
..ask the audience not to mistake their performances for trick photography.
All shots taken outdoors were actually made in the mountains, in the most beautiful parts of the Alps, over the course of one and a half years.
The big ski race is performed by German,
Norwegian and Austrian master skiers.
The screenplay to this motion picture was inspired by actual events..
..that occurred during a twenty year period in the life of the great mountains.
THE HOLY MOUNTAIN
A Drama Poem with scenes from nature by Dr. Arnold Fanck
Dedicated to his late friend, mountaineer Dr. Hans Rhode with reverence
Direction and screenplay:
Dr. Arnold Fanck
Production design:
Leopold Blonder
Sculptures:
Karl Böhm
Nature photography:
Dr. Arnold Fanck and his Freiburg School:
Camera Operators:
Hans Schneeberger / Sepp Allgeier
Assistant Camera:
Albert Benitz and Kurt Neubert
Studio photography:
Helmar Lersky, Hans Schneeberger
Original score:
Edmund Meisel
CAST:
The Sportsmen:
The Dancer Diotima - Leni Riefenstahl
The Friend - Louis Trenker
Vigo - Ernst Petersen
The Mountain Guide - Hannes Schneider
Colli - Friedrich Schneider
The Actress:
The Mother - Frieda Richard
Produced by the cultural department of the
Universum-Film joint-stock company, Berlin
PRELUDE
There, where the rock falls steeply and defiantly into the surf... is her home--
The sea is her love, wild -- boundless --
But her life -- is dance -- vibrant expressions of a stormy soul.
Diotima's Dance to the Sea.
Diotima: Dancer Leni Riefenstahl
And so Diotima dances... dances to satiate her longing for him -- whom she has seen in her dreams -- atop the highest mountain peak.
END OF PRELUDE
TWO FRIENDS FROM THE MOUNTAINS
"The Friend"
Ingenieur Trenker
Vigo
Ernst Petersen, student of medicine
At the entrance to the Grand Hotel
DIOTIMA DANCES THIS EVENING
IN THE GRAND HOTEL
And Diotima dances in the country of her desire.
DANCE TO THE SEA -
DREAMBLOSSOM - DEVOTION
DREAMBLOSSOM
She seems ... almost holy!
Were any people from the mountains here?
Did you see my dance? --
What did you enjoy most?
The friend rushes upward, high into the mountains, to savor his overwhelming experience.
DIOTIMA'S ASCENT
A jubilant spring climbs higher up the mountain.
And a joyous Diotima immerses herself in it.
Just then, "the Friend" begins his lonely descent..
..from the icy brow of the tallest peak.
In an alpine meadow.
The mountainside reveals nature's ferocious power.
The imposing pinnacle of the highest mountain rises before her.
The meeting.
Did you come from up there?
It must be beautiful there.
Beautiful -- arduous -- dangerous
What does one search for, up there?
One's self.
And nothing else?
And what are you searching for, up here -- in nature?
Beauty!
And nothing else?
AT HIS HOME
AT HIS HOME
Today I climb in search of the most beautiful mountain that exists.
And tomorrow?
Tomorrow we will celebrate our engagement together -- very high up there.
You seek Gods -- but it's people you must find.
I suppose you came all this way just to see me, not the ski race.
Look for me at the jumping contest!
He wants to go up there again... without me.
Take me with you one time - into your world -- really high up --
At least up to the cottage.
"The Sea and the Stone
Can Never Be Wed."
Winter, still draped across his mountain.
Look -- those enormous rocks have been worn away..
..by the gigantic force of water, in nature's eternal cycle.
And all the debris left by these mighty waters -- they are our mountains.
Why is nature so beautiful to us?
Because we invest our very souls in it.
You, too, are like nature.
And that's why I love you so much.
The bustle of wintersports.
The bustle of wintersports.
The mountain guide
Hannes Schneider
Have you finished marking the race route?
How's the competition looking?
You'll probably be beaten.
By whom?
Colli... the shepherd.
Never.
Colli
Friedrich Schneider
Say, if your Friend doesn't participate, there'll be no competition in the long-distance run.
Take me with you!
What's wrong with you, darling?
FEAR!
I will be back in time for your dance tonight.
Goodbye -- until tonight!
The jumping event has begun.
Diotima goes to watch the ski jump.
Colli prepares for the his final jump.
In wonderful style,
Vigo determines the winner.
The young victor.
But far away from the sporting bustle, the Friend..
..seeking the most beautiful mountain
-- for tomorrow --
I'm not sure I can ride such a steep hill.
Now where would my beautiful, gentle Madonna like to go?
Wild and fantastic, like a gothic cathedral, rises from its mighty foundation --
-- the most beautiful mountain.
THE LONG-DISTANCE RUN
Come back the winner, and I'll grant you a wish.
The route is marked.
High atop his silent world.
Colli fights for the lead.
Colli leads.
75 miles per hour on skis!
Relentlessly pursuing Colli.
Vigo closes the gap!
Overtakes!
Vigo in the lead.
Colli far behind.
Vigo still leads.
The others continue the wild chase.
The two favorites find themselves far behind.
Don't give up, we're nearly the last!
Racing through the forest, they no longer notice the fairy tale beauty of the snow-covered firs.
Pushing for the lead.
Colli goes wrong
All wrong!
The end of the fight.
Just before the finish.
I'll get you yet!
Vigo -- Vigo!
He begins his descent into the valley.
May I have my wish now?
And what does the victor desire?
THE DREADFUL NORTH FACE
ABYSS!
ABYSS!
When he comes home today,
I have a surprise for him.
A new dance --
A Hymn of Joy
I really think... she loves me.
Well, finally you appear!
Come with me, I need you.
We must scale the Santo-north face.
Now? In Winter?
Are you mad?
You're my best friend. Come with me.
We'll be mad together.
I'll come get you.
I must go away... with a friend of mine.
-- a magnificent man, whom you should meet sometime.
The ski racers go to the cottage, to celebrate the day's events.
Whas has come over you?
Sorry, Vigo. It's not you.
But please do not ask.
To the north face of the mountain.
Before the dreadful Santo-north face.
Are you afraid to come with me?
Look, we should turn back.
The Föhn wind is coming down.
Let it come -- the stronger the better!
And let storm and avalanche roar their wild songs with it.
The very walls come alive with the flow of the avalanches.
It comes boiling up from the valleys in a terrible tempest.
TURMOIL!
TURMOIL!
Something must have happened to him!
Snap out of it!
Do you hear me?
You really are mad!
Take me back down again!
Is there something you desire -- down there -- among the rabble?
A dancer --
-- Diotima
It was you!
VIGO!
And Diotima must dance -- her hymn of joy.
I can't fasten you to anything!
It's all ice!
Vigo -- I'd never do anything to harm you!
I've gone with Vigo to conquer the Santo-north face
I can dance no more!
You cannot just walk out in the middle of a performance.
Our ski-master and his friend Vigo --
-- have not returned from the Santo-north face.
Are there mountaineers among you -- ?
Men who would climb up, through this night, up to Sella cottage, to alert the skiers?
Who among you will climb?
For my sake?
Was one man not enough for you?
Vigo -- ? He is but a child!
They're all -- children.
I am climbing up to the cottage.
I will find the way.
But no single man has the strength to lift a body from an overhang.
Sacrificing the comrade - perhaps one's self with him - the greatest dilemma of the mountains.
THE DEED
We drink to the welfare of our absent ski-master.
Nature unleashed!
Cut me free --
I can't bear it anymore.
At least save yourself!
Why... why?
How to we reach Mount Santo?
First down to the forest -- then over the bridge and up again.
Have you found the bridge?
Losing faith
Why?
HIS WORLD
And with the last of his strength, he holds his friend, long since frozen.
Dawn breaks upon his tormented soul.
A peaceful calm settles upon the frozen world, and upon the sould of Diotima, who at last learns the fate of her beloved.
Fallen!
He has fallen!
He held onto his fallen friend the whole night, and thus sacrificed himself.
Among us, the greatest attribute... is loyalty.
Peace lies upon the eternal sea -- silently it spreads, rolling out in broad waves, to soothe the world's suffering and strife.
Above it all looms a Holy Mountain -- a symbol of the greatest values than humanity can embrace -- fidelity -- truth -- loyalty -- FAITH
END
Music: Aljoscha Zimmermann
Ensemble
Sabrina Zimmermann - Violin
Antonio Clavilijo - Cello
Dieter Pöll - Percussion
Markus Steiner - Percussion
Aljoscha Zimmerman - Piano
Sound engineer - Thomas Schmölz
Recorded in April 2002
Violetmedia Soundstudio, Munich
Film transfer and digital postproduction
Wagner & TaunusFilm
(c) 2002 Friedrich Wilhelm
Murnau Foundation
DVD-Untertitelung:
Oliver Ullmann
The film The Wildcat was presented for the first to the public in 1921. 
The intertitles in the surviving print were different than the ones from the pages of the official Censor.
The new intertitles were prepared from the Censor archives.
The Wildcat
Comedy in 4 acts 
Hanns Kräly & Ernst Lubitsch
Director: Ernst Lubitsch
Scenery and costumes: Ernst Stern
Cameraman: Theodor Sparkuhl
The characters 
The commander of the fortress ... Viktor Janson 
His wife                      ... Marga Köhler
Their daughter                ... Edith Meller
Lt. Alexis                    ... Paul Heidemann 
Claudius, the head of the gang of thieves 
                              ... Wilhelm Digelmann 
Rischka his daughter          ... Pola Negri
Pepo, the timid thief ...Hermann Thimig
Dafko                 ...Paul Biensfeld
Zofano                ...Paul Grätz
Masilio               ...Max Kronert
Tripo                 ...Erwin Kopp
Location:  near Piffkaneiro
<:> First Act <:>
<:> Quiet! <:> 
Lili, the Commander's daughter.
Ministry of War 
General Piffkaneiro  
To the Commander of the Fortress Border. 
Lieutenant Alexis is transferred
It is imperative, as Lieutenant Alexis is best known to the female sex as "Alex the Seducer", to maintain very strict discipline with him. 
Signed: General Piffkaneiro 
Finally, a handsome man! 
What a pig!
How can you speak so about Alex? 
Alex prepaes to leave his home. 
My darling!
A word of goodbye.
Rómpese el corazón, lágrimas se derraman.
My heart breaks, tears expand, nostalgia grows and enlarges the ball in my throat
Go in peace and may your path be easy. 
You made me happy!
Goodbye, Daddy!
Claudius, the head of the thieves and his accomplices are the terrors of the border.
Hello, friends!
Hello, Chief!
Come on, give it up!
What have you stolen now?
Where have you hidden it this time?
I was at the movies.
Not behind the head!
Rischka, my child. 
She hit me!
Me, too! 
You should not indulge her, too!
Handkerchiefs!
Ah, the handsome man!
Take off your pants!'
Ah, the handsome man!
What you do to me, I'll do to you!
End of the First Act 
<:> Second Act <:>
The Brigands!
... attacked the Lieutenant.
Tell us what happened! 
Suddenly, a shot! 
Now I have eaten enough.
Go immediately and look for Lt. Alexis! 
But I am the ... 
Lieutenant.
The pajama pants are very cute.
Let me introduce you to my wife!.
And my very precious daughter.
- Do you like my daughter? 
- Pardon? ?
But you will not get my daughter's hand so easily!
Idiot!
This is unbelievable.
Why did you let him escape?
... and such a beautiful pajama pants, 
I wish I had had such a pair.
They would have been too small for you.
You have no idea how I froze.
The punitive expedition against the thieves.
You may make the coffee now.
Children, you look great!
If you please, Mr. Conductor!
They have already drawn!
Don't be rough!
War is war! 
We should not even permit them a slap.
At your service!
That girl has guts!
End of the Second Act.
<:> Third Act <:> 
Victory along the entire line.
You have fought valiantly, just as Hector faced the cannons!
We will reward you for this wonderful victory. 
As thanks, I offer you my daughter's hand!.
But I absolutely cannnot accept. 
But yes, you may even demand it! 
Nothing can be done otherwise... 
The victory celebration.
I have never felt so good!
Rischka!
Busy! 
Aren't you ashamed to dress in my closet!
We will soon be husband and wife! 
I am afraid!
This does not help me. 
I need you to stop.
You, come out! Impertinent person!
The air is unhealthy!
Ten legs, five men, and it plays!
End of the Third Act. 
<:> Fourth Act <:>
Rischka dreams.
Can you hear my heart beating?
Ah, the season of love ... 
Now is the time to marry that girl!
You promised him that one of us would marry her!
I will do what I promised! 
You must marry! 
And don't speak so crudely!
Who would want to marry me?
I would like to!
For Rischka, the big day ...
Will you make my daughter happy?
Always be honest and faithful forever, and to the grave.
The daughter of the commander of our fortress, after having given him every confidence ... will marry Lt. Alexis. 
The marriage will take place today..
Lieutenant, we must now leave for the wedding ceremony.
This could be your size.
I'll make myself more comfortable.
Why are you so taken with our daughter?
He loves you more than he does me!
I will cure him, however difficult it will be!
Where were you hidden all this time? 
End
Music:  Marco Dalpane (2000)
Director: Marco Dalpane
Recorded: Teatro Consorziale di Budrio
Sound: Franco Visioli, Nicola Zonca
Post-production: Thomas Schmölz
Editors: Nina Goslar 
Production: Foundation F.W. Murnau in collaboration with ZDF / Arte
{4413}{4578}The town in the past...
{4728}{4807}Every evening, the high notables|of the small town
{4810}{4887}met at the Golden Unicorn|for the twilight cup...
{4945}{5018}His Ponderousness|the Mayor...
{5153}{5223}His Reverence|the Pastor...
{5386}{5461}His Erudition|the Doctor...
{5689}{5762}His Measuredness|the Notary...
{6071}{6163}... and the new teacher...
{6306}{6420}In other days, the ancient candlesticks|heard every evening the most|important news of the town...
{6423}{6502}But since some time,|the esteemed notables|had but a single topic:
{6505}{6559}the stranger,|and ever again the stranger...
{6674}{6742}One day, a stranger|asked the gravedigger|for the way to the town.
{6745}{6789}To the latter,|he looked strangely known,
{6792}{6836}though he had never|seen him in person...
{7842}{7925}"Who owns the land|beside the cemetery?"
{8003}{8116}"The Municipality has destined it|to the enlargement of the graveyard..."
{8658}{8728}"I hardly believe that|the Municipality is willing to|give away the cemetery land...
{8731}{8783}But, why the devil are you|interested exactly in that one -?"
{8871}{8982}"I'm a much tired wanderer...|I wish to make me a garden here..."
{9027}{9112}"Next to the graveyard - ?!"
{9155}{9264}The stranger's request|gave rise to a fierce debate|among the counselors;
{9267}{9339}but the gold he offered|was highly appealing...
{9976}{10041}The stranger's proposal|was approved unanimously,
{10044}{10125}and he was granted|the graveyard land|for ninety nine years...
{10210}{10269}But the joy of the conceited town-dwellers|was not unclouded;
{10272}{10345}because the stranger had built,|between his mysterious being|and the others,
{10348}{10398}an evenly unclimbable wall|all around his estate...
{10628}{10678}"You can see by yourselves, Sirs!
{10681}{10773}I've run all around the wall,|and found neither door nor gate - !"
{11521}{11551}"Stop your efforts, men!
{11554}{11604}I alone know the door|that opens this wall!"
{12056}{12139}"And nobody has yet found|a door in that weird wall - ?"
{12145}{12201}Second Verse.
{14263}{14314}"It's a good old custom|of the Golden Unicorn,
{14317}{14384}that young couples drink|the first dip from the bridal cup ---
{14387}{14442}And it's easily guessed|that you are sweethearts!"
{17055}{17122}"Excuse me...|do you know where my bridegroom went?"
{17194}{17266}"My dear child, your groom|went away with the stranger,
{17269}{17325}the one that was|sitting at your table..."
{18943}{19035}There are plants, that from|the magic light of the full moon|draw mysterious virtues:
{19038}{19098}mandrake and Salomon's seal,|wolfberry and centaury...
{19101}{19149}Nobody knew better|than the old chemist...
{22713}{22778}"Child, child,|you're quivering by fever!
{22781}{22839}But wait,|I'll make you a tonic tea,
{22842}{22895}and you'll feel better at once!"
{24352}{24396}Hymn XIX.
{24399}{24509}Put me as a seal on your heart,
{24512}{24607}And as a seal on your arm.
{24610}{24732}Because Love is as strong as Death,
{24735}{24827}Passion as steady as Hell
{24830}{24976}Its heat is burning|And a flame of the Lord
{25274}{25392}Because Love is as strong as Death,
{26306}{26379}"Hear, people:|the bell has struck eleven ....."
{27886}{28018}"What do you want, child,|in my kingdom?|I didn't call you..."
{28152}{28261}"I want to know|where's my beloved!"
{29135}{29192}"I did not steal him...|his time was over!"
{29358}{29416}"What you see here,|are the lives of men...
{29419}{29477}They light up and burn|for some time long -
{29480}{29535}And they go out,|when God so decides..."
{30669}{30745}"Believe me, my task is heavy|It's a doom!
{30748}{30822}I'm tired of seeing|the sufferings of men
{30825}{30898}And reaping hate, when I obey to God..."
{31229}{31322}"And is there a way,|to awake an extinct light|to a new life, Death - ?"
{31518}{31591}"No way. You overcome me - ?"
{31594}{31704}"I believe that Love|is as strong as Death - !"
{31924}{32021}"Is your love as strong as death?
{32024}{32139}Will you fight|against the immortal one?
{32142}{32280}I'd bless you,|should you succeed in beating me!"
{32591}{32661}"Here are three lights,|that are about to go out...
{32664}{32715}I put them in your hands,|save them!
{32718}{32816}If you succeed, - even one only -|I'll give you back your beloved's life!"
{33058}{33169}Third Verse.
{33446}{33540}"Come, believers!|Come to the prayer!"
{33782}{33868}Ramadan.
{34167}{34251}"Allah'l Allah il Allah|we Mohammed rafful Allah !!"
{34314}{34407}Zobeide, the Calif's sister.
{34446}{34484}The pagan...
{34695}{34822}"There's no god other than God -|and Mohammed is his prophet"
{34998}{35131}"Are you crazy - ?!|Do you want both us lost - ?!"
{35146}{35234}"I haven't seen you|since the beginning of Ramadan!
{35237}{35310}Night after night,|I've waited for a sign
{35313}{35392}to plunge into your arms again...|in vain..."
{35503}{35610}"Tonight... I'll send you Aisha...|but now I beseech you:
{35613}{35701}leave the sanctuary,|or else you are lost - !"
{36204}{36296}"A pagan - ! An infidel - ! A giaour !!!"
{36660}{36759}"A giaour has violated the sanctuary !!"
{37174}{37210}"Back...
{37213}{37365}don't stain the sanctuary|with an infidel's blood !"
{38837}{38904}The Calif.
{39270}{39346}"Zobeide - ?|My sister -- ??!"
{39508}{39655}"We don't know|where the stranger's hiding,|but listen to my advice, Calif..."
{40577}{40662}"As if I cared|for a giaour's fate - !
{40665}{40811}I only wanted|to save the sanctuary|from corruption by his blood - !"
{40972}{41123}"You'll be glad, then, knowing|that there's no escape for the violator|of the sanctuary - !"
{41301}{41325}"We are following him closely...
{41328}{41363}and I have had the town|surrounded by the guards,
{41366}{41409}so whoever tries to escape|will go straight into my hands..."
{41904}{42037}"You must go to him, Aisha-|go and bring him to me|by the secret way - !"
{42128}{42185}"Only here he's safe - !
{42188}{42293}They won't seek him|in his persecutor's palace !"
{42606}{42684}El Mot, the gardener...
{43815}{43866}"Come, at dark, by the secret way!
{43869}{43977}The Mistress will hide you|in the palace, till the crowd's rage|has died out!"
{44127}{44198}"Surround the palace of Princess Zobeide...
{44201}{44258}Let anybody in...|nobody out...!"
{44353}{44388}Night...
{45445}{45523}"Come with me,|I'll hide you until the|hounds' watch has weared out..."
{45750}{45769}"The Calif -- !"
{46742}{46773}"What's happening - ?!"
{46837}{46908}"Perhaps, they're hunting a raging dog !"
{46999}{47070}"Your orders have been|carried out, Sir !"
{47398}{47478}"The night is beautiful, sister...
{47481}{47657}I'd like to stay up late|on the palace's terrace...|Will you keep me company - ?"
{48359}{48449}"Who's digging at this late hour|in our garden...?"
{48536}{48655}"El Mot, the gardener,|wants to give you a surprise..."
{49646}{49723}Fourth Verse.
{51475}{51617}"I'm glad to see|a smile on your mouth,|my beautiful betrothed!"
{52334}{52390}"How often men|are near their death|unknowingly...
{52393}{52441}They think they have|the eternity before -
{52444}{52510}yet it's no more|than a rose's life|with which they play..."
{52662}{52798}"Messer Giovanfrancesco|is much disliked|by the Council of the Fourteen...
{52801}{52890}Too much... Perhaps|he'll not see next dawn..."
{53640}{53729}"Not for nothing|I'm the best fighter|among the Fourteen...
{53732}{53848}And when Carnival|heats one's blood, it's not uncommon|to come down to fists...
{53851}{53891}the usual deadly end..."
{53990}{54023}"I know, you hate me,|Monna Fiametta...
{54026}{54083}and up to the day of our wedding,|you're free to doom me for nothing..."
{54270}{54370}"Afterwards, I hope|you'll have a smile for me too -
{54373}{54445}And a rose...|as for the other one.-
{54448}{54511}That by then will be rotten..."
{54928}{54983}Cockfight.
{55196}{55226}Letters.
{55391}{55472}"This letter|is for Messer Girolamo..."
{55549}{55682}"Tell him|I'm sending him this letter|with my most beautiful smile!"
{56020}{56078}"With this letter run fast|to Messer Giovanfrancesco... 
{56081}{56123}beware...|don't mention it to anyone...
{56126}{56164}less than ever Messer Girolamo...!"
{56677}{56721}"Call the Moor here!"
{57372}{57529}I, Monna Fiametta, beg you|to be my guest tonight.
{57532}{57627}I think we have much to say.
{57630}{57733}Come when the bell strucks ten.
{57736}{57819}The maid will guide you.
{57961}{58089}"Madonna Fiametta sends you this letter|with her most beautiful smile!"
{58127}{58226}"Have you by chance|a second letter to deliver?"
{59567}{59681}"I have an enemy, Moor, -|whom I've invited tonight -
{59684}{59786}and I won't let him|to leave this house alive -
{59789}{59842}Do you understand - ?"
{60401}{60446}My love, fly away!
{60449}{60545}The Council of the Fourteen|wants your death,
{60548}{60636}and Girolamo is going|to be your hangman!
{60639}{60672}Avoid riots!
{60675}{60710}Fly secretly,
{60713}{60805}and don't come back home|before I call you!
{60808}{60900}The destiny that Girolamo|prepared for you,
{60903}{60986}shall be fulfilled|on himself tonight!
{60989}{61060}I kiss your eyes|and your heart!
{61063}{61089}Fiametta
{61610}{61714}"I'll push him here,|where you are,|with the tip of my sword...
{61717}{61782}And when he turns his back on you..."
{63013}{63090}"Madonna Fiametta|sends this to you!"
{63277}{63321}"And this letter..."
{63453}{63539}I, Monna Fiametta, beg you|to be my guest tonight.
{63542}{63594}I think we have much to say.
{63597}{63653}Come when the bell strucks ten.
{63656}{63701}The maid will guide you.
{63788}{63844}"... and a good advice - !
{63847}{64006}Not a word, not a sound|if you care for your life|and for Monna Fiametta's honour...
{64009}{64078}Whatever happens, stay silent..."
{64187}{64230}Ten o'clock.
{66589}{66639}"Now -- !!"
{67328}{67403}Fifth Verse.
{67490}{67532}O Most Reverend One!
{67535}{67570}O Millenary One!
{67573}{67611}O Phare of Wisdom!
{67614}{67636}O Jewel!
{67639}{67687}Tomorrow is my birthday,
{67690}{67810}and I've decreed great rejoicings|in the whole Empire of the Middle!
{67813}{67879}And I wish that|on my birthday you,
{67882}{67933}o Pearl among all Wizards,
{67936}{67992}drive out my imperial boredom
{67995}{68071}with new tricks|from your excellent mind!
{68074}{68116}With best greetings,
{68119}{68164}Your|DJOU SCH蹵TI WANG
{68167}{68189}Emperor.
{68284}{68371}P.S. Should you,|against all expectations,
{68374}{68437}bore me,|o Most Reverend One,
{68440}{68524}with my highest regret|I'll be compelled
{68527}{68576}to have you beheaded!
{68579}{68607}The Above.
{69182}{69220}"Tiao Tsien...! Liang!!
{69223}{69261}Tiao Tsien...! Liang!!"
{69886}{69963}"Would you perhaps be so kind to bring me
{69966}{70026}my Sunday jade magic wand - ?!"
{70788}{70954}... before, the honorable Master A Hi|disposed of the cause of his troubles!
{71773}{71812}"We go!"
{72279}{72340}The Son of Heaven!
{72437}{72491}The Emperor's Archer.
{72746}{72819}"Son of Heaven, have mercy|of the lurid toad
{72822}{72884}who kisses the dust|under your feet!
{72887}{72950}Master A Hi is not seen on any road."
{73183}{73347}"O Son of Heaven, have mercy|of the miserable earthworm|at your feet!
{73350}{73472}No trace of Master A Hi|is yet seen on any river!"
{73610}{73639}"A Hi - !!!"
{74682}{74756}"On with magic!"
{75143}{75174}"Abracadabra...
{75177}{75206}Witch's fat...
{75209}{75248}Three black cats!!!"
{75565}{75691}"Lofty Son of Heaven!|So that you be always shielded|against your enemies,
{75694}{75761}let me present you,|on your birthday,
{75764}{75826}with a whole well organized army!"
{77060}{77121}"Pay homage|to the noble Son of Heaven!"
{77239}{77387}"How much will this cost again -!"
{78170}{78244}"My dear A Hi,|your gift is beautiful,
{78247}{78311}but its bringer is even more so!
{78314}{78356}I'll keep her too!"
{78505}{78588}"O Son of Heaven, let me give you,
{78591}{78683}in place of this unworthy little frog,
{78686}{78780}a magic horse,|matchless in the world!"
{79983}{80124}"My dear A Hi,|I'm quite satisfied with you|I'll keep the horse ---
{80127}{80180}and the girl as well!"
{80449}{80536}"O Highest One, that's impossible!
{80539}{80637}I cannot do my magic|without the girl!"
{80726}{80788}"So - ? You can not - ?
{80791}{80943}Wait and you'll see,|that you'll be able to!|Either you'll be..."
{81021}{81078}"... or - !"
{81320}{81433}"O Son of Heaven,|your eloquence is irresistible!"
{81880}{81960}"Lock him in the highest pagoda!
{81963}{82059}Tomorrow at dawn|he'll be beheaded - !"
{83913}{83990}"You must make her|more flexible with me, A Hi,
{83993}{84050}otherwise --|you already know !!"
{84667}{84740}"You will help me, won't you - ?!"
{84932}{84988}"Be reasonable, Tiao Tsien!
{84991}{85052}What can poor Liang offer you!
{85055}{85101}But the Emperor ---!"
{85214}{85293}"Give me back my magic wand!!"
{85502}{85530}"You -- you...
{85533}{85599}you miserable,|horrid cactus,|you -- !!"
{88174}{88250}The flight...
{88384}{88419}The pursuers...
{88693}{88773}"We must go faster, Liang!
{88776}{88849}The path narrows down!"
{90130}{90184}"The jade piece from|A Hi's magic wand
{90187}{90254}becomes ever smaller,|each time I use its power!"
{90282}{90348}"Go on! Go on -!"
{90580}{90615}"They are close!"
{90716}{90885}"Demons of fire,|block the way with flames!"
{91587}{91644}The night...
{91794}{91847}"Take A Hi's magic horse,
{91850}{91923}and bring me the two,|dead or alive!"
{92130}{92207}The magic steed.
{93885}{93978}Sixth Verse.
{94264}{94330}"Do you understand now, child,|why I'm tired|and fed up with my task?
{94333}{94367}I'm the eternal invincible one...
{94370}{94405}Go back to the living -|and live!"
{94628}{94702}"Give me back my beloved's life!"
{95402}{95441}"There's a last way - !
{95444}{95558}Bring into my magic circle|a human hour, of another|life not extinguished yet,
{95561}{95631}having before itself|years... days... hours. -
{95634}{95700}Then I'll give back|your beloved's life..."
{96039}{96063}"...... eleven !
{96066}{96126}Guard fire and lights,|that nobody be harmed..."
{96392}{96442}"Praise be to God - !"
{96631}{96694}"Death took my beloved --
{96697}{96749}I want to join him!"
{97156}{97231}"Old man, you have already lived so long!...
{97234}{97293}What more can life offer you...?"
{97405}{97526}"Give me your life,|give me the few days|that perhaps are left to you -
{97529}{97598}help me to save|my beloved's life - !"
{97732}{97757}"Not a day --
{97760}{97787}not an hour --
{97790}{97822}not a breath - !!"
{98691}{98723}"The beggar - !"
{99051}{99210}"Beggar, do you want|to end your troubles - ?"
{99384}{99474}"Give me your life - !"
{99699}{99725}"Not a day --
{99728}{99755}not an hour --
{99758}{99791}not a breath - !!"
{99958}{99995}The hospital.
{100390}{100527}"The mother is well|and the child is sound...
{100530}{100724}But the young man|admitted this evening,|died just before ten...!"
{101041}{101096}"Holy God, poor boy!
{101099}{101154}To die so young - !"
{101426}{101457}"And ourselves,
{101460}{101537}who would be glad|not to wake up next morning,
{101540}{101595}death doesn't want to do with!"
{101944}{101979}"If your life is so sad --
{101982}{102022}who among you gives it to me --
{102025}{102056}by goodness' sake - ?!"
{105419}{105454}"She was the last one - !"
{105738}{105762}"My child - !!"
{105930}{106067}"... another life,|not extinguished yet..."
{107850}{107906}"I can't pay you such price...
{107909}{107951}Now take my life too!
{107954}{108056}Because without my beloved one|it has no value for me - !!"
{108223}{108297}"I'll take you|to the one you love!"
{109034}{109117}"Who gives up his life, will gain it..."
{111068}{111119}"Hear what I say, people:
{111122}{111176}The bell has struck twelve!
{111179}{111235}Beware of ghosts and spooks.
{111238}{111315}That no evil spirit|may steal your soul!"
The Unholy Three
Twas a balmy summer evening,
And a goodly crowd was there.
Hercules! The mighty...marvelous... mastodonic model of muscular masculinity!
Never smoke cigarettes and you'll be a strong man like him.
Professor Echo! God's gifted genius!
The velvet-voiced ventriloquist!
Nemo, how would you like to walk over to my house and have a drink?
Why walk? Let's run!
Sweet Rosie O'Grady.
That's all there is to life, friends, a little laughter...a little tear...
This dollar pamphlet contains one thousand wheezes and jokes, a guaranteed tonic for dull care!
The price is ten cents, one dime!
Now, folks, that's just a sample of the lady's art!
The show on the inside starts immediately!
See her do the dance that broke the Sultan's thermometer.
You're there, Rosie, the best pal a guy ever had!
And tonight when we eat,
I'm goin' to buy you a swell steak!
I just couldn't hold out on you, Echo.
You're to square a guy!
I'm glad you done that, Rosie.
Money got that way never done no one no good!
Tweedledee! Twenty inches! Twenty years!
Twenty pounds! The Twentieth Century Curiosity!
The Demi-Tasse Daddy.
Fools!
Midnight.
You see, my plan is so ridiculous... so simple... that it scares you.
But... if you come with me, we'll clean up millions.
It's spooky! It sounds... unholy!
That's it!
We'll be the Unholy Three!
The day before Christmas...
And how is Hector McDonald, my
Grandma's little parrot seller?
Don't let her tease you, Hector.
Little Willie darling heard your voice.
He wants you to take him bye-bye.
You're just an old darling, Hector.
I won't tease you any more.
You're makin a play for that guy!
Since when do you own me?
If you tip that boob off to who we are,
I'll lay some lilies under your chin!
If you don't stop yelling, you'll tip him off yourself.
I'll get a Mrs. O'Grady.
I think you'd better show the parrots.
They talk so well for you.
Echo, the ventriloquist, could make wooden dummies talk... now watch the jolly parrots.
Isn't it wonderful how the parrots always talk to your Grandma?
That house, where you called about the parrot, was robbed last night.
This is Mr. Arlington.
The parrot you sold me doesn't talk.
Here's another parrot that won't talk.
All right, I'll come over.
I'm sure when the bird sees me it will feel more at home.
The lady from the bird store, Mr. Arlington. may I leave him here?
He might cry if he sees the...
B-I-R-D
Take mine, darling... and Granny will get you some red beads just like those.
He's always been so fond of beads!
Christmas Eve...
...and then, Echo says to my, "Granny will get you some red beads just like those"!
Yes, and before morning Granny will have those pretty red beads.
Hector's out there with a
Christmas tree for little Willie.
Didn't I order you to stay away from that guy?
I wasn't with him!
I met him on the corner headed for here!
Wait for me in the kitchen.
You go back to bed, Mrs. O'Grady.
Rosie and I will trim the tree.
Get rid of him! we're gonna pull that Arlington job tonight.
Oh, I'm mad at Granny!
She won't stay in bed!
Perhaps she wants to help us trim the tree.
Yes, she'd love to do some trimming.
That guy bossin me... me and my strength!
He's too jealous to leave her with that boob. Come on... we'll turn this trick alone!
I've a secret I want you to share.
I'm going to ask Rosie to merry me.
But I'm not going to give her the ring until tomorrow.
You and your strength! You're yellow, you big stiff... or you'd come with me.
You heard me! You're yellow!
JOHN ARLINGTON MURDERED
IN HOME BY JEWEL THIEVES.
'Oh, spare my life', said
Mr. Arlington, 'spare my life'!
You... filth!
Don't you realize that you've murdered a man?
That's why I said we'd never carry a gun!
Was there anybody beside yourselves know the rubies were here in the house?
Ther was on old woman from a bird store who saw the rubies.
If you don't want no part of these, because of how we got 'em... then me and the Kid wll take 'em.
You're gonna put 'em back in the safe with the rest of our stuff!
I'm from Police Headquarters.
Oh, yes. Isn't it terrible? Mr. Arlington was one of my best customers.
You were at Mr. Arlington's home yesteday, weren't you?
Did the man you saw with Mr. Arlington look as if he would commit such a crime?
The reason I ask is because sometimes the least little thing gives us a clue.
I hate to see anybody tease a baby.
I don't like to take his toys from him.
Let's finish our talk in the store.
You sold a parrot to Mr. Arlington.
Who delivered it?
Oh! So you delivered it yourself?
You forget easy, don't you?
So long. I'll see you later.
That dick has a line on us... we gotta think fast!
He's got a hunch Hector turneed this trick. 
Let's plant the jewels in the boob's room!
That's it! Make him the fall guy!
That's what we hired him for, isn't it... in case we got in a jam?
Christmas night...
Don't you think my savings are enough for us to start on?
If I loved a man, he wouldn't have to have a dime!
Oh! If you loved a man!
Then why have you let me go on hoping?
Aw, I've just been kidding!
Oh, Hector, I tried so hard to let you know I love you...
I've been a crook... a pick-pocket!
But you're not going to be any more.
I did some pretty bad things myself... when I was young.
Gee, but you've made this a great Christmas, Rosie.
Gee, but you've made this a great Christmas, Rosie!
Ain't you the kidder?
No, Echo, I'm on the lovel. I love him!
Thanks.
What are you going to do?
You'll find out soon enough!
Extry! Extry! Arlington murderer arrested!
What a bonehead I was to overlook that!
McDonald's alibi, that he was at
Mrs. O'Grady bird store, will, be investigated by the police.
That means more investigation... but there ain't goin to be no Mrs. O'Grady when they get here!
Yes there is goin to be a Mrs. O'Grady... that dick saw me here...
You guys can get out of your make-up... but I can't! ¡And I ain't going to the chair alone!
And neither is Hector McDonald going to the chair!
Now, laugh that off... you big stiff!
What are you going to do?
You'll find out soon enough!
Regan is on his way to
O'Grady's bird store.
Here's one thing stronger that you... and I might need him.
It was Spring before the grim machinery of the law worked around to the case of 
Hector McDonald.
Does the defendant's attorney intend to produce the alleged witnesses, Mrs. O'Grady and her grand-daught?
127er
We're making every effort to locate them.
While in a secluded cabin in the mountains...
In his prison cell he sits.
How about just us two dividin the stuff?
Maybe I got a better palan.
You can save him, Echo. And, if you will,
I'll stick with you. I'll never see Hector again.
Yes! You'd stick with me... but you'd go on loving him.
...and the minute he's free, you'd double-cross me and go back to him.
Don't you understand... I'll do anything to save him! I love him, Echo... I love him.
I'd even take that from you.
After that, you don't want to change your mind about sticking with me?
He would always have Rosie... if he saved Hector. This was the thought that took Echo secretly to the city.
Your Honor, I object!
He is mis-stating the evidence!
Objection over-ruled!
Have you lawyer put you back on the witness stand. When you get there keep repeating the Lord's prayer. 
Move your lips But don't utter a sound.
Have faith in miracles.
Mrs. O'Grady.
It's Mrs. O'Grady's handwriting... and she's not here!
Your Honor, may the defendant take the stand again to give new evidence?
In a case so serious as his, with a man's life at stake, the court cannot reasonably deny your request.
Speak louder!
Your Honor, and gentlemen of the jury...
There was an old woman who was a man... and two others... the Unholy Three...
First, it was an old woman and her grand-daughter.
Now, the old woman is a man!
What next?
That wasn't me talking!
I didn't say a word!
...and it must be remembered that defense has failed to produce a single witness to confirm the prisoner's story!
You mean... you want me to go with you?
There's a fortune for just us two to split. What do you say?
Do you think he's guilty?
Will he get the chair?
I'm Echo, the ventriloquist...
Grandma O'Grady of the 'Unholy Three'!
Your Honor, I want to make a full confession!
The Law can be kind... And Echo's confession won freedom for both himself and Hector.
Dear Hector: I'll never see you again...
I can't explain...  but always summber I love you, Hector... I love you.
Good Bya. Rosie.
Echo, you remember what I promised if you saved Hector?
Well... I'm here.
Aw, what's the use of us kiddin, Rosie. We don't love each other. You run along to Hector.
Do you really mean that, Echo?
Good-by, old Pal!
That's all there is to life, friends... a little laughter... a little tear...
Original music composed and performed by The Alloy Orchestra.
Following the music instructions written by Dziga Vertov.
Music produced for
The Pordenone Silent Film Festival.
This movie was restored by
Lobster Films during the spring 2014 with the participation of the Eye Film Institute.
When Dziga Vertov travelled to
Western Europe in 1931,
He brought with him a print of MAN
WITH A MOVIE CAMERA.
His journey, taking in different
European cities, concluded in Amsterdam and here he left his print with the Filmliga.
This rare full-frame print, to which the original division in 6 chapters has been restored, was the main source for the film print that you are about to see.
MAN WITH A MOVIE CAMERA
A record on celluloid in 6 reels.
Produced by VUFKU 1929
(An excerpt from the diary of a cameraman).
For the attention of the spectator:
This film presents an experiment in the cinematic transmission of visible phenomena.
Without the aid of intertitles
Without the aid of a script
Without the aid of theatre
This experimental work aims at creating a truly international absolute language of cinema based on its complete separation from the language of theatre and literature.
Author-Supervisor of the experiment:
DZIGA VERTOV
Chief cameraman:
MIKHAIL KAUFMAN
Assistant editor
ELIZAVETA SVILOVA
Bakhmetievsky (district) bus depot.
Borzom, mineral water.
M. Gorki
O. I. Mogutov's Wine, Vodka and food store.
Tour of passenger freighter "Lenin" going from Odessa to Yalta.
Mail.
Wedding registration.
Divorce registration.
Expert shoeshine from Paris.
The filmmaker.
Cultural questionnaire.
Drop box for wall newspaper contributions.
On sports.
Green Manuela.
Proletarian Film Theatre.
Beer pub.
Icon and candle store.
Club Vladimir Ilitch Oulinaov of the station of Odessa.
Father of Fascism.
Vodka, beer, wine, eatery.
Lenin club, the first five-year plan.
END
THE PENALTY
From the story of COUNERNEUR MORRIS
A victim of the city traffic.
It was young Dr. Feris' first serious case.
The injured child is still
I unconscious of his fate.
I dared not wait any longer.
I amputated both legs above the knee.
There is a contusion at the base of the skull.
Good God! You should not have amputated!
You have mangled this poor child for life.
His father and mother...
My poor boy, I will do what I can for you.
I shall lie for you, and may Got forgive me.
Only immediate amputation could save your child's life.
I heard them say...
He imagines he heard us. It's the effect of the ether.
He lies! He lies!
Twenty seven years later... San
Francisco is the richest city in the western world.
She has one hideous blemish...
The Barbary Coast.
Barbary Nell.
Frisco Pete.
Blizzard, lord and master of the underworld.
Lichtenstein, of the Federal
Secret Service.
Rose, his most daring operative.
Rose, this detail I'm offering you is so dangerous, I hope you will turn it down.
It' s always Blizzard, that cripple from Hell.
Do you remember sweet Barbary
Nell who wandered from our fold?
She' s dead!
I could get him for theft, arson, murder, but his criminal machine would still grind on.
Through the Master I must reach his slave, the underground powers of the Reds.
He' s gathered up his dance hall girls and he' s put them to work in his house, making hats, thousands of hats.
I must know why!
"I believe Blizzard is hatching something so big, it endangers the city.
I must find out what!
By the way, Barbary Nell, who strayed from us, now sleeps upon a marble stab...
... in the morgue.
Blizzard' s favorite for the moment.
A woman who enters that den risks worse than death.
That' s all in the day' s work.
... and I shall walk as men walk.
I shall be the master of a city!
"And for my mangled years the city shall pay me...
... with the pleasures of a Nero and the powers of a Caesar!
But you won' t live to see it... if you don' t pedal better.
It means living in that devil' s house till you find out what he' s up to.
Of course. Well, I' m game.
Dr. Ferris, now the most famous surgeon in his line.
Dr. Wilmot Allen, his assistant.
Blizzard had agents in strange places.
Barbara asked me to call for her.
The surgeon' s daughter Barbara, had dedicated herself to Art.
I' m dreadfully discouraged.
I have done nothing worth while.
Some day she will realize that this is all nonsense.
Sorry you have to go.
Haven' t I waited long enough?
Why don' t you chuck it, Barbara?
Not until I have done at least one thing that is worth doing.
And I' m going to do Satan, after the fall'.
If I fail...
... I will marry you.
Nothing to report.
Blizzard keeps plans to himself.
His people obey orders not knowing their meaning.
My knowledge of music...
...has been my protection.
He likes my pedaling.
Rose
Rose has been there a week... and she' s learned nothing.
You' re a find!
You are not afraid of me... you look me in the eyes.
How could I be afraid... when you play like that?
You are a find!
WANTED - Model to pose of
"Satan After the Fall".
If you thing look like Satan, apply at studio of Barbara Ferris,
32 Institute Place.
Be in front of that studio tomorrow and see that no applicant but myself enters it.
Everything comes to him who waits.
You have mangled this poor child for life.
Do I look like Satan?
Before I am through with her and her father, they' think
I' m the devil himself.
9 A.M, Barbara' s Studio at 32 Institute Place.
Model already engaged.
Bubbles, a street waif whom
Barbara has befriended.
Whenever Blizzard was absent,
Rose hunted for clues.
Some excellent judges think that I resemble Satan.
If there is enough of me.
I seem to please.
I knew about when I was bumming the streets cat-throat' s his middle name.
You ought not touch him with a pole.
Gawd! Look at that face!
If I could catch that expression in the day...
I' d be famous.
How do you happen to know so much about Art?
My father, who shall be nameless, was a distinguished man.
But he detested little boys with their legs clipped off. So at fifteen I hoppled out of his life.
I could write a better treatise on sculpture myself.
Why do you live in the underworld?
When Satan fell from
Heaven he looked for power in Hell.
Hugely satisfied with his morning s work.
Rose, my dear!
Under the piano my darling... we will have some music.
I have a feeling I shall waft you into Heaven.
A death song, Rose!
Rose was my best bet... so far she' s learned nothing.
"I could not have played that way without your help.
Go back to work...
I can murder anything but music.
Days passed and the clay grew into the image of the man who was like Satan...
Into a face clothed with evil intent.
In time man would mangle the soul of the daughter, even as the father had mangled the body of the man.
The end of this passage is barred by a gate but through it
I could see what...
But the most remarkable of all is a fully-equipped operating room.
If you say it' s good,
I know it' s good.
But she hesitated for this would mean the end of Blizzard.
I know of Dr. Allen... and of his great master,
Dr. Ferris."
I will come tomorrow at the same time.
What an admirable pair of legs.
I gave mine to science.
That monster ought to be chloroformed and put out of the way.
He shows me only courtesy and helpfulness.
The end of this passage is barred by a gate, but through it I could see what...
Doctor Ferris investigates.
May I talk with
Mr.  Blizzard alone?
I have followed every step of your career, and you have indeed profited by your early mistakes.
You were the child whose life I ruined?
Don' t let that trouble you too deeply.
It is now in your power to repair your error.
Command me in any way...
But don' t come here any more.
Only your daughter' s request can keep me away. She is making a masterpiece.
Barbara, let me tell you a story.
He lies! He did not have to cut them off.
Behind his visits there is some sinister motive.
I can read it his eyes.
If you have made him what he is, it is all the more our duty to help him.
Blizzard' s man O'Hagan, his back in town.
He has organized thousands of disgruntled foreign laborers.
Hats and men... what' s the devil up to?
Blizzard' s chief lieutenant,
O'Hagan.
You have worked in the dark long enough... this is the plan I have been developing for two years.
2 December
At twelve noon on that day I shall loot the City of San Francisco.
Your 10.000 foreign malcontents will filter into the city in small detachments.
The signal will be an explosion.
By fire and riots I shall draw the police and military into the suburbs.
The heart of the city will be left defenseless... ours to loot at will.
And then we shall vanish with our treasure.
You talk as if you had legs! By God!
You have gone mad!
Perhaps... but with the madness that succeeds!
Better come out of that closet or I will begin to shoot!
Crying won' t help... talking may.
What the use...you' re going kill me anyhow.
I doubt it... you' re the best pedaler
I ever had.
But the most remarkable of all is a fully equipped operating room.
You see, you haven' t been allowed to do much damage.
I think I' m glad.
Don' t you see?
Master!
With exultation he felt the power that his mind was gaining over Barbara.
You are the best critic in the world.
Live your own life... go where I shall point... to your place among the stars.
How am I ever going to thank you the help you have given me?
When you have finished that, don' t give me op.
I love you, Barbara, with my whole heart and soul.
At her laugh his Hell - born loose passions broke.
But almost instantly he knew that he had blundered...
...and like a good general tried retrieve his mistake.
I am the unhappiest beast in the world.
Forgive me having dared to lift my thoughts to you.
Laughter burns a cripple like acid.
I don' t know why I laughed.
You frightened me.
Will you forgive me?
I have come to prescribe a little, Barbara.
Call me a taxi.
True women need love, a home, children. He has made you forget that.
I will marry you, dear, whenever you wish.
After a night of jealous fury, the Beast takes action.
Hello Doctor, this is Bubbles.
It' s about Barbara... she' s gone to
Blizzard' s house.
I do not know why she went. She was crying.
He will run all the way... on those magnificent legs.
Once before a woman surfeited me with her caresses.
She' s dead!
Rose just shows herself at the window and nods... and that' s all.
Where is Miss Ferris?"
She is probably in her room.
Shall I search your house, or will you take me to her?
Listen, my baffled hero... if you wish the lady to go free...
... you must hand over to me your superb legs.
Dr. Ferris will cut them off for you.
Then he will graft them to me.
They will be very becoming.
Your daughter is in my house. She has been hurt. Cowmen at once.
That fairy tale about your daughter was merely to make certain that you' d come.
You' ve played the trick with apes... now I' m putting human beings at your service.
Your victim is fulfilling destiny in making you the master surgeon of the world.
You must make it possible... unless you would have your charming daughter married to these.
Out of my house is not out of my power... that' s here.
Suppose you and your assistant should disappear... then your daughter and I...
Give me legs and I will be a model son-in-law.
Then I will be a tower of strength...
I will be a Caesar!
You are right... you' d be a superman!
I will do it!
Doctor Ferris' sudden decision to operate brought about starling results.
I have waked from a terrible dream!
I was a devil...
I did things that I shudder to think of!
What' s happened... you did not do what he wanted?
That was a madman' s request...
I operated on his head.
There is a contusion at the base of the skull.
That caused pressure on the brain... he has never been wholly responsible for his acts.
This man, let alone may become as great a power for good as he was for evil.
He shall have the chance.
The tyrant' s hand relaxed... the whirlwind breaks.
‘he old Blizzard is no more.
I have assumed my real name
In my madness I built power from evil. I shall undo my handwork.
I am still your friend, but it must be for better things.
He' s got religion... that means he will raise Hell!
How do we know he won' t snitch on us?
If we don' t finish him, he will finish us.
The New Man... and his wife.
We shall do great things together.
Fate chained me to Evil... for that I must pay the Penalty.
"That is a great puzzle,
Perhaps I am going to see it solved.
Don' t grieve, dear... death interests me.
All that' s left of him... an evil mask of a great soul.
Uploader:
Anavyssos
The End
FILMEXPORT HOME VIDEO
Presents
This film was renovated in 1993 by
EROTICON
Written and Directed by
Director of Photography
Production Designers
Music Composed by
In Lead Roles
Cast
Is another train coming?
You've got so many flacons, you are worse than my daughter.
Wait here until it stops raining.
Do you know what? Let it rain, you can spend the night in my house.
Hurry up, Andrea, I must go to work.
You know that I am afraid of strangers, Father.
Don't be silly, this man is no thief!
Where would you go? There is no hotel in our village. Stay here.
The storm must have cut off the wires.
I know you shall never come back...
And...
What's the matter?
Would you mind if I leave, Father?
Do you want to visit your aunt?
Very well then, go.
Why do people forget so quickly?
Why do people forget so quickly?
I yearn for you though I know you will never return. I do not dare to die.
It would kill my father if I told him.
I am so helpless!
I cosset it inside of me, even if
I feel that my life has reached its end.
I do not know why I write this letter, but I feel relief in knowing that you have not thought about me once.
My poor husband is waiting for me at the theatre.
What will you tell him about where you were?
With my lover!
You would never say that!
Your key!
Who is that gentleman?
Where does he live?
Tell him to wait!
You can say whatever you wish!
I know you are lying!
I would not like to be in her shoes.
You're impossible, you would even delude a saint! I will divorce you!
Did your "little daughter" write?
It is said he will soon be a grandfather!
They say she tied that man who spent the night at your house.
No one will dare touch the chastity of my daughter!
Your child was stillborn.
Perhaps it is better for you this way.
How some men handle their love affairs.
You see, you were here a few days longer and bed and board costs money.
Wandering aimlessly.
I am sending you some money, do not take everything so tragically.
But you wanted to go the other way.
The man who was to come for the blood transfusion is not here.
Maybe I...
Do you know how you got injured?
Your wife saved you your life.
My wife?
Yes, your wife. Don't you remember?
You brought her here in your car.
Could you bring my wife here then?
I am sorry but I can deliver this piano model only in a few weeks as I have just sold the last one.
My wife.
I can wait a few weeks for the other piano.
Dangerous friendship.
You were not home, because you knew I would come.
He is a fine man. I hope he will make a good impression on you.
...And in the evening...
...In the morning...
...In the morning...
...I ask you to reject my husband's invitation.
Forgive me, I should have done that myself.
...I know what pain I have caused you.
You may laugh at whatever I say to apologise to you. But I love you.
Have you forgiven me?
Yet in the evening...
I love you and I am jealous of you because you love your husband.
Andrea, I want you to...
Do not lie to me, he is the man who had your picture!
Who? That annoying man!
I do not know him at all!
I will keep an eye on that gentleman!
You must come with us tomorrow, we will be most pleased if you join us.
If you only knew what I think of him!
And what I think of you! Not even an angel could put up with you!
I love you so much because you are not like other men, you are not jealous.
I am not jealous, because I trust you.
I have a terrible headache.
I am so tired.
...I almost forgot.
I will give you back your key, you will need it for someone else.
On the "trip".
On the "trip".
Don't you think that leading a simple family life is most fortunate?
Why don't you get married then?
It is quite simple and easy.
That is what you think!
...I think you will lose.
Do you want me to lose?
We did not have time to tell you that we are leaving tomorrow.
It is my wife's wish. It is so nice in the south at this time of the year.
Yes, it is nice, indeed.
I hope to see you soon again!
What kind of a comedy is this!
Why aren't you sincere, Andrea?
I was never more sincere as today!
I think our trip will do you good, you will calm down.
I am calm, but you are jealous, and you are running away like a coward!
How "love" ends...
Give this letter to my husband at 5 o'clock.
Very well!
This is the end then!
You shall never see me again!
Was anyone here?
Will you believe me if I say that no one?
To loyalty - to all women!
I swear your wife is not in the room!
Liar!
The past that shall always be the past.
Shall we go?
Yes, let us go!
The End
The first professional film by
Josef von Sternberg was unusually bold both subject matter and technical skill.
It framed the style of all gangster films to come.
A great city in the dead of night...
...streets lonely, moon-flooded...
...buildings empty as the cliff-dwellings of a forgotten age -
"The great Bull Weed - closing another bank account."
"That's what makes bums and squealers!"
"I may be a bum, but I am no squealer.
I might say, sir, that I am a
Rolls-Royce for silence."
"All right, Rolls Royce - I'll give you a chance to prove that."
"Keep your eyes off her!
What do you think I'm here for?"
"Watch me show that dame what I think of money."
"Buck Mulligan's looking for trouble."
"How'd you like to pick up ten bucks?"
"Pick it up or I'll send you to the morgue!"
"Give me that gun!"
"Rolls Royce, meet Feathers - my girl."
"How long since you had the body washed and polished, Rolls Royce?"
"If you don't want Mulligan to bump you off, Professor, you'd better stick with me."
"With pleasure, sir."
"Come on, let's drift!"
"Can I possibly be of any assistance?"
"The city is yours, Kid - what'll you have?"
"Attila, the Hun, at the gates of Rome."
"Who's Attila? The leader of some wop gang?"
"You were born two thousand years too late. You can't get away with your stuff - nowadays."
"They'll never get me!"
"I'm either a missionary or a sucker, but I'm going to put you on your feet."
"What could I do to help you?"
"Help me? Nobody helps me! I help other people!"
"I'm going to bury that guy while these lilies are still fresh!"
But Buck should have used wax flowers, for long after his lilies had faded - -
"You don't want that junk. It's too vulgar!"
"Why, it's the old hideaway!
Why did you bring me here?"
"Don't you know it's wrong to steal?"
"Look at him - cost me a thousand - looks like a million!"
"He's read every book in the case - he likes to read!"
"Let's have the key, Professor."
"A perfect getaway - - through our warehouse to the next block.
And nitro couldn't blow those 
         doors!"
"No, thanks. I've got to go out on important business."
"The police all know Mulligan's
Special. Plant the little flower where it will do the most good."
"I told you that guy had brains."
"You stay here. You may have the brains, but I've got the guts."
"What were you before Bull Weed picked you up?"
"A lawyer sometimes - a drunkard always ... what does it matter?"
"A woman, I suppose."
"I'm not interested in women."
"The Captain wants to see you."
"Say - what is this - a pinch?"
"Somebody framed me!"
"Framed you? Since when are you a picture, Buck?"
"You've got the wrong guy this time.
I'll be out in twenty minutes."
"Is this why you're called Feathers?"
"I wear feathers all over."
"What were you before
Bull Weed - er - found you?"
"I thought you weren't interested in women!"
"Bull Weed's our best friend, isn't he?"
"This is the first time in a long while that I've felt ashamed."
"Well, I planted that flower. They've probably pinched Mulligan by now."
"See you at the Ball tonight?"
"You've got to show. Everybody with a police record will be there!"
"Besides, I'm going to make
Feathers queen of the ball."
"- be there! Them's orders!"
The underworld's annual armistice - when, until dawn, rival gangsters...
...bury the hatchet and park the machine-gun.
"Check your gats!"
"Vote for Feathers!"
"Throwing away any ten-dollar bills tonight?"
"Who said you could dance with her - with-out asking me?"
"Our friend has gone back to his booze again!"
"- but I don't want you to drink!"
"Please .... don't!"
"You're Bull Weed's girl - aren't you?"
Elsewhere the night deepened into silence and rest. But here the brutal din...
...of cheap music - booze - hate
- lust - made a devil's carnival.
"F-F-Feathershelected!"
"You tell her now."
"The committee is waiting to crown you Queen o' the Ball."
"You needn't worry about your sweetie. He's out - - for the night!"
"Before sentencing you, I declare to you and your kind...
...that no man, or band of men, can defeat the Law."
"Others have tried it before, and,
I regret to say, will try it again -
- but their fate must be the same as yours."
"All your life you have dealt with the Law as an enemy. And now...
...by a final deed of violence, you have compelled it to end your career."
"I sentence you to hang by the neck until you are dead - -"
"- and may God have mercy on your soul!"
"How are we going to help him now?"
"Don't worry. They haven't hanged him yet."
The Law took no chances. Bull Weed was isolated from his world.
No messages delivered, no visitors admitted.
"- before sunrise tomorrow, to hang the said Bull Weed by the neck until he is dead."
"Any last request?"
"Tell Paloma to bring me the juiciest steak in Dreamland."
"The only one who'll see Bull is Paloma - when he brings him his last meal."
"Here's the plan - the hearse will come to the outer court...
...an hour before the hanging -"
"- and you wait in your car at
Three Corners Road, for
Bull to join you."
"You have Paloma tell Bull -
I'll attend to the hearse."
"Does that mean any danger - for you?"
"The police will only see me buying two tickets at the railroad station -"
"Then they'll be sure Bull is leaving town with me."
"Then I won't see you again?"
"This is good-bye."
"If I lose you, it's my finish.
I love you so -"
"I can't let you go - !"
"We have a chance to lead a decent life. If we get Bull out - we're his again!"
"We can't double-cross him - - we owe him everything."
"We do love each other, don't we?"
"We can't do this - - we couldn't be happy if we betrayed him!"
"You see - you taught me how to be decent."
"Rolls Royce says watch for
 the hearse - two o'clock...
...The gang will be in it - - they'll cover the guards and spring you!"
"That's a lie! Rolls Royce doesn't want me to get out!"
"You've got him wrong, Bull - that hearse will come crashing through like a tank!"
"On the level, Ed - has Rolls
Royce or Feathers ever really tried to see me?"
"Maybe I hadn't ought to tell you - but the whole town knows how they're carrying on."
"Ed, is there time for another game of checkers?"
"You hate to leave the old burg - don't you?"
"Do you think Rolls Royce is still in town?"
"What do you care? You'll be hanging in an hour."
"There's one guy I'd like to get before I hang."
"You're in a tight place now."
"It's your move."
"The plan went wrong - the guards got wise, somehow."
"It's all over with him by now."
"Extra! Bull Weed escapes!"
"What's the extra about?"
"Nothing - just a boob breaking jail!"
"So you've brought the police, too. You little rat!"
"Now you can wait and take what you framed up for me!"
"Bull - listen - we were on the level - we tried to get you out -"
"He sure cinched my finish - he's got those keys!"
"We've got the Bull cornered at his old hangout!"
"If you're waiting for Bull Weed, you'll have a long wait."
"They'll get us both in a few minutes, Bull. Why should I lie to you now?"
"If I could get my hands
 on that lousy skunk...
...I'd go back and
let 'em hang me!"
"I'm sorry things went wrong - but there's still time - for you - to get away!"
"Now you see - - how much he double-crossed you!"
"I've been all wrong, Feathers -
I know it now - I've been wrong all the way -"
"And all this got you was another hour!"
"There was something I had to find out - - and that hour was worth more to me than my whole life."
There it is, Herb.
One verse and two choruses.
- Is this a good song, Eddie?
- It's a good song, Herb.
- It's as good as the doll-dance number.
- All right.
Skip the verse, do the chorus, tempo.
Hot, eh?
- Good morning.
- Hello, Jimmy.
I've got the hottest song you ever heard in your life.
- Is that so?
- Yes, that's so.
Got it? Have you got it?
Jimmy, if you can get this crowd to keep quiet, I'll sing it for you.
- How about a little harmony?
- All right.
Listen, let's go through it.
One and two.
The second chorus, a little jazz, a little pep.
Come on, I'll vamp until ready.
Let's go.
Go on, Herb.
- That's it.
- The chorus in F-sharp.
Hot dog!
Listen, kid, if we can get that number, we're a cinch for the Palace.
- Hello, girls.
- Hello, Eddie.
Listen, Eddie, we'll take that song and smack it over for you.
Sure!
Oh, no. Not this song, babies.
Zanfield's bought it for his new revue.
And the Mahoney Sisters are coming from the West to put it over for me.
Listen, Eddie, you're not gonna waste a swell number like that...
...on a smalltime sister act, are you?
Nix cracking, Rosie.
Half of that sister team is going to be the future Mrs. Eddie Kearns.
Wait a minute.
Wait a minute, Eddie.
If you wanna be made overnight, just give us a crack at that number.
Oh, no. Oh, no.
No, no. Positively not.
I've gotta get back to the hotel.
The girls are waiting for me.
Oh, but listen, if you want a song...
...see Georgie Cohan.
He writes good music too.
How about it, Jimmy?
Oh, I'll take that, thank you.
Gee, this is elegant, ain't it?
Tell you better when
I get a peek at the beds.
Quiet. I told you to pack that cooking outfit in the trunk.
Yeah? Well, I'm taking no chances.
If we can't pay our bill and the hotel holds the trunks, we still eat.
And, baby, when you don't eat, you lose a lot of calories.
Calories? What are they?
Oh, acrobats, you big sap.
- Well, I never got fat on your cooking.
- No?
You never got that complexion from the Greeks.
- Don't talk to me like...
- Ixnay, ixnay.
- Leave us plenty of towels too.
- I did.
And I counted them.
How high can you count?
Well, everything's okay.
Will there be anything else?
Yeah, food.
I think he may stall for a tip. Get to the window and give me the high sign.
Hank, I don't wanna do that.
Don't be such a cheapskate.
Screw.
Say, did they run out of everything but dollar signs on this thing?
One coffee, one order of fried eggs.
There's two in an order, ain't they?
- Yep.
- And one order of rolls.
- Hank.
- Yes?
Come look at the elegant view.
Oh, that will be all, thank you.
Cup of coffee, order of rolls, a couple of eggs.
It worked.
Oh, Queenie, New York.
The place we've dreamed and talked about.
- Ain't it swell?
- Yeah.
But there's something about it that scares me, Hank.
Scares you?
Well, there's nothing to be afraid of.
Well, it seems like we're taking an awful chance.
We were getting along so well out west.
Plenty of work, small jumps, a chance to save money.
And the act always went over big.
But here, nobody knows us.
Oh, I'm afraid.
Now don't lose your nerve, honey.
But we haven't got much money.
Oh, Hank, couldn't we go back, just for one more year?
Back to those opera houses and town halls?
Those cheap hotels and their lobby comics?
Cooking our own food...
...washing our own clothes and ironing them on mirrors.
Riding in those smelly day-coaches.
Going ragged all summer and then darn near freezing in the winter. And why?
Just to save money enough to get to New York and show our act.
Oh, honey.
With your looks and my ability...
I wouldn't steer you wrong.
Now don't worry.
You see that electric sign of the fellow in BVDs?
- Yeah.
- Well, right there...
...they're gonna have the Mahoney Sisters.
- In BVDs?
- Yes, in BVD...
Baby, they were plenty smart when they made you beautiful.
Come on, let's get cleaned up before Eddie gets here.
I'll run a tub for you.
The Mahoney Sisters in BVDs.
Hey, what are you singing?
The bubble song from Lux.
Will you join me?
No use of us both getting wet.
Will you wash mine?
I might as well. You never wash anything but your neck.
I not only wash them.
I gotta pick them up.
Oh, Hank, I didn't think.
Oh, you never do.
Oh, don't strain yourself.
I'll get them.
Oh, boy, this is going to be good.
Oh, I'll go.
Can you imagine my embarrassment?
Uncle Jed!
Hello, honey. How are you?
- Fine, and you?
- Great.
- Gee, I'm glad to see you, Hank.
- Oh, Queenie, hurry up. It's Uncle Jed!
Uncle Jed?
I'll be right out.
What a break for you.
- I'll be with you in just a minute.
- All right, honey, but hurry.
What do you know, Uncle Jed?
I've got you booked for 30 weeks over at the Manley Time.
Nothing doing.
We're in New York to stay.
Say, listen, girls...
...you know, I know this town better than you do. And there are more sisters...
...doing their acts over the lunch counters in New York than over the...
Than in the theaters.
You're just a crapehanger.
Maybe, but let me tell you...
...tell you, tell you, tell you...
What's the name of that record you're playing?
Say, listen, girls...
Yeah?
Well, what is it?
I love both you girls, and I want to see you get along.
Sure, Uncle Jed, we know that.
But we aren't leaving this town till we get a flash at Babe Ruth and Grant's Tomb.
- Oh, will you get that, Uncle Jed?
- You bet.
Oh, girls, your break... Your break...
Your coffee's here.
Bring the toothbrush glass when you come.
- All right.
- Will you have some coffee, Uncle Jed?
No, thanks. I just had my breakf...
I just ate.
- Yeah?
- Uncle Jed!
Queenie!
Gosh, what a big girl you are.
- And so beautiful.
- Ain't she, though?
Well, I suppose you've decided to stay in New York.
Yeah, we're all set.
But thanks for the offer, Uncle Jed.
That's all right.
I'll keep it open for a few days.
- All right.
- Goodbye.
- Oh, goodbye, Uncle Jed.
- If you wanna see me, just call me up.
Yeah, all right.
You're in the phone book?
You bet.
I think we're making an awful mistake not to take that work.
I know what I'm doing.
We stand as big a chance as anybody else.
What did the Duncans have when they hit Times Square?
"My Patio."
Say, we've got more than the Duncans ever had.
Well, the Duncans are pretty good too.
Say, what'd we do to them on the Gus Sun Time?
We knocked them off their seats.
Come in.
- Eddie!
- Hank!
Oh, baby.
Let me have a good look at you.
- Gee, but it's good to see you.
- Oh, boy, is it good to see you! Oh, gee!
That's my Queenie!
- Queenie? You don't mean to tell me it's...
- Sure.
Queenie, all grown up and everything.
Ain't she? That sisterly kiss won't be so hard to take now.
I'll say it won't.
- Take it big.
- I did.
You were a funny-looking thing the first time I saw you...
...with those gangly legs and freckles.
But you certainly turned out to be a beautiful girl.
Well, I'll go get some clothes on.
I'm just crazy about her, Eddie.
She's so young and beautiful.
Of course she is.
Well, Hank, now that you're here, when are we going to get married?
Oh, not till we've put this act over.
I'm gonna give Queenie a break.
Always doing something for somebody else.
No wonder I love you.
- I kind of got a weakness for you too.
- Yeah?
Mrs. Eddie Kearns?
Sounds pretty good, doesn't it?
Swell, Eddie.
Yeah, and you can feature that anytime in the electric lights.
- Gee, still the same sweet kid, ain't you?
- Why, certainly.
Hank, did you pack my new dress in the trunk?
I'll get it for you in a minute.
Come here, Queenie.
- Gee, I can't get over how she's changed.
- Well, you sure look elegant, Eddie.
- Doesn't he, Hank?
- He's an eyeful.
Three carats.
Platinum.
And here's the payoff.
Look, but don't laugh.
Gold garters!
Oh, Eddie, I always knew you'd make good.
Yeah, and I ain't forgetting that you're the little girl that made me come to New York.
Remember when I wanted to quit and give the whole thing up...
...and you made me stick it out?
Well, now I'm gonna do something for you.
Zanfield's bought my new song,
"The Broadway Melody."
And he's naming his revue after it.
- But I've already spoken to him about you.
- You think we've got a chance?
Chance? Don't be silly.
One word from me, and you're in.
- Queenie, ain't that great?
- Sure, if it's true.
True? You don't know how I stand with Zanfield.
- If we're in, what do we do?
- When do we start?
And how much do we get?
You're gonna sing my "Broadway Melody" with me.
The Mahoney Sisters and Eddie Kearns.
Yeah, Eddie Kearns and the Mahoney Sisters.
Well, how does it go?
How's it go? Now, listen, I sing a verse, and you come in on the chorus.
Then we do another chorus, and then go into a little dance.
- Give us an idea of the dance.
- I'll give you an idea.
- Good?
- Swell, Eddie, do it again.
Let's move back this table, kids.
We'll do our dance.
All ready, girls?
Come on, now, let's go.
There you are.
Queenie, why don't you look at my feet?
Look at her.
Attagirl!
You like that?
Don't do that.
Don't do that!
Hey, wait a minute, wait a minute!
- What's the matter with the left leg?
- I've got a headache.
Go on, sit down, take a load off your mind.
- Don't talk to me like that. I don't feel well.
- Listen, don't answer me back, understand?
Come here.
There's Eddie. Hello, hey!
Your rhythm is all wrong.
Nothing like I showed you.
All right, now watch.
- Hello, Eddie.
- Hello, how are you?
We had a tough time getting in!
When do we show the act?
In a few minutes.
I haven't had a chance to talk to Zanfield yet.
- It's okay, ain't it?
- We're in?
Sure, it's in the bank.
- Whatever I say goes.
- Hey, Kearns!
Yes, sir?
We don't wanna take all afternoon to set one dance.
Yes, sir.
Maybe we'd better get undressed.
Come on.
All right, Sam, let it go.
- Oh, George.
- Wait a minute, hold it there. Hold it, Sam.
The sets are all ready for your okay, Mr. Zanfield.
That's just an idea of what it's gonna be.
I can see that. It's just an idea.
Yes, sir. Yes, sir.
But don't worry, I'll fix it.
- Okay on those sets.
- Yes, sir.
Remind me to see that rehearsal in the morning. Make a note of that.
I'm having lunch at the Knickerbocker.
Oh, Mr. Zanfield, this material, I couldn't get it in the gold design, only in the silver.
- Isn't it lovely?
- It's fine. Get it in the gold.
- Remember, I want that in the gold.
- Yes, sir.
Oh, Mr. Zanfield, pardon me, will you take a look at the Mahoney Sisters right now?
- The Maloney Sisters?
- No, the Mahoney Sisters.
- Who are they? I never heard of them.
- It's the sister act I told you about.
- Where are they?
- Right over there, across stage.
All right, wheel them in.
- Tell George I'll take a look at the act.
- Thanks, Mr. Zanfield.
Well, kids, you all set?
Got your music?
Well, go over there and tell him what you want.
The Baloney Sisters.
Give us the introduction pickup and some choruses. And swell to the finish.
- But you follow us.
- Yes, ma'am.
Sam, looks like some carnival lost a good act.
I'm gonna lay that dame like a roll of linoleum.
- Hank, you can't pull that around here.
- Hank, don't start anything now.
- Get her in the dressing room.
- Sure. Now, come on. Get together.
- All set now?
- Oh, wait a minute.
- Don't mind if I put this down?
- No, ma'am.
I'll vamp till ready, and don't forget:
We do things intimately.
- All set.
- All set, fine. Babies, smack it over big.
You ain't got nothing to worry about.
You're as good as in now.
- I'll go and see how the boss likes it.
- All right.
Well, all right, shoot.
- Play it, will you?
- Something wrong with the piano.
- Do I have to come over and play it for you?
- Okay, go ahead.
What's the matter with them?
There's something wrong with the piano.
- Say, are you trying to crab our act?
- No, I'm not.
- Well, will you play it then, hot or cold?
- Well, go ahead then.
All right. All right, girls.
Mr. Zanfield's seen enough.
He'll let you know. Come in next Friday.
- But he ain't seen the finish yet.
- Yes. I know, all right. Line up, girls.
Oh, Mr. Zanfield, please give them a break.
You haven't seen their act.
I saw enough.
I can use the blond, but that little cluck is out.
But don't you know it's tough to put comedy over on a bare stage?
They'll be all right at the performance.
Give them another chance.
I know, Eddie.
Gee, kid, that's a tough break. Even if the act is a louse, he should've seen the finish.
It ain't a louse. It's a good act.
We stopped the show every performance we did for Jake Wells.
Yeah, the one I saw would stop a tank.
Say, you've been asking for trouble, and now you're gonna get it.
You great big peroxide-headed dizzy blond, you! What do you think of this act?
Hey, come here! Come here, girls!
Come here!
Let me at her, will you?
Let me at her!
Next time I'll give you a facial instead of a scalp treatment.
- Yeah, and I'll fix you, you little peanut.
- Let go of me!
- Oh, boy, I'll sock her...
- Stop it, Hank, you're crabbing everything.
Go get your clothes on.
I'll fix everything.
The big blond baboon! Why'd she pick on me? I didn't start any fight with her.
- Where's my music?
- Here's your music.
- Well, where's my bag?
- Now, be quiet. Be quiet, Hank!
Get in there. Straighten it out.
Let's get smart, Sam. Where are you?
Don't let them throw you up in the air.
I'm not gonna waste all day at it.
Give me a pickup and two choruses.
And let me tell you dames something:
If I get ahold of her, I'll rip her wide open.
Flo, what was the trouble about?
- I was beside the piano, not doing a thing...
- Wait a minute.
- I can't stand for quarreling.
- I didn't start it.
Never mind who started it. Now run along and be a good little girl.
- Oh, all right.
- And remember, no more quarreling.
- Excuse me, Mr. Zanfield.
- Well?
I heard what you said about me.
Please, couldn't you use the both of us at the same salary?
I might.
I think I can slip her in somewhere.
- Oh, thank you, Mr. Zanfield!
- All right.
My sister is the business manager of the act.
You won't let on that it ain't the both of us you want, will you?
Of course not.
- You send her over, and I'll talk to her.
- Oh, thank you!
All right.
Oh, Hank!
He can take his old show and put it where it'll do him the most good!
Don't act like that, Hank.
He didn't see your act, that's all.
- He's a very busy man.
- Oh, he's busy?
Well, so am I busy, with 30 weeks waiting for me.
- Now, don't get so excited over nothing.
- Hank, quick!
Mr. Zanfield wants to see you.
- Oh, yeah?
- On the level?
- Maybe we're in after all.
- Sure!
Let me handle this. I can always take care of these things better with nobody around.
I'll talk to him.
All right, girls, we'll take this right from the beginning. Okay, Sam, let it go.
I heard what you said to Zanny.
- You won't let on to Hank, will you, Eddie?
- Of course not.
Gee, that was wonderful of you,
Queenie.
I could kiss you for that.
You mustn't do that, Eddie.
I guess I shouldn't.
I never realized you were...
Gee, you're the sweetest little girl
I ever knew.
You mean next to Hank.
Yeah, sure.
You know, Hank's been everything in the world to me.
She's looked after me and worked for me, and fought for me, protected me.
I could never repay her for all her love and care.
Of course you love her, Queenie.
And you're gonna be everything that she wants you to be.
And I don't blame her for loving you.
Gee, but you're a cute kid.
And she loves you, Eddie.
I guess you and me are about all she ever thinks of.
Oh, I never wanna hurt her, Eddie.
And I want her to be happy with you.
Why, Queenie, I'd rather lose my pipes so I couldn't sing...
...and go lame so I couldn't dance than to hurt Hank.
- Sure you would. So would I.
- Can you imagine?
- We're in! Rehearsal in the morning!
- That's great!
- I knew you'd put it over, Hank!
- Oh, just leave it to me!
I ain't booked acts for 10 years and not know how to handle them!
- You bet you haven't!
- You're both swell kids!
- And plenty smart!
- And how!
- Gee, rehearsal in the morning! Ain't it great?
- Yeah!
Come on.
I got a lot of washing and ironing to do.
- You have?
- I want you to look your best, honey.
But tell me, how did you put it over?
What did you say to him?
I said to him, "Now, you listen here,
Mr. Zanfield, this is a sister team.
And we splits up for nobody!"
And with that, he smiled as nice as you please...
...and said, "That's all right, Miss Maloney."
Can you imagine calling me Maloney?
And everybody knows our name's Mahoney.
- Yeah, can you imagine that?
- Imagine that.
"Maloney"!
Hey, come on and get those clothes on, will you?
- Hurry up!
- Well, are we all set?
Yes, sir, everything ready to go when you say the word.
All right.
- Are you safe up there, Audrey?
- Okay.
Yes, that's perfectly safe.
- You get the orchestra in the pit.
- Yes, sir.
- Oh, Hagerty.
- Yes?
- That looks very good.
- I think it'll be very effective.
- So do I.
- Yes, sir.
Can you imagine? Putting on all this makeup for just one show a day?
Oh, dear! I'm just shaky all over.
Queenie, will you stop?
You're getting me nervous now.
It ain't a bit different than it was in Reading, PA.
And we're going over just as big.
- Oh, Hank, do you think so?
- Why, it's cream in the can, baby.
- Are you decent, girls?
- Yeah, come in.
Oh, Hank, get a load of this.
"Big mammoth appearance of the Mahoney Sisters on Broadway.
Zanfield saw them once, and they were in.
With appreciation and regards to our agent, Uncle Jed."
- Is that a pippin or not?
- You care for that?
- Do I?
- Hank, will you get Eddie out of here?
I'm nervous!
What's eating her?
Eddie, you gotta run along now.
We're nervous.
I get you.
Now, Queenie, don't be nervous.
- Remember, this is your big opportunity.
- Will you get out of here?
- Beat it, Eddie, will you?
- Now, don't forget, a lot depends on this.
- Oh, get out!
- Get out!
Stop, stop! Girls, girls!
- Be careful of my hats!
- We gotta get down on the stage!
I don't care!
I won't allow you to ruin them.
I told you they were too high and too wide.
Well, big woman, I design the costumes for the show...
...not the doors for the theater.
I know that. If you had, they'd have been done in lavender.
Pardon me, Mr. Zanfield, but the orchestra's killing my "Broadway Melody" number.
- Too much brass. They can't hear me.
- Kearns, tell them to keep it down.
Thanks, Mr. Zanfield.
- All right, boys, I think we can go.
- Yes, sir!
Hey, you!
When you get through with that noise, try and play my number.
Cut out the brass, and keep it very piano.
Are you back again?
Yes, and I'm telling you how I want my music played.
I've conducted opera.
What do you know about music?
- Nothing. I only wrote it, that's all.
- Then you have the best of me.
You don't have to listen.
I'll tell Zanny what a sap he was for buying it.
Maybe he'll get you to write the music for the show.
If I couldn't do better than this...
If you could, you wouldn't be waving a stick!
Electrician!
A little more this way with that spotlight.
What are you trying to do, ruin my profile?
Your profile was ruined the day you were born.
That's a smart crack.
Hit me with it and keep it here.
Hey, put that spotlight over here on this girl!
- He wants it over there.
- But it goes over here.
That spotlight goes here.
I can't sing without a spotlight.
Say, you couldn't sing if you had a searchlight.
- Did you get everything you wanted?
- Pardon me, Mr. Zanfield.
Would you okay this bill for Miss William's second act?
What's the idea? Two grand for a coat worn for less than three minutes? I won't pay it!
But you said ermine.
You'll giggle yourself right out of here one day.
Yes, sir.
- It's a gorgeous garment, isn't it?
- Isn't it gorgeous?
In fact, it's the gorgeous-est thing
I have ever seen. You sweet little cutie!
- There you are.
- Thank you, Mr. Zanfield.
- Come here, Unconscious.
- Hello, boys.
Say, Joe LeBlanc saw the rehearsal, and he says there's a fortune in the show.
- Yes, sir!
- We ought to know. We put it in.
- You think it's a good show then, Zanny?
- It's just an oil well.
- Let's see your gusher.
- Looks like a mine to me.
From all the gold-diggers you got in the troupe.
Any old time one of them can pry a nugget off of his ledge, they're going some!
Come on, Unconscious, put the load down.
Overture, girls.
This is the "Broadway Melody" number.
Get out of here and hurry up.
Come on. Come on. Get out of here.
Come on. Go on, get out.
Oh, there's the overture.
Oh, where's my hat?
Where's my hat?
Where's my hat?
Oh, where's my hat?!
- Over there!
- Over where?
- On the floor, under the clothes.
- Oh, yes. The clothes carton.
Why didn't you say so in the first place?
And make it snappy.
- Are you ready?
- Yes.
Now, honey, remember:
The dress rehearsal is tougher...
...than a first-night performance.
So don't be nervous.
- I'm not nervous.
- Neither am I.
No, it's over that shoulder.
That's the idea.
More. With those beads.
That's it. That's better.
That's the idea. In this...
All right! Out of the way.
Clear the way.
Elgin, call a doctor.
Elgin! Call a doctor! Elgin!
What are we gonna do?
Wait a minute. Wait a minute.
Hold it!
That number's too slow.
Cut out the Maloney Sisters.
- Cut out the whole first chorus?
- Yes.
Why, has he cut us out altogether?
Ain't it awful, the way they cut out these big stars?
I'll get to you in a minute.
Listen here, Mr. Zanfield, you can't cut us out like that.
We've got equity contract.
Kearns, go into the dance on the first chorus and end it there.
One more cut for you, dearie, and you'll be holding a spear.
And one more crack from you, bimbo, and you'll be holding a lily.
Listen to me, Mr. Zanfield, we...
Keep quiet. Will you cut it out and give me a chance to do my number?
But he cut us out of the whole show.
He can't do that.
Did you hear that, Mr. Zanfield?
They're trying to drown me out.
- Are you trying to drown him out?
- We're doing our best.
Mr. Zanfield, would you come backstage a moment? It's very important.
- All right.
- Yes, sir.
What's the trouble now?
The other dame flopped.
How about this one?
No, sir.
- Terrible.
- What are we gonna do about her?
There he is now.
I'm gonna give that guy an earful.
Where's that blond McGinty sister?
Use her.
Mahoney's the name, and let me tell you something...
Excuse me, Mr. Zanfield.
I'll get her up there.
You may not know it, but we've played some of the very best...
Listen, we want you on the prow of that boat.
Come on now.
Let's get your clothes off.
But I don't want to take my clothes off.
No, that'll be all right.
But listen to me. I've never taken my clothes off in my life.
I know all about that. Come on.
- How've you got this thing hooked?
- I don't know.
Over here.
Say, do I get that spot, or don't I?
That's tough. I missed him.
- How's everything going, Zanny?
- Very smoothly. Very, very smoothly.
- That's fine.
- Great.
Sit down with us.
Oh, Jules. Jules.
I like that number.
That's a very good arrangement.
How do you do it?
Where do you pick them?
I guess it's just a gift.
By the way, what's the name of that little beauty on the boat?
Ask her.
It'll give you something to do.
- That's a great idea.
- Come on, Unconscious.
Yes, sir.
- You were great, Mahoney.
- I'll say you were.
- You'll be in a Rolls-Royce by Thursday.
- Go on.
What a flock of Johns will be waiting at that stage door!
- Go on. You can't kid me.
- I'm not kidding you.
I may be there myself.
- Oh, Queenie.
- Go in and change.
Hank, did you see Queenie?
What's the matter, Hank?
Aren't you happy?
Wasn't Queenie great?
Aren't you proud of her?
Of course, Eddie.
I'm glad to see her make good.
Oh, but gee, we ain't never had to get by on our legs before.
Oh, that don't mean nothing, Hank.
Those guys are not gonna pay 10 bucks to look at your face.
This is Broadway.
Yeah. Broad's way.
Now, run along and change.
I'll get Queenie.
Attagirl.
Queenie, everybody is raving about you.
- Gee, but you're a beautiful kid.
- I'm glad you like me, Eddie.
Like you? Oh, boy. When I got a peek at you up there on that boat...
- Isn't this the beautiful lady of the boat?
- Yes.
- Kearns. They're waiting for you.
- Yes, sir.
- I'm Jock Warriner.
- How do you do?
- And this is Stew and Bay.
- How do you do?
I bet them that the most beautiful girl in New York will have supper with us.
- You've got to help me win that bet.
- What have I got to do with that?
- Well, you see, you're the girl.
- Oh, no, I'm not.
- I guess we win that bet, Jock.
- Now, wait a minute. Not yet.
- Hey, Unconscious, where you going?
- I'm gonna get on that boat.
Come here, sap. You can't get on that.
That's not a real boat.
Please.
Please, won't you change your mind?
- I'm sorry, but really, I can't.
- Oh, come on. Please do.
- No. Not tonight.
- No?
- Come on. Slip us the 50.
- Wait a minute. I haven't lost yet.
Oh, yeah...?
Come here, Unconscious, come here.
You can't go up there, you'll get kicked out.
It's a ladies' dressing room.
- Let's go on the boat.
- On the boat. Get out of here.
Don't worry, Hank.
They only cut one number.
We got a couple of others.
"Zanny saw them once, and they were in."
Zanny saw me once, and I was out.
Not altogether. And what of it?
Yeah, I know.
Do you think that's all I'll get to do, go on without any clothes on?
Not if I can help it.
But you don't need to worry.
You got a lot more on when you ain't got anything...
...than most of the dames
I've seen around here.
Well, I guess I'll go get undressed again.
Come in.
- Hello, kids. Are you all ready?
- Yep. All ready.
Well, listen. Zanny is giving a big party at his apartment tonight.
- Let's go over.
- Gee, that's great. Did he invite us?
Not exactly, but what's the difference?
Ain't I the star of this troupe?
That guy threw me out of your song tonight.
I ain't gonna give him a chance to throw me out of a window.
Let's get a bowl of chop suey, and we'll rewrite the show.
If it'll write me back in the show,
I'd go for a bowl of anything.
Well, you can get most anything out of a bowl of chop suey.
Oh, cutie!
Come on, Queenie.
You two run along.
I've got some things to do, and I'll join you later.
Why, what's the matter?
Well, I've...
I've got an awful headache.
I'm sorry, honey.
We'll go straight home if you'd rather.
Oh, no, Hank. You two run along.
You'll have a lot of fun, anyway.
Come on, Queenie.
We don't wanna go without you.
Get your hat. You'll feel better when you get out of here.
Oh, sure, honey, come on.
I can't go.
- You got a date with somebody, huh?
- Of course not.
- Who, Queenie? You're crazy.
- Crazy, am I?
You've got a date with that Jock Warriner, I'll bet.
- Well, and what if I have?
- Well, I don't like it.
Oh, you can't go out with that bird.
I'll have to show you whether I can or not.
Come in.
- Hello.
- Oh, hello.
Well, here I am again.
You can't get rid of me.
- I'll be right with you, Mr. Warriner.
- All right.
Maybe you had better wait for me just a few minutes down on the stage.
- Shall I wait at the stage door?
- Please.
- Now, don't be long.
- No, I won't.
- Hurry.
- I will.
Now, Queenie, don't act this way.
He ain't the right kind of a guy for you to go out with.
What difference does it make what kind of a guy he is?
I'm going out with him because I...
Well, because I want to.
- Oh, no, you're not.
- Oh, yes, I am.
You're not! You're gonna listen to me.
I can take care of myself. And you can both mind your own business.
Why don't you mind your sister?
She knows best.
You keep out of this.
I've got my own life to live, and I'm gonna live it.
I'm not gonna be the third wheel to anybody's bicycle!
Oh, Queenie!
Oh, Eddie, what'll we do?
Why, she's never gone against my advice before.
Don't worry, Hank. She's only a kid.
She'll snap out of it.
I guess the bright lights got under her skin.
Come on, let's go and get a bowl of chili.
Queenie!
- Oh, you didn't go. You didn't go!
- I couldn't, Hank.
Oh, dear! I'm so glad.
Oh, they're elegant.
- Yeah. Where do I park them?
- Wait a minute. Put them over there.
Good morning, beautiful lady.
Oh, you frightened me.
Good morning.
- Oh, they're elegant. Thanks.
- Just a little birthday card.
Yes, well, they're lovely.
You'll excuse me now?
You have some place to go, haven't you?
Are you putting me out?
What's the matter?
Don't you like the flowers?
- Oh, they're beautiful.
- They're not half so beautiful as you.
Any girl that can look beautiful so early in the morning...
That sounds like you know a lot about girls.
I do. I'm an expert.
- Much obliged for the compliment.
- You're welcome.
Well, so long.
- Must I go?
- Please do.
- And thank you for being so nice to me.
- Not half so nice as I'd like to be.
I'm arranging a little party tonight for your birthday.
- A party for me?
- Yes.
Come in.
But you mustn't do that.
- But why not?
- Because I don't want you to.
That's silly. Everything's arranged.
You must come.
Please don't.
Hello, Eddie.
- Hello, Queenie.
- Oh, hello.
- How are you? Where's Hank?
- She's out.
Then I'm gonna wait right here till she gets back.
Well, it looks as if I'd better take the air.
I'll give you a ring a little later, shall I?
Fine.
- Goodbye.
- Goodbye.
And thank you again for the flowers.
Well, I've got my suspicions about any guy that kisses a girl's hand.
- What do you mean?
- He'll give you a ring later.
He'll give you a ring.
On the telephone, but not here.
What are you burned up about?
- He hasn't done anything to you.
- No.
- And what's more, he ain't going to.
- Sit down and cool off.
Hank'll be here in a minute, and you can start raving to her.
Oh, Eddie, don't be such a crab.
Why do you let a guy like that hang around you?
Say, will you lay off him? I'm sick of hearing you crab all the time.
- I'll give him a sock in the nose.
- You and how many others?
I don't need any others.
I can do it all by myself.
What do you think of that?
I know. But you haven't anything to do in the show.
I can team you up with this blond and still book you as the Mahoney Sisters.
Nope. I've gotta stick around and keep an eye on Queenie.
Queenie? What has she been doing?
She's changed, Uncle Jed.
She don't tell me things anymore.
Night after night, she's out with Jock Warriner.
If it wasn't for Queenie,
I'd be the happiest girl in the world.
With Eddie?
Now, now listen, Hank.
Why don't you give Eddie a break and marry him?
- Maybe I will.
- Maybe.
Maybe that's just what Queenie needs:
- To see you and Eddie happy.
- Do you think so?
It's exactly what
I've been trying to... Sure!
- You see, it's very simple.
- Rolling his own.
That's it.
Now, watch this one.
Boy, if you could do that with my wife.
Say, give us something good, something new.
Say, can you pull a rabbit from that?
Hello, everybody.
- I brought the radio with me.
- Joe, what have you got there?
- Gee, I can get Chicago with that.
- Chicago? Why, that's nothing.
- I got Scotland last night.
- How do you know you got Scotland?
Why, I heard the guy singing
"The Best Things in Life Are Free."
Take this cake in the other room, and when you hear us yell "surprise"...
...bring it back lighted.
Now, don't forget.
Hey, give me a few of those things.
Give me a few of them.
Someone's coming. Are you all set?
Quiet, quiet.
Surprise!
Surprise! Surprise!
- Well, where's Queenie?
- Yeah, where's Queenie?
Why, there was another party, and I forgot to tell her about this one.
I thought she'd have more fun there.
I'm sorry.
Jock Warriner, huh.
Say, listen, I've got an idea.
Let's give the party...
Let's give the party...
- For Hank.
- Great!
Wait a minute, folks.
Just a second.
Take all the things down to my room.
We'll hold our party there.
Hank doesn't feel very well.
Well, all right, we'll go down to your room.
Good night. I hope you feel better.
Look, Hank, I'm awfully sorry.
- I'm sorry, Hank.
- I left a present for you.
- I hope you're feeling better, Hank.
- We'll see you tomorrow.
You see what you're missing?
Why don't you have a little drink?
It might buck you up.
- Good night, Hankie.
- Good night, Uncle Jed.
Good night, dear.
Hey, Eddie.
Ain't you coming down?
You run along, Jed.
I've got to tell Hank something.
- I'll see you in a little while.
- Sure.
But don't make it too long. You know that bottle won't last very long.
Queenie and me have always been on the level.
And now I'm fronting for her.
Won't you please give her all the best of the breaks?
What's the matter, Hank?
I lost something.
Oh, Eddie.
At least I've still got you.
That's one break.
Goodbye, baby.
Happy birthday.
Queenie, aren't you having a good time?
I'm having a marvelous time,
Mr. Warriner.
Now don't call me Mr. Warriner.
Call me Jock, won't you?
All right.
Mr. Warriner.
- Wait a minute, everybody. Queenie.
- Oh, I can't.
I want you to stand up here where everyone can see you.
- A toast!
- A toast to Queenie!
A happy birthday to Queenie, the queen of New York's beautiful girls.
- Many happy returns!
- Happy birthday!
I can't say anything but thanks, everybody. A lot.
Oh, it's a lovely surprise... Jock.
Oh, it's nothing at all.
Will you dance now?
That cake is just elegant...
...but I can't eat it all.
Well, you eat as much as you can, and we'll save the rest.
Please, Mr. Warriner, ask them to play something else.
- I hate sentimental music.
- All right.
"Broadway Melody."
Don't wear a frown on old Broadway.
Tell me...
...why don't you like that song?
I don't know.
Well, what do you like?
I like cake.
Won't you tell me that you like me a little?
Maybe.
You mean it?
Maybe.
Will you tell me why you're so nice to me?
Maybe.
Please, I wanna dance.
Oh, no, come on.
Let's sit this one out.
But look, everybody's dancing, and the music is playing and everything.
Mr. Warriner.
You don't mean this for me?
Why, of course.
Diamonds should only be worn by beautiful girls.
Oh, it's just adorable.
I'd like to do a lot of things for you, Queenie.
How would you like an apartment all your own?
Say, on Park Avenue.
And a car all your own.
Perhaps a Rolls-Royce.
Oh, and a lot of nice things.
Well, I'd have to think about that.
Say, where have you been?
I've been looking all over the place for you.
You would come in at a time like this.
Certainly. Come on, little love boat.
Let's have this dance.
- Were you asleep, Hank?
- No, honey.
Well, that's swell, because I wanna to tell you...
...about the grandest party that ever happened to me.
Look at that. Look at that. Did you ever see anything more beautiful in all your life?
No, sirree. Because that's class, that is.
And Eddie said he wouldn't even give me a ring.
What would I want with his ring?
There's more diamonds in a bracelet, ain't they? Ain't they?
Honey, I don't know what you're saying this for...
...but I know you don't mean it.
You can't mean it.
- It ain't in you to mean it.
- Sure I mean it.
Why shouldn't I mean it?
And that ain't all I'm gonna have, either.
I'm gonna have a Rolls-Royce.
And an apartment on Park Avenue.
And everything that goes with it.
That's what I'm gonna have.
Now, honey, listen to me.
I know we ain't had the greatest break in the world since we hit New York.
But that's gonna change.
That's got to.
And you're gonna meet somebody that's right.
Somebody you can be proud of, who'll just be crazy about you.
Somebody who's really worthy of you.
Somebody like Eddie.
Yeah? Well, that's all right for you...
...but I ain't craving any hall-rooms...
...with some song-and-dance guy...
...who expects me to cook his meals over a gas-jet...
...listen to a lot of smart wisecracks and bum songs.
- No, sir.
- Oh, Queenie.
Move over.
No more of these kind of dumps for mine.
I'm gonna have everything in the world I want.
That's me.
And you're gonna have Eddie.
Queenie, I don't want you to answer me like that again.
- Then keep your nose out of my business.
- Well, your business is my business.
That package is from Warriner, ain't it?
- What if it is?
- I won't let you keep it, that's all.
How are you gonna stop me?
Oh, Queenie, don't you see what
I'm doing is for your own good?
And don't you see what I'm doing is for your...
Oh, what are you talking about?
Now you listen to me.
You're not gonna go out with that guy, hear me?
I'll stop you if I have to tie you up to do it. You hear me?
Cut it out. Be quiet.
They can hear you out front.
Well, you hear me. I'm going out with whoever I want...
...and I won't hear orders from anyone about it.
- Now get that and get it straight.
- Queenie!
You ain't my boss. So mind your own business and shut up.
Oh, Queenie.
I won't shut up.
And you're gonna listen to me.
I won't listen to you any more than
I will to her. So you needn't get started.
- Getting near you, Kearns.
- All right.
Hank, you run along. I'll talk to her.
Now, listen, Queenie. You're young yet, and you don't know things.
What Hank has been saying to you is for your own good.
Yeah, and I suppose what you're saying is for my own good too.
As far as that goes, yes, it is.
Whether you believe me or not,
I'm saying this because I...
- Hank finished that. Got nowhere with it.
- Well, I'm gonna get somewhere.
And whether you like me or hate me, you're gonna pay attention to me...
...because I'm...
Well...
Me and Hank won't let you go out with that guy. He's no good.
- He wants girls who...
- You never went out with girls...
...like he does.
- Plenty, but none since I met you.
You and Hank...
Get me right, sweetie.
I'm being on the level with you.
Here's your pants, sir.
- Hurry up, Kearns.
- All right.
Oh, can't I say nothing that will make you see what I mean?
You're wasting time talking against
Mr. Warriner, if that's what you mean.
Mr. Warriner. Do you know what they say about that guy?
I don't care what they say.
They're jealous, that's all.
- You and the rest.
- Me, jealous?
What are you so interested for?
What business is it of yours where I go and who I go with?
It's my business because...
Well, because it is.
Oh, you ought to know why I'm doing this.
- It's because I...
- No, no, Eddie. Don't say it.
Oh, I gotta say it, Queenie.
I can't stop from saying it now.
And you gotta hear it.
I love you, Queenie.
I love you, and you know it.
I can't help it. I tried, but I can't.
But it's easy to say now.
I love you, dear.
And I love you, Eddie. Never forget it.
- No matter what happens.
- Do you, Queenie?
Yes, Eddie.
And that's why we can't...
Oh, don't you see now why...
Why what?
- I'm going out with Jock Warriner...
- No, you're not.
Don't try to stop me, Eddie.
It's the best way.
Here's your coat, sir.
- If you go out with that guy, I'll...
- There's a stage wait, Kearns.
Let it wait.
Queenie, I gotta go on now.
- Promise me you won't go out with him.
- Are you trying to ruin the show?
- Promise me, Queenie.
- Oh, I can't promise.
- Then you won't?
- Well, then I won't.
I'll murder that guy. I'll tear him apart.
Go on out with him. Go ahead.
Get on there, Kearns.
Queenie, you better be here when I get off.
- Get up to your dressing room.
- All right.
Oh, Queenie. You ain't got no idea what you're doing.
Oh, yes, I have. Can't I have a little fun without you trying to stop me?
Oh, I ain't trying to stop you having fun...
...but this thing will turn out bad.
That guy don't mean to marry you.
His kind don't never marry.
He ain't the type to take a girl out and buy her drinks...
...and let it go at that. You know that.
And you know what the finish will be.
Now listen to me, Hank.
Get this straight, once and for all.
I'm old enough to know what I'm gonna do.
And I don't want no more cracks from you and Mr. Wise-Guy Kearns about it either.
You can go your way, and I'll go mine.
What I'm saying's for your own good.
- Tell it to somebody you don't know.
- I ain't gonna let you get away with it.
- Give me that. That's mine.
- It's not yours...
- Well, it is mine, and you will give it...
- No, I won't.
You will give it to me.
Queenie.
Queenie, you mustn't go.
Queenie, you can't go.
Eddie, stop her.
Do something, will you?
- Queenie, just a moment, Queenie.
- Get your hands off me.
You're not gonna leave except with me and Hank.
- You get out of my way.
- You heard what I said.
You can't get away with it.
I'll kill that guy just as sure as anything.
I'll make him suffer the way he's making me suffer.
Shut up!
- I'm going.
- You can't go, Queenie.
Gonna stay right here. No.
Let go of me.
I've heard all I'm gonna hear from either of you. You've said enough.
- I'd like to see you kill anybody.
- Queenie.
You dirty, cheap little songwriter, you.
I hate you, I hate you, I hate you!
Queenie, Queenie!
- Say, what kind of a sap are you, anyway?
- What do you mean?
You gonna let a john like that steal her from you because he's got a little more jack?
Well, if you do, all I can say is you're a rotten quitter.
You love her, don't you?
Oh, don't lie to me. I know you do.
Say, if I loved a girl like you do Queenie...
...l'd fight for her. What's the matter with you? Where's your nerve?
- But, Hank, you don't...
- Oh, don't pass the buck to me.
What do you think I've been meaning all along? I was on the level with this thing?
That I was in love with you?
That's a hot one.
I just been playing you for all
I could get out of you for the act.
- You been kidding me all the time?
- Sure, I been kidding you.
Say, I wouldn't marry you if you was the last man on earth.
And at that, I ain't so sure you're the right guy for her.
You're a coward.
You're afraid of Jock Warriner, or you'd go out and fight for her.
- But you're just yellow.
- You think I'm yellow?
- Sure, you're yellow.
- I'll show you how much I'm yellow.
You're yellow. You hear me?
You're yellow.
- I'm yellow?
- Yes, you are. You're yellow!
You're yellow. Do you hear me?
Oh, Eddie, you're not yellow.
You're white.
Murray Hill-8400. Yes, please.
Hello.
Hello, Uncle Jed?
It's Hank.
Say, I've decided to take those 30 weeks.
You can team me up with that blond.
I'm breathless.
Oh, I don't know what to say.
It's wonderful.
Oh, I can't thank you enough.
It's not half good enough for you.
I want you to have everything in the world.
Thank you.
- Hello, Eddie.
- Where's Queenie?
I want you to meet my girlfriend.
- Come on, let's go back to the party.
- Oh, Queenie, not yet.
Why, I haven't had you to myself for a moment tonight.
Oh, but I'd rather go back, please.
Wait, Queenie.
I have so many things
I want to tell you alone.
Oh, well, you can tell me out there.
Wait a minute, Queenie.
I've done all these things for you.
Aren't you going to be nice to me?
- Oh, Jock, let me go.
- Why should I let you go?
- Please let me go, please.
- No, I won't let you go.
You're going to stay right here with me.
- No, I'm not gonna stay here with you.
- Yes, you are.
- No, I'm not.
- I will keep you here.
You won't keep me here, do you hear me? You won't.
- Let me go.
- I won't let you go.
I won't stay with you another minute.
- Let me go.
- I told you not to come here.
- Why did you come?
- Oh, Eddie, take me away.
What do you mean coming in here? Get out.
- I won't before I'm finished with you.
- Oh, Eddie, let's go.
- I've been looking for you.
- Now that you've found me...
...what do you want?
- I'll show you what I want.
Oh, Eddie.
What's the matter?
Oh, darling, let me see you.
Oh, Eddie. Have they hurt you, sweetheart?
Have they?
You just hit him again if you dare.
Just try it, that's all.
- Eddie, let me see you.
- Queenie, Queenie.
You don't realize what you're doing.
You let me go. And you can take your jewelry and your presents...
...and everything. I don't want anything to do with you.
Let me get a sock at that guy.
- No, Eddie don't...
- Let me get at him, just let me get at him.
- I wanna get at that guy.
- Throw him out.
- Out he goes.
- No, don't.
Don't let them. They're going to kill him.
Oh, Eddie. Don't you do that to him.
And stay out.
What do you know about that guy?
Got rid of that guy anyhow.
Oh, Eddie. Eddie, dear.
You dirty bums, you.
- Oh, Eddie, have they hurt you?
- What do you think?
- Oh, I'm sorry.
- I'll bet you are.
I am.
I don't know why you feel sorry for anybody like me.
I'm no good.
I can't even scrap a little.
I let a heel like that take a sock at me and get away with it.
Well, Eddie, he's bigger than you are.
- Yeah, a little bigger.
- And he's awfully strong.
I suppose you found that out from his hugs.
Well, if you couldn't stop them from throwing you out...
...how could I stop him from hugging me?
Well, there's something in that.
I guess you'd better go home.
Oh, Eddie, aren't you gonna take me home?
- I'll take you home.
- Don't you like me anymore?
Like you? Why, Queenie, I...
Oh, what is it? They've hurt you, I know they have.
Oh, I'm all right, Queenie.
Come on, let's go.
Now understand, it took six of them to throw me out.
Yes, Eddie.
Oh, what is it?
Oh, they'll be here any minute.
What does it...? What does it...?
Read it.
"Arriving 2:30, wonderful honeymoon.
See you the minute we get in.
Love to our Hank, Queenie and Eddie."
Oh, I'm so excited. What time is it?
- 12:00 last night.
- It's what?
Well, what's the matter with this thing?
See who that is.
- Hello, Jed.
- Hank!
Oh, gee.
- Hello, Eddie.
- Hello, Hank.
Oh, come here.
Well, well, Queenie. Congratu...
- How are you?
- Oh, fine, Uncle Jed. How are you?
Oh, I'm great. What's it going to be in the electric lights this time?
Queenie Kearns and Company?
No, sirree.
I'm only gonna be connected with the stage by marriage.
Oh, Hank, we found the cutest little home down on Long Island.
- Yeah?
- Where Eddie can work.
And say, when you're finished with this tour, you're coming to live with us.
Oh, nothing doing. Hotels for mine, where I can get service.
- I'd be all out of step in a real home.
- What do you mean?
- You're coming to live with us, all right.
- I should say she is.
Just like a trouper.
Troupers are all tramps.
Here today and gone tomorrow.
No home, no nothing.
Hank, you're just a born trouper.
Doggone this weather. It certainly is tough on colds, isn't it?
Well, say, I want Queenie and Eddie to see the act.
Say, where is that blond, anyway?
I don't know. She's always late.
Hank, you're a sight for sore eyes.
- Hello, Uncle Jed.
- Oh, hello, Flo.
- You know everybody, don't you?
- Hello, darling.
- Oh, Eddie.
- Hello, Flo.
Oh, Eddie, tell me, did you have a good time on your honeymoon?
Yeah, great.
Oh, Eddie, when you open your new show...
...gonna give me a job, aren't you?
- Why, certainly.
Oh, you're grand.
Say, come on, stupid.
Let's run through the act for them.
Okay.
But, say, you know something?
She's a born trouper.
We're gonna break in the act and bring it to New York.
- That's great.
- Say, step on it, will you?
- I've got a matinee.
- Sure.
I want two choruses...
...and you follow us, not us you.
- Come on, Flo.
Say, listen. There's gonna be no part in your show for that dame, get me?
Of course not, honey.
It's kind of rough yet, but don't you say it's pretty good for an opening?
You know, if you don't hurry, you're gonna miss that train.
- Oh, the train.
- Sure, the train.
Oh, Hank. Hank, can I help you?
Yes, you could hold my coat for me.
I forgot all about the thing.
Oh, Hank.
That's all right, Queenie.
- Goodbye, Eddie.
- Goodbye, Hank.
Oh, you'll write to me soon, won't you?
Yeah, I'll write you from Peoria.
Now, where's my hat? Where's my hat?
- Oh, where's my hat!
- Here's your hat.
Here. Here. Here's your valise.
- All right. Bring it, Uncle Jed. Come on.
- It's pretty heavy.
- Goodbye, Hank.
- Goodbye, Hank.
- Goodbye, Hank.
- Don't forget to write. Goodbye.
Oh, don't cry, dear.
Hank won't be gone long.
The season will be over before you know it, and she'll be back here with us.
It ain't that, honey.
But it seems like Hank ain't never had a real break.
And I guess I haven't done much to make her any happier.
I wouldn't feel that way about it, dear.
Hank'll be much happier back on the road.
Why, she couldn't give it up.
It's her life.
She couldn't live without it.
And now that she knows you're taken care of...
Don't cry, honey.
People can't help falling in love.
It comes to you no matter what you do.
And I love you, dear.
Oh, and I love you, Eddie.
You were just meant for me.
Opening in Peoria.
Four shows a day.
Zanny said he'd make me a star in six months.
Say, listen, it's better to star in...
In Oshkosh than to starve on Broadway.
That's a bunk.
Say, now you listen to me, stupid. I'll handle things.
Yes, and I'll have you back on Broadway and in the Palace in less than six months.
- No fooling?
- Why, it's cream in the can, baby.
Sure, it's...
It's... It's in the can.
[ENGLISH]
THE RACKET
Hello, Mac.
Hello Nick
Take a tip, Mac... change your racket.
I like my racket...
...and I haven't shot yet
Nicholas Scarsi
Is a fully recognized member of
THE ANTI-LIQUOR LEAGUE
OF AMERIKA
CAPT. JAMES McQUIGG
POLICE DEPARTMENT
Scarsi's sending a load of beer though Eighth and Grand.
There'll be hell popping!...
That's below Spike
Corcoran's dea-line.
Scarsi's coming in tonight, Spike.
Hit Eighth and Grand after dark.
If Spike tries stop you...
What about McQuigg?
Leave that copper to me.
There may be a little trouble toning at eight and Grand...
...let the boys settle it themselves.
I'll be there.
I'm giving my kid brother a little birthday party tonight at Weiberg's.
Drop in
Don't forget, Mac.
Forget what?
The party.
Scarsi's Spike's gang buffaloed.
There's not one of them in sight.
Scarsi's coming in, Spike!
I warned you Scarrer!
Let's see Scarsi get you out of this, Chick.
CITY EDITTOR
Pratt!
Big killing... Eighth and Grand.
Miller!
Wake up!
Horses!
Happy birthday, Joe.
Gee, that's a swell flash!
Nix on the slang kid.
You're a college man.
Are there going to be any women at the party?
No women!
Women are poison to me.
...And McQuigg took
Chick to the can.
The Old Man'll fix that.
McQuigg's got Chick.
Get him out!
What's he in for?
What's the  difference?
TRIBUNALE
I just called to remind you of the party.
I'll be there.
Lock him up.
There's Nick Scarsi.
What's the big idea of cutting the dance, Helen?
I'm going to sing for Nick's party.
You can away with murder, but you can't
Lay off this kid, you dirty little gold digger!
He's not in the racket... and he's not going to be!
He called me a gold digger.
Well, I'll dig, and dig deep!
You know the boys.
Chick won't be here tonight.
All right, Nick ...
That's a horse on me
Beat it!
This time... it's o horse on you.
Maybe.
Habeas corpus... for the release of
Mr. Nicholas Scarsi, signed by the judge.
This is the last murder you'll ever get away with in my district!
I'm going drive you out!
I've given you lots of chances... but you're just a dumb harp.
So you're going out!
CAPTSIN McQUIGG SENT TO STICKS
Scarsi Feud Seen in Veteran Policeman's Transfer
Gee, Captain! Where is this
Twenty-eighth Precinct?
In the country, out to hell-an-gone.
28th PRECINCT
POLICE STATION
You'd better cut out booze.
It's cut plenty before I get it.
Let's go... McQuigg probably won't talk about his transfer any way.
This is a fine thing to come sailing out of a police station in this
God-forsaken Zone of Quiet.
Captain, you've got to talk... we need a story.
Start another anti-smoke campaign.
I'm Ames, of the "Monitor".
Tell the Captain I'm here!
PRESS
New in the game, aren't you?
Oh, no! I was on the
"Omaha" Bee for a month.
Fancy that!
Hurry up! The captain's waiting for you.
Well, Captain, I'm ready to listen to your story.
We've got some girls downstairs...
Listen to them.!
You can get rid of us, if you'll give us the story.
What's the matter. afraid of Scarsi?
I'm here because Nick's afraid of me!
Find him...
...tell him...
...tell him I told you!
That ought to bring him out here to start something.
If it does... you'll have your story.
Mr. Scarsi is attending
Mr. Spike Corcoran's funeral.
First he plugs them, then he plants them.
Stop them! They ought to show a little respect for the dead.
Why was McQuigg transferred?
I don't know...
Why was McQuigg transferred?
Because, they say, Nick
Scarsi's afraid of him.
I'm mot afraid of anybody!
I'm laying off McQuigg, only until after election!
So if you see that copper, tell him that!
...so if don't get Scarsi before Tuesday, pthe Organization wins the election, and Nick stays in power.
Then what becomes of you?
Those reporters were sent by McQuigg.
Tell the boys to leave him my calling card.
You'll be stopping next... telling me you're out of gas.
That little glow-worm on your engagement finger ought to prove I'm serious.
No, Joe... you can't beat the wedding bells.
Making you walk, eh?
I'll fix the yellow puppy!
Where's the nearest police station?
I got a hit and run driver...
Don't bother me... you Know what to do with him.
What's your name?
Wait'll I tell you, big balloon, you'll burst!
What'd he do?
My name's Johnson. Write that in...
My mother'll like it.
How's your farm, McQuigg?
Scarsi's answer to your visit.
We can't get this bird's name.
Bring him in.
He'll talk.
Come on, Francis!
Oh! Hello!
Didn't your mother tell you not to speak to strange ladies?
Don't thing I'm fresh, but I feel I know you.
I heard you sing.
If that's Joe in there, Scarsi will...
Is he one of Scarsi's men?
Just his baby brother, that's all!
His name is Joe Camino...
Book him!
Shut up, you little fool!
That fellow is Nick Scarsi's brother.
That's the dame he walked...
She saw the accident.
How did it happen?
Sorry, policeman, but I'm tongue-tied.
Put her downstairs with the other ladies...
She'll talk!
I'll phone you, Miss Hayes.
No wonder Nick says women are poison to him.
This one may be dynamite!
Hold everyone hire.
If this gets out, I couldn't hold him an hour.
Good work, Sullivan.
SCARSI'S BROTHER ARRESTED
HIT RUN DRIVER HELD
INJURED WOMAN DIES
Is captain McQuigg in?
I'm District Attorney Welch.
Mac, the old man wants you to release young Scarsi.
Nick will have you thrown off the force for this.
I'll mix with Nick to a finish now.
Tell that to the Old Man!
Tell it to Nick!
...tell him I have the case set for next Wednesday... not next year...
...and tell him the judge's name is Blake!
Nick will start something now.
I'm starting something myself...
I'm ripe to fight!
It's the country air.
Sam Meyer, from Riley,
Platka and Cohen...
...Bail for Joe Scarsi.
Scarsi's raving! You'd better get Joe out of this!
Are you going to leave me here with these...?
Maybe they'll teach you not to be so touchy next time.
Tell Nick you're engaged.
You keep your mouth shut, or Nick'll take care of you!
Gee, I'm glad you're still here.
Alice in Wonderland!
I've brought some things you may need.
I wonder what'll happen if you ever have a baby, and no one's tipped you off about storks.
Left flat!... And you thoght Joe was going to marry you.
And you're afraid to talk.
Yellow... for fear of a couple of bragging punks!
You are liar!
Miss Hayes has agreed to testify against Joe Scarsi...
Phone that to your paper.
Takea Miss Hayes out to dinner... and bring her back.
Are you coming back?
Will you be here?
I'll be back.
The editor won't listen to me...
I'll give the story to Miller and
Pratt... They're at the Dutchman's.
You stay in.
You're a witness Scarsi...
If you're out tonight, you'll be on a slab by morning.
It looks like I'm yellow, hiding in here!
Who's the cop that picked up Joe Scarsi?
I am.
I came to see a witness you got... girl named Hayes.
See the sergeant.
I might as well see you, too.
I'm a friend of that Scarsi kid's.
That's nothing to brag about.
We don't want any trouble with you...
You did your duty.
Duty, my eye! I do my job because I like it... and because I don't like crooks...
...And I don't like crooks for the same reasons I don't like a lot of other people...
...and because they banged my old man...
...and because, generally speaking I'm a better man than they are!
Do you now Nick?
A news paper bad man!...
Everybody knows him, but nobody ever meets the yellow...
I thought Nick had lots of guts.
He'll have a chance to prove it when I shove his kid brother over the road.
Tell Nick to go to...!
Who did it?
Got one of them, captain.
The other hopped a freight...
Ross is after him..
Did you fan him?
If he had a rod, he threw it away.
Hello, Nick.
You like it out here?
I'm beginning to.
I sent my driver in here to see that Hayes girl...
Did he do something wrong?
I thought he was in the pen for some bank job.
He must've got paroled.
Yes... A lot do, since they equipped that penitentiary with revolving doors.
What do you want him for?
I don't want him.
Well, if he didn't do anything...
Somebody did...
...and I've got you!
Are you trying to frame me?
In purple satin under glass.
That's the man!
Now, Nick, how'll you alibi this?
Lock him up.
What's the charge?
Same old thing for you... murder.
All right...
I'll use the phone.
Habeas corpus... for the release of
Mr. Nicholas Scarsi.
You got to recognize a writ...
That's the law!
I'm sick of the law!
We'll fight this out here!
Go phone that to the judge!
Picking a fight, uh?
Drunk, uh?
Put him in the bull pen.
Sweet of you!
I'll give you a story after I talk to Welch.
Plenty of time before we go to press.
It was nice of him to pull it so early.
If you give this to the papers...
Bring Scarsi in.
Nick's put your whole organization in a trap with this job.
If you spring him with what
I;ve got on him, the opposition and their papers...
...you won't have a chance in Tuesday's Election!
So this time I'll force your own Organization to bring him to trial.
Get me out of here!
Are you going to make this boy testify against Scarsi?
You know what Nick will do to him.
I'll take him through this.
Can't you think of anyone but yourselves?
You and Scarsi both...
So cocky you kill a policeman trying to get at each other's throats.
I'll identify him, captain...
I'll testify.
Good boy!
Come downstairs and bring her with you.
I told you not to look after me...
Why did you do it?
Because...
...because you affect me like a mammy song.
Make you identification to Mr. Welch.
So you're Scarsi, the Awful... afraid of women, but death on kids.
Nobody ought to be afraid of you...
...Not when you had to slug this baby!
What'd he get in my way for?
There's your confession!
All of which proves that women are still poison to you.
Mr. Scarsi  swaggered in here a half hour ago...
...and Miss Hayes just tricked him into admitting the killing.
Women and children first.
Get that release order!
As long as your Wards are set for them for Tuesday's Election, what do they care about you?
It's not Tuesday yet...
My Wards can still be set the other way.
You don't win this Election unless I get out tonight!
Speed it up...
I've got a supper party on.
The wash room, please.
I must get ready to leave.
The homicide squad's on the way out to take Scarsi!
Scarsi's gun.
If it's the Old Mam's orders, it's O.K. with me.
Not until I give you the signal.
The Old Man can't carry you and the Election both...
You've got to take the rap until after Tuesday.
Now I'll get the papers in here!
I'll give them a story with names and dates and figures that'll rip this town wide open!
So you want to talk, eh?
I'll call the press...
That'll get the tow of you out of my system.
I'll show you what it means to fool around with me!
Who'd believe you?
I've got everything on paper... ready for a double-cross by you!
How you made that high hat grand jury fold up last month...
...How the Old Man had that kid in the Treasurer's Office accidentally killed by a train!
Who do you suppose I pay for the breweries I own?
Who do you suppose I pay for the alcohol I get?
I'll talk your whole rotten
Organization  into suicide!
The window... it's fixed, for a getaway.
I thought you'd crawl when
I spoke that piece.
Give me a gun!
What's goig on here?
Tell him!
Did you imagine I'd let any lousy politicians, who'd knock their own mothers over the head for a vote, tell me what to do?
I'm off you worms! I'm going to deliver my Wards to the reform gang for a laugh!
To lick you, we'll have an election for a change that's square!
Give me that gun!
In the belly you make a move!
Out!
Your party will probably run you for Mayor for this.
Scarsi tried a getaway...
Turk, of the District
Attorney's office got him.
What a break for the
Sunday papers!
But why shoot him?
So that Government of the professionals, by the professionals, and for the professionals, shall not perish from the earth.
What were the events leading up to the tragedy?
That'll do.
You kids can run along now.
Are you going, Helen?
No, kid, I'm not going your way.
So it's dog eat dog to the last ditch, eh, Captain?
You can't teach an old dog new tricks.
You and me both, Policeman.
What now, Captain?
I'd like a little sleep... But by the time I get through with the Coroner the rest of the public servants...
...it'll be time to go to Mass.
THE END
A Turner Classic Movies Presentation in association with
The University of Nevada, Las Vegas
New edition produced by
Jeffery Masinosed
Music Score Composed and Arranged by
Robert Israel
Performed by
The Robert Israel Orchestra
Conducted by
Rober Israel
Recording Session Directors:
Vit Muzik and Vladislav Kvapil
Telecine:
David Blosk, Ascdent Madia
Digital Restoration services provided by
ADS (Advanced Digital Services, Inc.)
ADS Restoration Team:
Tom Sehenuk - Ariel Tiscsay - Gabriel McKail
GERMAN FILM LIBRARY
MUSEUM OF FILM AND TV
BATTLESHIP POTEMKIN
Film from the series "The Year 1905"
Produced by the 1st studio of GOSKINO
Supervised by
J. M. BLIOKH
Script by
N. F. AGADZHANOVA-SHUTKO
Director: S. M. EISENSTEIN
Assistant Director: G. ALEKSANDROV
Head cinematographer
EDUARD TISSE
Director's assistants:
A. ANTONOV A. LEVSHIN
M. GOMOROV M. SHTRAUKH
Administrators
A. P. KRYUKOV and A. KOTOSHEV
Part one.
"MEN AND MAGGOTS."
The spirit of revolution soared over the Russian land.
A tremendous, mysterious process was taking place in countless hearts.
The individual personality, having hardly had time to become conscious of itself... dissolved in the mass, and the mass itself became dissolved in the revolutionary élan.
Sailors Matyushenko and Vakulinchuk.
We, the sailors of Potemkin, must support the workers, our brothers... and stand among the front lines of the revolution!
Heavy and gloomy is the sleep of the off duty.
Attentive, but clumsy.
He vents his anger on a young man.
Hurtful...
Vakulinchuk 
Comrades! The time has come when we too must speak out.
Why wait? All of Russia has risen!
Are we to be the last?
Morning.
We've had enough rotten meat!
Even a dog wouldn't eat this!
The ship doctor Smirnov.
It could crawl overboard on its own!
These aren't worms.
They are dead fly larvae.
You can wash them off with brine!
Russian prisoners in Japan are fed better than we are!
We've had enough rotten meat!
It's good meat. End of discussion!
Senior Officer Giliarovsky
Impotent rage was overflowing.
The ship's store.
The sailors refused to eat the borscht.
GIVE US THIS DAY OUR DAILY BREAD
Part two.
"DRAMA ON THE DECK."
Commander Golikov
Whoever is satisfied with the borscht take two steps forward!
The petty officers.
You're free to go!
I'll hang the rest on the yard!
Call the guards!
Matyushenko, under the guise of breaking ranks, calls the sailors to the gun turret.
To the turret...
To the turret!
To the turret...
Guys!...
It's time.
Most of them gathered by the turret.
Stop! Don't move!
They try to sneak through the admiral's hatch.
Back, scoundrels!
That way is not for you!
I'll shoot you all like dogs!
Cover them with canvas!
Got it!
Cover them!
Attention!
Dear Lord!
Make the disobedient see reason!
Fire right into the canvas!
Vakulinchuk decides.
Fire!
BROTHERS!
Who are you shooting at?!
The rifles quavered.
Shoot!
Everyone shoot!
Shoot, scum!
To the rifles, brothers!
Smash the dragons! Smash 'em!
Smash 'em all!
Have fear of God!
Beat it, sorcerer!
To the bottom to feed the worms!
Brothers! We've won!
The bleeding Vakulinchuk flees from the furious Giliarovsky.
Vakulinchuk's overboard!
Save Vakulinchuk!
And he who was first to sound the cry of rebellion was first to fall at the executioner's hand.
To the shore.
Odessa.
A tent on the new pier in Odessa is the final resting place for Vakulinchuk.
FOR A SPOONFUL OF BORSCHT
Part three.
"THE DEAD MAN CALLS OUT."
Mist lingered on from the night...
Rumours came from the pier.
Together with the sun, the news hit the city.
The battleship raided...
...rebellion...
...shore...
A killed sailor...
We'll remember.
For a spoonful of borscht.
"Citizens of Odessa! Lying before you is the body of the brutally killed sailor Grigory Vakulinchuk... killed by a senior officer of the squadron battleship Prince Tavrichesky.
Let's take revenge on the bloodthirsty vampires!
Death to the oppressors!
Signed: Crew of the squadron battleship 
Prince Tavrichesky."
Eternal memory to the fallen fighters!
All for one.
One for all.
Down with the executioners!
Down with tyranny!
Mothers and brothers!
Let there not be differences or hostility among us!
Smash the Jews!
Shoulder to shoulder.
The land is ours.
Tomorrow is ours.
A delegate from shore.
The enemy must be dealt a decisive blow!
Together with the rebelling workers from all of Russia
WE WILL WIN!
The shore watched Potemkin tensely and attentively.
Part four.
"THE ODESSA STAIRCASE."
In those memorable days, the city lived together with the rebellious battleship.
Like a white-winged flock, boats flew to the battleship.
AND SUDDENLY
Let's go! Let's convince them!
Listen! Don't shoot!
My boy is badly hurt.
COSSACKS!
And then the brutality of the military authorities in Odessa was answered with the battleship's shells.
The target - the Odessa theater.
The generals' headquarters.
Part five.
"RENDEZVOUS WITH THE SQUADRON."
Turbulent meetings went on until evening.
The people of Odessa are waiting for the liberators!
Land the troops and the army will join you.
Landing is not possible.
The admiral's squadron is coming our way.
With one heart, they decided to face the squadron.
Night came, full of anxiety.
The squadron was sneaking up in the darkness.
Sore from constant speech, throats breathe heavily and unevenly.
Squadron on the horizon!
All hands on deck!
Prepare for battle!
Full speed!
Hearts forward!
Top speed!
Potemkin and destroyer No. 267.
The admiral attacks!
The squadron draws near!
Give the signal: join us!
Join!...
...us!
The enemy is within firing range!
All against one.
ONE AGAINST ALL.
Shoot?... or...
BROTHERS!
Above the heads of the tsar's admirals thundered a brotherly hurrah.
And proudly waving the red flag of victory, without a single shot, the rebellious battleship passed through the rows of the squadron.
Directed by
Sergei M. Eisenstein
Starring
Members of the Proletkult Theater
Sailors of the Black-Sea Fleet
The Sevastopol Fishermen's Association
Inhabitants of Odessa
Motto according to Leo Trotsky,
Russia, during the Revolution
A reconstruction of the Russian premiere version directed by Enno Patalas in cooperation with Anna Bohn
An Initiative Project of the
German Federal Cultural Foundation
GERMAN FILM LIBRARY
MUSEUM OF FILM AND TV
Supported by
German Federal Film Archive, 
Berlin and British Film Institute, London
Titles
Moser+Rosié, Berlin
Film laboratory
Taunus Film, Wiesbaden
Colorization of the flag
Gerhard Ullmann
This musical reconstruction is based on a manuscript by Dmitri Shostakovich... that is being kept in the Glinka museum of Moscow.
In 2004 the manuscript has been edited and arranged for the film's premier.
The New Babylon drama in eight parts during the time of the Franco-Prussian war... and the Commune of 1871
Screenplay and direction:
Grigori Kosintsev, Leonid Trauberg
Camera:
Andrei Moskvin
Art direction:
Yevgeni Yenej
Consultant:
A. Molok
Assistant:
S. Bartenev
Assistant director:
M. Yegorov
Production studio Sovkino
Leningrad
War!
Death to the Prussians!
Let their blood flow in Berlin!
Let their blood flow!
War! All tickets sold out!
Death to the Prussians!
War! The prices have gone up!
The great warehouse 'The New Babylon' the manager
Sale!
The shop assistant
And for dessert...
From the board...
My dismissal?
'The board of directors invites you to the ball tonight.'
Sale!
Sale!
Sale!
Sale!
Let them bleed!
Paris!
My beloved Paris!
We are all looking for love
We are all looking for love
I am looking for love, mademoiselle.
A deputy
I was just saying to madame... that the government has agreed to your appointment.
Here's to a cheerful Paris!
To a sated Paris!
To a carefree Paris!
A reporter
People of Paris!
The French army... has been defeated!
Defeated!
To Paris!
To Paris!
To Paris!
To Paris!
How about my appointment?
Paris is under siege
Cheerful...
Carefree...
Sated Paris.
The National Guard of workers defends the city
If Paris falls, the workers' Guard will be destroyed!
We need guns to make sure Paris doesn't fall!
For the guns!
In the workers' quarter
When Paris falls it won't be the bourgeoisie who will pay for the war... but the working class.
The soldier
He has been begging.
Take those boots off!
As long as you don't surrender there won't be any peace!
I don't need your bread! I'm off.
Where will you go without your boots?
There are placards saying they have capitulated!
They have capitulated! The Prussians are taking away the workers' guns!
The Prussians and the bourgeoisie... are pointing the workers' guns on the workers!
Let's take the guns to our quarters!
Why aren't you coming?
What do I care about your guns?
I don't want to fight anymore!
I want to return to my village!
The morning of March 18th the workers' Guard defends their guns preparations for the operetta's premier preparations
We are all looking for love
All we need is the horses and we're done!
Faster!
What are you doing here?
What are you doing?
Leave me in peace.
It's tough enough when you're hungry all day.
Look at these men!
Look how beautiful they are!
If only I were younger...
Who are you serving?
Finally!
There's no more milk!
Please, take our guns away!
Saddle the horses!
Take your guns and shoot us!
Shoot us!
The people won't let itself be disarmed!
Shoot that rabble!
What a disgrace, the operetta is a failure!
To the town hall!
To Versailles! We'll start from there!
To the town hall!
Soldiers! After Versailles you will be allowed to go home!
Why don't you appeal to the soldiers?
To the town hall!
To Versailles.
Jean, please don't go!
Don't go, Jean!
Paris as it has been for hundreds of years this Paris is no more
Why we enjoy our work more?
We work for ourselves and not for the owners.
As decided by the Commune!
We don't work nights anymore.
As decided by the Commune!
Our children aren't cannon fodder for the rich anymore.
As decided by the Commune!
We aren't evicted from our homes anymore.
As decided by the Commune!
As decided by our Commune!
We have plenty of time.
We can solve everything.
Paris lacks money, weapons and ammunition.
Can't we just seize shops and banks?
No, we won't threaten anyone who isn't threatening us.
In Versailles
Why are you sad?
Who did you leave behind?
Soldiers!
Thieves, prostitutes and murderers have taken over Paris!
I left my girl behind.
She won't survive over there.
They take away your land and divide it.
No violence.
We will solve everything peacefully.
Friends! Let us sing the hymn of a free France:
The Marseillaise!
Arise, children of the fatherland
The day of glory has arrived
Against us, tyranny
Let blood flow!
To Paris!
The 49th day of battle
The Commune has been surrounded and cut off.
The enemy has broken through!
This sitting is over.
Over?
The new Babylon the bourgeoisie looks on from a hill at Versailles
Let their blood flow in Paris!
French!
You're lying.
We are not French!
We are communards!
Your deputies are done for.
You want Paris?
The old Paris?
Never!
The new Babylon
Be the boss?
Never!
Sale!
Peace and order is restored in Paris peace and order long live the Commune peace and order
Our army has brought peace and order!
I'm completely wet because of that rabble!
Mademoiselle!
And so you wanted to be the boss?
I'll show you who's boss.
I'll show you.
May tainted blood water our fields
Where did they take the prisoners?
The French soldier is tall and strong!
He once conquered half the world.
He will conquer the whole world.
Where did they bring the prisoners?
He will conquer the whole world.
It's prohibited to beg in cafés.
The trial
Next!
Death!
Death!
Admit, you prostitute... that you led a wild life during the Commune.
Take this shovel and dig a grave!
Death!
Mama!
They shoot us as if we were arsons...
Prostitutes...
Murderers...
We will meet again, Jean!
We're off to our Paris!
We, the communards!
Long live the Commune!
Long live the Commune!
The Wife of the Pharaoh
Only about half of the 2976 meters of the original film survived, and in poor condition.
In the present version the gaps in the plot will be explained in black text on a white background.
The text of the other intertitles follows the original script.
First Act
King Samlak of Ethiopia to King Amenes who sits on Amon Ra's throne.
Life gives him salvation and strength.
I am visiting your residence, to humbly offer you an alliance, for the protection of the inner and outer peace of our Empires.
For our bond to become even stronger,
I wish to offer you my daughter Makeda.
An accident at the construction site of the Treasury...
Don't jeopardize the valuable lives of the workers and give me time for the construction.
I only wish to know when the
Treasury will be finished!
The misfortune of the
Treasury is real.
Your men will perish miserably...!
Because the King is having build a Treasury, our men must die...?
To the Pharaoh!
Pharaoh, give us back our men!
Think of the children!
Are you ready to offer the
Gods a morning sacrifice?
Lord of the Heavens, 
Father of the Gods, the King is facing you, to thank you in this morning hour.
King Samlak of Ethiopia gets his daughter decorated before her entrance into Egypts capital.
She thinks too highly of herself to assist me with my decoration.
Theonis, the slave, attracts the fury of Makedas, her mistress.
Before punishment she got saved by an Egyptian:
Ramphis, son of Sothis,
Amenes' architect.
He kidnaps her on his raft that transports wood and valuables for the Pharaoh's new Treasury.
Second Act
Samlak, King of Ethiopia, and his daughter Makeda are arriving at the Pharaoh.
Amenes is less impressed by
Makeda than by the treasures
Samlak had brought with him.
In the house of the Treasurer,
Ramphis and Theonis are playing a board game.
That's my treasury.
Don't we want to go down there to see the Treasury from nearby?
No one is allowed to come close to the Treasury at the risk of capital punishment. 
I cannot break my own order.
You have good reasons to be cautious.
People are stealing in your country.
At the ports of your Capital a female slave was stolen.
...have it announced throughout the country that I vouched for bringing along the stolen slave.
Come on, we want to finalize the alliance.
Coming close to the Treasury is a capital offense.
- Tomorrow!
- Tomorrow!
What were you looking for in my Treasury?
You're lying!
You will both die!
Kill me, but keep him alive.
I alone am guilty!
As soon as the sun rises a lawful judgement will be enforced.
I am ready to pay for his life.
I wait until sunrise... then he will die.
Now you know my will.
The Pharaoh hat Ramphis thrown into the alligator pool.
Ramphis is screaming. 
Theonis hears it from her cell.
She can see through the window how Ramphes is in danger.
Bring me to the King - but let him alive.
Thanks to the goodness of the Pharaoh you've been pardoned to lifelong forced labor in the stone pit.
You are the first genuine person...
I will do anything to win your heart.
But I pardoned him?
...pardoning with lifelong forced labor in the stone pit!
Those are your important state affairs.
Didn't you guarantee to bring me back the stolen slave?
Infuriated  because Amenes refuses to hand over the slave to Theonis, the Ethiopians are departing.
Fourth Act
...and all of this because of a foreign girl!
Are you aware that you're bringing your country into a war?
...and all of this because of a slave!
No, because of a Queen.
Bless her!
The Queen will be shown to the people.
Don't you want to come to go see her?
Long live the Queen!
War! The Ethiopians are crossing the country scorching and killing.
Before going off to war against the Ethiopians,
Amenes asks Theonis for a vow of fidelity.
She refuses when she hears that Ramphis and the prisoners escaped from the stone pit.
The Pharaoh, who has to give up hope for her love, has her being fixed into the walls of the Treasury, and Sothis, who knows the secret gate, will be blinded.
Father!
What's the value of a person's eyes, when a King is worrying about his wife?
The wife, who's responsible for your blindness, must die.
Fifth Act
The King doesn't want to be disordered.
If you want to see Theonis alive, do not humiliate her, she is my wife.
Forgive me that I want to save you.
I stand before you so pure, as I am leaving you.
Where is the King?
We don't have any accurate news yet.
King Amenes is dead.
If you deliberately extradite the Queen, King Samlak will pardon you. Otherwise the city will be destroyed, and the population will be exterminated.
The Queen should decide herself.
In your hands is the fate of the people. Make a choice.
Bring me to King Samlak.
Only a coward will hand over the Queen to the Barbarians.
Sixth Act
The judgement of the dead on King Amenes.
The dead Kings body has been stolen by the enemy!
These are his remnants.
We judge the dead according to our customs.
He was strict but fair!
Anyone accusing the dead of an evil deed, please stand up.
Anyone who has something to say in favor of the dead, please come forward.
No exception, Queen Theonis, for your sake...
Amenes, you are guilty, no grievance about you.
Your name will be obliterated forever.
Let's leave this place, now that I'm free.
You aren't free. You have the duty to heal the wounds of your people. They are suffering because of you.
The power is in your hands now to choose for your people a righteous King 
Please save the people from another Tyran and choose the most worthy King.
Who do you think is most worthy?
He is your King!
You are the hope of the people.
It is your holy duty...
The Egyptians are celebrating the new King.
Don't you know me, your King Amenes?
This fool imagines he is King Amenes!
Where is Theonis?
Are you lamenting me?
Who is your King?
I claim my wife!
The King too is subjected to the commandments of the Gods.
Give me Theonis!
He betrayed you for the woman's sake.
Our man have been slaughtered for the sake of this woman.
Stone them!
Spare them!
Amenes begs the people to spare Theonis, to no avail.
He also begs them to kill him as well.
Instead, he again is crowned Pharaoh.
With the crown on his head, he falls dead from the throne.
[SINGING]
They called her frivolous Sal
A peculiar sort of a gal
With a heart that was mellow
An all 'round good fellow
Was my gal Sal
Your troubles, sorrows and care
She was always willing to share
A wild sort of devil
But dead on the level
Was my gal Sal
[SINGING]
Watch them shuffle along
See them shuffle along
Go take your best gal, your real pal
Go down to the levee
I said to the levee
And join that shuffling throng
Hear that...
[SINGING "KOL NIDRE"]
[UP-TEMPO MUSIC PLAYING]
[APPLAUSE]
[SINGING]
Wonderful pals are always hard to find
Some folks have one
Some folks have none
And I was alone for years
But fate was kind
And in the end
Sent me a friend
Although he's not much higher
Than my knee
Still, he's the greatest thing on earth
To me
Dirty hands, dirty face
Leads the neighbors a chase
But his smile is as cute as can be
Making noise, breaking toys
Always fighting the boys
But his eyes, they're a vision
To see
And when my work is done
Coming home with the setting sun
From the gate he'll start to run
And then I'll kiss my boy
Dirty hands, dirty face
Little devil, that's what they say
But to me
He's an angel ofjoy
Dirty hands, dirty face
Leads the neighbors a chase
But his smile, his little smile
Is as cute as can be
Making noise, breaking toys
[LAUGHS]
Always fighting the boys
But his eyes, they're his mother's
And they're a vision to see
And when my work is done
Coming home with the setting sun
From the gate he'll start to run
And then, oh
I'll... I'll kiss my boy
Dirty hands, dirty face
Little devil, that's what they say
But to me
He's an angel ofjoy
[APPLAUSE]
Wait a minute, wait a minute.
You ain't heard nothing yet.
Wait a minute, I tell you.
You ain't heard nothing.
You wanna hear, "Toot, Toot, Tootsie!"?
All right. Hold on, hold on.
Lou, play "Toot, Toot, Tootsie!"
Three choruses, you understand?
In the third chorus, I whistle.
Give it to them hard and heavy.
Go right ahead.
[BAND PLAYING "TOOT, TOOT, TOOSIE!"]
[SINGING]
Toot, toot, Tootsie, goodbye
Toot, toot, Tootsie, don't cry
The little choo-choo train
That takes me away from you
You don't know
Just how sad it makes me
Kiss me, Tootsie, and then
Do it all over again
Watch for the mail
I'll never fail
If you don't get a letter
Then you'll know I'm in jail, hey, hey
Don't cry, Tootsie, don't cry
Kiss me, Tootsie, goodbye
[WHISTLING]
Get hot.
Goodbye, Tootsie, goodbye
Ah!
Goodbye, Tootsie, don't cry
The little choo-choo train
That takes me away from you
You don't know
Just how sad it makes me
Kiss me, Tootsie, and then, hey, hey
Come do it all over again
Watch for the mail
I'll never fail
If you don't get a letter
Then you'll know I'm in jail
Don't cry, Tootsie, don't cry
Ah!
Goodbye, Tootsie, goodbye
[ROSENBLATT SINGING "KOL NIDRE"]
[SINGING "KOL NIDRE"]
[SINGING]
Blue skies smilin' at me
Nothin' but blue skies do I see
[SCATTING]
Bluebirds singin' a song
Nothin' but little bluebirds all day long
I never saw the sun shinin' so bright
Never saw things goin' so right
Noticing the days hurrying by
When you're in love
Oh, don't they fly?
Blue days, days, days
All of them gone
Nothin' but blue skies from now on
- Did you like that, Mama?
- Yes.
I'm glad of it.
I'd rather please you...
...than anybody I know of.
Oh, darling, will you give me something?
- What?
- You'll never guess.
Shut your eyes, Mama.
Shut them for little Jakie.
I'm gonna steal something.
[JAKIE LAUGHS]
Oh, Jakie.
I'll give it back to you someday too.
You see if I don't.
Mama, darling...
...if I'm a success in this show...
...well, we're gonna move from here.
- Oh, no.
Oh, yes.
We're gonna move up in the Bronx.
A lot of green grass up there and people you know.
The Ginsbergs, the Guttenbergs, the Goldbergs.
A whole lot of "bergs,"
I don't know them all.
And I'm gonna buy you a nice, black silk dress, Mama.
Mrs. Freedman, the butcher's wife, she'll be jealous of you.
- Oh, no. No.
- Yes, she will. You'll see if she isn't.
I'm gonna get you a pink dress that will go with your brown eyes.
What do you mean, no?
Who is telling you?
What do you mean, no?
Yes, you'll wear pink or else.
Or else you'll wear pink.
And darling, oh, I'm gonna take you to Coney Island.
- Yeah?
- Yes. We're gonna ride the Shoot-the-Chutes.
- Do you know the dark mill?
- Yes?
- You ever been to dark mill?
- I wouldn't.
With me, it's all right. I'll kiss you and hug you. You'll see if I don't.
Now, Mama. Mama, stop now.
You're getting kittenish.
Mama, listen. I'm gonna sing this like I will if I go on the stage with this show.
I'm gonna sing it jazzy.
Now, get this.
[SINGING]
Blue skies smilin' at me, me, me, me
Nothin' but little blue skies do I see
[SCATTING]
Bluebirds singin' a song
Nothin' but little bluebirds all day long
You like that slapping business?
Never saw the sun shinin' so bright
Never saw things goin' so right
Noticing the days hurryin' by
When you're in love, oh, don't they fly?
Blue days, all of them gone
- Stop!
- Nothin' but...
Mother, I'm sorry I wandered away
Breaking your heart as I did
Now that I'm grown up
I've come back to say
Things that I felt as a kid
Dear
Mother of mine
When friends all doubt me
I still have you
Somehow you're just the same
Mother divine
With your arms around me
I know I'm not to blame
When skies are sunny
[JAKIE SINGING]
Ain't it funny?
That's when my pals
All haunt me
When things go wrong
And they don't want me
Mother, I still
Have you
Mother of mine
When friends all doubt me
I still have you
Somehow you're just the same
Mother divine
With your arms about me
I know
I'm not to blame
Gee, ain't it funny
When skies are sunny
That's when my pals
They haunt me
And when things go wrong
And they don't want me
Mother
I still have
You
[APPLAUSE]
[JAKIE SINGING "KOL NIDRE"]
[APPLAUSE]
[SINGING]
Mammy
Mammy
The sun shines east
The sun shines west
But I know where the sun shines best
Mammy
My heartstrings are tangled around
Alabamy
I... I'm comin'
Sorry I made you wait
I... I'm comin'
I hope and trust I'm not late
Mammy
I'd walk a million miles
For one of your smiles
For my Mammy
Mammy
My little Mammy
The sun shines east
The sun shines west
But I know where the sun shines best
It's on my Mammy
I'm talkin' about
Nobody else's
My little Mammy
My heartstrings are tangled around
Alabamy
Mammy, I'm comin'
I hope I didn't make you wait
Mammy, I'm comin'
Oh, God, I hope I'm not late
Mammy
Don't you know me?
It's your little baby
I'd walk a million miles
For one of your smiles
For my Mammy
THE WHITE HELL OF PIZ PALÜ had its premiere in 1929.
The original negative is lost.
However, a nitrate print survived.
The print was partially out of sequence and its subtitles...
...differed from those of the original release version.
With the help of the censor records these errors have been corrected.
The restoration of the film took place in 1997 in collaboration between...
...the Stiftung Deutsche Kinemathek and
Taurus Film in the Federal Archive.
THE WHITE HELL OF PIZ PALÜ
The screenplay by Dr. Fanck is based on a brief newspaper...
...report about some young mountain climbers who lost...
...their way in a rock face near Innsbruck...
...and fought for their lives for seven days.
FÖHN
...a warm Alpine wind...
...lashes the faces of Piz Palü.
The Mountain rages, steaming with snow dust.
"Don't be cocky up here, Hannes!"
"The fist holds steady!"
"The rope does not reach far enough down...!
...Wait here, I'll run down to the valley to get help."
Suddenly...
The mountain is silent.
Once again, two young people stand in front of this mountain.
DAIVOLEZZA HUT
2,977 meters above sea level
The mountain basks in sunshine.
"Udet! Udet!"
All the best to the engaged couple!
"You know, suddenly all that ice up here seems foreboding."
"Today we are alone for the first time, Maria."
Log of the Diavolezza Hut
October 6
...1925 Off to the Piz Palü.
Guide: Christian.
Dr. Johannes Krafft and Maria Krafft...
...died by accident in the
Piz Palü glacier.
"Don't you know the story of Dr. Johannes Krafft?"
"It happened at Piz Palü... the pale mountain..."
"And since then, he goes as a restless solitary wanderer...
...over all the ridges and faces of the Palü...
...The local community calls him...
...GHOST of the Mountain."
"Come, let's make some tea."
"May I offer you a cup of tea?"
The warm Föhn wind drifts through the valleys.
"Why do you go to the mountain again and again?"
"And why do you wander always alone?"
"It was only a narrow crevice in the Palü Glacier...
...but it reached far down into darkness..."
"There... an urgent cry for help came out from the icy depths...
...Maria was still alive...!"
"Maria...!"
"Maria...!"
"But only the sub-glacial stream roared down in the dark."
"Maria...!"
"Since then, the Mountain holds her captive in its icy grave."
"Please come in and join us for dinner."
"Do you know there are students from Zurich...
...coming tomorrow to attempt the north face of the Piz Palü?"
"This is the face that poses the last big problem here at the Palü."
"Is it that difficult?"
"He tried it already twice by himself...
...but without the security of a second person it is too dangerous."
"I'll come up again tomorrow evening."
"My God, the Föhn us blowing in... now the ice will thunder at the Palü."
"Stop being so ambitious here in the mountains, Hannes."
"Don't you think we shouldn't let him go by himself?"
October 7 1928
Tomorrow at 6:30 a.m...
...off to the north face of the Palü.
Dr. Johannes Krafft
...Alone.
"She should not lie close to the wall...
...there is a strong draft through the cracks."
"Wait a moment...
I'll go with you."
Dear Maria, I go with Dr. Johannes to attempt the north face...
...because it leaves me no peace...
...I want to prove that I can achieve something, too...
...Don't be angry, we'll be back this evening and hopefully...
...we'll stay alone after that.
- Yours, Hans
Dear Maria, I go with Dr. Johannes to attempt the north face...
...because it leaves me no peace...
...I want to prove that I can achieve something, too...
...Don't be angry, we'll be back this evening and hopefully...
...we'll stay alone after that.
- Yours, Hans
"You cannot leave me alone in the hut... you have to take me with you!"
"No, this is not for a girl."
"Look, we have to cross the great gorge of the Piz Palü...
...underneath a dangerous ice face."
In the fantastic world of a glacial break.
"Kids, Dr. Johannes is ahead of us."
"Let's climb directly through the gorge...
...that is the only way we can still beat him."
"Let's hope that the whole mess...
...doesn't come crashing down just today!"
"From here on,
I'll go first."
"I don't want to be behind all the time."
"Be reasonable."
"Go fast!"
"Now we are stuck."
Distress in the mountains!
October 7 1928
Tomorrow at 6:30 a.m...
...off to the north face of the Palü.  Dr. Johannes Krafft
-A-l-o-n-e-
With Hans Brandt and Maria Maoni
Sudden temperature drop.
"Distress signal at the Palü!"
"Yes, yes,
I am coming."
"Take pitch torches and stretchers with you!"
"We reach the peak from south...
...and from there we try to descend the north face."
"Go with me to the face..."
"Through the glacier break you'll find somebody who has been thrown...
...across the crevice.
The others are lying below."
"Take my sweater."
Hell
ALPINE MISFORTUNE
In the Engadin Mountains five young...
...climbers were overcome by an avalanche and were found dead...
...A second party, a young couple, guided by the well known mountaineer...
...Dr. Johannes Krafft, lost their way in the north face of the Piz Palü...
...For three days a rescue team searched from the summit down...
...to find the missing, but the face is just too vast...
...From time to time calls for help from the missing can be heard.
The third night.
"If he loses his nerve and starts to act wild...
...you'll have to help me, Maria."
"Can't we let him loose?"
"He would throw himself down immediately to end his agony."
Dropping provisions is impossible...
...I'll show you now the exact location by flying as close to it as possible.
"Hans is freezing to death!"
"Hans is freezing to death!"
His last walk.
Old Christian: In a few hours you might have succeeded in climbing down to us...
...It will just be in time for the two...
...I tried to keep them warm as best I could...
...But don't search for me for too long.
Leave me where I belong.
You know I alway was good friends with the ice.
But the mountain rages.
"They are coming...
THEY ARE COMING!"
"Two have been saved.
They are up in the hut."
"And where is
Dr. Johannes?"
You know I always was good friends with the ice.
THE END english subtitles transcribed by
.:: Norgen (norgen@centrum.cz) ::.
Studio MOSFILM
OCTOBER
This film was produced in 1927 by a group of soviet filmmakers, led by Sergei Eisenstein for the Tenth Anniversary of the October Revolution.
This film recreates the events of October 191 7 with the greatest possible realism.
Many participants of the Revolution,
Red Guards, soldiers and sailors appear in the film.
Among them is
Nikolai Podvolsky, one of the leaders of the armed uprising.
Leningrad and its streets, the Winter Palace, the corridors of the Smolny, were the same as in that fateful year.
Thus, OCTOBER 191 7 renders a stirring ''eyewitness'' account of the early days of the birth of the
Soviet Union.
A masterpiece created by one of the world's greatest film directors, it's a welcome gift to film viewers.
The original film premiered in the era of the silent screen.
This sound version was made by
Eisenstein's associate
Grigory Alexandrov.
The music is by
Dimitri Shostakovich.
Sound : V. Ladyguina
V. Babouchkine
OCTOBER 191 7 this fiIm is dedicated to the Petrograd
ProIetariat heroes of the October
RevoIution.
Commissioned by the October
RevoIution JubiIee Committee.
Chairman,
NikoIai PodvoIsky.
ScreenpIay and Direction,
SERGEI EISENSTEIN and GRIGORY ALEXANDROV
Camera,
EDUARD TISSE
We have the right to be proud that to us feII the good fortune of beginning the buiIding of the
Soviet State and by doing so, opening a new chapter in the history of the worId.
VLADIMIR ULYANOV (LENIN)
ALEXANDER III, EMPEROR
OF RUSSIA.
FEBRUARY
The proIetariat's first victory on the road to sociaIism.
TO THE CITIZENS
OF RUSSIA!
TO THE CITIZENS
OF RUSSIA!
Long Iive the
ProvisionaI Government!
TO THE CITIZENS
OF RUSSIA!
To the citizens of
Russia?
That means...
BROTHER !
FRIEND!
The ProvisionaI Government...
...wiII continue to honor the commitments made to the aIIied powers.
One pound of bread.
One haIf pound...
One quarter pound...
One eight pound...
The same oId story...
Hunger and War.
But...
Outside the FinIand raiIway station.
ApriI 3rd
''It's him !''
''UIyanov!''
''LENIN !''
''Long Iive the revoIutionary soIdiers and workers who have overthrown the Monarchy!''
''No support for the
ProvisionaI Government!''
''Long Iive the SociaIist
RevoIution !''
SociaIist...not Bourgeoisie.
Five months of Bourgeoisie
Government...
No Peace
No Bread
No Land
JULY
Days of the peopIe's wrath.
''Down with the capitaIist ministers!''
''Down with the
ProvisionaI Government!''
Meeting foIIowed meeting outside the buiIding where the Petrograd Committee of the BoIsheviks was housed.
''An uprising is premature!''
''The enemy wiII try to provoke us!''
''We caII for caIm and restraint!''
Kronstadt SaiIors.
''The party wiII Iead you when the times comes.''
NEVSKY PROSPECT
Corner of Sadovaya Square
StronghoId of the reactionary newspaper...
EditoriaI offices of
THE EVENING TIMES.
TO THE RESCUE OF THE BANNER.
''BOLSHEVIK!''
The government ordered the bridges raised... to cut off the workers' districts from the center.
The victors threw copies of THE PRAVDA into the river.
The counter-revoIutionaries had won.
The ''PRAVDA''
The 1st Machinegun Regiment... caIIed for soIidarity with the workers.
TURNCOATS!
TRAITORS!
BOLSHEVIKS!
Headquarters of the BoIshevik miIitary organization.
The Petrograd Committee of The BoIshevik Party.
DICTATOR.
Minister Of The Army.
Minister Of The Navy.
Prime minister,
Etc., etc., etc...
Hope of the Nation and the RevoIution :
AIexander Kerensky.
The tsar's Iackeys.
A true democrat!
The ''ROYAL'' democrat!
The ''TURNCOATS.''
The ''TRAITORS.''
On JuIy 6th, the ProvisionaI
Government ordered the arrest of Lenin.
Lenin had gone underground.
But he directed the 6th Party
Congress, which pIanned an armed uprising.
In the chambers of
Empress AIexandra.
AIexander Kerensky.
In the chambers of
AIexander III.
AIexander IV?
''Order For The Reinstatement
Of The Death PenaIty.''
NAPOLEON?
EMPEROR?
The RevoIution is in danger!
''GeneraI...
...KorniIov...
...is advancing !''
''KorniIov is advancing !''
''Defend Petrograd!''
''KorniIov is advancing !''
''In the name of
God and Country.''
''In the name of God...
''In the name of Country.''
''Hooray!''
''Hooray!''
GeneraI KorniIov.
Two NapoIeons.
Which of the two?
KorniIov is advancing.
With the Savage Division.
With British tanks.
And the government?
The government is powerIess.
''KorniIov shaII not pass.''
Prison doors were torn open.
The ''TURNCOATS.''
The ''TRAITORS.''
The BOLSHEVIKS.
The arsenaI was in the hands of the peopIe.
The workers of Petrograd took over...
...the defense of the city.
DEFENSE HEADQUARTERS.
THE SMOLNY.
The ''TURNCOATS.''
The ''TRAITORS.''
The BOLSHEVIKS.
THE SAVAGE DIVISION.
''GOD IS WITH US.''
The BoIshevik IeafIet...
...spoke their Ianguage.
BREAD!
PEACE !
LAND!
BROTHERHOOD!
Fraternizing.
And...
GeneraI KorniIov was arrested.
PROLETARlAN, LEARN TO
USE YOUR RlFLE!
''The BoIsheviks must seize power!''
''This wiII be the Iast and decisive battIe!''
The hour drew near.
On October 10th., the CentraI
Committee Of The BoIsheviks debated the question of an armed uprising.
Trotsky urged for a postponement.
Waiting untiI Rodzyanko and Co. strangIed the RevoIution or beginning the uprising.
There was no middIe course!
To vaciIIate was to Iose.
''AII in favor of
Lenin's proposaI.''
''AII in favor of
Lenin's proposaI.''
The party set up headquarters for the uprising.
THE MlLlTARY
REVOLUTlONARYCOMMlTTEE
OCTOBER 24th
After four months in the underground,
Lenin was in the SmoIny.
Map of Petrograd and suburbs.
The Palace Square...
The Winter Palace...
On the eve of October 25th
Lenin took over the direction of the uprising.
An appeaI was drafted.
''TO THE CITIZENS OF RUSSIA''
The Provisional Government has been deposed!
State power has passed into the hands of the...
Petrograd Soviet of Workers' and Soldier's Deputies.
October 25th, 191 7,
10 a.m.
In repIy to the appeaI... from the workers' districts to the SmoIny...
CLASS SUPERVlSOR
THE MENSHEVlKFACTlON
The Mensheviks.
The Commissars!
''To the teIegraph office!''
''To the teIephone exchange!''
''Man your posts!''
The morning of October 25th.
On orders from the
Committee and according to the pIan, the cruiser
''AURORA'' saiIed up the
Neva River.
AURORA
Again the bridges were raised and the workers' districts were cut off from the center.
The bridges feII into the hands of the workers.
''The saiIors are coming !''
A Cossack regiment.
''This is the Minister of War.''
''Where are the Cossacks?''
''They're saddIing their mounts.''
NeutraIity.
TO THE ClTlZENS OF RUSSlA
''QuickIy, to the front so that we can return at the head of our IoyaI troops and crush the BoIsheviks!''
''GentIemen !...''
The cadets marched to the aid of the deposed government.
''HeIp is on the way!''
The Women's Death BattaIion.
''To the Iast drop of bIood!''
The biIIiard tabIe of NicoIas II.
Barricades of the counter-revoIutionaries.
The deIegates of the Second Congress of Soviets assembIed.
Delegates of the
Menshevik Party - Room 16.
Delegates of the S.R. Party
Room 20.
DeIegates from the front.
From the East.
From Kronstadt.
From the Ukraine.
From Siberia.
The ProvisionaI Government had Iost power, but continued to exist.
Its Leader.
Its Members.
They drafted an appeaI to the peopIe.
''...The Constituent AssembIy is the onIy IawfuI government in Russia.''
That night at the SmoIny the Menshevik S.R. CentraI
Executive Committee opened the session of Congress.
''Comrades.''
''There is but one question on our agenda.''
''That question is... who shaII be in power?''
''The ProvisionaI Government is the onIy IawfuI government.''
THE MlLlTARY
REVOLUTlONARYCOMMlTTEE
But the peopIe decided otherwise.
The Russian CapitoI was in the hands of the revoIutionary workers and soIdiers.
AURORA
The Winter Palace...
The Palace Square.
''The BoIsheviks have hatched a miIitary pIot against the
IawfuI government.''
''We wiII have hunger and ruin instead of bread.''
''The country's ruin wiII be
BoIshevik's destruction.''
''But the revoIution wiII aIso perish.''
''Down with him !''
''Down with the Iackeys of the bourgeoisie!''
EIection of the Congress Presidium.
''AII those in favor of the
Mensheviks and S.R.'s?''
''Not so many.''
''AII those in favor of the BoIsheviks?''
ALL POWER TO THE SOVlETS!
Red Guards heId the Winter
PaIace in a ring of steeI.
Surrender!
You are given 20 minutes... to avoid bloodshed.
Military, Revolutionary Committee.
Bearers of the truce proposaI.
''A man?''
''A woman?''
''Hey, friend!''
''Last uItimatum to your government.''
Waiting for a repIy.
Waiting...
One by one, the soIdiers of the Death BattaIion surrendered.
Time was running out.
InfiItrators from the SmoIny were making their way into the
PaIace to the Cossack battery through the PaIace ceIIars.
There are 1,100 rooms in the PaIace.
In the main courtyard...
...among the Cossacks the infiItrators were at work.
''Officer coming !''
''You dirty...''
''How dare you Ieave your post!''
''You, a cadet!''
THE MOTHER !
''Cadets! Attention !''
''We have been given an uItimatum.''
''We shaII not surrender Russia to the BoIshevik-German Spies!''
On the fIoor above...
The infiItrators had done their job.
''How do you propose to seize power?''
''I'm asking...
...you BoIsheviks!''
''The Army is not with you.''
''The frontIine troops...
...are not with you !''
''That's a Iie!''
''You are speaking for Headquarters!''
TWELFTH ARMYSUPPORTS
THE SOVlETS!
''The TweIfth Army...
...is with the BoIsheviks.''
''Comrades!''
''Comrades!''
SoIdiers of the CycIe BattaIion.
''RaIIy to the Soviets!''
The Cossacks...
...surrendered.
They changed sides.
StiII no repIy.
NO REPLY.
And at the Congress...
The Mensheviks ''discoursed.''
''We must try to settIe this sad misunderstanding peacefuIIy, without fighting, without bIoodshed.''
''The BoIsheviks want to force historicaI events.''
''There wiII be no peace!''
''There wiII no bread!''
''The time for words has passed!''
''We want peace!''
''We want bread!''
''We want Iand!''
The signaI!
The guns at the
Peter and PauI Fort.
Committee For The SaIvation
Of Country And The RevoIution.
Trying to save the
ProvisionaI Government.
To save the Government?
''Why... that is... the Mayor, in person !''
''We protest most emphaticaIIy!''
''Forward!''
The Empress' bedroom.
''Let's get Kerensky!''
''GentIemen. Let us meet them in a most dignified manner.''
''You are aII under arrest on behaIf of the MiIitary
RevoIutionary Committee...''
October 25, 191 7.
Antonov Ovseyenko.
''...I decIare the ProvisionaI
Government deposed!''
ST. PETERSBURG
MOSCOW
NEW YORK
BERLIN
LONDON
PARIS
''Comrades!
The Workers' and
Peasants' RevoIution, which the BoIsheviks have aIways deemed necessary, has been won !''
Wednesday, October 25
Thursday, October 26
DECREE ON PEACE
DECREE ON LAND
''We must now set about buiIding a proIetarian sociaIist state in Russia.''
V. UIyanov (Lenin )
THE END
THE PASSION OF JOAN OF ARC
A film by Carl Th. Dreyer
At the Bibliotheque de la
Chambre des Deputes in Paris resides one of the most extraordinary documents in the history of the world: the record of the trial of
Joan of Arc, the trial that ended in her death.
The questions of the judges and Joan's responses were recorded exactly.
Reading it, we discover the real Joan... not in armor, but simple and human... a young woman who died for her country... and we are witness to an amazing drama: a young, pious woman confronted by a group of orthodox theologians and powerful judges.
I swear to tell the truth, the whole truth... nothing but the truth...
In France I'm called Joan... in my village,
I'm called Jeannette.
How old are you?
Nineteen...I think.
Do you know the Lord's Prayer?
Who taught it to you?
My mother.
Will you recite it?
You claim to be sent by God?
To save France... it's why I was born.
So you think God hates the English?
I don't know if God loves or hates the English... but I do know that the English will all be chased from France... except those that die here!
You have said that St. Michael appeared to you...in what form?
Did he have wings?
Did he wear a crown?
How was he dressed?
How did you know if it was a man or a woman?
Was he naked?
Do you think God was unable to clothe him?
Did he have long hair?
Why would he have cut it?
Why do you wear men's clothing?
If we give you women's clothing, would you wear it?
When the mission that God has entrusted to me is over...
I will again dress as a woman.
So it is God who orders you to dress as a man?
And what reward do you expect from God?
The salvation of my soul.
You blaspheme God.
This is disgraceful.
For me, she is a saint.
Has God made you promises?
That has nothing to do with this trial.
Shouldn't we let the judges decide that?
Shall we put this question to a vote?
So! What has God promised you?
Perhaps that you will be delivered from prison?
When?
I know neither the day... nor the hour.
Since she couldn't be made to confess easily... we will have to be clever...
Go find a letter bearing the signature of King Charles.
I will dictate a letter.
I have great sympathy for you!
Do you know the signature of your King?
I have a letter from him for you.
I can't read.
To our beloved Joan...
I am preparing to march on Rouen with a mighty army.
I send you this devoted priest.
Have confidence in him.
Just as Jesus is the son of God... you claim to be the daughter of God?
Will you recite the
Lord's Prayer?
God has told you that you shall be delivered from prison?
By a great victory!
God has promised you that you will go to Heaven?
So you are certain of being saved?
Be careful, it's a dangerous answer.
Since you are sure of your salvation... you have no need of the Church?
Are you in a state of grace?
Respond!
Are you in a state of grace?
If I am, may God keep me there.
If I am not, may God grant it to me!
Father... permit me to attend Mass.
Joan, if we permit you to attend Mass... will you stop wearing men's clothes?
So, you would rather dress as a man than attend Mass?
These shameless clothes... abominable to God...
You are no daughter of God...
You are Satan's creature!
Go prepare the torture chamber.
She really looks like a daughter of God, eh?
The torture chamber.
Regard your judges.
Do you not feel that these learned doctors are wiser than you?
But God is even wiser!
Listen, Joan, we know that your visions do not come from God... but from the devil.
How do you know a good angel from an evil angel?
You have knelt before Satan, not St. Michael!
Don't you see that it's the Devil who has turned your head... who has tricked you... and betrayed you?
I think she's ready to abjure!
The Church opens its arms to you... but if you reject it, the Church will abandon you... and you will be alone... alone!
Yes, alone... alone, with God!
Even if you part my soul from my body...
I will confess nothing...
And if I do confess, later I will say it was forced from me!
Not for anything in the world do I want her to die a natural death.
She is very weak.
She has a fever... we must bleed her.
Be careful, she could end her own life... she's very crafty.
Bring the Sacraments.
Is there something you wish to tell us?
I fear that I am about to die... and if I do, I ask you to bury me in sacred ground.
The Church is merciful...
It always welcomes the misguided lamb.
Joan, we all want what's best for you.
Look, I have sent for the Sacraments.
I am a good Christian.
Do you not know it is the
Body of Christ you refuse?
Do you not see that you outrage God by your obstinacy?
I love and honor God... with all my heart.
You claim...that I am... sent by the devil.
It's not true... to make me suffer, the devil has sent you... and you... and you... and you...
There is nothing left to be done... alert the executioner!
Let us try one last time to save this lost soul...
It is to you, Joan, that I speak.
It is to you that I say your King is a heretic!
My King is the most noble
Christian of all.
The arrogance of this woman is insane.
France has never seen such a monster...
I have never wronged anyone.
If you do not sign, you will be burned alive...
The stake awaits you...
You don't have the right to die.
Your King still needs you.
Joan, sign... and save your life!
Joan, we have great sympathy for you.
Sign, Joan!
In the name of the Lord. Amen.
Having recognized your errors, you shall not be excommunicated.
But as you have greatly sinned, we condemn you... to perpetual imprisonment, to eat the bread of sorrow and drink the water of anguish.
A good day's work: you have saved your life and your soul.
She has only made fools of you!
Long live Joan!
Go find the judges!
I take it back, I have lied...
Hurry!
I have committed a great sin...
I have denied God... to save my life.
But Joan, you have confessed before everyone that the devil misled you.
You still believe you were sent by God?
Her answer will bring her death.
Everything I said was for fear of the stake.
Have you anything else to tell us?
We have come to prepare you for death.
Now...already?
How am I to die?
At the stake.
I'll bring the last Sacrament.
How can you still believe that you are sent by God?
His ways are not our ways.
Yes, I am His child.
And the great victory?
...my martyrdom!
...and your deliverance?
...death!
Will you take confession?
May the Body of Our Lord
Jesus Christ keep my soul... unto life everlasting. Amen.
Be courageous, Joan.
Your last hour approaches.
Dear God, I accept my death gladly... but do not let me suffer too long.
Will I be with You tonight in Paradise?
Jesus!
You have burned a saint!
The flames sheltered
Joan's soul... as it rose to heaven -
Joan whose heart has become the heart of France...
Joan, whose memory will always be cherished... by the people of France.
WAY DOWN EAST
A Simple Story of Plain People.
Since the beginning of time man has been polygamous
- even the saints of Biblical history - but the son of
Man gave a new thought. and the world is growing nearer the true ideal. He gave of One Man for One
Woman.
Not by laws - our Statures are now overburdened by ignored laws - but within the heart of man, the truth must bloom that his greatest happiness lies in his purity and constancy.
Today Woman brought up grom childhood to expect
ONE CONSTANT MATE possibly suffers more than at any point in the history of mankind, because not yet has the man-animal reached this high standard
- except perhaps in theory.
If there is anything in this story that brings home to men the suffering caused by our selfishness, perhaps it will not be in vain.
Time and place - in the story world of make-believe,
Characters; Incidents - never occurred-yet always happening.
Let us suppose a remote village in New England.
Ana Moore and her mother.
We call her "Anna" - we might have called her
"Woman" - for is not herw the story -
Sore need of money drives the mother to appeal to the
Tremonts, their rich relatives in Boston.
Oh Mother, I hate to ask them for money.
So, through the troubled twilight...
All right Mother, I'll go.
THE DEPARTURE
Tell Cousin Emma I made this hug-me-tight my own hands.
The fashion paper says these gloves are style in the city.
An errand undertaken with the tremulous footsteps that ever mark the trail of the
"poor relation"
Her cousins, the Tremonts, were giving a bridge whist party the afternoon of
Anna's arrival.
Cousin Emma Tremon
Herself.
Diana Tremont, her daughter.
An occasional interloper in
Society - The dashing
Lennox Sanderson, who depends go his living upon a rich father.
He has three specialties:
Women! Women! And
WOMEN.
There is a young person - says she's your Cousin
Anna Moore - from
Greenville.
My dear child! Whatever brought you here?
Well, you see, things haven’t been going very well - and we wanted to ask you - if -
Courage failing, she changes the subject to the hug-me-tight.
I beg your pardon.
Mrs. Tremont imparts the embarrassing news of the country cousin's arrival to her daughters.
Well, get rid of her.
But to impress their eccentric, but enormously rich aunt, the sisters pretend to be nice to Anna.
I knew you both from your pictures.
Yes, I expect to stay quite a time - that is, if we suit each other.
CHAPTER II
Near the country estate of then Santerson family is
Bartlett Village.
Also the home of Squire
Bartlett, the richest farmer in the neighborhood.
The clock hand points to blossoms - and awakening.
David Bartlett though of plain stock, haw been tutored by poets and visions as the world.
Squire Bartlett, a stern old puritan, who lives according to his awn con- seption of the Scriptures, particularly the "Thou
Shalt Nots".
Mrs. Barlett, whose gentle soul is as sweet as her beloved Scriptures.
Day dreams of twenty-one.
The great Tremont ball - the climax of the social season.
Anna's dress that she and her mother had made in case she should go out in
Society.
It's quite all right - and from the balcony you can see uis dancing.
Solely to pique the sisters of whom she is not over-fond, the aunt makes different arrangements for Anna.
Oh, Aunty! - This dress
- where’s the top?
Beneath the alcove lights' golden glow.
Anna's delicate beauty a whip to Sanderson's laded appetite.
In your beauty lives again
Elaine, the lily maid, love dreaming at Astolat.
Tell me more.
Cousin Emma hurries Anna off to bed - perhaps in fear of her own daughters being outshone.
The susceptible Sanderson, obsesed by a new desire.
Sanderson, after managing several meetings, finally lures Anna to the apartment to meet a mythical aunt.
Wait - I'll call Aunty.
Strange, she isn't here.
Just five minutes! She'll be back any time.
If she doesn't come in five minutes - I must go.
You don't understand...
I mean... I want you to... to marry me.
Anna's inexperienced heart caught in a tide of infatuation.
Oh, I' m just going to tell everybody.
But Sanderson, dreading to cross the wishes of his rich father, upon whom he is de- pendent, persuades Anna to promise secrecy.
Sanderson belongs to a class which, if it cannot get what is wants in one way, it will go to any length to get it in another.
Evil plans.
Passion's urge knows no conscience and various its ways to betrayal.
Sanderson induces Anna to marry secretly before going home.
Far away it happens that
David Bartlett is dreaming a troubled dream.
Don't worry... everything's all right. Don't you trust me?
So... it is done.
The bridal suite at
Rose Tree Inn.
To her it is the fulfillment of the dreams of girlhood
- to him but another adventure.
Here conscience knocks at the door... perhaps the slightest interruptions might still avert this tragedy, but...
My... my husband!
The afternoon the Bartlett post office was robbed.
The dread minion of the
Law - Rube Whipple,
Constable.
Seth Holcomb waiting for
Martha Perkins, whom he has been following around for twenty years.
Seth takes his liquor under tha name of
"Long Life Bitters".
Martha Perkins, a relic, nobody needs newspaper when she is around.
The Constable on the man hunt.
Napoleon, his fiery steed.
Napoleon refuses to climb the hill.
The temptation of
Napoleon.
These men! I just can't keep tem from following me.
Great news! Post office bin robbed! Dollar eighty-two cents in postage stamps, eighteen postal cards!
Heavy loss to the government.
I'll 'low bno man to laugh at the law, Seth Holcomb.
The both win.
Charter IV.
One day of the honeymoon before Anna starts home with her great secret.
Promise now.
Only two days!
Anna's return home.
Anna relieves her mother's anxiety with happy mysterious hints of wealth to come.
The old way too pleasant to give up.
Less and less frequent their secret meetings until at last...
In answer to her urgent letter...
All right. I'll wait.
You haven't told anyone aboyt our marriage?
She tells him of a tender new reason why the secret cannot be kept any longer.
You mustn’t tell ANYONE.
Well...
Well... if you MUST know
The truth...
Because we aren't married at all!
You’re just joking... tell me, aren't you joking?
WE MUST be married... see... see... our ring...
Marriage would have meant my losing everything...
I intended to make it right... but...
For Heaven's sake, don't make a scene! I'll let you have lots of money and you can go away.
Mother! Mother!
When the mother returns...
Some time afterwards - left alone by her mother's death
- Anna hides away with her shame in the village of Belden.
Maternity:
Woman's Gethsemane.
Shadows across the time dial.
The baby without a name.
My child, your baby is very sick.
Ten drops of this in a little water every hour until
I return.
Where's your husband?
Oh... he's away.
The landlady solemnly reminds Anna that if the baby dies without being baptized, it will never see Got.
Helpless and alone in the dreadful hours of the night, and stricken with a terrible fear for her baby's soul... she herself performs the sacred rite.
In the name of the Father, and of the son... and of the Holy Ghost...
I baptize thee...
TRUST LENNOX.
The vigil.
The little hands grow cold upon her breast.
My child, your baby is dead.
Sanderson on his country estate at Bartlett.
Everybody is talking about you having no husband.
I guess you'll have to leave.
Upon her back the age-old Cross.
The Pilgrimage.
Hi Holler, the Barlett's chore boy, sprucing op in the barn to meet Kate, the Squire's niece.
A reckless spectator.
Oh! Hi! Hi Holler! Hurry up! It's time to fetch Kate!
Anna, in search of work, reaches Barlett Village.
Kate, the Squire's niece, returns from a short trip to Boston.
The Professor, summer boarder at Squire Barlett's. pursues his studies.
Is this the young niece you were expecting from
Boston?
I am looking for work.
Work? You don't 'pear to have no strength to work.
Where ye from?
Whose your folks?
I haven't any folks.
For all we know she might be some loose woman wanderin' 'round. I won't take her inter my hum!
Sorry, young lady, but I ain't got nothing for yet.
Inasmuch as ye have done it unto one of the least of these... ye have done it unto me!
That's Scripture, Father.
All right, Mother, we'll try her. Nobody can't ever say
I went aging the Scriptures!
Whatever your troubles, child, remember, the Lord is your Shepherd, you shall not want.
Kate's Homecoming.
It has been settled by the
Squire and David’s childhood that they are to marry,
Open admiration.
The Professor, meeting
Kate, is converted to the scientific theory of Love at first sight.
Oh, Professor, my shoe is untied.
Well, well, neighbor
Sanderson, haven’t seen you since Kate went away.
Kate - Sanderson's newest infatuation.
David, you'll have time before supper to show
Neighbor Sanderson that heifer he wants to buy.
What are you doing here?
I am working.
You can't stay here.
I live right across the way.
Come right in, Mr. Sanderson!
Supper's ready.
You father was right.
I'm afraid I'm not strong enough for this work.
Release don't do away,
Miss Moore! I... we all... like you very much.
You'll get stronger after awhile, and...
Anna! David!
Come right in.
END OF PART I
WAY DOWN EAST
Part II
Meanwhile, Anna, her past still a closed book, has become a beloved member of the household.
Knowing only Anna's blameless life among them,
David thrilled with the thought that she is the virginal white flower of his dreams.
By the river and the distant music of the falls - Around them the sweet scent of summer fields.
The David points out the two forks of the river, that go into one...
And all a thrill with a great sincere love,
Visions to her how they two might go,
On through life together...
One heart for one heart,
One soul for one soul,
One love for one love,
Even through Eternity.
At last the freat over- whelming love - only to be halted by the stark ghosts of her past.
I am only trying to say I love you, Anna - it seems
I've always loved you!
So she tells him he must never speak like this again.
The summer goes, the winter comes,
We cannot rile the year,
Nor can we rule the barque of Fate,
Nor all its strange ways steer.
The Professor's love... burdened heart brings him down to the country to see
Kate.
I'm going ter read yer some funny jokes.
Why does a chicken cross the road?
None of the rooster’s
Business.
Ain't that funny?
Three eggs, two bad.
Miss Kate, I want to ask... if you will... be... my...
The ice is going out soon.
When the river starts you'd better look out down below there!
Anna goes ton the store after forgotten goodies for the big party planned for the evening.
The villain still pursues her.
The sewing circle next to the grocery store.
Maria Poole, the landlady from Belden, visits Barlett.
That's Anna Moor lives down to Squire
Barlett's.
Moore? Her name ain't
Moore...
She lived at my house.
Mrs. Lennox, she called herself... but she never had no husband at all!
And then... there was a baby!
The Squire thinks it time that David and Kate come to an understanding.
It's my bounden duty to go and expose this woman to the Squire.
Father's set on getting married but I don't think we can without proper love... do you?
Suppose, Squire, I had been like you suspected when you first saw me?
Would there be any hope of forgiveness?
When the law's broke. it's broke, ain't it? A wrong’s a wrong and nothing can make it right.
Of course...
I was just supposing.
On their way to the big barn dance.
Maria Poole, from Belden, was at the sewing circle and she says...
No. I shouldn't tell you!
It's that...
Oh, it's awful...
But before Martha tells her thrilling news...
On their way to the big party, they stop to warm up at the Squire's with an old- fashioned dance.
No, I am not invited to the party,
The Professor, dazed but happy.
All bound 'round a woolen string!
A great big hat with a great big brim.
All bound 'round, all bound 'round.
All bound 'round with a woolen string!
David, for some reason, suddenly discovers he is not interested in the party.
The neighbors' barn dance.
Moro and worried by Anna's presence... also afraid she will interfere in his pursuit of
Kate - Saderson -
I can't have you around here where I live!
Suppose they find out about your past life?
You'd have to fet out them!
Suppose they find out about YOUR past life!
Oh, it's different with a
MAN! He's supposed to sow his wild oats.
At last Martha gets her opportunity with the
Squire.
Does Lennox Sanderson mean anything to you?
Why do you ask such question?
Because I can't keep silent any longer.
I love you! I want you to be my wife.
It's about Anna Moore.
She lived in Belden under the name of Lennox.
Mrs. Lennox.
A baby was born, but there ware not no wedding ring to the finger.
No, father... you must have proof.
I'll go to Belden in the morning... and if it is true...
Please! Please don't!
I can never be ANY
MAN'S WIFE!
The next morning. The
Squire on his way to
Belden to investigate
Martha's story.
The Squire's on important business, isn't he?
So happens that
Sanderson...
At noon Squire arrives in Belden.
It's all true. Why, her baby was born in this very room.
Late afternoon.
Roses in wintertime!
Lan' sakes!
Don't want no supper of your getting!
The time's come for you to get your things and get out of this house!
Don't want no words!
Just get out!
It means she is going to get out of my house!
I found out all about her... she ain't fit to be here!
She's the mother of a baby, but she ain't got
NO HUSBAND!
Tell them it's a lie,
Anna!
I... I can't!
You found out so much!
Why didn't you find out the whole truth?
That I was an ignorant girl betrayed through a mock marriage.
This man... an honored guest at your table... why don't find out what
HIS life haw been?
For HE is the man who betrayed me!
And then the storm.
The sugar camp.
Anna's lost in the storm... get out men... quick!
Frenzied... tortured...
The calling river.
The storm lulls.
The great ice-break.
The ice jam gives way... rushing to the falls.
Quick! Quick!
The Doctor!
Toward morning.
The Squire asks forgiveness.
Come, Anna, I know I didn't the right thing. I'm willing to marry you now if you want me.
I... I will.
I will.
Interested witnesses.
Seth, wilt thou have this woman to be the wedded wife...?
I... I will.
The one man for the one woman,
Between them the
Sacramental bond...
Life's cleanest and sweetest.
Subtitle by:
Giannis - Anavissos
THE END
What are London and Berlin doing?
- Hello lello. . .tlls ls Radlo Parls.
- A Japanese source. . .
- . . .says tley saw. . .
- . . .about 1 00 mlles off tle lsland of Trlnldad. . .
- . . .Jacques Hamelln's plane. . .
- . . .fall. . .
- . . .ln flames. . .
- . . .lnto tle ocean. . .
Tokyo's stock exchange sparks off...
...a fall in the different markets
The blow of this tragic news in Paris...
...leads to the downfall of the BU
RECElVED 50 PARCELS STOP
HAMELlN LANDED S AFELY
50 KM SOUTH
OF PLANNED DESTlNATlON
OFFlClAL CONFlRMATlON
TO FOLLOW
- Wlat a dlsaster.!
- We must lold on. . .
- Wlen tley drop below 500. . .
- . . .buy as many as you can.
- Wlen tley reacl 480. . . l'll buy BU slares.
- False report, le las arrlved.
- He's allve.!.!
LANDED S AFELY GREAT FLlGHT
WlLL START WORK lMMEDlATELY...
...ON THE DRlLLlNG RlGS
LOVE, J ACQUES
- You knew about tlls?
- l dldn't deny lt. . .for our common good.!.!
- We've made a fortune. . . do you understand??
Since he landed...
...Jacques Hamelin has made several tours de force
But the weather is harsh, debilitating
- Slgn tlese documents for Parls. . . lt's just a formallty
Darling, l hope your eyes don't hurt l'm fitting out the new accommodation...
...that the ever-so-kind Mr Saccard...
...has chosen for us
Saccard only believes in one thing: money. . .
Money can buy everything...
...everything... even love!
- Prepare a clequebook ln tle name of Jacques Hamelln lmmedlately
- Casl ln tle Hamelln cleques and deblt my account.
- Mrs Hamelln ls tle boss's new glrl.!.!. . .
- For you. . . 1 25, 000 francs
- A llttle port?. . .
- Tlere lsn't any. . .
- l bouglt tlls jewellery second-land. . . lf you llke lt, keep lt. . .
- lt lsn't a present.!
l wlll put lt tlrougl your lusband's account. . .
- lt's far too expenslve for me. . .
- Too expenslve. . . ?
1 5, 000. . . ls a bargaln.!
- l tlouglt you mlglt flnd tlls clequebook useful.
- Your lusband gave lls autlorlsatlon.
You can slgn ln lls name.
At Baroness Sandorf's.
- Wlo dld you wln tlls off?
- Off one of your frlends. Gunderman.
- Wly are you so jealous?. . .
You don't love me any more. . .
- You love anotler woman. . .
- And l lear you're slowerlng ler wltl money. . .
- Wlat else dld you lear?
- Tlat you lave llred a useless manager. . .
. . .just because of lls wlfe
- Tley say you'll end up bankrupt. . .
- Wlo says tlat?
- Gunderman.
- You're tle only one to tllnk tlat.
You're banklng on my downfall. . .
- ln a montl, BU's capltal wlll be wortl 200 mllllon.
- Go and tell tlat to your Gunderman.!
- Tlat's all l wanted to know. . .
Saccard is plagued by misfortune.
The money which he thought was his servant is now his master.
CAYENNE GUlANA
WORK MAKlNG SLOW PROGRESS
NEED URGENT DEClSlON
FROM PARlS
WlLL LEAVE ON NEXT SHlP
- lt's all golng smootlly.!
Great news.! Let's go.!
- Better delay your return. . .
- . . .by tlree montls
Hamelin account
- l'm lere to lnvlte you to a party l'm glvlng ln your lonour.
- . . . Slnce tlat flrst day. . .
- . . . l've been ln love wltl you. . .
- You're forgettlng wlat you owe me. . .
- . . . Sorry. . . l love you. . .
- Tllnk about lt.!. . .
- Your lusband owes me
300, 000 francs. . .
- You've been slgnlng bad cleques all along. . .
- . . . Tlat's a crlmlnal offence.!
The battle resumes for Saccard.
Dear sir...
For your information, you made a cheque out to us for 1 6,500 francs...
...on the 1 5th of this month from an account with inadequate funds
Yours sincerely,
Banque Universelle
- lt seems Saccard was lnvolved ln dublous practlces. . .
- Any BU slarelolder could press clarges agalnst llm.
- Mr Hamelln must be warned. . .
- Pay tle cleque ln rlglt away. . .
- ...and l'll go to your party...
Saccard's party.
- Mr Saccard, l leard. . .
- . . .you'd been falslfylng accounts.!
l'm presslng clarges agalnst you
- You belleve old Sandorf.!.!. . .
Don't you know tlat sle's worklng for our competltors.
- . . . l'm stlll presslng clarges. . .
- Sult yourself. But your lusband slgned tle statements wltl me,
lf l go down, le goes down, too.
- l lave pald.
- Now, you pay. . .
- Were Saccard to dlsappear,
BU slares would go tlrougl tle roof
- Wlat were you tllnklng of.
- Some of our slares lave just been floated.
- Wlo dares sell?
- Mrs Hamelln.
- London ls selllng ln bulk.
- So ls Amsterdam. . .
- New York ls llquldatlng us. . .
- Clarges lave been pressed. . .
Saccard may get arrested. . .
The transport plane took Jacques Hamelin to Bordeaux
- Gulde me.
- My eyes. . . lt's notllng. . . lt's just an attack. . . lt'll pass but. . .
- l'm under arrest.
Tle money has passed through like a cyclone
- You mlglt say tlat wlat ls on trlal ls money.
- Don't tlank me, your husband is a great inventor, his invention is full of promise.
- Saccard, money ls a good servant, but a bad master. . .
You lave made your own mlsfortune
- You've done mucl worse.
You've almost sullled tle reputatlon of a lero.
As soon as l own the majority of BU's shares...
...l shall honour all justifiable requests
- . . . Tle swlne.! . . . He's done a deal for llmself.!.!
Gunderman's intervention puts an end to the lawsuit...
...and while Jacques Hamelin, whose eyes start to recover, is acquitted...
...Saccard...
- ln slx montls. . . l'll be free. . .
And l'm already onto something amazing...
- lf you llke, l can lelp you make money, lots of money.
Subtitles ripped by tiger6ex
(c) BitShock.org TEAM
Due to censorship,
Tagebuch einer Verlorenen was shortened and changed drastically.
In 1997, a reconstruction and photochemical restoration of the film as it had originally been intended was created by the Fondazione Cineteca Di Bologna, the Deutsche Filminstitut -- DIF,
Frankfurt am Main, and the Friedrich-Wilhelm-Murnau-Stiftung,
Wiesbaden.
It is based on the dupe negative from the Danish Film Institute, Copenhagen.
Most of the missing scenes were added from a contemporary copy from the Archivo Nacional de la Imagen --
Sodre, Montevideo.
The reconstruction of the edit that was shown at the film's premiere is based on a comparison of the surviving copies, as well as the censor records of the Filmoberprüfstelle Berlin.
The wording of the German intertitles was recreated with the aid of
German-French intertitles from a copy at the Cinémathèque Royale de Belgique, Brussels.
A few surviving German titles from the copy at the Archivo Nacional de la Imagen -- Sodre, Montevideo served as a model for the typography.
The master negative of this edit was used for the 2K digital version.
For this HD mastering, the image has been corrected in places, and heavy damage to the film has been retouched.
DIARY OF A LOST GIRL based on the novel by Margarete Böhme
Script: Rudolf Leonhardt
Director: G.W. Pabst
Camera: Sepp Allgeier
Set: Ernö Metzner
Cast
Pharmacist Henning ... Josef Rovensky
Thymian, his daughter ... Louise Brooks
Aunt Frida ... Vera Pawlowa
Meta ... Franziska Kinz
Pharmacy assistant Meinert ... Fritz Rasp
Count Osdorff ... Arnold Korff
Count Osdorff, his nephew ... André Roanne
The Director ... Andrews Engelmann
His wife ... Valeska Gert
Erika ... Edith Meinhard
Dr. Vitalis ... Kurt Gerron
Production
Pabst-Film 1929
So you've had your way with this housekeeper too!
Why is Elisabeth leaving,
-- today of all days?
PHARMACY
Oh why does Elisabeth have to go away?
I'll tell you about it this evening
-- little Thymian!
-- big Thymian!
My confirmation gift!
But... I'm no countess!
That doesn't matter --
I'm Count Osdorff!
This evening at half past 10 in the pharmacy
This is Meta, my new housekeeper!
Good night, Herr Pharmacist!
I'm all alone!
I want to be here for you!
I'll tell you what happened with Elisabeth!
-- I'll tell you everything!
And she doesn't want to say who the father is.
You have to marry her.
Yes, if the pharmacy weren't so heavily mortgaged -- -- !
Of course,
Thymian must be asked, too.
I can't marry him,
I don't even love him -- -- !
Don't lay a finger on the innocent child, -- you -- !
The family --
-- -- has decided -- --
Ww. Bolke: Midwife
RULES OF ATTENDANCE:
Forbidden...
Dear Father,
Dear Osdorff,
I am so unhappy.
Your nephew still doesn't want to obey, Herr Count.
I've tried everything with you, every school and every trade, you've failed at all of them!
Now I've had enough!
See how far you get on your own.
In the reformatory one lived according to the house-rules.
And so the housekeeper became the lady of the house.
Thymian's Room
NURSERY
Count Osdorff resolved to help Thymian.
Dear Osdorff,
I am so unhappy.
What did I actually do that I am treated so strictly and cruelly?
...because Meta has Father wrapped around her finger.
I beg you to go to him.
Perhaps then I'll be able to go home again.
Yours,
Thymian
-- ...I'm afraid to write to Father,
Meta is so mean... --
I heard that your uncle has thrown you out -- --
-- -- go now to Thymian.
You belong together: the outcast and the lost girl.
Go to her -- tell her something nice -- !
Here the pharmacy won't be auctioned off to you just yet, now that I possess the mortgages.
Even the strictest discipline cannot repress the girls' desire to look pretty.
PUNISH ERIKA
Count Nikolaus Osdorff
The Count claims to come on behalf of your father.
No-one at home wants to know anything more about you,
Meta has married your father.
Steal the key, and I'll help you further.
I'll wait for you tonight in front of your house!
I know where we can stay.
No, I want to go to my child.
I'll write down for you where I can be found.
Bar "FOR TWO ANGELS"
Dessauer Str. 17
I'd like to see my child.
Little Erika Henning -- --
She happens to be dead -- --
He just took her away.
Where you headed, luv?
-- -- to Erika!
Erika and Count Osdorff are received with open arms by the proprietress of the establishment.
And what's more, he leaves his regards!
Oh, be reasonable, little one, you don't even have a shirt on your back!
If your friend helps you, you'll be outta this whole mess!
Me?! I'm penniless, and my uncle won't give me anything more!
I want to go to work!
What are you able to do, my poor little thing?
Be so kind as to place this advert in the paper.
Dance Lessons, Thymian Henning
Dessauer Str. 17
Dance Lessons by the beautiful Thymian Henning
Little child, how did you end up here...?
...I tell you, you'll bitterly regret this!
That's Dr. Vitalis -- he always wants to save us --
-- but in the end he joins us.
You look like you're at a funeral, dear friend; try and be a li'l happy!
Today's your birthday?
I know how I'll help: we'll do a lottery for you.
Once a year the pharmacist takes his wife out on the town.
So here you have the seamy side of the big city.
And what can you win with the lot?
Yes, Thymian, now you are a lost girl --
-- just as we're all lost!
Three years have passed since the painful meeting between father and daughter.
Thymian still leads the same life.
After a brief, trying illness, my beloved husband, the pharmacist
Karl Friedrich Henning passed away yesterday, on the 17th of June, 1929.
INHERITANCE NOTICES
Thymian Henning, as legal heir to Herr Henning's estate, is requested to attend the reading of the will, which will take place in the house of the deceased.
Money will enter the house -- over a short course -- by way of a dark lady!
Why, you're rich!
Yes, I could start another life -- --
For another life -- you need a new identity!
He should marry her!
Countess Thymian Osdorff, there's an identity!
You insist on exercising your right to take over the pharmacy...
...and drive your friend's poor widow out of her home?
Countess, Herr Meinert has redeemed the mortgage of 45,000 marks that you inherited from your mother... and thus becomes the sole owner of the pharmacy.
Here is the money.
Filthy slut!
The money!
Where's all the money? --
I gave it to my little sister, so she doesn't end up like me.
And me?
Am I to blame in the end?
I, his uncle, bear most of the blame.
I should never have repudiated that helpless lad!
May I attempt to repay you with the debt I owe him?
We're now in Swinemünde.
Uncle Osdorff is so kind to me.
My former life often seems like an ugly, terrible dream.
Cousin Osdorff -- !
My niece --
Countess Osdorff.
Little Thymian, you don't recognise me anymore?
Dear Countess, I hope you'll let me take care of you.
I'd like -- for us to leave!
We beg you, dear Countess, to work with us in our society for saving wayward young girls.
Countess Thymian Osdorff is invited to the board meeting and to examine our institution on 19 August 1929.
Our youngest member --
Countess Osdorff.
Today we have an especially difficult case.
A young girl has once again been entrusted to us...
...who has struck down our every educational measure by repeatedly running away.
How we've worried about her --
Fabulous!! My dear, try the soup they make here!
Yet she constantly turns away from the blessings of our home --
I know this house and its "blessings" --
Your ignorance won't help her --
I want to try, for I was once what she is.
A little more love and no-one would be lost in this world!
Paris  
The Latin Quarter
MARGARET DAUNCEY
Sculptor
Doctor Porhoet, uncle and guardian of Margaret 
Dr. Burdon on the line.
"Her spine has been injured in the fall..."
... and now she is completely paralyzed." 
... yes, exactly after the fall, when you operated last week.  
The patient is my niece, 
Margaret Dauncey. 
Okay. I will operate on her tomorrow at 11 o'clock here in the clinic.
The medical world has gathered to watch the American surgeon, Arthur Burdon, demonstrate a new miracle in surgery. 
Oliver Haddo - hypnotist, magician and student of medicine. 
This Burdon is almost a magician!
Nonsense! Saving a human life is a relatively simple thing. 
But the scientific creation of life requires magical power. 
Your niece is the most beautiful patient I have ever had.
The Arsenal Library.
Here much of the old magic 
- Almost forgotten - deteriorating 
Here, Oliver Haddo has made a search for months for an old magic formula for the magical creation of human life. 
Formula: The creation of human beings through alchemy, with the help of this formula, is possible. 
These additives must be added at a temperature of 115 Degrees Fahrenheit, with the blood from the heart of a virgin.
Then you can observe the first sign of life...
Dr. Porhoet, here is the book that you were asking for. 
- But the formula you are looking for isn't there.
Margaret's convalescence brings a time of great happiness to her and Arthur Burdon.
Oh, Arthur, such a poor child to be so crippled, - what a fate! 
If it were not forbidden, I would have you cut one of these beautiful roses for me.
He looks like a character out of a melodrama. 
And then - New Year's celebration at the Lowen Von Belfort -  
Please allow me to give you this gift, the only existing portrait of 
Oliver Haddo, the magician. 
Do not worry - these people are working only with snakes that have had their fangs removed.
It's not so, Dr. Burdon. 
They are only deprived of their poison! 
This man has a horn viper, the most deadly of all snakes. 
I will now demonstrate how I can render the poison from this snake harmless - my means of magic! 
You have not shown us that the snake was poisonous.
Arthur is taking the girl to the hospital 
- But this idiot can get you killed.  
All the next day, Margaret was haunted by memories of the previous evening. 
Dora Clark writes that I should come to meet her in the city.  
I am not waiting any longer. 
I am very sorry about the tragedy that occurred last night. 
I came to express my regrets to you. 
Oh Arthur, thank goodness you're here.  
I was supposed to meet Dora here, but she has never arrived.
Can you take me home? 
Would you like to see something special? I can show you! 
Concentrate on the head of the faun -  
If you want me, you can find me at this address. 
Oh, Arthur, I cannot explain it 
- But stay with me - do not leave me! 
Margaret invited Arthur Burdon for dinner. 
Only in his presence did she feel safe from the hypnotic power of the magician.
I wish we were already married, Arthur 
- I hate this waiting ... 
In only two days, my dear. 
I am afraid of what might happen in the mean time.
You were never more beautiful than you are now! 
Come tomorrow morning at 10:30 am  
- it is very important! Oliver Haddo
Come tomorrow morning at 10:30 am 
- it is very important! Oliver Haddo add the blood from the heart of a virgin.
Then you can observe the blood must be from a girl with white skin, blond hair and blue or gray eyes.
Why was I asked to come? Why don't you leave me alone? 
You know that I cannot go. 
Tomorrow will be my wedding day.  
... and therefore you will never marry 
Arthur Burdon! 
Oh - what shall I do? 
What shall I do?
The wedding day. 
Dear Susie, 
I was married this morning to Oliver Haddo. 
Please tell Arthur 
- Margaret.
I know one thing - Margaret is not marrying Haddo by her own will 
- she is under his hypnotic power. 
We cannot let her out of our sight! 
Following Dr. Porhoets advice, Arthur followed Margaret and Haddo to the Riviera. 
He lost her there.
Monte Carlo. 
I won 4000 francs after following the system 
And so it is a working system ... 
I have heard that this man, who stands behind you and tells you how to play, must be a magician.
The run of luck is always turning 
- who loses today, wins tomorrow.
Margaret, look, this is your unlucky suitor, the genial Dr. Burdon! 
I could not reply to your message as long as Haddo was there. 
Tomorrow morning he will be in his laboratory in Latourette. 
Come to me then! - Margaret.
Latourette 
The retreat of Haddo, the magician.
Arthur ... please understand ... that was not me that you saw ... 
- It was something in me, that 
I had no power over. 
I no longer have a free will -
I don't have my own soul.
Margaret, I know that it was not your fault 
- Nothing has changed my love for you.
I'm not really Haddo's wife. 
We are married in name only! 
What does he want with you? 
I think he wants to kill me in a magic experiment. I often think 
I will die from fear! 
Come with me now. Your uncle is already on the way here and we will immediately arrange for a divorce. 
Haddo traced to Latourette 
- in a small village outside Monte Carlo 
- has his laboratory in an old magician's tower. 
Stop. 
Investigation confirms that he was a patient in an insane asylum
That to me is enough - he is completely insane! 
That means that we can free 
Margaret from his hands.  
Dr. Burdon, I am so happy that you are here. 
I cannot find Miss Dauncey. 
She left this message for you on her pillows. 
My dear Burdon,
You and your honorable colleague,  
Dr. Porhoet shall see, that it is useless to interfere in my affairs.  
Yours sincerely, - Oliver Haddo 
You can't go there by car. 
I can only take you as far as Sospel. 
The lights of the magician's tower gleamed in the stormy night like two evil eyes.
These additives must be added at a temperature of 
115 Degrees Fahrenheit,    
After that you can observe the first signs of life. The blood from the heart needs ...
Looking for a guide, gentlemen? 
Neither man nor beast will go to the magician's tower at night.
Arthur ... Arthur! 
These additives must be added at a temperature of 
115 Degrees Fahrenheit,  
After that you can observe the first signs of life. The blood from the heart needs ...
- End -- 
The Magician 
Director: Rex Ingram
Mammy, we're almost through with the picking.
Yes, sir! And we done put in a good season's work.
- Zeke.
- Ma'am?
You got all of them things that you got to buy in town tomorrow?
Yes, Mammy, I've got them right here.
Here it is, Mammy.
Why, here's a nice shirt for Pappy... and a pair of pants for Spunk.
You knows you just joking.
Why, I never had no new pants in my life.
Why, as soon as you goes out 'em,
I stepped in.
- And a dress for Missy Rose...
- Oh, Zeke, what kind?
It ain't gonna be no wedding dress and you needn't be... asking me for none neither.
Ain't nobody asked you for no wedding dress.
- Who'd marry you?
- Why, you would.
What does you think
Mammy adopted you for... except so you could marry me?
- She didn't do nothing, did you Mammy?
- Course she did.
Oh, children, don't you all fuss.
Zeke, what you gonna bring the children?
I don't see nothing on here for Sears.
Not a thing?
Nor Roebuck.
Gee whiz!
Nor Coe.
Did you done forgot?
Oh, don't tease them, Zeke.
Don't I see a new bright pocket knife hanging on that string?
And a whole lot of marbles.
That's right!
And a big pack of chewing gum.
Yes.
I believe you sure is right, Mammy.
But what you want me to bring you from town, Mammy?
You's always leaving yourself out.
- Don't matter about me, son.
- Yes'm, it do.
Well, looky here.
Here's a straw hat with a whole lot of feathers on it for you, Mammy.
And a pair of them shiny gold spectacles.
Don't bring me nothing, son.
Mammy, I can't buy nothing.
I got to buy you something.
Why, there ain't no "nothing" to buy.
Well, all right then. Anything you choose.
Oh, cotton
Hey, cotton
Oh, cotton
Cotton
"...have no other God before me.
"Thou shalt not make unto thee any graven image or any likeness...
"of any thing that is in heaven above, or that is in the earth beneath...
"or that is in the water under the earth.
Thou shall not bow..."
- Hello, Henry.
- Hello, folks.
Come on, Henry. We got a great big dish of chitlins just waiting for you.
Everybody loves chitlins.
Henry, I sure am glad to see you.
Sit right down and make yourself at home.
Every time I see you, you got that old banjo with you.
- What's the matter with...
- Better put that old starvation box down... you gonna have a lot of trouble, some of these days.
What you talking about, man?
This banjo is my best friend.
- What you talking about?
- How come it is?
Why sure, you know what I did?
Just here, last week, I told this old banjo:
"Banjo, I'm tired of telling time by the old sun."
I said, "I wants me a watch."
Well, what did it do?
- Here it is.
- Let me see it. Look at that, Pappy.
- That sure is a good watch.
- Look at that baby!
You sure is lucky to get a watch like that.
Mammy, it's alive. I hear its heart beating.
Let me hear it.
You're just lucky.
I don't believe you stole it.
- Fine watch.
- Don't you know, this thing's ticking.
- Sure, it's going to tick.
- Let me look at it, then.
What time is by your watch, Henry?
There it is.
Sure is.
It sure is.
Henry, if you ain't gonna eat none of these chitlins... we gonna clear away the table.
- Yes.
- We sure is.
- Come on, boys. Let's have a little dance.
- I'm gonna do good.
Hello, Adam and Eve.
What are you doing around here?
Well, we just come down to see if you had time to marry us.
That's right.
- To marry you?
- Yes.
Ain't these eleven children yours?
That's right.
And we thought it was about time... for us to make it more permanent.
That's right.
Seems like you made it mighty late getting round here to be married.
- The damage is all done.
- It sure is.
But could you fix us up, anyhow?
Well, it's never too late to do the will of the Lord.
That's right. That's right.
Well, children, I certainly is glad to see you all done make up your minds... to do the right thing.
Thank you. 'Cause you know,
I've always been a respectable woman... and I don't want that to come up against my character.
Oh, it ain't what you was.
It's what you is today.
Look here, you ain't got on no wedding veil.
I ain't gonna marry you in no wedding veil.
- Now, Missy, go get the veil.
- Yes.
I guess we'll conduct this marriage ceremony right around there... under that tree.
Just follow me round here.
The Lord is with us to see this wedding.
- Look like you're gonna have your way.
- That's right.
Venus, come and be your Pappy's best man.
Here, boy, come on round here.
You look more like your mammy... every day.
...in the time of man's innocence... signifying unto us the mystical union... that is between Christ and his church.
- Which holy estate Christ adorned...
- Hello, Zeke.
Come on, kiss me, Missy Rose.
...and first miracle that he wrought in Cana of Galilee.
What's the matter with you?
What's the matter with your eyes?
- Don't look at me like that.
- I been looking at you all day.
You sure do look good tonight,
Missy Rose.
Oh, Zeke, don't do that.
- Come on, kiss me.
- Don't do that, Zeke.
- Come on, kiss me.
- Don't do that.
Oh, Zeke.
...or lightly, but reverently.
- Man and wife.
- Amen.
The wedding's all over. They're married.
Come on out and kiss the bride.
Excuse me, Missy Rose, but it looks like the devil's in me here tonight.
That's all right, Zeke. I'll forgive you.
Go ahead, my son.
- Ready, Henry?
- Yeah, I'm ready.
- That's it.
- Oh, yeah!
Sweet little baby
Now I lay me down to sleep,
I pray the Lord my soul to keep.
If I should die before I wake
I pray the Lord, my soul to take.
Bless Mammy and Pappy.
Bless Missy Rose,
Brother Zeke and Spunk.
Bless Sears, Roebuck and Coe. Amen.
Hush you bye
Don't you cry
Go to sleep
Little baby
You shall have
All the horses in the pasture
They belong to Mammy's little baby
Go to sleep
Little baby
Now, get up there. Here, here, here.
Go along. Go to bed. You're old enough to go to bed by yourself.
- Goodnight, Mammy.
- Goodnight.
- Goodnight, Mammy.
- Goodnight, Spunk.
- Goodnight, Pappy.
- Goodnight, Missy.
- Goodnight, Mammy.
- Goodnight, Zeke.
- I'll see you in the morning.
- Lord, grant me.
- Goodnight, Zeke.
- Goodnight. Sleep tight.
- Goodnight, Pappy.
- Goodnight, Zeke.
- Goodnight, Pappy.
- Goodnight, Spunk.
Thank God.
These mules are so stubborn.
Stop right here.
- Whoa there, mule.
- Take it down to Veteran Smith.
Let us give thanks for our success this year.
Let us kneel right down here.
We is most grateful for this bountiful crop, O Lord...
- Yes, sir.
...and we trust you won't be offended...
- No.
...if we just ask one favor more.
Please, Lord, let us get a good price...
- for our cotton.
- Do pray, Lord.
- Amen.
- Amen.
- Don't forget the flour and the pepper.
- All right.
- Buy me my chewing gum.
- Don't forget my bowie knife.
- Good bye.
- Good bye.
My buddy and my buddy's friend
Can pick more cotton than the gin can gin
Come on there, mule, giddap!
Whoa, there.
Come on here, Spunk. Let's hurry up and get this cotton ginned... so we can get on downtown there before everything's closed up.
It'll be over in two shakes of a lamb's tail.
Well, if you'd just shake your tail a little bit...
- it'd be so much better.
- Come on and help me.
- I is. I done all the work, anyhow.
- What do you know?
- Listen.
- I'm listening.
Sure sounds pretty, don't it?
Sure is.
You know that song.
- But I ain't sung that in a long time.
- Sounds like At the End of the Road.
The way is long
The night is dark
But I don't mind 'cause a happy lark
Will be singing
At the end of the road
I can't go wrong, I must go right
I'll find my way 'cause the guiding light
Will be shining
At the end of the road
There may be thorns in my path
But I'll wear a smile
'Cause in a little while
My path will be roses
The rain may fall from up above
But I won't stop 'cause the ones I love
Will be waiting
At the end of the road
The way is long, the night is dark
But I don't mind 'cause a happy lark
Will be singing
At the end of the road
I can't go wrong, I must go right
I'll find my way 'cause a guiding light
Will be shining
At the end of the road
I seem to roam through a field
That is snowy white
And through the silent night
A banjo is strumming
It says, "Come back, I roam no more"
My mammy's heart and the cabin door
Will be open
At the end of the road
- We sure needs you around here, Zeke.
- Hello there, fellas. How is everything?
You sure can sing good, fellas.
I feel much better. I can work harder.
Can't you?
Yes, indeed. I'm going to get this cotton on down in this gin here.
Come on here, boy. Let's get through.
Yes. Here I is, fellas.
Let her come on down here.
Take it on down here.
- Look out, down there.
- There.
Going down to New Orleans
- Going to leave my honey downriver
- Roll down from night till day
- Well, I'm sure going away forever
- Going down to New Orleans
- Going to leave my honey downriver
- Roll down from night till day
Roll the cotton, roll the cotton
Roll the cotton from early morn
Roll the cotton, roll the cotton
Roll this baby sure as you're born
Roll the cotton, roll the cotton
Roll the cotton from early morn
Roll the cotton, roll the cotton
Roll this baby sure as you're born
I sure is going to eat myself... plenty of corn bread and chitlins here tonight.
Do it, Cy. Do it for your papa.
What did he get?
- Lord save us, look at that gal.
- Did you see those eyes?
Yes, sir!
Some chicken.
What a brown-skinned bunch of sweetness she is.
Three steps to Heaven.
Angels walking on earth.
Boy, she's chocolate to the bone.
Boy, shake that starboard hip.
Open that door and let me in here.
Boy, she knows her stuff.
That baby's got a wiggle even worms can't realize.
- No fooling, that gal sure knows her...
- Get back here, boy.
- Oh, Lord.
- Here, here, here.
You is just what I has got on my mind.
Let's get on away from here.
Say, get out of the way, small change.
You don't look like no big money to me.
I don't, doesn't I?
Well, just let your eyes feast upon this.
Guy got a roll that would choke an elephant.
No, no, it ain't nothing like that.
This here money is mine, and here it is where it remains.
Say, where did you get all the money, big boy?
Cotton, cotton
Always picking cotton
Don't matter where I gets my money,
I has it just the same.
Where is you going, honey?
Anywhere you going, big boy.
Sure enough?
- Well, let's go away from here.
- I want to look good...
Come on away from here, honey.
Hello there, gal, how you feeling?
Got any money?
Let's have it, tin can.
- That's it, girl.
- Get out there, will you, honey.
The Benevolent Orders
of the Flat-Footed Waiters
Gave their annual ball
With the price of admission
only one half-a-dollar
They just crowded the hall
Flat-footing around
They suddenly found
An original movement
that they call the Swanee Shuffle
It's for you and for all
Now learn to do the Swanee Shuffle
Nothing to the Swanee Shuffle
Against the beat, you make your feet
Swanee Shuffle along
If they're flat just make them flatter
Like a pancake on a platter
I'm telling you, it's easy to
Swanee Shuffle along
Now just imitate the way a waiter
Walks with a plate of chow
Why, you needn't wait to do it later
Why not now? I'll show you how
Come with me where Dixie marches
Marches on its fallen arches
And see them Swanee Shuffle along
Learn to do the Swanee Shuffle
Nothing to the Swanee Shuffle
Now if they're flat just make them flatter
Like a pancake on a platter
I'm telling you, it's easy to
Swanee Shuffle along
Now just imitate the way a waiter
Walks with a plate of chow
Why, you needn't wait to do it later
Why not now? I'll show you how
Come with me where Dixie marches
Marches on its fallen arches
And see them Swanee Shuffle along
Come on!
There it is now. There it is now.
Oh, shuffle it, boy. Move it, baby.
Now that boy's sweet as honey.
All right, nice.
Everybody dance!
Oh, play that thing.
How you feel, big boy?
Like my dancing?
Does I?
Honey, I likes anything you's got.
My great, big, dancing, teasing, trancing man.
How much money is you got, big boy?
Well, I's got to close on 'round...
About $100.
You ain't got $200, is you, honey?
No, I ain't got no $200.
$100 suits me all right, right now.
But wouldn't it be nice if you had $200... so you and me could spend $100... and then you could take that other $100 home where it belongs?
Well, where's I gonna get any $200?
Why, it took my family six months' hard work to get half that much.
But with financing, there ain't nothing you can't get.
Why, honey, a boy came here last week... with only $10 to his name... and when he walked out... he had close around to
$300 in his hind pocket... and Hot Shot's favorite diamond ring.
Where did he get all that luck from?
- Just dancing with you, honey?
- Now who's been talking to you?
I's just overflowing with luck.
Dancing with me is like having a rabbit foot in each pocket.
Then I ought to be about the luckiest man in the world, right now.
I ought to have been here a long time ago.
Why, what do you know about that?
- Why, if that ain't the old boy himself.
- Where?
Well, there's Hot Shot now, honey.
Say listen, he's got more money than he knows what to do with.
And is one of the most generous suckers
I ever heard tell of.
- Is that true, sure enough?
- I mean it.
Let's go on to him and ask. Right now.
Come on, let's go see what he got.
Come on, big boy.
Atta boy.
Hey, Hot Shot, look here.
Who called Hot Shot?
Come here a minute, will you?
What's on your mind, high yellow?
What's aching you now?
Here's a boy who says he feels kind of lucky.
And he wants to know if you gonna give him a little accommodation.
Say, come on now and help the boy out a little.
You know anything about shooting dice, son?
Well, I just knows the words.
I ain't so familiar with the tune.
You old sweet rascal, you.
- You sure can say some cute things.
- Sure enough?
Not tonight.
I ain't wasting no time on no buck-and-a-half cotton picker.
Say, what's the matter with you, goofy head.
This boy ain't one of those kind, is you, big boy?
Say, what does he mean, buck-and-a-half cotton picker?
I bet I got more money in my pocket right now...
- than he ever thought of having.
- Sure you have.
Say, honey, wouldn't it be nice if you'd spent a $100... all on your baby? By this time tomorrow...
Yeah, what is the matter with that tinhorn?
Come on over here, let me show him something.
What do you mean,
"buck-and-a-half cotton picker"?
Suppose I paid you $20 right off the bat?
That makes a lot of difference.
Money talks with me brother, money talks.
That's just what I said, money talks.
Go ahead, he wins the first throw.
Deuce...
- and a six.
- Atta, baby!
Stand close to me, honey.
Keep on feeding me luck, yeah?
Oh, boy.
Let's hit old stiff hat for a natural right now.
That'll be good.
Oh, boy.
Eleven. How do you like that?
Just fine.
Well, I'll give you a break, big boy.
Go ahead, shoot that 40.
Go ahead and shoot the 40.
You... He can't win no more.
Come on, now, money can't grow down there in the hand.
Put it down. Atta boy!
Don't fail me this time, dice.
- Roll right out on a natural.
- Here it is again.
Sure is.
Now you knows I can't keep this up all night long, brother.
You sure can't.
Bound to crap out some of these times.
Shoot that $80.
Let the $80 ride. Come on.
If you win, you'll have a $160.
And we'll be sitting pretty.
She's telling you right, boy.
- Come on, put your money out there.
- Let's go. Can't wait all night.
Well, this is the time we hit him.
Honey, stick close to me now, sure enough.
Yeah, and this is the time that old boy craps.
Let it be snake eyes.
Let me be right, dice, let me be right.
Keep the big boy broke.
This is my last chance.
Natural, dice, natural.
Right in the dough.
In the dough is right.
That is a six and an ace.
This is the best gravy train ever rolled up my alley.
That didn't take long.
Pretty good day.
He's took all my money.
I didn't know. I thought you'd win.
Oh, I'll help you to get some more money.
Oh, don't act like this.
Oh, my goodness.
Let me see them dice.
You ain't suspecting me, is you, big boy.
There ain't nothing wrong with them dice.
Go on, let him see the dice, Hot Shot.
Well, I ain't saying nothing, but let me see them dice.
Come on, why don't you let him see them?
That ain't nothing.
There they is.
There ain't nothing wrong with them dice.
There ain't nothing wrong with the dice, big boy.
I don't see nothing wrong.
Let me see that pair of dice you just playing with.
Oh, you're starting that bellyaching, huh?
Starting that racket.
Come on, let him see the dice, if you got any more in your pocket.
Let me see that pair of dice you got in your pocket.
Say, you better keep quiet.
You big country hick.
Say, don't call him no country hick.
He ain't no country hick.
You'll be getting my back up in a minute.
Why don't you stop all this?
Going around here squawking about losing your dough like a big 10-year-old.
Oh, my goodness.
Say, don't take it so hard, big boy.
There's lots more cotton in the field.
Let me alone.
I'm asking you once more.
Let me see them dice you got in your pocket.
Now, I'm getting pretty tired of you trying to bullyrag me.
Now you get your hide out of here before I throws it out.
Go on out, big boy.
I'll be out in a minute. Go on.
Now, you clear out of here before I let you have some of this.
Give 'em room, give 'em room.
Come on, get a move on.
Zeke.
There's the door.
Come back here and give me my money back, you dirty thieves.
You dirty skunks.
Spunk.
Where did you come from?
How did you find me?
I heard your voice.
You ain't hurt, is you?
I'm hurt, right here.
You're all right, ain't you?
Speak to me, Spunk.
Oh, God!
- Where is you hurt, Spunk?
- Right here...
Zeke, did they get the money from the cotton seed?
I'm so glad I found you, big brother.
Can't you...
Can't you do something for me?
Hold me.
These bullets...
These bullets hurt me so.
- Wait a minute...
- Oh, Lord, help me.
...and I'll see if I can get somebody to help me.
Oh, help me, somebody.
Come here and help me.
My brother is dying.
Oh, God, won't somebody help me?
Help me, please. Help me, please.
Spunk.
I'll take you home to Mammy.
She'll help me.
Can you stand up, Spunk?
Can you try to help and get up?
Come on. Come across you.
You're holding out on me, eh?
You keep quiet.
You only get half of what I won.
Didn't I have $40 when I started?
Oh, you ain't never had $40 in your life.
Oh, Lord... have mercy on my children.
Have mercy on my soul.
- Haven't they been here, Mammy?
- Mammy, didn't the boys...
Didn't the boys come home yet?
Mama, what's the matter?
Children ain't come home yet.
Have mercy upon my children.
Mammy, don't cry.
Have mercy on my soul.
Don't cry, Mammy, they coming home.
Oh, Lord!
Mammy, don't cry.
The Lord will bring them home safe.
The Lord will bring them home, Mammy.
Don't worry.
- Oh, our poor boys.
- Don't cry, Mammy.
We wonder this morning where they are.
Send them to us, sweet Jesus.
Yes, Lord. Lord have mercy upon them.
Let our boys come. Where can they be?
Yes, Lord.
Have mercy upon our brothers.
Where can our boys be this morning?
Lord, have mercy upon them.
Can they be on their way here?
What's that I hear?
Zeke.
Oh, my God.
Where is our boy Spunk?
Where is Spunk?
Oh, our poor boy.
Oh, Lord, have mercy upon us. Oh, Lord.
Lord, have mercy upon us this morning.
Lord, have mercy...
Oh, graveyard
Oh, graveyard
Oh, graveyard
You must give us his body now
Weep not
Weep not, dear Mother
The Lord giveth and the Lord taketh away
Weep not, Father
Come, son.
I am not here to judge you.
Oh, Pappy, I've sinned.
I've sinned... and I am hanging on the edge of hell.
Yes, son.
But the Lord forgives.
My heart is aching for my poor brother.
Oh, my heart is aching.
Oh, Pappy, show me how to repent.
Show me the way.
Look, son... the Lord has sent an angel... to show you the way.
Can't you see him coming... in that snow-white chariot... and snow-white robe?
Can't you hear him, son?
It is the angel of the Lord... that comforts... them that mourn.
Look, son... can't you see him?
Yes, Pappy.
I see him and I hear him.
The Lord's done showed me the light.
The Lord has done revealed the truth of his creation.
I lay my brother... down in the ground... but the ground can't hold my brother.
No, Pappy.
The ground can't hold him.
'Cause the Lord is stronger than the ground.
Yes.
Why, the Lord is the ground.
The Lord is the sky... and the heavens and the moon and the sun.
The Lord is the earth... and all the living things of the earth.
Yes.
The Lord in his kingdom.
Ain't no more pain.
There ain't no more sorrow.
And there ain't no more death.
So why do we wail in grief?
Oh, my brother...
I gives you back to the sky and the wind... and to the earth and to the seas.
Oh, my brother...
I gives you back to the Lord.
For the Lord is the beginning... as well as the end.
Come with your sorrow... and leave with his joy.
Come with your failure... and leave with his victory.
Come, oh come with your emptiness... and leave with the fullness of his joy.
Come, oh, come to the Lord.
Come to that land of green pastures.
Come to the Lord.
Amen.
Hallelujah!
Out in the night.
Swing low, sweet chariot
Coming for to carry me home
Swing low, sweet chariot
Coming for to carry me home
I looked over Jordan and what did I see
Coming for to carry me home
A band of angels coming after me
Coming for to carry me home
Amen.
Get on board, little children
Get on board, little children
Get on board, little children
There's room for many a-more
Brethren and sisters... the servant of the Lord is here, to give you all... a free airplane ride direct to glory.
Let's go!
Amen.
Amen. All right, you fellas.
- Give me a dunking down.
- Get on behind him.
- All right, just lead him. I'll kick him out.
- Get down!
I'm glad to shake your hand.
Thank you, sir. Yes, sir.
Come down to the meeting tonight.
Thank you, brother!
Giddap!
I've had me a good time today, really!
Hot mama, raring to go.
Where you going, buttercup?
I is going where I's going, that's where I's going!
You move out the way.
Everywhere I go, you come following along behind me.
- Oh, now...
- Oh, move out the way! Get out!
Hallelujah! Brother Zekiel's coming!
Hallelujah!
Hallelujah! Brother Zekiel's coming!
Hallelujah!
Great day, the righteous marching
Great day
God's going to build up Zion's walls
Great day
Great day, the righteous marching
Great day
God's going to build up Zion's walls
This is the day of jubilee
God's going to build up Zion's walls
God's going to set his...
Be still!
Look at that little mule!
What kind of mule is that?
Hey, Chick... ain't that, that guy we cleaned out down in Greenville?
What you know about that? It sure am.
Well, well, well!
So that's who this guy is, eh?
That's that guy. Can you beat that!
Hey, let's have some fun with this guy here. Come on.
Hey there, Brother!
How's the dice rolling these days?
A big fella like you ought to be carrying that little donkey instead of riding it!
- Hey, did you get that look?
- Did I?
You've kind of turned up your nose at us sinners, nowadays, huh?
Shut up, you yellow hussy.
You ain't never going to be nothing at all.
All you want is to come here and get after my boy!
Go on back down there to that alley where you belong.
Oh, well, it's just another one of the Lord's little mistakes!
The Lord don't make no mistakes, you understand?
You can make a fool of Zekiel... but you can't make fun of the Lord, while Zekiel is around...
- and I'm gonna make you respect him.
- Are you gonna stand for that?
Why don't you knock him down?
I'll knock your brains out, you big lug.
What you mean, anyway?
And you can't make fun of the Lord neither, while I'm around!
- Let me go!
- I ain't none of them things.
I'm the servant of the Lord, and I've got the strength of the Lord in my arms.
You're hurting me!
In these two arms!
It's too bad that he's got to put his holy hands on you. You'll spoil them!
Amen!
The Lord will surely punish them for that.
I wish I was about 10 years older.
I'd show you something!
You got some nerve, coming down here!
Great day, the righteous marching
Great day
God's going to build up...
Give me that old-time religion
Give me that old-time religion
And it's good enough for me
It was good for the Hebrew children
It was good for the Hebrew children
It was good for the Hebrew children
And it's good enough for me
Old-time religion
Give me that old-time religion
Give me that old-time religion
And it's good enough for me
- Hallelujah!
- Hallelujah!
Look at that boy sitting up there with his whole family around him!
I bet you ten-to-one you can't save me, Brother Zekiel.
Make me cry. You're making everybody else cry around here!
- Say, boy, look...
- What's the matter with you, gal?
- You crazy?
- Dry it up, small change!
Brethren and sisters... the text of my sermon is going to be:
"Repent, ye sinners...
"before it is too late."
- Oh yeah!
- Hallelujah!
The road to hell is downhill.
Downhill!
Easy and greased like lightning.
And the Cannonball Express... is leaving for hell twice a day.
Yeah!
I'm talking to all you sinners out there, who's on that train.
I'm going along with you... and I'm gonna give all you sinners your last chance.
But remember... there ain't no round trip ticket to hell!
All aboard.
Brothers and sisters... we's gonna make three stops before we get to hell... and we're approaching the first one now.
The first stop, is the town of Faith.
Town of Faith!
It's just a little place, but the climate is cool... and the people is friendly and kind.
Some of you bootleggers... and some of you gamblers... better get off and take hold of Faith!
Brothers, come right along!
Preach it right and long!
Children, come on and get off at Faith!
That's right, children.
Don't you make no mistake in locating in Faith.
We're going on to the next station.
Hear that old train pulling out?
Pulling out!
Children, you see that old devil throw that cinder in my eye?
Dirty devil!
He's just trying to make me miss that next stop... but I'll surely fool him.
I'll surely fool him.
Get ready.
We is coming to the next station.
- Obedience.
- Obedience!
Oh, but Obedience.
Here, sister. Don't leave your man behind.
Make him get off at Obedience.
I'll get him!
Come on, sister. Bring your man on and make him get off at Obedience.
- That's right.
- That's right.
- Obedience...
- Yeah.
...is a nine o'clock town.
- Surely, it is.
And the curfew rings every night.
- Sure it does.
- Sure do!
Bring up your children in obedience, and you'll know... they'll grow up good Christians... and not just little old scalawags!
Children should be seen and not heard.
Amen!
All you sinners.
Come on and jump aboard, you sinners.
This side is for the leading citizens in Obedience.
Get out here.
We's going on to the last station.
Watch it go.
Can't get enough steam now.
The last station.
We's coming to that last station, the last station:
Repentance... is the last station before hell.
Anybody here want to get off at Repentance?
Oh, yeah!
That's right, children.
Come on, kneel on down.
It gets kind of hot in Repentance sometimes... but never as hot as hell.
Won't you come, sister? Won't you come?
I beg with you. I plead with you.
Don't bother me. Leave me alone.
I don't want to hear nothing you got to say.
Won't you come? Come on and repent... repent, I say.
I'm speaking to that last sinner and I don't want her to go to hell.
Won't you come? Won't you come?
You hear that old devil say
Come on down below
But you just let him know
You're heading for Heaven
Come on and climb the golden stairs
And all your troubles and all your cares
Will be over at the end of the road
At the end of the road
Won't you come, sister?
I'm pleading with you.
I want to go, Brother Zekiel.
Don't leave me.
I want to be saved. Oh, Lord.
I want to be good.
I'm coming, Brother Zekiel.
I'm sticking with the last sinner... and I don't want her to go to hell!
'Cause the guiding light will be shining
At the end of the road
Hallelujah!
Carry me to the water
Oh, carry me to the water
Oh, carry me to the water
To be baptized
Hallelujah!
Carry me to the water
Stand right around, brother.
Fold your arms.
Hallelujah!
Amen.
Hallelujah!
Amen.
I have another building
Not made by hand, I know
I know I have another building
A building not made by hand
I know I have another building
Not made by hand, I know
I know I have another building
A building not made by hand
Praise the Lord!
Praise the name! Hallelujah!
Praise the Lord!
Carry me to the water
Carry me to the water
Carry me to the water
To be baptized
Hallelujah!
Oh, Lord, make me good.
Oh, Lord! Oh, Lord, make me pure.
Praise the Lord! Praise the Lord!
Hallelujah!
Oh, brother!
Praise his holy name.
Amen.
I've been a wicked woman.
I've been a wicked woman.
- But I'm sanctified now.
- I know how it is.
- Hallelujah!
- Amen.
Hold me close to you, Brother Zekiel.
Keep me good.
Keep me good.
Don't let me sin no more.
Pray, Brother Zekiel.
You're so good.
Zeke!
Leave her here with me.
You go on there back to your people.
Oh, God!
Have mercy on me!
Here, what's the matter with you, gal?
Ain't nothing. I know what it is.
Yes, you got more religion than what's good for you... you hypocrite!
Come on up here, Christmas!
You're slower than cold molasses in the winter time.
Come on up here.
Tuck your heads there, boys. Come on.
Even so, we've been mighty lucky.
That's the first she-devil we run across since we've started on this trip.
She sure is pretty, Mammy.
I never see such big eyes in all my life.
Oh, big eyes!
Why, Zeke ain't had no mind for no big eyes.
Not since his brother died, anything but them.
We got trouble here, trouble there
I really don't believe
We got trouble everywhere
We got trouble everywhere we go
He's coming now, Mammy.
I'm gonna change my apron.
... trouble there
I really does believe
We got trouble everywhere
We got trouble everywhere we go
Tired, son?
I'll let you have a nice plate of this hot chitlins.
I sure would, Mammy.
But I likes everything you cook.
I know you certainly is crazy about chitlins.
What's the matter, son?
I was just thinking, Mammy.
I don't know what I would do... if I didn't have you and Missy Rose to look after me.
It does take a good woman for to keep a man out of mischief these days.
That's right, Mammy. It sure does.
Now, don't go fretting, son.
Your Pappy and me is the best friends you got.
And we gonna look after you just as long as we can.
Thank you, Mammy.
Because you're the same old Zeke to me.
- Missy Rose!
- Ma'am?
Come on here and look after these vittles on the stove... while I get ready to go to the jubilee.
Yes.
Missy Rose, come over here and sit down with me, won't you?
Why, what's the matter, Brother Zeke?
That's just it,
I don't know what is the matter.
Seems like the devil's done took ahold of me.
What you mean? What kind of talk is that?
A big strong man like you ain't going to give in to that nasty devil...
- after we done traveled this far.
- I don't want to give in... but he just keeps on a-clawing and a-pulling after me all the time.
- That's just the way he do.
- Just won't let me be.
What's we going to do, big brother?
I don't know what we're going to do.
- Unless...
- Unless what, Zeke?
Missy Rose, supposing you and me...
Let's you and me get married, at the next station.
That'll stop him quicker than anything.
Brother Zeke.
You know, I love you.
Mammy, where is my pipe?
What you hide my pipe for, anyway?
Why can't you let things be?
I suspect it's up somewhere where you just left it.
Oh, here it is, you old stew pot.
Mammy, Pappy, Missy Rose and me's got a surprise for you.
- Yeah?
- Yes. Ain't we, honey?
- Yes.
- What is it?
We is done decided to get married at the next station.
Oh, Lord!
- Pappy, ain't that happy news?
- I long expected that.
- Yes, and I'm glad.
- They had to come to it.
Let me kiss both of you.
God bless you all. Well, well, well.
Children, that's just as it ought to be.
Zeke and Missy.
Looky here, children.
You know the Lord's going to set his blessing on this wedding.
Well, well, well, this is justice for you.
Pappy and I done waited a long time for this day.
Here, honey, this ain't no time for no crying.
Why, don't you know that me and you is going to make... that old devil run so fast... that his horns and his tail's gonna drop off?
Don't cry no more, now.
Please don't cry, honey.
- No, this ain't no time to cry.
- Yeah, Mammy, you talk to her.
Yes, she ain't nothing at all but a child.
Well, appears it's better for you to cry first and then laugh last.
I'm crying because I'm happy, Mammy.
Yes, well these men, they ain't no angels.
There ain't none of them no angels.
But I tell you, you wouldn't find a better boy than my Zeke... if you was to scratch this world with a fine tooth comb.
Give me that old-time religion
Give me that old-time religion
Give me that old-time religion
It is good enough for me
It was good for the Hebrew children
It was good for the Hebrew children
It was good for the Hebrew children
And it's good enough for me
Hallelujah!
Give me that old-time religion
What are you doing here, Hot Shot?
What are you doing here?
So you're all hopped up about that fake preacher, huh?
Go on, Hot Shot, leave me be.
I ain't got no time for you now.
Come on, you ain't got no time for me now, huh?
I been wrong all these years, understand?
I found happiness.
Brother Zekiel has given me strength and shown me the way.
Well, of all the people in this world to fall for that kind of 'lasses.
- Come on, babe, give me a kiss.
- Get out of my way, Hot Shot.
I got religion now.
Oh, I don't care nothing about your religion. Come on.
Take your hands off of me, Hot Shot!
How come you don't want my hands on you no more?
I'll make you forget that psalm-singing, crap-shooting faker.
- He ain't none of them things.
- Yes, he is.
And I is late for the services... and you or nobody else ain't going to keep me... from the protecting arms of Brother Zekiel.
- You ain't going out that door.
- Let me go!
Can't you see that my blood is washed in the spirit of the Lamb?
I can see that your blood's been washed in the fire of the devil.
Can't you see that I'm through sinning,
Hot Shot? Oh, please.
Oh, you ain't never gonna quit sinning, gal.
It's right there in your blood.
Oh, Lord, give me strength!
Oh, help me, Brothel Zekiel!
I'll break your neck.
Get off of me. I'll show you.
Don't use that poker, gal.
Don't come around no more.
- Oh, my head!
- You dirty skunk!
That's what I'm doing to anybody that stands in my path to glory.
Oh, my!
Come on, old Devil.
Put up your hands before I bust you in the jaw.
- Hit him, Brother Zekiel! Sock him!
- Don't be backing around in that corner... like you're scared of me.
I is with you, Brother Zekiel.
This bell ain't going to ring until you been down and out.
Preach it, Brother Zeke.
- You got me that time.
- We're proud of you, Brother.
Yes, go ahead and laugh. Laugh.
This going to be your last time... because you're going to finish your laugh in hell.
Hell, Brother Zekiel, hell!
I'm tired of you making sinners out of my people.
Now, come on get up from there.
Pick up your bones...
- because the fight ain't over yet.
- No.
Now, brothers, he's trying to give me a battle.
- That's for the gamblers you done made.
- True.
Yes, sir.
- That's for the backbiters.
- Preach it.
- And that's for the midnight ramblers.
- Tell it so they can hear it. Tell it, yes.
And that's for the corn-whiskey drinkers, the jazz dancers... the scandal-mongers and the bootleggers.
Look at him.
There he is, the old devil is down and out.
Somebody come here and get a stretcher and take him away from here.
Put him on that train to hell, and let him... ride, let him ride on down by himself.
- Oh, brothers, we done been sanctified.
- Sanctified!
We done been purified.
We done been saved... and we don't belong to him no more.
Amen.
I belong to that band
I belong to that band
I belong to that band
Hallelujah
This is Missy calling you!
Oh, Lordy! Come back!
Please don't leave me, Brother Zeke!
This is Missy calling you!
Oh, Zeke, where is you?
Please don't go. Come back! Don't leave!
Oh, Lordy!
Brother Zeke! Where are you?
Oh, no!
- Zeke's gone.
- Zeke is gone?
Knocking off, now.
Come on, boys, let's go.
Come on here, Jim.
Gee, Babe!
I sure had a hard time finding you.
And another thing, I ain't going to leave you until you goes with me.
Give me some of that good old loving you got there. Come on.
Holy mackerel!
The man is coming from the mill.
Give me my hat, woman. I'll see you later.
I hate to see
That evening sun go down
I hate to see
That evening sun go down
My man's done quit me
And done left this town
Feeling tomorrow
Just like I feel today
Feeling tomorrow
Just like I feel today
I'm gonna pack my trunk
And make my getaway
Easy rider
He done lost his rein
With gin and gambling
They're gonna hide your face
To work for that woman
Say, what's the matter with you, long face? Don't you like my singing?
What's that buggy doing out there?
Buggy? Why, honey, I ain't seen no buggy.
I don't know nothing about no buggy.
Well, there was one out there when I come in.
Oh, don't be suspicious.
Come on and show your baby.
My goodness, you just as fussy as you can be.
Now come on out there and show me where the buggy is.
Don't be like that.
Now see that, baby?
I told you there wasn't no buggy out there.
Come on and eat your dinner.
Don't be like that.
You know I love you.
Come on now and be good.
Come on now and sit down.
What's the matter, you sick?
- No.
- Well, what's the matter then?
Has the boss been at you again today, huh?
No. I told you no. Don't bother me.
Tell me, honey, what's on your mind?
Here I've been waiting for you all day... to come home and put your big strong arms around me... and now you treat me just like I'm a stepchild.
- Is you treating me right, Chick?
- Course I is.
Let your baby sit on your lap and make you... feel so good.
That's it, dreaming boy.
Rest your head on Chick.
I sure is tired, Chick.
I'm tired of thinking.
I know you is. Stop thinking.
Thinking makes you say bad words to Chick.
Zeke, you asleep?
Zeke.
- Come on, Chick! He's following us.
- Oh, I can't run!
- Hurry up. He's got a gun!
- No, I can't run.
Please!
Hold tight, Chick.
Hold tight.
Hold tight, Chick.
Look out the wheel's going.
Thought you was going to get away from me, didn't you?
Don't you know you can't quit me like that?
Before I let you get away from me,
I'll break you in two.
I is broke in two already, Zeke.
Please take me out of this mud.
Don't talk to me like that. Oh, please.
Won't you please take me out?
Oh, please.
Don't you know you can't quit me like that?
I ain't two-timing you, Zeke.
- That's what you been doing all the time.
- I never knowed what I wanted.
Don't be sore with me.
That old devil's coming closer now... and I is getting more scared all the time.
That old devil's reaching out his claws for me.
Can't you help your Chick now?
No.
Your Chick's done gone to the devil.
No, honey. You can't go! You can't go!
Zekiel, don't let that old devil get me.
Old devil can't get you, honey.
Not as long as I'm around.
Hold me, Brother Zekiel.
Hold me in your strong arms.
I'm holding you, honey.
I'm holding you, baby.
Holding you in my heart, forever.
I is scared, Brother Zekiel.
I is scared to meet the Lord... so scared.
Who done this? Who done this?
I know. I know!
She hurt? I couldn't help it. The wheel...
What's the matter with this thing?
Whoa there, boy. Whoa!
Oh, my!
Don't kill me, don't...
This old hammer kill John Henry
But it won't kill me
No it won't kill me
There ain't no hammer
On this mountaintop
That rings like mine
Going home
Going home
I'm a going home
Quiet like
Some still day
I'm just going home
It's not far
Just close by
Through an open door
Work all done
Care laid by
Time to fear no more
Mother's there
Expecting me
Father's waiting, too
Lots of folks
Gathered there
All the friends I knew
All the friends I knew
Mammy.
Zeke! Oh, my boy.
Thank God!
I'm so glad you come, my son.
Oh, thank God.
- Where do you come from, Zeke?
- Brother, you gone and left us.
Brother Zeke, where do you come from?
We're glad to see you back.
You don't look well, Brother Zeke.
Pappy, can I come into your house?
Boy, you're just in time to help us with the picking.
Missy Rose, you ain't forgotten me, is you?
Of course not. I love you too much.
Do you, sure enough, honey?
Son, you must be mighty hungry.
Don't you want some chitlins and spare ribs?
- Mammy, I likes anything you cook.
- Come on, then.
English
A man without a past arrives in the Eternal City.
Unhindered and nameless - a new man.
And with a new heart
Now dressed less conspicuously, the Late Mathias headed for the best luxury hotel.
Terence Papiano, Esq.
Archaeologist
Tours of Rome, Day and Night a lot of luggage?"
"Suite 3 - 400 lire a night."
Identity Form
"The dead travel fast!"
The late Mathias is no exception.
Forced to flee, running in utter confusion, he begins to think
Freedom has something bitter about it.
ROOM FOR RENT
"The room to rent?
Certainly, my daughter will show it to you."
ADRIENNE!
"I hope this will suit you
May I have your name?"
"My name? I call myself Monsieur Adrien.
Does that bother you?"
"Don't mind the books. They're my poor father's passion. I detest them myself!"
SPIRITUALISM
SPIRITUALISM
HOW TO COMMUNICATE WITH THE DEAD
Unfortunately, this drunken woman is one of Paleari's boarders.
What a bad impression it would make on the new lodger.
"It's Miss Caporale, my father's medium.
She's had a hard life - she drinks a little.
But she's an artist - she sings well!"
This strange household worried Mathias.
And if that wasn't enough
"Please excuse me for not being dressed earlier.
I would like you to meet my dear Adrienne's fiancé."
"A distinguished archaeologist,
Terence Papiano."
"I hope you aren't leaving,
Monsieur Adrien?"
Within a few months, "Adrien" begins to take to the lovely, wholesome Adrienne.
It helps that odious Terence left on a trip the day of his arrival.
Unfortunately, Terence is due home tonight and his borderline hysterical brother Scipion has dutifully spied on the "stranger."
SPIRITUALISM
HOW TO COMMUNICATE WITH THE DEAD
"Those damned spirits!
Miss Caporale has been using them to persuade my poor father to marry me off to that Terence
- whom I hate!"
Very much in love with Adrienne but deprived of his identity, he is in no position to free her from Terence by marrying her himself.
"Adrien" suffers more and more from being a NOBODY.
" And that lodger still here?"
Miss Caporale is also Terence's assistant.
"So he is rich?"
" and he loves her?"
"Call Adrienne!"
"Monsieur Adrien!"
"Do come in, Monsieur Adrien we were just talking about you."
"My future father-in-law is about to hold a very unusual séance.
We'll be communicating with the dead.
We hope you'll join us."
"Get dressed and join us as soon as possible in the "Magic Room".
The séance.
SPIRITS
Knock once for 'yes' and twice for 'no'.
"Will my daughter be happily married to Terence?"
"it's nothing; stay here!
It's just that these experiments are too much for my poor brother."
"I've been robbed - 50,000 lire!"
"I'm going to report this to the police.
Say nothing until I get back."
"That's a promise?"
"Someone has stolen 100,000 lire from Monsieur Adrien!"
"It's TERR ..."
"it's a mistake. I found my money.
There was no theft."
"A change of air would do your brother a world of good."
"Leave Rome with him "
"...without further delay."
To be robbed, and unable to file a complaint, in danger, and unable to defend himself, in love, and unable to fulfill his happiness; these were the privileges "Monsieur
Adrien" had brought to Mathias Pascal and Mathias Pascal was tired of being dead for nothing.
"I'm leaving - a few days - personal business.
I'll forgive you not keeping your word, if you promise not to marry Terence - at least not until I get back!"
Soon after, Mathias
Nightfall, the following clay
Mathias found himself in front of his memory-haunted house.
"Who is it?"
"Mathias"
"Who?"
"The late Mathias Pascal"
"Where have you been?"
"In the next world!"
"Romilde? I want to see her!"
. . Remarried?"
"You were dead"
"You see - you can't stay!"
"I have the Civil Code in my favor.
In such cases, the first husband has the right to take back his place.
It's the second husband who has to go."
"So I'm free to stay,
AND I'M STAYING!"
The next morning, the streets of Miragno are jammed with holiday crowds.
Have no fear, I'm leaving for Rome
(on urgent business).
Be happy with your child.
Mathias
Living happily means living in hiding
Mathias, his papers now in order, steals down the deserted streets towards the station
At 10 a.m.
In front of Town Hall
Speech by Batta Maldagna (outgoing mayor and candidate for re-election)
HERE LIES
MATHIAS PASCAL
ASSISTANT LIBRARIAN
The End
Music Copyright 2009 by Timothy Brock
The reconstruction was carried out in 2002/2003 by Luciano Berriatúa and Camille Blot-Wellens on behalf of the Friedrich-Wilhelm-
Murnau-Stiftung in Wiesbaden.
The basis was a camera negative and a dupe negative from the Bundesarchiv-Filmarchiv, Berlin.
Most of the intertitles were obtained from the flash titles on the original negative.
The missing intertitles were restored by referring to the shooting script.
The newly appended titles are recognisable by way of the Friedrich-Wilhelm-
Murnau-Stiftung (FWMS) logo.
The reconstruction of the hues was made possible by tinting the negatives.
Laboratory work:
L'Immagine Ritrovata, Bologna
In 2008, an export copy was discovered in the Cineteca Nacional de Chile in Santiago.
In 2013, the tinting was revised and inconsistencies in the reconstruction rectified, for the 2K digital version.
PHANTOM by Gerhart Hauptmann
Based on the novel of the same name, fro m the Berliner lllustrirten Zeitung adapted for the film by Thea von Harbou
Direction: F. W. Murnau
Photography: Axel Graatkjär and Theophan Ouchakoff
Sets based on designs by Hermann Warm, executed by Hermann Warm and Erich Czerwonski
Cast:
Lorenz Lubota - Alfred Abel
His mother - Frieda Richard
Melanie, his sister - Aud Egede Nissen
Hugo, his younger brother -
H. H. v. Twardowski
Hardware dealer Harlan - Adolf Klein
His wife - Olga Engl
Veronika, his daughter - [Lya de Putti]
The Baroness - Ilka Grüning
Melitta, her daughter - Lya de Putti
Mrs Schwabe, pawnbroker -
Grete Berger
Wigottschinsky - Anton Edthofer
Bookbinder Starke - Karl Ettlinger
Marie, his daughter - Lil Dagover
An usher/clerk - Heinrich Witte
FIRST ACT.
What were you just thinking about,
Lorenz?
About my former life...!
Write the story of your life in this book, which Father himself bound for you!
Do you think the memory will be less agonising then?
I, former convict Lorenz Lubota, hereby write down,
as my dear wife Marie wills it so, the story of my guilt and my atonement.
Melanie doesn't have any time for this - does she?!
Call Lorenz!
Always you with your books, Lorenz!
With the amount of money you earn even God doesn't know how you could be able to afford them!
Just let me have my poor books, Mother.
At the very least they provide one with dreams of all the things one will never experience...
Isn't it time for you to get to art-school,
Hugo?
I'll be coming home a bit later today.
I want to help Aunt Schwabe with some accounts.
I don't want you to have anything to do with her - with that... usurious witch!!
She's gotten fat and rich off her cutthroat business!
And I, I've slaved away my whole life like a horse...
The neighbours.
Lorenz should be getting here soon, at this point.
It seems to me, my child, that you divide your day up into Lorenz's comings and goings!
Does Lorenz know that?!
...hold onto your heart, Marie!
Once Lorenz wakes up from his dream world...
Here are a few poems I've done,
Father Starke...
I'd like to hear what you think of them...
Well well, now you of all people are wishing to tread among the poets - ?!
Please, don't hold me up!!
I have to go to work!
What kind of work is it that you do anyway - ?!
Where did you get those silky rags?!
Where have you been running around night after night - ?!
Get a grip on yourself, Mother!
You're rid of me now - !
I have no desire to wither away and rot in this miserable hole!
I can stand on my own two feet!
I don't need anybody's help!
Misery, hunger, poverty - everything's coming down on me!
And now disgrace too!
Can't Lorenz Lubota ever get to work on time?!
The good Lord in a fit of wrath made Lorenz Lubota town clerk!
Well - take care, Mother!
Melanie... where you're headed... there's no way back...
What do you want here?
Why are you running after our dear girl?
END OF THE FIRST ACT.
SECOND ACT.
So, I'm telling you, Marie... This Lorenz, who would have thought of it!
This is more than talent - this is genius!
Mist- Mister Lubota!
Professor, old Starke doesn't just throw his support behind anyone, but Lorenz Lubota - that's a genius!
Are you the one, Muse, /
Who takes me in her service, /
And like the Sphinx /
Tears with her claws from my breast /
My song?
Lorenz!!! Are you ill?!!
Have you already found out - ?
From your sister - ?
How ugly... how terribly ugly it all is - !
I want to go get a little fresh air... maybe - that will put me more at ease...
You, sir - man - lad, do you know you're a genius?!
I gave your poems to a man who would consider it an honour to be your mentor.
One fine day, at the hall where you were once a lowly clerk, you'll be made an honorary citizen of our town!
Do you really think... that I'm a poet...?
That I could be a great and eminent man - ?!
I think that now the boy realises he's a poet, he's losing his head!
What's the name of the daughter in this house here?
I can't give you anything more, child...
I've got nothing myself...!
Either the money - or the pawn-ticket!
Rules are rules in this world!
This must be your first experience with Schwabe... as you think you can persuade the old bird by pleading?!
You know Mr Wigottschinsky,
Lorenz - don't you?
Pretend I'm not here; act like you would in your own home!
I gave a number of poems that I composed in my spare time to an excellent judge of literature - a certain Mr. Starke, to read...
Now he wants to introduce me to a well-known publisher who's supposed to print my poems...
My boy, you might very well become quite the famous man.
How can an old hand such as you be so far off the mark in your judgment!
The poems are nice enough... but they are certainly not, and never will be, publishable material - !
Now I don't dare go to the publisher... with my shabby suit...
Considering your impending fame, you do look pretty shabby...
We'll just have to help fix that for you...
The old dame seems to have taken a fancy to you.
It's usually hard to pull one over on her!
I think I'll accompany our poet to look for some new clothes.
I'm something of an expert there!
Will you come back again?
This so-called professor claims Lorenz's poems have no merit.
Yes, but... what will Lorenz say about that?
No, no - my good fellow - we must drink to the beginning of this promising literary career!
Where on earth is Lorenz?!
...and why on earth isn't Melanie here yet?
First off, champagne - !
Even if all the money gets burnt through - the old lady has more in the cashbox, - right?
Cheers, poet!
I'll look at whomever I please!
You've made a conquest, Lubota!
He's my brother - !!!
Have you heard, - old Harlan wants to have his daughter
Veronika engaged to rich Wiedenberg!
Is that true what you've just said, - about Veronika Harlan's engagement?
END OF THE SECOND ACT.
THIRD ACT.
Say there, little one - your brother Lorenz - he's tight with old Schwabe, isn't he?!
My brother Lorenz is the most upright man in the world - and the only one my Aunt Schwabe doesn't consider a scoundrel!
We would like to enquire as to why the town clerk Lubota has been away from work without an excused absence!
My son is sickly...
We have received complaints against the 'sickly' Mr Lubota, who's been carousing in bars and making a scandalous scene in front of the Harlan residence!
According to the coachman you're supposed to have followed
Miss Veronika once already -
You used to be town clerk, Mr. Lubota?
Do you have any idea, Father, where Lorenz is today - ?
I'm in no hurry to tell him what failures his poems are!
Now for God's sake, Lorenz, what's going on with Harlan - ?
Mother - last night -
- the whole world fell apart around me - !!
If you love me, Mother, don't ask!
I have no time to lose!
I have to get to the Harlans - !
If I only knew how I could get your brother to pull the wool over the old dame's eyes!
I've told you once already!
Leave my brother out of it!
He's above all of this!
Madame... is it true... that you wish your daughter to be engaged to Mr Wiedenberg?
I know I have no say in this matter!
Nevertheless - for God's sake... have pity! Give me an answer!
Call my husband in!
Madame... I saw your daughter only once...
But I can't go on any longer - without the hope of someday acquiring her for myself!
Don't consider me a fool, Madame!
This love overtook me like fate!
To give up on it would be like - giving up on God!
Don't you want to tell me what's on your mind, Mother Lubota?...
Is Lorenz ill?
I don't know what's happened to him!
He's no longer my Lorenz at all!
He's a stranger that I don't know - who doesn't know me!
How can one have doubts about Lorenz, even for a minute, Mother!
I take my leave, Mr. Harlan, without the assurance that you will support my courting your daughter...
It would be an honour, Mr Lubota, after some time, let's say a year from now - to discuss this matter further...
To the best tavern in the city!
Forgive me... please... an almost unbelievable resemblance...
You may stay... if you like!
We were just on our way in any case!
Champagne - !
I'd like to drink some champagne!
Tell me, Marie, do you think it's possible... that Lorenz could go astray?
No, Father!
What I meant to say... Lorenz Lubota is developing his poetic genius.
He only moves in the best circles now!
What that boy could become - if only he had some money - !
He'd only need some money... just some money!
Don't - ! Don't - ! Don't you too run - from me! Not you too - !
Who are you - ?
I am - a town clerk down on his luck!
Don't tell this joke in front of my mother, or she'll throw you out - !
Tell me who you are!
I... am a poet... a man with no luck... chasing after a shadow... a phantom!
I want to know... what drove you to me, like a sleepwalker...
I want to know who you think you're kissing... when you're kissing me!?
END OF THE THIRD ACT.
FOURTH ACT.
My daughter and I are, unfortunately, destitute...
You understand me, don't you?
Melitta let slip that you're a well-known poet...
I hope your income corresponds to your fame!
You're right... one has to pay...
There is a price for everything!
My son isn't home...
Mr Lubota doesn't need to bother coming to the town hall -
He's free of that concern!
Love at first sight, brother-in-law! - you know how it is!
Children, if we stuck together and had the right threads - we'd make for setting up a splendid business!
I... I... need money!
My dear child, I don't concern myself with your love affairs; be so good as not to interfere with my business affairs!
The only person we can tap is old Schwabe, that's for sure! -
What if Lorenz put the royalties on his poetry up as collateral - ?!
Well, my boy, if you pass yourself off as a poet, you have to pay the consequences - or else do without the support of a gullible aunt.
The shakedown.
Only you can help me, Aunt Schwabe!
The world is closed to those who come with empty hands!
People are scoundrels, Lorenz... each and every one of them!
I only trust one... That's you!
This boy here, - he wouldn't get a penny from me!
But you... you shall have the money!
I can't stand this - !!!
I don't want this - !!
I'm no scoundrel - !!
Then blow the lid off the whole swindle and remain a nothing and a starveling your entire life - !
And - her?
From Miss Anna Schwabe
60,000 marks are certified to be paid -
The practical application...
I'd like to speak with Lorenz!
You've come to the wrong place!
For days now I've had no idea where Lorenz is at.
Now let's go shopping!
A hundred thousand things to buy - !
You don't seem well...
I thought Lorenz took better care of you.
To Mr Lorenz Lubota,
It is a fact that you have been away from work without an excused absence,
but you have frequented and behaved scandalously in a questionable tavern
and, further, you have harassed highly esteemed citizens of the town.
- Moreover your unqualified behaviour toward civil-servant Hermann Schaat
is considered a serious offence against a public administrator.
As such, you are dismissed from this day forward, without claim to further wages.
What do you really want - ?!
Why are you snooping around on me?
You've never once shown any concern for me - why today all of a sudden?!
What do I want here - ?
I loaned Lorenz 60,000 marks - and now I'd like to know what he's using it for.
My Lorenz is an honest man - !
What my Lorenz does, he can answer for - !
Bear that in mind - and leave me be!
I want to know where I stand!
I'll be making enquiries... in any case you can tell Lorenz that I expect him at my place today!
I'd like to buy this piece for my mother!
The founding of the Wigottschinsky-Lubota firm calls for a celebration!
I brought something for you, Mother!
Did you buy that with the money from your Aunt Schwabe - ?!
She was here... she was asking about you... you have to go see her today...
Why did you want to talk to me, Aunt?
Lorenz, you are the biggest scoundrel that I've ever come across in my entire life!
I've made some enquiries...
I now know where I stand with you!
I demand back the money you swindled me out of!
...and if you don't have the money anymore, as you claim - where did you blow it?
I owe you no explanation of how and where I spend my money.
Your money? -
You dare talk about your money? -
What's come over you, you - ?
Have you been suddenly taken over by the devil?!
Either you give me back the money - or I'll have no qualms about handing you and your fine friend over to the police!
I'll give you three days to clear the matter up completely; not an hour longer.
If you haven't done it by then,
I'm turning you over to the police!
END OF THE FOURTH ACT.
FIFTH ACT.
She's given everything away... she's been to see Mother...
When she thinks her money's in danger, the old beast knows no pity!
She'll break your neck without mercy!
You'll just have to pull the wool over her eyes a second time, - and if you have to - with force!
I'd rather stand in the square and admit my mistakes in front of everyone and do penance!
Do you think that will get the money back?
I'll pay the money back!
I'll pay back every last penny!
From what? From your income as a discharged clerk - or from the royalties from your poetry?
I can't break free from her! -
I can 't break free from her!
Don't you see
I'm on the brink of madness - ?
Then help me!
Why aren't you helping me - ?
If I could help you... if I could save you... then I wouldn't love you anymore...
The topsy-turvy day...
The grey day...
Mother is very ill...
I have to run to the drugstore quick!
Mother... Mother!
I've come to you.. Help me!
There outside... it's my son!
Your mother is very ill, Lorenz...
We have to keep her away from any excitement!
I'm giving you three days' time... not an hour longer!!
Marie... I have to ask you something...
Marie... what would you say... if someone told you... that I've turned into a scoundrel...?
I would laugh at him, Lorenz!
But if he were right, Marie?
The final attempt...
I have to talk with you, Aunt...
Aunt... I beg you... have mercy...
I can't give you back the money now...
And I can't tell you where it went!
Then the police will have to concern themselves with this matter.
You can ask the gentleman who discovered your talent to post bail for you... or you can sign your future royalties over to me...
But none of that's at all true!
It's all lies!
Nobody would even give me 50 marks for my ten measly poems!
Yes!! I lied to you!
But I don't want to lie anymore - no more!
You would have been better off if you kept lying, you fool!
Then maybe I would have deferred your debt!
But now - To what end - !?
I can well imagine what kind of slut you threw my good money at, but I'll have the police as much on that woman's throat as they are on yours!
Where is Lorenz?
I don't know, Mother... he'll be back soon!
Now you have no other choice!
When the whole affair comes to light, you'll go to jail and it'll be the death of your mother - !
Agreed, then... tomorrow night...
END OF THE FIFTH ACT.
SIXTH ACT.
The black day...
Do you have the money?!
I don't want to hear anything about business right now; right now I want to have a nice dinner with you.
Cheers, old lady, live it up!
Who's making so much noise going back and forth?
Won't you go to sleep, Lorenz, it's 2 o'clock!
We're lost...
Both of us are lost... gone to ruin!
Can you tell me where this addressee lives?
The house number isn't clear.
Damn it! The old lady's night bell!
Don't! - Don't! -
Don't! -
You don't need to handcuff me...
I'll go with you willingly.
Don't ask any questions; be good to mother! Farewell!
Atonement...
...and redemption.
We've been waiting, Lorenz, to bring you home!
Look, Lorenz - your new homestead!
But I have the consolation
that my good mother died in the firm belief that I was a sick man.
A letter from your sister, Lorenz!
Life toyed with me like life toys with a rudderless boat.
Now I've reached dry land, far away.
Think of me with love, as I think of you.
Did Father's book fulfill its duty?
Yes, Marie! -
The Western and Atlantic Flyer speeding into Marrietta, Ga., in the Spring 1861.
There were two loves in his live.
His engine,
And--
"Fort Sumter has been fired upon."
"Then the war is here."
"Yes, dad, and I'm going to be one of the first to enlist."
"Aren't you going to enlist?"
"Your name?"
"Johnnie Gray."
"Occupation?"
"Engineer on the Western and Atlantic Railroad."
"Don't enlist him. He is more valuable to the South as an engineer."
"We can't use you."
"William Brown."
"Occupation?"
"Bartender."
"If you lose this war don't blame me."
"Did Johnnie enlist?"
"He didn't even get in line."
"He's a disgrace to the South.
"Why didn't you enlist?"
"They wouldn't take me."
"Please don't lie. I don't want you to speak to me again until you are in uniform.
A year later. In a Union encampment just North of Chattanooga.
General Thatcher, and his chief spy, Captain Anderson.
"I Know every foot of this railroad from Marietta to Chattanooga, and with ten picked men I cannot fail."
"We will enter the South as civilians coming from the neutral state of Kentucky to join the southern cause."
"At Big Shanty we will steal the train while the passengers and the crew are at dinner, and proceeding North we will burn every bridge, cutting off the supplies of the army now facing you."
"Then the day you steal the train I will have General Parker advance to meet you."
"As soon as I arrive I will let you know how seriously father is wounded."
"Big Shanty.
Twenty minutes for dinner."
"Three men stole my General.
I think they are deserters."
"Why not stop and fight them?"
"I'm afraid they have us greatly outnumbered."
The Southern army facing Chattanooga is ordered to retreat."
General Parker's victorious
Northern army advancing.
"There is only one man on that engine."
In the enemy's country, hopelessly lost, helplessly cold and horribly hungry.
"At Nine o'clock tomorrow morning our supply trains will meet and unite with General Parker's army at the Rock River bridge."
"Then the army, backed by our supply trains, will advance for a surprise attack on the rebels left flank."
"Once our trains and troops cross that bridge, nothing on the earth can stop us."
"This girl was in the baggage car when we stole the train, so I thought it best to hold her."
"We had better stay here until daybreak to see where we are."
"It was so brave of you to risk your life, coming into the enemy's country, just to save me."
After a nice, quiet, refreshing night's rest.
"We've got to get back to our lines somehow and warn them of this coming attack."
"I will get that spy before he reaches the Southern lines. You follow with the supply trains as planned."
"We must pick up more firewood."
The Rock River bridge.
The Northern division nearing the bridge to meet the supply trains.
"That bridge is not burned enough to stop you, and my men will ford the river."
Heroes of the day.
"Is that your uniform?"
"I had to wear it to get through the lines."
"Take it off!"
"Enlist the lieutenant."
"Occupation?"
"Soldier."
Buster Keaton in "Battling Butler"
Directed by Buster Keaton
"Alfred, your father thinks a hunting and fishing trip -
- in the mountains might do you a lot of good."
"Yes - get a camping outfit -- go out and rough it. Maybe it will make -
- a man out of you if you have to take care of yourself for a while."
"Arrange it."
And so Alfred went out to rough it, leaving the -
- city behind - there was no other place to leave it.
"There doesn't seem to be a thing here to shoot."
"Isn't she pretty?"
"This is my papa and brother."
"Have you any more brothers or fathers?"
CHAMPION BIG FAVORITE OVER BATTLING BUTLER
ALFRED "BATTLING" BUTLER
New Arena Will Open Monday -
- Large Crowd Expected, Every Ticket Has...
"Some prize fighter has taken your name, sir."
"Arrange to stop it."
Advice to the Lovesick by
Beatrice Faircatch I have -
- Outlined the following proposal, with the answers...
"I'd like to marry that pretty little mountain girl."
"Shall I arrange it?"
"Mr. Butler would like to marry you."
"That jellyfish couldn't take care of himself -- let alone a wife."
"We don't want any weaklings in our family."
"Weakling!
You don't know who he is."
CHAMPION BIG FAVORITE OVER BATTLING BUTLER
MR. ALFRED BUTLER
ALFRED "BATTLING" BUTLER
New Arena Will Open Monday...
"What's he doing here - training?"
Advice to the Lovesick by Beatrice Faircatch
I have outlined -
- the following proposal, with the answers you may expect:
He - "Do you think you could learn to love me?" 
She- "Why -what do you mean?" 
He - "I'm crazy about you." 
She- "This is so sudden."
He - "You're the only girl I ever loved." 
She- "Give me time to think."
He - "No, I must know now." 
She- "Have you ever proposed to any other girl?"
He - "Don't you care for me just a little?" 
She- "I don't know."
He - "It means everything to me." 
She- "What will father say?"
He - "Will you marry me?" 
She- "Do you really mean it?"
He - "Yes."   She- "Yes."
Then use your own Judgment,...
"Do you think you could learn to love me?"
"I have."
"When are you going to fight again?"
"When I'm drafted."
"I mean, who do you fight next?"
"Yes."
"Sir, it's time to take your liniment."
"These people will never know the difference - the champion -
- will win and no one will ever hear of Battling Butler again."
"If you're going to fight tomorrow you'll have to hurry to catch the train."
"Arrange the train."
"In this corner we have Battling Butler."
Butler's trainer and manager.
"- the Lightweight Champion."
"The Alabama Murderer challenges the winner."
"I'm champion."
"That means you cannot go back to the mountains, sir."
"You're wrong, I'm going back and tell her the truth. I'd rather lose her that way."
WELCOME BATTLING BUTLER
WELCOME BATTLING BUTLER
WELCOME BATTLING BUTLER
World's Lightweight Champion
BATTLING BUTLER TO FIGHT ALABAMA
MURDERER New Champ to Defend Title -
- Thanksgiving Stars Training at Silver Hot Springs tomorrow
"That means you have to leave right away."
"Arrange it."
"I'll hurry and pack my things."
"I'm sorry, but you can't go."
"I want you to know me as I am -- not as the brutal, -
- blood-thirsty beast that
I am when fighting."
"Promise me you will never come near the training camp or to see me fight."
"Where do we go from here?"
"We'd better go to Butler's training camp, sir, -
- so that you can answer her letters from there."
SILVER HOT SPRINGS
Hotel Register
Alfred Battling Butler & Wife.
NO ADMITTANCE
"Drive carefully. These country folks may not be used to city speed."
Alfred Battling Butler & Wife.
Alfred Butler and Man.
NO ADMITTANCE
"How's your heel?"
"He's all right."
"Let's go out for a little road work."
Eight miles later.
"I'm glad you came to see me -- now you must go right back home."
"I won't go home! I'm going to stay right here and help you train."
"Compliments of Mr. Butler."
"That woman says she's married to you, too."
"-- so you see, sir, it would wreck his home if she knew -
- the truth. Won't you be a good fellow and fix it for him."
"My dear, we are not the only
Butlers here. This is the -
- Lightweight Champion, Mr.
Battling Butler, and his wife."
"Don't forget your date Thanksgiving."
"What date?"
"With the Alabama Murderer."
"If he wants to be Battling
Butler let him fight the Alabama -
- Murderer, and he'll never flirt with anybody else's wife."
"I'm through - get him in shape the best you can."
"Don't you think it advisable, sir, to give this up?"
"No, Martin, I'd rather be killed by the
Alabama Murderer than have her know."
"Put up your hands."
By dinner time the only thing Alfred had on his mind was his stomach.
And so for three weeks Alfred trained and starved and suffered and ached -
- and bled and groaned and hoped and prayed and - and then came the storm.
OLYMPIC Auditorium 
THANKSGIVING NIGHT NOV. 26 1925
CHAMPIONSHIP BOUT
BATTLING BUTLER VS. ALABAMA MURDERER 15 ROUNDS
"I persuaded her to stay at the hotel
- so she won't see you fight."
"I thought it best to prepare for the worst, sir."
"See that she gets a good seat."
"I hope you win -- father and brother wrote that they've bet all their money on you."
"Butler!"
"BUTLER!"
"That was Battling Butler - he fought!"
"You didn't think we'd throw away a championship just to get even with you."
"Thanks - for saving me."
"I've been saving you for three weeks."
"That was Battling Butler."
"I lied to you -- I'm not even a fighter."
"I'm glad."
THE END
Subtitle by Reza Fa
Subtitles: Nina Kondza translated from subtitles by Luís Filipe Bernardes
Mr. Ferguson's office.
Oh hello, when did you arrive to Chicago?
No, we're just getting ready to close now.
Alright, let's try the other room and maybe we can have our conversation in there. I don't want anybody to interrupt us .
Are you free tonight, Marion?
Well if you were, it's our silver wedding. Got a party. All the children, grandchildren, all of the relatives
I'll get that.
Mr. Ferguson's office, yes. Well, this is Fuller, Mr. Ferguson's secretary talking.
Will you hold that a minute?
Yes, we are working on them now.
We'll mail them out tonight. Goodbye.
Got to go tonight.
Are you in a hurry? And how!
Jack Merrick? Yep.
Pretty steady, isn't he?
That's your buzzer. Say, you'd better buzz down to that party of yours.
I'm off.
Oh, Fully! Yes?
Come here. Come here.
Come here!
Goodbye. Oh, goodbye. See you tomorrow.
No! I won't be here tomorrow. But don't tell anyone though.
Why not? Swear not to tell?
Sure. Oh I can't now. I'll write and tell you all about it.
Oh, anything serious? Oh, very serious.
We expect you and your father tonight. Thank you very much.
Don't forget ... Hello, Mr. Merrick!
Hello, old timer, how are you? Hey, you and Marion doing anything tonight?
Oh, we don't be still. Say, can you keep a secret? Sure.
Take a peek at this.
Look.
Well, well, that's funny.
I'm just 25 years ahead of you. No kidding!
Congratulations. That's great!
Hello?
Mr. Ferguson's right here. It's Mrs. Ferguson.
Hello, my dear. No, I'm going to work here tonight.
Yes, I know it's a good opera.
No. I'll get a sandwich at the club later.
Good for my waistline.
Yes.
Goodbye.
Have you your notes on this?
Yes.
I've got it!
The license? Yes, the license itself! Look
John Merrick, a single man
Marion Donnell, a single woman
Both white.
Come on, where are your things. Oh, you mean where are my notes.
What's the - What's the idea? Well, I'll be back in a minute.
Now listen, now you're all washed up on that, now come on. Oh, I haven't told him.
You go right in and tell him now. Yes, but shh,  be quiet.
Hurry up now.
Ms. Donnell, you made a mistake here of over 10 million dollars.
Oh...
Well, a few million dollars, more or less.
Mr. Ferguson, I should have told you before. but I've had such an exciting day.
I'm leaving.
Leaving? Yes, to get married.
Married? Yes.
When's the happy day? It's tonight.
Tonight? Sounds like an elopement. It is.
Who's the lucky boy? Well, if you don't mind, I'd rather not say.
I see. I hope he's worthy of you.
Chicago boy? Oh, yes.
What's his business? Well, he hasn't exactly a business. He's somebody's son.
How unusual. Well, I mean
I mean, well, it's Jack Merrick.
Merrick? John Merrick's boy? Yes.
I see what you mean by "somebody's son."
But he's going to work. You're marrying money.
No, I'm marrying the man.
He's the son of one of the really big fortunes.
That doesn't matter. He should work. Every man should work.
You work, Mr. Ferguson, and you're rich.
Well, I'm rather a lonely old man.
My work keeps me occupied.
So you're off tonight. Yes.
Crazy kid. It's serious.
Marriage is a serious step for a woman. I'm not afraid.
Young love seldom is afraid.
Well I'll finish these. No, no, no. never mind.
I'm sorry this is so sudden. Well, this sort of thing usually is sudden.
Sure I can't correct my mistakes? No, no.
Oh, thanks. Goodbye. Goodbye.
We'll miss you. Thank you.
Goodbye and good luck. Thank you, Mr. Ferguson.
Goodbye!
Let's get out of here! Of course I'm going to get out of here!
Wait, I have to put everything in order ... Now wait a minute, I have to put this here ...
Oh, here, I'm the man of the family and I'll put that down.
Well, maybe that's the last time I ever see that ...
What are you.. don't take those flowers out of there! Goodbye, old friend ...
Come on, hurry up. Will you get out of here?
Oh wait a minute, where's my purse?
Alright, now come on. Do you think I've got everything?
Hurry up. I wonder if I've forgot something ...
Do you love me? I adore you!
Come on...
Will you get out of here? You've got a date with a very important guy.
I see you.
Darling! Yes?
Good morning, Mrs. Merrick.
Good morning, Mr. Merrick.
Oh, look at that lake. Yeah.
Do you know where we ought to be now? Just where we are.
In the sunny south of France.
The sunny south of France? You know, motor down from Paris ... to the south of France.
Get on the yacht at Marseille.
And then all the way down the Mediterranean to Algiers.
I mean a real honeymoon.
But, darling. Isn't this a real honeymoon?
Of course it is.
Goodbye. Goodbye.
Goodbye. Goodbye.
Happy? Happy?
Oh, you broke ...
Say Jack, you better fix that. Oh, let the hotel fix it.
No, you fix it. Why?
Well, if you don't know why ...
Hey, will you cut that out?
Stop that, will you...
The phone is ringing. Let me answer that phone.
Hello?
Hey! Hello?
Speaking.
What? Well tell him I'll be right down.
I didn't say send him up.
Was it Mr. Merrick?
Are you sure it was Mr. Merrick?
Well, anybody with him?
Oh, heck!
I love you truly...
...truly. Hey, pipe down!
Why? It has arrived.
The breakfast? No, Dad.
Why, where? He's coming up now.
His lawyer is with him.
Oh, the great big bogeyman!
Now, this is no joke.
Now we get some fireworks. Now the trouble starts.
Troubles? What do you mean, troubles?
What makes you so nervous, Jack? You don't know Dad.
Well, darling, if that's he's gonna make me look like that, I don't want to.
This is serious. You realize what we've done, don't you?
What? Well, we, we eloped. We ran away.
We got married. We've got a fight on our hands.
Oh, darling, we're two to one. We can fight the world.
But I wouldn't want to fight Dad. I'm his only son.
I'm the only thing he's got. You're my husband and you're the only thing I've got.
Yes, I know. Now, you better get dressed. I'll go on in.
I know Dad. You can't keep him waiting.
Hello Dad.
You young fool, I ought to take you and break your neck. Why, Dad?
What have you done? I've married a marvelous girl.
Did you have to marry her? Now, get that out of your mind.
She's as straight as a die. Were you drunk?
No!
Well, who is she? And who are her people?
Her people? Well, well I've never asked her, Dad.
To hear you talk, anyone would think I picked her up.
As a matter of fact, Marion is a charming, decent girl who happens to work for a living.
How does she earn her living? She was a stenographer.
A stenographer? But she'd stack up with any of the girls we know.
Well, that being the case...
Didn't it occur to you that I'd might like to have met the woman who's going to take our name?
Yes, I thought of that. But to tell the truth, Dad, you're a bit of a snob.
What? Well you are.
Because she happened to work for a living, you'd have ritzed her and questioned her.
And you couldn't do that to her. She's got too much spirit.
So rather than take a chance at losing her, we ran away.
I wanted to be sure of her. Well, she's made sure of you, alright.
I'm glad she has! 
Well, Dad. I love her and she loves me.
And we're married.
What are you going to do about it?
Do you realize what the papers are going to do about it? What the story will be?
"Young Merrick elopes with stenographer in the middle of the night."
Oh, Dad ... A dirty, filthy, rotten scandal.
Now you listen to me. I am one of the biggest men in this country and you're my son.
And as my son, you owe me your duty.
And that duty is to live up decently to the name that I've worked all these years to give you.
And now, now you're quitting! No, I'm not quitting!
Yes you are quitting!
You're tangled up with some woman of the town.
One of the kind that follows kids like you around waiting for a chance to hook them.
Something that you ought to bring down to a place like this at night.
Some low-down, low-life, fortune-hunting parasite!
Why I.. Marion! Jack, he was speaking about me?
Yes, I was.
Oh...
Marion!
Dead wise. Smart as a whip, too...
Say...
What are you going to do about it? I don't know!
You don't know? Well what?
Send him away. If you knew Dad, you'd know that if he went now in the mood he's in ...
He'd never come back. You want him to come back? He called your wife a thing of the streets.
Oh, he's just mad now. Mad?
Well, you'll know Dad better. I don't want to know him any better.
But we'll need him. Do you need him? I don't.
Well, you're not going to bow out of 50 million dollars just because he lost his temper, are you?
His temper? Why, he didn't mean it.
He did mean it and I mean this.
Not one penny of that man's money are you going to take.
Now, you're just upset. Now when you think better of it ...
No. You're going to work as we planned. And I'll work, too.
Jack, let's keep our pride. But, honey ...
I married you, not your father or his money.
Now it's for you to choose. But Marion, I can't give up a fortune.
I can give up my life.
Go and send him away.
Go out and send him away or I swear to you ...
I'll leave you.
I mean it.
Okay.
To show you how wrong you are about Marion, she just told me that if you had fifty times the money you have she wouldn't touch a penny of it.
And that goes for me, too, Dad.
I'm with her 100%.
I love her and I'm going to work for her.
We...
We don't need you, Dad.
Jack!
Jack!
Yes Dad?
Come here, boy.
Now suppose this is the right girl for you, suppose it is ... It is, Dad.
Have you realized that they'll only say one thing about her? What's that?
She'll be just the stenographer that Jack Merrick eloped with in the middle of the night.
Well what's wrong with that? Oh it's all very well to be cocksure now.
But you've got your lives before you.
And you mark my words. The day will come ... when she'll resent, and rightly too, the implication that she caught you off guard. That she hooked you for your money.
Well?
Now suppose we call this a day? For now?
Just what do you mean?
I mean have the marriage annulled. Never!
If you wanted to start this girl off right you'd let me have this marriage annulled quietly.
Then, the impression would be that you never had been married.
But that you had met a charming girl, you'd brought her down to see me, and I'd liked her.
Now, do you get me? Not quite.
Then after that, we'll see what she has in the way of a background.
If nothing at all, well, a little publicity and we'll build one.
But she doesn't need one. Oh now, wait a minute.
You know how I do things.
We'll buy her some clothes, we'll build her up gradually.
She's a charming girl. Everybody seems fond of her.
You propose to her, the engagement is announced, and everything is jade.
Then for a happy courtship and after that, an honest to goodness slapbang wedding.
That'll start you both off right and put you in the spot in this city that the name of Merrick entitltes you to.
Now does that make sense?
I see what you mean. It will be much better for the young lady in the long run, Jack.
You must see that. Yes, yes, I see that.
She's pretty touchy about the whole thing. It'll need handling.
Good. That shows she's got spirit. Oh she's got that, alright.
And it would be much better for her, wouldn't it? Why of course.
And then Jack, a real honeymoon abroad.
Say, what are the chances for getting the yacht on the Mediterranean? Anything you want.
You know how I do things.
Okay. Say now, wait a minute. You will be nice to her, won't you?
Sure! Yeah.
Yeah, yeah...
Are you going through with that?
You think I'm crazy? How do I know who she is?
He's in love with her. Oh he's nothing but a kid. This woman swept him off his feet.
When the time comes for him to marry ... he'll marry to Josh Carson's daughter and he'll like it.
The young Carson girl, eh? Yeah, little Catherine Carson. She's a charming kid.
Good family, good breeding. One of his own class.
Why hang it all man, this kid's the only thing I've got.
I don't think you'll break this thing without a fight.
Well, we can fight, can't we? We've handled people before this, haven't we?
Shhh. Let her start.
Go on.
Dad's thinking of you. It will be much better for you.
What is this plan of your father's?
Well, he thinks we should call it a day. Just for now.
Call our marriage a day? We'd still be married.
How could we if they annul it? Well don't you see? We'd be engaged all over again.
I see, and in the meantime? Well, Dad would build you up with people.
Build me up? I don't need building up.
Well you want a position, don't you? I've got a position! I'm your wife.
Well who said you weren't? You did!
Well I'll back Dad's judgment. After all, he is somebody. His opinion counts for something.
You're right, it does. It counts for you. What is your dad exactly? What do you think you all are?
You want to call this thing a day? Alright, call it a day. I'm through!
Why, Marion!
Mr. Merrick! I married your son because I loved him and thought he loved me.
I felt that if he worked on his own, I supposed it would make a man of him.
I put him to the test and he failed. No, Marion!
You came here to save your son from a fortune-hunting parasite.
Well, you happen to have saved her instead!
Annul the marriage! Take him back! I don't want him! Marion!
Go back, your father is calling you! Marion!
Jack!
What seems the matter with baby this morning?
He wants his milk. The milkman's late.
So am I.
Before you go, Ms. Donnell, I'd like to speak to you.
There are some things to be gone over. I'm so late.
You don't know that crowd on a morning like this.
There'll be a crowd here if you don't get some of these bills paid.
Ms. Donnell, you can't keep on evading them.
I'm not evading anything. I simply haven't got the money, that's all.
Somehow or other, we've got to pay Dr. Rigley. He's got to be paid.
After all, you owe the baby's life to him.
And I didn't tell you yesterday. But yesterday they came and took the sewing machine.
The sewing machine? Four months behind on the payment.
But I had the money for that. That money went to the central market.
Surely they would have waited ...
Is he alright? Of course he is.
I'll go.
Milk!
Here's the baby's milk now.
Is that the certified milk? Yup.
Gotta collect.
What? Gotta collect.
What is he saying? Gotta collect.
He says he's got to collect.
Sixteen dollars and fifty cents?
How's that? How long since you've been paid, young man?
Don't know. These tradesmen are so impotent.
Well I like that. I'm like the Mrs. Rockefeller the way she hands them to me.
Come on, why don't you leave it?
Step on it, will you? I'm late.
I step on you!
Here. Give her the change.
So you gave him the twenty dollars.
You didn't have to pay all that.
Now you've given him the rent money and we'll be out on the street.
The baby had to have his milk. I could have gone down to the corner and got it for fifty cents.
Why didn't you say so?
Now let me tell you something for your own good, Ms. Donnell.
You get fifty dollars a week. After that, you pay me twenty when you pay me.
That leaves you thirty to run everything. Food, clothes, rent and all this baby costs you.
Oh, my angel.
At night when I bring these things up, you've got a thick headache or you're tired ... and you say "in the morning."
Then morning comes ... I must go, here ...
Well I must go, too, Ms. Donnell. For good.
Oh you, you couldn't ... And why couldn't I, pray?
Because you've got to take care of him.
He's never had anyone but you.
Oh please sweet, let's talk about this tonight.
Please.
Oh, Ms. Donnell. You ain't in no fit condition to go out and do a day's work. I'm alright.
Well your nerves ain't right. Mark my words, it's comin.
Wha't coming? A breakdown, and then what will happen?
Oh, why don't you do what you should have done long ago?
What? Go to the baby's father. Let him help.
No!
Where's my umbrella?
I left it in the bathtub. It makes puddles out there.
I'll get it for you.
What's the matter, Ms. Donnell? Telephone the office and say I'll be late.
But what's the matter? Oh I'm alright, just a little faint.
I'm perfectly alright. There's nothing the matter. Get me a cup of tea, will you?
I told not to go out mornings without your tea.
I'll get you a bit of toast, too. No, never mind the toast.
Miss Potter. Yes?
Come here.
What is it? Look.
"Welding of millions. Paris, France, November the fourth.
John Merrick, Jr., only son of John Merrick,
Chicago multi-millionaire, was this day married to ...
Catherine "Flip" Carson, youngest daughter of Joshua P. Carson, of the Chicago Chemical Work
The pair left immediately after the ceremony for an extended trip through the sunny south of France" ...
Well, that's that.
Where's my tea?
That's him, ain't it?
Well, the baby's grandfather is here, ain't he?
According to the papers, he's a charitable sort of man.
Very. Then you should go to him.
Those Merricks owe that baby something.
Oh, Ms. Donnell, it's your stubborn pride.
You can be stubborn about yourself. That's one thing.
But a young baby's another.
Hello. Hello!
Mr. Merrick senior, please.
Mr. Merrick inside? He's waiting for you, Mr. Pry. You go right in.
Any more news?
No. While you're in there, tell Mr. Merrick that we're holding the wires on the train til the last minute.
Alright. If my wife calls, tell her I'm going with him. Right.
Hello? Hello. Mr. Merrick is leaving at once on the Twentieth Century.
Have you arranged for the motorcycle escort to take him to the train?
It's most urgent. Oh, you have arranged it. What's wrong with that Paris call?
Oh, the delay is in New York, Mr. Merrick.
Mr. Merrick! Not now, miss, please.
Hello? Hello?
Oh, Mr. Sullivan? Mr. Sullivan. Mr. Merrick says you may publish this cable, which is all he knows.
Paris, France. Car overturned near Lyon.
Chauffeur killed outright.
Jack and Catherine in hospital in Lyon.
Both unconscious. That's all, Mr. Sullivan.
Take this wire. George Clark, Ritz Hotel, New York City.
Jack badly injured. Leaving Twentieth Century.
Obtain surgeon O'Leary if possible ... at any cost.
Sailing Berengaria Friday night.
Hello? Hello?
Oh, Western Union? Just a moment please.
Hello? Hello?
What?
Well what is it?
What is it?
No, it's something about Pittsburg.
Come on, John, you haven't a minute to lose.
Oh, Mr. Merrick. Mr. Merrick! You forgot these files.
No. Mr. Ferguson is in a director's meeting.
He's been tied up for hours.
Twenty million of preferred stock. I'd have an issue with forty million ... and you're asking for a...? Just a minute. Will you compromise and accept 22.5?
We'll compromise? Why what are you talking about? Young man, I've been in this business for 40 years ... and I won't be bulldozed.
Gentlemen, gentlemen. We've got to postpone this until tomorrow.
Now you all understand the main features of the agreement.
Ms. Donnell has them in her notes. A copy will be mailed to you tomorrow.
Remember the last time I met you in Chicago? Why sure, you were heavier than I.
Hello? I can't hear you.
Can you speak a little louder?
Oh, I hear the word "Paris" ...
Oh, I see. Yes, he's.. he's regained consciousness?
Oh, fine, fine...
Bring your notes, please. Yes.
Alright, thank you.
What's the matter with you, Ms. Donnell? What's the matter?
Nothing. I watched you this afternoon at the meeting.
You didn't take down any of the notes.
Your mind was miles away.
I'm sorry, Mr. Ferguson. Don't be sorry. Sit down and tell me all about it.
There isn't anything to tell. Oh yes, there is. Now, sit down.
You know, I've seen this coming on.
What? A breakdown.
A breakdown? Yes, why you haven't been yourself for weeks.
Frankly, I'm worried about you.
Is there anything so surprising in that?
We've been associated for a long time. After all, I'm a friend.
Now you better tell me what's troubling you.
You've more important things than ... Nothing is more important to me.
Now come on, what is it? Tell me all about it.
It isn't any one thing. It's everything. Everything's all muddled together.
I'm a failure. You're not a failure.
Now what you need is a trip to the country.
Out in the sunshine with that baby of yours.
I can't. You can. And I'm going to see that you go.
Why, if I saw a stranger in the state that you're in, I'd want to help.
And you're much more than that to me.
I've got...
Marion!
Fuller! Quickly!
Yes. Yes. ... and the funniest part of it was he paid the bet.
Just one drink and then you're going home. As beauty commands.
Oh, I do gallant. Didn't they say that in the play tonight?
Yes, don't you remember?
Yes.
And then he took her in his arms ...
Remember? Yes, I remember.
But you are not a brave guardsman. You're a very important lawyer.
With lots to solve tomorrow.
That sounds very dull, Marion.
I'm not the romantic type, eh? You're the real type, Hector.
You have brains, and kindness ... Everything except romance, eh?
You saw how unhappily the romance ended in the play tonight.
Sing one song. Oh, no I don't think...
Just one song and then I'll go. Well, alright.
If it pleases you. 
Are you happy, Marion? Of course I'm happy. Why do you ask?
I sometimes wonder if you really are.
What more could a girl ask to make her happy? You've given me so much.
Too much. Oh that's impossible.
As long as it's... As long as all that pleases you, I'm happy. You're very beautiful.
I like to look nice for you. That's the least I can do.
Marion, could you ever really love me?
Hector, dear ...
You, darling... you'll never know what a paradise you've made for me here.
It's like a haven in a storm.
Now, you're becoming the brave guardsman  again.
Good night.
I love you.
Oh, I wonder where my baby is? Jackie?
Jackie! Jackie! I wonder where he can be.
I wonder where he can be.
There you are, my darling. Oh, my sweet!
Oh my precious lamb.
Goodnight, my sweetheart. Goodnight. Give me a nice kiss.
That sweet kiss! Oh, precious.
You know what day tomorrow is? Sunday!
My day! My day! And we're going to the zoo.
You know we're going to see the monkeys and the lions that roar and the wolves ... and all kinds of little animals. Won't that be fun?
Now you go to sleep with pleasant dreams.
Pleasant dreams.
Mr. Fuller is here to see you. Fuller?
You have pleasant dreams. Thank you, sweetheart.
Fuller?
Goodnight, my darling. Good night.
Hello there. Marion ...
What's the matter? Mr. Ferguson.
Yes, he's late. We were going to the opera.
That's it. He can't come.
He can't come? I've just left him. Where?
At home. At his house. He's ill, Marion, very ill.
Ill?
But he was alright this afternoon when I left him at the office.
I know, it was at the club. He was there with Mr. Moore. Mr. EC Moore. You know?
What happened? Well, he was there, as happy as could be, laughing at a joke ...
Mr. Moore said it happened all in a moment. What happened?
He collapsed suddenly.
He sent you here? Yes. His one idea was that you shouldn't worry.
Marion, you are his very life.
Oh, I wish I could see him. Of course you can't. He's at home.
I know, I know, I know...
You're wanted on the telephone.
Hello?
Yes, Mrs. Ferguson.
This is Marion Donnell.
Yes.
How is he?
Hello? Hello?
She rang off.
What did Mrs. Ferguson want?
She said he wanted me to come over. I should come over immediately.
You'd better go. He's asked for you, and it must be serious.
Get my wrap, quickly. 
Good evening, Dr. Beckles. Good night, Fuller.
Doctor Conway. Good evening, Doctor.
Ms. Donnell, this is Dr. Beckles and Dr. Conway.
Is...? Ms. Donnell is Mr. Ferguson's secretary.
Marion.
You're Ms. Donnell?
Yes.
Will you go in, please?
Shall we go in? He asked to see you ... alone.
I'm sorry I kept you waiting.
But it couldn't be helped, could it, Doctor?
Please make your visit as brief as possible. Yes, I understand.
Marion! Marion! Don't go away.
Don't go away.
You musn't leave me.
You musn't leave me.
Musn't...
I'll be alright.
I'll be alright...
How beautiful you are.
Don't go away.
Please don't leave me.
I love you.
Marion, don't leave me, please ...
Kiss me.
Kiss me.
Marion!
Kiss me...
Oh, how dark it's getting ...
I love you...
Take me away! Take me away! Marion!
Marion! Marion!
I told him to drive straight to the apartment. Is that right? Yes.
Paper? Paper, lady?
What's that?
That's an outrage, the way they've distorted that.
I don't need these papers to tell me what I am.
Her eyes told me that night ...
I'll never forget those eyes ...
It seemed as though I'd stolen a part of her soul.
Oh, it was awful.
Well that's passed. You must think of your future.
My future?
Well, you're financially able to do almost anything you want to now.
I'm not touching a penny of that money.
What? I'm giving it all back.
But you need money for your boy. Not this money.
When he grows up, what can I tell him when he asks me where this money came from?
Oh, how I'd like to undo this whole awful thing.
Well don't get excited, Marion. Wait and we'll discuss the whole matter when we get to your apartment.
I'm giving up the apartment as soon as I can.
You are? I can't endure the place.
It seems a part of that mad dream. I must have been mad.
Hey, do you know any Beethoven?
What? Hey, that bird wasn't there!
I know it. You know it? Didn't want to play Steve. 
Listen, you punks. Here's my Marion Donnell story for Sunday.
"The great secretary problem."
Gee, this will set the wives up higher than a kite.
"Should a wife have a hand in choosing her husband's secretary?"
Oh, give the girls a chance. Or the wives will be picking them out of the old ladies home.
And what about the secretaries?
Oh, there's always the follies.
There a lot of key punchers in this burg waiting for the boss to give them a little sugar.
Well well well well, look what Grandma brought. The old man himself.
Who? Ferguson, and with an autograph, too.
"To Marion, from HF." That's Hector Ferguson, alright.
It sure is. He certainly done something for this town.
He certainly did. Say what's the lowdown on that bedside story when he kicked off?
You mean about this Donnell girl and the wife at the deathbed?
Yeah. I got the lowdown on that. Pretty sad ...
He was in love with this Donnell girl, alright ...
He was conservative, but he was no chaser.
Hey fellas, look what I found. The plot thickens.
There's a child! Say ...
Say, bring the box down. Hey, wait a minute.
Wait a minute. I'll handle this.
Put the punk over there.
Say, here you are. Who's this, sonny? Huh?
Uncle Fergie.
Uncle Fergie. Say, is that a story or not?
Sounds pretty raw to me. Oh, the kid will never live that down.
Well, his mother is still Ms. Donnell, isn't she?
And that's Hector Ferguson, isn't it? Yes.
The women will eat it up. Even the mayor will weep.
There she is. How do you do, Ms. Donnelly ...
What are you doing ... You can't take my baby's picture!
They haven't taken anything. Are you sure?
Yes.
Where's my baby! Get out of my way!
Get out of here, all of you! Beasts! Beasts!
Get out and stay out! Don't ever come back! Get out, I say! Get out!
I left him in bed. I can't be in two places at once.
They must have stole him out of it.
They've gone.
I've got to tell them the truth. Tell them who Jackie's father is.
How can you do that? They wouldn't believe you. They'd only distort the truth and make matters worse.
There's only one person in the world who you should tell and that's the boy's father.
Why, he doesn't even know the child exists.
But he must be told. We telephone him and ask him to come here now.
You think he'd come with this scandal now? We can soon find out.
I haven't seen him in four years. What difference does that make? This is his obligation.
But he's married. Even so, this is still his obligation.
Lake Shore 4200.
You think they could publish that? They could infer it. They're liable to say anything.
Mr. Merrick's office. Mr. Merrick, Merrick Jr.
They're calling you.
Hello? Mr. Merrick. Mr. Jack Merrick, Jr.
Ms. Donnell speaking.
Yes, I'll wait.
I must protect him, I must.
Hello, yes, I'm waiting.
Don't you see what this will do to him?
In school, and after ... If it touches him, if he suffers through it ...
I couldn't bear it, I couldn't ...
Hello?
Jack? This is Marion... Donnell.
Could you come right over to see me?
I can't, no, I can't tell you over the telephone.
It's very important, very.
2460 Lake Shore Drive.
Yes, I'll be waiting
Alright.
He's coming.
That's right. I'm sure you'll find you've done the right thing.
Now when he comes, tell him everything.
After all, you are asking nothing for yourself.
But you do need his help for his son.
Let me know what happens. I will. You're such a good friend.
Not at all. Cheer up, Marion, and good luck.
Thanks. Goodbye. Goodbye.
Get his clothes on. But he's in bed.
Get his clothes on. Mr. Merrick is coming.
Who?
His father.
Come on, darling, you're going to get dressed now.
You want to get dressed?
There'll be some rejoicing when those Merricks know they've got a son and heir.
Young Merrick's wife can't never have a child of her own.
Ever since she had that motorcrash up in France, she's been a cripple in a wheelchair.
And there's no heir to all those millions but our young Jackie.
No, there'll be joy bells ringin alright.
Hurry, please.
You'll have to watch out they don't try to steal him from you.
Steal him?
Well if that old man Merrick got it into his head that he wanted the child, with all his influence and money ... well we wouldn't stand a dog's chance against him.
What are you talking about?
Well, you know what you're about asking the father over here.
But I'd watch out. They're an unscrupulous bunch.
And ... And what?
Well they'd have a lot on their side in the law courts with all the lies the newspapers are saying ...
The law courts?
Can't you see what this child means to that family?
Yes ... I don't say that they would steal him, but it's on the cards they might.
And those people never lose anything they go after.
Come on, Jackie, get your socks on ... Don't dress him!
Listen, darling. Sweetheart, listen to mother. Stay as quiet as a mouse and then I'll come back and read to you.
Goodie, goodie!
Blanche, don't go, please. Wait a moment.
Go ahead.
Ms. Donnell, please? Will you come in here, please, sir.
Thank you.
Hello, Marion. Hello, Jack.
Didn't take you long to get here. You asked me to come right away.
I know, something came up, and I thought I might need your help.
You can bank on that anytime.
But you see, it's all settled now. Are you sure? Because if there's anything I can do ...
Thanks. You'd rather not tell me what it is?
Well it's really of no importance now.
I see. Well, that's that.
You're looking very well. Thanks. So do you, a little thinner.
I've three years hard work, I guess. Yes?
It was awfully good of you to come over. I'm sorry I got you on a wild goose chase.
Well if there is anything I can do, I hope you'll call on me.
I will...
Come here to me this minute!
Let's put you to bed!
Hello, Mommy. Hello, darling.
Yours?
Yes, mine.
I see.
I didn't believe it ... What?
Well, I'd heard something about a child in Ferguson's will, but ...
Is that what they're saying? I heard something about it.
Well, good-bye, Marion. Take care of yourself.
Jack! Wait, wait!
Yes?
Will you come with me? Why of course.
Marion... Yes.
Why didn't you tell me? Why didn't I know?
You know now. You had to know.
How old is he? How old would he be?
I can't believe it. I can't believe it!
Where was he born? Here in Chicago?
Yes. Why didn't you come to me?
I wanted to stand on my own. But was that fair to him?
It's a serious thing, having a child. Yes it is.
What reason could you possibly have had by keeping him away from me?
I called on you today because I felt he needed your protection.
Of course, of course.
Would you have let me go away today without ... I was afraid ...
Afraid of me, his father? I was afraid you might try to take him from me.
Marion! Can you blame me?
I know. I know. We musn't think of that.
We must just think of him now.
You don't know how I've longed for something like this.
And something just like this, too!
You young husky, it's your dad. Your dad!
Look at me, it's your own father, you monkey.
He is like you, Jack. Of course he is, I saw it right away.
He's reminded me of you often. Really?
Really.
I can't understand ... What?
Oh, nothing, never mind ... I've got him now, haven't I?
I've got you now, you young Samson.
There we are.
Say, Marion, this is a tough kid, do you know it?
How much does he weigh? Thirty pounds.
Yes, and then some.
He's got the Merrick jaw, alright, hasn't he?
You're a Merrick, aren't you? Jack, you will stand by him now, won't you?
You try and stop me. We must stop that rumor.
We'll stop it, alright. Leave that to Dad.
Gee, just wait til he knows about this.
You're his father. Anything that must be done, you'll do, will you?
Marion, why didn't you come to me before?
Look at us, Marion. Just we three.
Jack...
You know, Marion, when you left me I went to Paris.
I had to get away. Everything here reminded me of you.
I went crazy over there. Then Flip Carson came over.
In spite of what I was doing, she seemed to understand.
Well, we were married, and then the smash-up ... you know.
Yes, I remember that day. I thought I was going under at first.
I didn't care much. The only thing I could think of was what a weak-kneed rotter I'd been.
And I swore to myself that if I pulled through
I'd try to be more of the man you wanted me to be.
Did you, Jack? I swore I'd find you.
I'd chuck Dad and the money. I'd find you.
And it was that that pulled me through. That thought.
Yes, Jack.
Then, when I was convalescent, they showed me poor little Flip, ...
All battered up, so patient and brave.
I remembered your words, you know, about being a man and sticking.
So I stuck.
But I've been working too, Marion. All the time.
Oh, I'm proud of you.
Marion, we've got to come together again.
But we can't. We must. We can't.
Why? We just can't.
You mean, because you don't love me?
No, I won't let myself. How can you dictate to yourself any more than I can?
I won't pretend. You must. We both must.
Why? Jack, we haven't a moment to lose.
The reporters were here this afternoon and they were inferring that Jackie was ...
Was what?
What you heard. I'm afraid of the newspapers. We must stop them.
Gee, what time is it? Six o'clock.
We can take care of the newspapers, alright. You leave everything to me.
Jack, I won't rest until I hear from you.
When I get things fixed up, I'll come back and let you know. Alright.
I'll be here by nine o'clock anyway.
Goodbye. Goodbye.
Bye, Daddy.
Oh, darling, oh my sweet!
My sweetheart! Aren't you a sweet. I love you mother.
Oh do you? I love you, oh, you sweetheart.
Oh, how good. Do you want to go to bed now?
No? Of course not. But you have to.
You have to go to bed. Oh, don't you tickle me.
My darling, my sweet.
Come on, now go to bed, darling. Oh, don't tickle mother!
Sorry to have disturbed you so late. It's all right.
Do you mind bringing the other trunks up, too?
The two that are downstairs? If you please.
Never mind, Fred. We're taking just what we barely need. ... for you, and the baby, and myself.
I have the baby's right here.
Fine.
I'm sorry to see you go, miss.
Oh, thanks, Fred. Bon voyage to you.
Thank you.
Shout if you want anything. I will.
Goodbye. Goodbye.
Nice young man. Single, too.
Pity we're going away.
So you're giving it all up. Oh, what a relief that'll be.
That's true, too.
We're gonna get back to something normal. Something we can call our own.
What are you going to do when you go to work?
Oh I don't know. I've got lots of ideas.
This young Merrick's in love with you. Don't they?
Yes? And what's more, you're in love with him.
No, that's impossible. But he's coming again tonight.
He promised to see that Jackie's name is protected.
Coming here to let me know it happened.
And I'm starting all over again. A clean new page.
Is that why you're leaving so sudden?
Because you're afraid to see much of him?
No, I'm not afraid of anything. From now on I'm going to fight back. Out of it all.
Madame, Mr. Merrick is here.
Oh thanks. Blanche, I've got some things in the other room. Will you bring them in here?
Good evening. Good evening.
I'd like to see this child. I'm sorry, he's in bed asleep.
You've convinced my son pretty thoroughly that this boy is his.
He convinced himself. I have further proof if he needs it.
What was your reason for withholding the fact of the child's existence until now?
I'd rather not discuss that.
Well, what was your motive in calling upon us today? I called upon Jack!
Why? Because my baby needed his father's protection.
Jack's told me the circumstances and I'm prepared to do the right thing.
Yes? When I say the right thing, I remind you that I have no heir beyond Jack ... and this child's place in the world ... I understand all that!
I am willing to take this child.
You are! Provided he's a fit and normal child ...
A normal child?
You're robbing that child of his place in the world.
His place in the world is with me, his own mother! Mother?
What sort of a mother are you? How dare you?
We can take that child from you! You can't!
Can't we? Are you a fit person to bring up a child?
Could you convince a court of law that you are?
A court of law? Yes, a court of law!
I'll fight you if it takes every dollar I've got in the world and I'll win that child in open court!
You couldn't. Couldn't I?
Suppose I tell the court it's not Jack's child?
You'd brand him that, eh? No, no, no!
Yes, you would. Yes, you would, you'd do anything.
I got your number the first time I ever laid eyes on you.
When you lured my boy up there to that place on the Lake.
You were after him them for what you thought you could get, and you're after him now.
Am I? You are!
I am, of course I am. And I can take him.
Ms. Donnell, please.
You're fighting me for my son. Alright, I'll fight you for yours.
I'll take him from you! Marion!
Jack, I forbad you to come here! I know, dad, but...
Jack, do you remember what you said this afternoon that we should come back together again?
Yes Dear. You love me, you've always loved me ...
You love our son. Isn't it true we should never have been parted, should we?
It is true. Jack! Jack!
Jack, I begged you to send him away before and you failed me.
Send him away. Don't fail me now! You must listen to me.
It's all up, dad. Please go. I know what I'm doing.
Oh, you contemptable creature ... Oh, get out of here, get out! I'm through!
Well I'm not through.
Marion, Marion, did you mean that? Of course I did.
Then you do love me. I do love you, Jack.
Oh, we'll go away at once. I'll never fail you again, never.
We'll take our boy and go away. Just we three?
Nothing will ever separate us again ever. Nothing ever.
We'll start all over again. We'll go away.
Yes. You get ready. I'll arrange everything and come back for you.
Alright. Dearest.
I'll be waiting.
Pack everything.
We're going away. We're leaving tomorrow.
Have you changed your plans? Yes.
Where are we going now?
Europe, anywhere, I don't know.
Then you're not giving everything up?
No. I'm not giving anything up.
You say this will smash your life. But what have you done to my life?
I had your best interests at heart. Oh, but you haven't got a heart.
You've tried to run my life the way you run your business. And I wish you were as sound as my business.
I'm glad I'm not. I'm human.
Human? You, human to absent that wife of yours?
Who trusted her life to a useless no good bum in Paris?
I know. Do you realize?
That half the time, when that child is smiling, that poor little body of hers is in torture?
I know that, too.
You know? And yet you can leave her in that chair of pain, alone?
Her spirit broken, her heart broken.
With nothing, nothing in the world but the memory of you, her husband who had left her for a creature whose name no decent person would ... Stop it, stop it!
I haven't got a heart, eh? I'm inhuman, am I?
Have you a heart? Are you human? Stop it, stop it, yes I tell you!
Don't I know? You brought all this about.
Didn't you? Didn't you?
May I come in?
Hello, dear. Hello, Papa Merrick.
Hello, Jack. Hello, dear.
I came with the dawn. Yes, dear, I'm coming home right now.
I got anxious. I telephoned and from the man's voice, I gathered that something must be wrong.
No, no, Dad and I had to get straight on something, that's all.
Don't you look so glum, Papa Merrick. Alright, dear, alright but ...
You shouldn't be out like this. Oh, it's a glorious morning.
The sun shining and the birds are singing.
It's good to be alive. And you two old fogeys arguing in a musty old room.
Can I know what this is all about? I'll tell you at home. There's a lot to tell.
I can guess most of it.
Did you tell Papa Merrick about finding the boy? Yes, yes, dear, I did, yes ...
Can't I be in on it? Catherine ...
Would you go along and leave Jack here with me?
There's nothing more. I'll go with you now.
You want me to sail along and leave you two alone?
Alright, I will. No, I'll go with you.
Jack, please, this may be the last thing I'll ever ask you.
When he asks like that, you better stay.
I'll sail along. I'll be dying to hear, though.
I'll go with you. No, Frederic is waiting for me.
Frederic!
What's the use? Let's not start all over again.
Oh boy, don't you realize?
That you're all I've got in this world.
What a beautiful morning to be going away.
Your tea, madame.
Blanche, is it cold in France now?
Pardon, madame? Is it cold in France now?
Yes, in the north of France, it's very cold. But in the south of France, it's warm.
What you call "sunny."
The sunny south of France.
France, is it now? I thought we were going to good ol Londontown.
Your tea, madame. You haven't had any sleep all night.
Well, we'll sleep on the train.
You might. But Mr. Jackie will have something to say about me.
There's your bell.
What's the matter? I'm what the Americans term "all in."
My feet will go just so far and no further.
We'd better send some of these toys to the poor little boys in the orphanage.
We'll never pack them.
Madame.
What is it?
A crippled lady.
Ask her to come in.
Mrs. Merrick? Watch out for trouble now.
Go in the other room.
I'll prepare to get back to London.
Alright, Frederic, wait downstairs. Yes madame. Thank you.
Nice wide doors!
In here? I can manage, thank you.
Ms. Donnell? Yes? May I come in? Yes, do.
I'm Flip Merrick, Jack's wife.
How do you do? I'm glad I found you out.
It's an unearthly hour for calling, isn't it? It's quite alright.
Could we talk for a minute? Yes.
Where should we sit?
Do you mind if I smoke? No, not at all.
I'll get you a match.
Looks like moving day. You going away?
Yes, we're leaving today.
I'm glad I caught you.
Do you smoke? No, not now.
Do sit down.
Marion Donnell.
Jack told me about finding you yesterday.
Though I only saw him for a moment, he could talk of nothing else.
And of the boy too.
Yes? I suppose you're wondering why I'm here.
I'll tell you why. I have just left Papa Merrick's house.
Jack and his father have been at it all night.
They're nervous wrecks, both of them.
And they won't let me in on what it's all about.
You don't know? They wouldn't tell me a thing, but ...
I have a pretty shrewd idea.
Jack said he'd have lots to tell me when he got home ... but I did feel that while he and his father were apparently deciding so much ... we two women should have some say in the matter ourselves.
Yes.
Ms. Donnell, I've loved Jack Merrick since I was a child in arms.
And I've always been teased about it. You know, I didn't know about you until after Jack and I were married.
No?
He told me about your elopement. Ever since then I've wanted to meet you.
Meet me? I've thanked you a thousand times from the bottom of my heart.
Why do you thank me? I think you had a great deal to do with the molding of Jack's character.
He's been splendid, so kind and gentle and ... May I ask why you came here?
Because I want you to take him.
Take him? What do you mean?
I mean, take him.
Not only because he's madly in love with you, but there's the boy and ... because it's right.
And you love him?
Of course.
And loving him, you could give him up to me?
What right have I to hold onto someone because I happen to love him?
What can I be to him? I'm only half a wife.
Isn't love finer than our bodies? Nothing's finer than a son.
He wants children. Who doesn't want a child of their own?
Yes, I see.
I don't say this thing doesn't hurt, but love is a beautiful thing.
It's the only thing.
And nothing fine comes without it's pain, doesn't it?
You found that out when your baby came, didn't you?
It's because I love him I can give him up.
Because you love him, you can give him up?
Yes.
But I don't love him. No?
No.
Are you being quite true to yourself? Yes I am. I am.
Mrs. Merrick, whatever you may think of me, please know that ...
I have no intention ... I don't love Jack.
My plans are made.
Yesterday when he came here, he told me all about you.
Of his love, his great love for you ...
I know, Ms. Donnell ...
It that the youngster? Yes, he wakes at the crack of dawn.
Could I? Would you like to see him?
Please.
If you don't mind the muddle. Oh, not at all.
Shall we go?
Thank you so much.
And we're going to have a beautiful time.
Oh, hello, curly head.
Good morning. Good morning to you, I'm sure.
Oh, he's marvelous. I have a picture of Jack as a child that looks just like him.
Oh, could I?
How old is he? Just over three.
Oh, bless him.
What's his name? Jackie ... Jack.
Jackie, well, well well.
How would you like to go for a ride, hmm?
Jack! I just left Dad.
It's all over. I left him actually crying. It was awful.
I'm on my way home now to tell Flip.
Your wife is here. Here?
Yes, she's in there with the baby. But...
Without knowing what we had planned behind her back, she came here to give you to me.
She said she could give you up because she loved you so much.
I told her I did not love you and that such a thing was impossible.
But why? Why?
Because her sacrifice showed me what a horrible, selfish love our love would be.
She showed me a finer love.
Jack, you've got to stand by her.
You're going on with her. But what about you and me?
Our love will be a greater love if we do our duty. Our duty is to our son. Are you thinking of him?
Yes, I am. He needs my protection.
You've no right to deny him that.
Do you think I haven't longed for him to know and love his father?
But Jack, I want to be worthy of his love. I don't want to sink any lower ever.
Sink lower? What do you mean?
I'm not going to rob that brave little woman of her life.
I can't. I won't. But you'd rob me of my son?
What can you do for him alone? You called on me yesterday and I came, didn't I?
In the position you admit you've placed yourself in, could you protect him as I could?
Could you?
Why, hello, Jack.
I've got a nerve calling at this hour in the morning.
Oh, I was dying to see him. I simply had to.
Now I've seen him, I'm satisfied. Yes, he's fine, isn't he?
Thank you for letting me see him, Ms. Donnell.
You'll forgive me for bursting in on you like this, won't you?
I'm glad you came.
You two want to talk? Oh, no, no.
Little curly head. You know, Ms. Donnell, he confided in me a profound secret.
He's dying for a pony. I want a pony.
I foolishly told him that if he was staying in Chicago instead of going off to foreign parts, that I'd give him one.
That Shetland Pony, you know. Yes.
I bought a Shetland thinking he could be trained to pull this chariot of mine around in the country, but Jack wouldn't hear of it.
He had sordid visions of smash-ups and runaways.
I told him he wouldn't be losing very much if I ... Flip, please don't! Don't say that.
I'm sorry, Jack. I was only kidding.
I think you'd better take Mama Flip home. She's tired.
Goodbye, Marion, darling.
Goodbye.
Goodbye, you little curly head.
Bye.
Nice wide doors!
Now we pick out the toys for the poor little orphan boys who have no nice home to live in and no mother to care for them.
Ms. Potter, put his hat and coat on and yours, too.
Don't say anything. Go.
Come along, Jackie.
Mommy, where are we going?
Darling, do you remember the lady that was here in the wheelchair?
Yes. Do you know what she said about the pony?
Yes.
Would you like to ride on the pony? Yes!
Would you, darling? Yes.
Take him over. Stay with him always.
Go ... Go.
Ms. Donnell...
Come along. Take your ride on the pony.
Jackie! Jackie, come back to me, come back!
You know mother likes to see your collar outside.
Like that.
Jackie!
Jackie... Oh, Jackie...
Did you get that?
Alright then. Add this:
If we can get an appropriation for five million dollars more ...
We can get this over.
Five...
Five million more will be enough ...
Wait a minute, wait a minute, will you ...
Say, listen you ... Listen!
Will you stop that pussycatting and have that child's hair cut?
You'll have him lookin' like a bloomin' convict, that's what. Better he look like that than look like a girl.
And you keep your nose out of this and tend to your own affairs.
I suppose he ain't my affairs, eh?
Say, another word out of you and you're fired.
Oh, fire yourself, you old fussbudget.
Now you do that right.
Madame, I have a lady downstairs waiting for finger waves, madame.
Then you'd better go and do your fingering right now.
Wait just a moment, just a moment, please!
But madame, please, I cannot stay here all day long.
Listen, will you please cut this boy's hair?
Well you all make me so nervous! Make you nervous!
You know his father doesn't want his hair cut ... Get out of here, get out of here!
What's all the shootin' for?
Mr. Jack, just see what they've done to him. They've almost ruined him.
Who did that? Your father.
He said he didn't like the curls, it made him look like a little girl and so he had the man cut them all off. That's what he did.
It's alright, Ms. Potter, it's not so bad. We can fix this.
Oh, I don't know.
Chicago!
Say, did he mean me?
You ought to know. You're from Chicago.
Hello? Hello?
This is Mr. Merrick again.
Now take this letter, please.
Josh Carson, Chicago Chemical Works ...
Chicago, Illinois.
Dear Josh...
Our thoughts will be with you on Sunday in memory of dear little Flip.
A year slips by quickly, doesn't it?
Say, Jack, Jack, I'm sending a letter to Grandad Carson.
Anything you want to say? No, just give him my love.
I wrote him this morning and told him how we miss little Flip.
Poor old fella, he must be pretty lonely.
Jackie is very well and sends his love.
He's growing a mile a minute ... Oh, dad ...
Tell him Ms. Potter will send him a postcard from London.
We're sailing for England tomorrow night.
Ms. Potter will send you a postcard from London.
We shall discharge her immediately upon arriving there ... for impudence, impertinence ...
Now read that back to me, will you?
What?
I can't understand you. Are you talking English?
I asked you to read that letter back to me.
Do you get that?
Do - you - get - that?
My dear young woman, will you please read that letter back to me!
Dad, take it easy, take it easy!
These New York people. They're all the same. Alright, I'll take it.
Hello. Alright, miss, now will you please read the letter back to me.
I say will you please read the letter back to me.
Dear Josh, Our thoughts will be with you on Sunday in memory of dear little Flip. A year passes so quickly, doesn't it?
Little Jackie... Jackie...
Is very well and sends his love...
Sends his love ... Growing... He's growing a mile a minute...
He's growing a mile a minute ...
I can't hear you very distinctly.
Jack, Jack... Jack!
This is Marion!
What? It's Marion!
Jack, it's Marion!
Jackie, I found her! I found her, Jackie!
I found her!
By the Law
Film adaptation of the story
"The Unexpected" by Jack London
A Goskino Production
Third Work of the Kuleshov Collective
Screenplay - Viktor Shklovsky
Director - Lev Kuleshov
Assistant - B. Sveshnikov
Cinematography - Konstantin Kuznetsov
The Yukon
The gold rush has brought them to this desert coast
The Irishman Michael Dennin
The chairman Hans Nelson, a Swede
Nelson's wife, the Englishwoman Edith
Shareholder Dutchy
Shareholder Harky
There's no gold in this mine - we have to look elsewhere.
Go, Dennin, collect the instruments - we are moving!
The company's gold mine
Gold.
Gold.
The company's success lasted throughout the winter.
Small house - great fortune!
The output of gold continued...
I was the one who found the gold and they make me their washer woman!
Spring came slowly.
Lunch
Dennin won't be joining us - he is no longer hungry. He lost his appetite due to envy!
Your health, Mister Dennin!
Stop it!
Stop it! Stop it...
He's alive.
Not without the law - it's a white man!
The weather changed abruptly.
One inch per hour.
I'll kill you all some day anyway!
He's dead...
The two graves are ready - if the Yukon doesn't flood them.
The two murder victims make their way ... through the storm and darkness to their burial chambers.
After the storm the top of the frozen Yukon was left covered with water.
Days went by in a tormenting silence.
Man or woman - one of them always sat... next to the criminal.
Kill me!
Give me something to drink!
The ice on the Yukon began to break
Daytime.
Night.
Daytime again.
What do you intend to do with me?
We will treat you by the law.
I am so tired, so tired ...
The tobacco is running out.
Give me back my tobacco!
Not without the law!
Edith's birthday came.
Don't be afraid! Take it out!
It's for you - a birthday present ...
Shave me ...
Shave him already! Today is my birthday!
Why did you do that?
It seemed so terribly simple to me.
And you always said,
I would end up on the gallows!
Days went by ... but it could not have been predicted ... that the law would arrive earlier ... than in a few weeks.
Let's pronounce judgement.
Not today, today is sunday!
The Queen of England
Edith insisted ... that the procedure ... should follow English law ... since the criminal ... was one of the Queen's subjects.
Accused, you are an Irishman ... and therefore we will pass judgement over you ... in the name of Queen Victoria.
The Judges
The Witnesses
The Jurors
The Verdict
Michael Dennin, by the Queen's law you shall be hanged by the neck ... until you are dead.
Dead ... dead ...
I spoke well.
Like in a real court ...
And now it's all over.
They say death is not agonising ...
The designated time came.
Lord have mercy, Lord have mercy,
Lord have mercy upon us!
I couldn't have done a better job if I had had to make it for you, Hans!
The Execution
May God ... accept you, repentant sinner!
Here - For good luck!
The End
KEAN
Solomon, the theater's prompter, was Kean's most devoted friend.
The Prince of Wales is coming.
The Count of Koefeld, Denmark's ambassador, and  his wife, charming Lady of Venice.
Do you know Anna Danby, the wealthy heiress?
She's in her box with her guardian.
Don't you see Lord Mewill yet, Anna?
Your entrance, Kean.
"Good morrow, cousin."
Romeo and Juliet. Act I.
"Is the day so young?"
Romeo and Juliet. Act I.
"Alas, that love, whose view is muffled still,
Should, without eyes, see pathways to his will!"
Romeo and Juliet by Shakespeare.
"With love's light wings did
I o'er perch these walls..."
Romeo and Juliet. Act II.
"If they do find thee, they will murder thee..."
Romeo and Juliet. Act II.
"Alack, there lies more peril in thine eye than twenty of their swords..."
Romeo and Juliet. Act II.
"This bud of love, by summer's ripening breath, may prove a beauteous flower when next we meet..."
Romeo and Juliet. Act II.
"Now Romeo is beloved and loves again,
Alike betwitched by the charm of looks..."
Romeo and Juliet. Act II.
"For never was a story of more woe
Than this of Juliet and her Romeo."
"Thus with a kiss I die."
Romeo and Juliet. Act V.
"I will kiss thy lips;
Haply some poison yet... doth hang on them, to make die with a restorative..."
Romeo and Juliet. Act V.
Mr. Kean, you were brilliant!
You have surpassed yourself, my dear. You have captured the heart of the most charming woman in the United Kingdom. the Countess of Koefeld, of whom, it seems, we both are fond.
My compliments.
The image of beautiful woman was deeply engraved in Kean's heart.
But the difference in their social station was an insurmountable obstacle.
Every morning in Hyde Parkà
While Kean's only companion was the faithful Solomon.
They are your creditors, Kean.
I'm afraid we are trapped.
And this man, whose income is no less than that of the Prince of Wales, has to dodge creditors.
What are you thinking about,
Mr. Kean?
Who is that sailor, Sir?
Don't tell me, Countess, that you don't remember Edmund Kean.
Why the disguise?
To escape myself, madam.
The Countess prefers you as Romeo.
Let's go to the pub, you old clown. íRum!
That's the famous actor, Kean - my best customer.
I am commissioner in this district, and a great admirer of your talent.
Edmund Kean, the great actor.
And I am his only friend.
Morning had long since arrived...
That's the band that is to give a performance here.
Hey, Pistol!
Katie! And Tom, how are you?
And you, my old friend Bob!
My dear friends, in a few days
I will give a benefit performance of Hamlet for old Bob and the others.
We are old friends, madam.
I used to be a travelling comedian, like them.
But you have become a great artistà the most famous in your countryà
During their meeting at the Coaly Hole tavern, a cordial relationship developed between
Kean and the commissioner.
I have a passion for the theatre,
Mr. Kean.
In my district I don't miss a single cockfight, nor a prizefight. What will you do? I love a player!
"Dear Mr. Kean.
Please allow me to ask a favor.
It is a question of my future, my whole life."
Anna Danby
My guardian wishes to force me to marry lord Mewill, whom
I dislike and who is only after  my money, I'm sure.
Because of this, I have left my guardian's house and will never return.
And how do you expect to get along?
I wish to dedicate myself to the theater.
Dear child! You wish to cast aside your way of life in exchange for a life of tears.
I can show you the other side of the coin.
This very day the Countess of Koefeld told us that everyone knows that
Kean attracts young girls.
Return home, miss, and remain calm. I will try to reduce to nothing the slanders of this malicious man.
"Dear Mr. Kean.
Please allow me to ask a favor..."
An hour later, at the home of the Countess.
This Kean has abducted her and is hiding her at his house.
Allow me, madam, to present you with the truth, in order to end this slander of the reputation of a young girl.
Excuse me, Count, but this is a secret a woman confides only to another woman.
"Tomorrow I play Hamlet.
Please come, and spare me a few moments. At the foot of the orchestra is a door leading to my dressing room.
I pray that you will come to me there."
Edmund Kean.
Thank you a thousand times, madam.
It is a great slander to accuse
Mr. Kean of being involved with miss Danby.
"Kind souls, what, weep you, when you but behold our
Caesar's vesture wounded?
Look you here, here is himself, marr'd, as you see, with traitors."
Julius Ceasar. Act III.
Kean, I beg you, do not drink!
Think of your artà
Think of your love!
Take these to the Countess at once!
An appreciation from
Mr. Edmund Kean.
...from Mr. Edmund Kean.
Get lost! Tell your master that it is improper to send flowers to a married woman!
And these are the roses I sent to my beloved!
My roses... My love...
Good Sir, if you are really who you claim to be, please pass me a handwritten note through the door.
This is truly a royal card.
Your Royal Highness, please allow me to donate your hundred pounds to the poor actors.
Let us allow Mr. Kean to get dressed, Your Majesty.
I hope that I will have the chance to converse with Your Highness.
I'll join you in a moment, my dear Count.
Your Majesty, I am in love with...
When I saw you enter here, I knew I could no longer pretend to be madà
I shall applaud you nonetheless.
From your box, Your Highness?
One should be careful with precious possessions!
What an accursed profession!
We are masters neither of our pleasures nor our sorrows. All is pretence! Nothing is real!
The role of Hamlet inspired his audience with admiration, and they sat open-mouthed at his performance.
"To be, or not to be: that is the question!"
Hamlet. Act III.
"The fair Ophelia! Nymph, in thy orisons be all my sins remember'd."
Hamlet. Act III.
"Get thee to a nunnery..."
Hamlet. Act III.
"...why wouldst thou be a breeder of sinners?"
Hamlet. Act III.
"If thou dost marry, I'll give thee this plague for thy dowry: be thou as chaste as ice, as pure as snow... thou shalt not escape calumny."
Hamlet. Act III.
"...be thou as chaste as ice, as pure as snow, thou shalt not escape calumny."
"...thou shalt not escape calumny..."
Oh, royal prince, whom I believed to be a friend...
...or I...
This is scandalous!
Down with Kean!
Throw him out!
Spectacle!... Play... Kean!
So there! I am not Hamlet!
I am a poor comedianà
My lords and gentlemen!
The performance cannot continue.
The Sun of England has set.
The great and famous actor
Edmund Kean has lost his reason.
As time went by, the countless debt claims and failures in private life took a final tol on Kean's spiritual and physical powers.
Kean lay slowly dying in the humble abode of Solomon, in a distant London suburb.
I feel that I am dying, my dear Salomon.
Readà Read Shakespeare to me.
"Alas, poor Yorick! I knew him, Horatio: a fellow of  infinite jest, of most excellent fancy..."
Louder, Solomon, louder. I can't hear you.
Your voice sounds as if it is coming from the depths of a tomb.
"Where be your gibes now?
Your gambols? Your songs?
Your flashes of merriment, that were wont to set the table on a roar?"
"Alexander died, Alexander was buried, Alexander returneth into dust; the dust is earth; of earth we make loam..."
"Imperious Caesar, dead and turn'd to clay..."
Hamlet.
"I loved Ophelia: forty thousand brothers could not..."
I am dying...
So fleet the works of men
Back to their earth again
Ancient and holy things
Fade like a dream -
Stately castles whose turrets pierced the sky have left imperishable record -
Though the storms of centuries have laid waste the works of their spirit soars on and poets make live again the days of chivalry.
Mediaeval England - England in the Age of Faith.
Her chronicles tell of warriors and statesmen, of royal Crusaders, of jousting knights. Her ballads sing of jolly friars, of troubadours, of gallant outlaws who roamed her mighty forests.
History - in its ideal state - is a compound of legend and chronicle and from out both we ogger you an impression of the Middle Ages -
Excitement rises high for the final event in a tournament.
From far and near have come all England's knighthood for, on the morrow, they depart on the Holy Crusade.
And so the lofty battlements of the castle look down upon the chivalry of
England in all its glory -
Richard of the lion Heart,
England's immortal King impulsive, generous and brave -
Prince John, the Kings brother- sinister, dour, his heart inflamed with an unholy desire to succeed to Richard's throne -
High above the clash of lance and shield in joust and tourney, the fairest maiden was chosen to reign for a day as the
Queen of Love and Beauty -
Lady Marian Fitzwalter, from whose slim white hands would fall... the chaplet of valor on the
Victorious knight -
Sir Guy of Gusbourne, intimate of Prince John and one of the two contenders for the championship -
Your veil for a favor, fair lady, that you may see it worn in victory.
The other contender for the championship-favorite of King Richard -
The Earl of Huntingdon's trusted squire...
To gain unfair advantage
Gusbourne straps himself to his saddle...
Brother, Ill gage you this against your prize falcon that Huntingdon wins the day.
On the knight with the white plume!
The marshals inspect the equipment of the contestants...
They splinter their lances - ever a good omen for Huntingdon!
I double mine on
Huntingdon!
Huntingdon hath proved his knightly mettle.
We hereby decree that on this Holy Crusade he shall be our second in command.
Go to the fair maid,
Marian, and receive the victor's crown.
Exempt me, sire.
I am a feared of women.
Another woman!
In the great hall of the castle the feasting that followed close upon the tournament has lasted far into the dawn...
Brave hearts that smile through parting tears...
Knightly lovers tell again their love to maidens fair...
Ladies' eyes speak courage to their knights...
Apart from the others, Prince
John and Guy of Gisbourne, dizzy with wine and drunk with thoughts of power...
The King's goblet...
Dog of a servant! This on the morrow shall be mine - and everything that is the King's shall them be mine.
A servant hath a friend and his friend hath a friend.
Be discreet my Prince.
Where is Huntingdon?
With dagger at head he doth try his strength for the goblet.
At such a time as this it were more befitting that he try his love for a maid.
Why hast thou not a maid?
When I return, good my liege.
Nay, before you go, good my knight.
A castle and lands to the maid who wins him.
You too shall have your pick of maidens, my Gisbourne.
So? Sits the wind in that direction? The Lady Marian, eh? A goodly choice.
You forget, Sir Knight.
I am a Prince.
It is only the Prince who has forgotten.
I regret, Lady Marian, that a brother of our noble King should so degrade his knighthood.
I fear you have incurred his enmity... in my behalf.
I was but my knightly privilege...
Interference is a dangerous pastime, my squire.
I... I never knew... a maid... could be... like you...
Now... all too swiftly... comes the hour of parting...
...and o'er the kneeling hosts the Bishop lifts his hand in benediction...
...and for the cross that gleams upon his shoulder each knight breathes a silent vow...
While on the battlements...
HUNTINGDON!
My lord King, I go to the
Holy Land with half a heayt.
The other half I leave in the keeping of a maid.
Good! Now your blade will be keener.
I leave in your keeping my dearest treasure.
Guard her with your life.
See that Richard never returns from the Holy Land.
Nor Huntingdon.
Even Kings must wait on love...
Huntingdon's head for Lady Marian's hand.
Do not forget.
And so the very flower England's knighthood marched on to its high purpose.
Scarce had the dust of the Crusaders settled to the Crusaders settled to the ground when the dire mischief of Prince John was set afoot...
When the throne is mine, I will reward those who serve me. To your task and spare no one.
All of England fell under the pall of
Prince John's perfidy.
By Prince John's order the good officials of the town of Nottingham are ousted...
I am the High
Sheriff of Nottingham.
The poor who cannot pay the tax levy are forced to give up their belongings...
For slaying a wild boar in
Prince John's forest...
For spurning Prince
John's addresses...
In Richard's castle
Prince John's henchmen apprise him of their evil successes...
Your bidding has been done. Huntingdon's castle is razed and burnt.
One woman braver than the rest...
Have mercy on the people of England.
Fred not your pretty head for such as they.
Prince, your oppressions will not please our King.
A Prince at home outranks a King abroad.
Think you not so, beautiful lady?
If Richard knew these things, there would be no Prince at home.
That maid bears watching.
In silence and at night...
Take this message and sleep nor night nor day until you reach your master.
Day after day... across the fields of
France... the Crusaders had plodded on...
Mark how Huntingdon spurs them on. He is the very backbone of the adventure.
A good way to crack a head, my master. Would were thy brother's.
To your tent. These fevers are but passing ills. Ere the night falls thou wilt be able to march again.
He plays his tricks of discipline to cozen favor of the King... the sycophant!
But for discipline
I'd twist you round a tent-pole and crack your spine!
Why come you here?
The people suffer and perish. The women of the castle hang their heads in shame.
Intrigue and death lurk in every corner. Desperately my heart cries out to you.
If the King should know of this, himself would return and this
Holy Crusade would fail.
If Richard had but one friend in England...
Fetch falcon.
My Beloved.
By some pretext I shall persuade the King to allow me to return.
On the heels of this missive
I shall be in England.
Huntingdon
Speed this letter and prepare our departure.
I pray you, my Lord and King, to speak again your trust in me which you have so oft prosed.
As I trust my right hand do I trust you.
You are my friend.
Then, my liege, your leave and favor to return  to
England without unfoldment of my purpose.
I humbly beseech you, not as my King but as my friend, to place unquestioned this trust in me.
Tis not the maid?
You! Turned chickenhearted for a wench!
You do but jest. go join the lances of your King.
Sire, what needs doing... must be done. But my heart aches that your friendship fails me.
My Beloved.
By some pretext I shall persuade the King to allow me to return.
On the heels of this missive
I shall be in England.
Huntingdon
Sire, you must trust me!
We wait not on permission.
We go to England though hell itself should gape and bid us stay.
A deserter.
Is this true?
The truth is... that back in England...
My Beloved.
By some pretext I shall persuade the King to allow me to return.
On the heels of this missive
I shall be in England.
Huntingdon
Sire, the penalty is death.
Have his wound attended.
Place him in that tower.
He will remain a prisoner, until our return. See to it that he is well cared for.
But, my liege, the penalty is death!
My command! Obey!
Give them food and drink until our last column is well on its way. Then let them rot.
In England Lady
Marian's serving woman comes under the dread inquisition of John...
Tell me what has become of
Huntingdon's squire.
I'll tell... I'll tell. Tis true.
He did carry information from mistress the King.
Lady Marian shall pay for this with her life.
So much for melding!
Quick! Fly for your life.
He means to kill.
I seek Lady Marian
Filzwalter.
After her, Bring her back. I'll put an end to tattling!
Scarce was the last column of England's knighthood well on its way when...
Unlock the door.
To England... with all haste.
There is work to do.
While in England, sturdy men, rebellions to Prince John's tyranny, sought refuge in
Sherwood Forest...
Prince John's deed!
These lusty rebels only waited a leader to weld them into a band... an outlaw band destined to live immortal in legend and story.
A friend of Richard returns to his native soil...
Good my lord... poor Lady Marian... it was on this very spot... here... a riderless horse... an overturned saddle...
To God... to Richard... and to her.
Thus it was that Huntingdon buried his Yesterday. Here began a new life... a life to be dedicated to revenge... bitter... but joyous.
In far-off Palestine
Richard meets with victory and concludes a truce with the infidel...
A year passed and then... from the mysterious depths of Sherwood Forest... came whispers of the rise of a robbers chief...
Robin Hood!
The High Sheriff of Nottingham...
Tis the naked arrow of Robin Hood and sings death to the emeries of King Richard.
A butcher's stall in Locksley Town...
The three lions of
Richard. It is Robin
Hoods manner of saying:
If ye be brave, come to
Sherwood Forest.
Richard is your King.
The rich man of Wakefield...
He seems to be everywhere. I confess
I am helpless.
Our very soldiers desert to join this outlaw's band.
Fetch me a bag of gold.
There are lots of visions and the way to a good result, to captures this Robin Hood:
John
This will put a stop to it.
Robin Hood!
Will Scarlett...
Friar Tuck...
Little John...
Robin Hood's lair...
Mark you his hat.
Allan - a - Dale...
Three blasts!
We rob the rich, relieve distressed
On damned John to score.
We'll take a life if sorely presses
Jill Richard reign once more.
While Prince John's dark schemes are sped in distant lands...
Richard's sleeping tent...
Now for England... and my reward!
Alas, poor fool.
Thou hast played king once too often.
Gisbourne!
On the morrow a messenger from England relates full measure of
Prince John's treachery...
Let John get his bellyful!
In Sherwood Forest a gallant outlaw... a some... time Knight now know as Robin Hood... hath a band of followers and doth thwart the Prince at every turn.
A robber knight, eh?
Methinks I know who tis.
Quick... to horse!
We go to England... mayhap to join this outlaw's band.
Prince John's hired soldiers levy tribute on the Priory of St. Catherine's...
Has this Prince no regard for Holy Chutch?
While... nearby... Robin Hood and his Merry Men distribute dole to needy villagers...
Three blasts...
They are of the Priory of St. Catherine's.
The Priory garden...
It is Robin Hood and his men!
Is not that the Earl of Huntingdon?
Tis Robin Hood.
Robin Hood to the poor, mayhap, but he was born
Robert, Earl of Huntingdon.
Prepare thyself. Within these holy walls there is some dear to you.
Lady Marian...
Scarce a day's journey away... a menace to their new-found happiness...
Sir Guy of Gisbourne...
Tis the Earl of Huntingdon with Lady Marian.
Each day do loyal men rally to our cause.
Twill not be long ere we storm the very castle itself.
An hundred troopers approach!
To horse! I'll follow.
When the lark sings in the morn,
I'll send you a message to re-speak my love.
...Robin Hood is the
Earl of Huntingdon!
Lady Marian Fitzwalter lives...
Surround this band of outlaws with all your men.
By hook or crook take
Huntingdon alive.
Seize that wench, Drag her here. She shall die the death promised.
When the lark sings in the morn...
To Lady Marian.
Tell her that when the sun drops... o'er Nottingham hill,
I'll come to her.
His lady and his King...
All the troops from
Nottingham Town surround the forest.
Tis a good time to take the town.
To the trees with all our men. Entrap these troops.
I go to Nottingham with Scarlett and Allan-a-Dale. We three shall take the town.
While in the forest Robin
Hood's men entrap the troops...
Near the gates of
Nottingham Town...
Rouse the townspeople!
Man the walls! Every mother's son of you!
To the postern door!
To the postern door!
The Prince's soldiers...
Lady Marian... brutally abducted... the saints protect her... fly to your master.
Richard is dead!
Long live King John!
Heralds to the north!
To the south! England is mine!
A mysterious stranger invades Sherwood Forest...
He seeks Robin Hood.
Why seek you
Robin Hood?
He says' Mayhap to join him... mayhap to slay him.
So ho, my pretty knight!
To do either you needs must prove your mettle first!
I will beat them.
With such strength... thou almost makst me think thou art Richard himself.
Each member of this band hath an arrow in yon tree. Speed yours!
Exulting in their freedom, then people of Nottingham
Town hang Prince John in effigy...
Well take life if sorely pressed
Jill Richard reign once more.
Soldiers have carried her away to the castle.
Damn their black hides! I'll lash them till they bleat!
Keep the town!
I go to the castle. You to the Forest. Fetch every man.
We'll make John sing a pretty song to-night!
Close the drawbridge!
Gisbourne...
My men are on their way.
Watch for them.
If they fail...
Three blasts...
I surrender.
Robin Hood is taken.
Forty archers make ready.
We shall teach you which way to face!
Bind him to yon post.
When I dip my dagger, he dies.
We have captured the outlaws.
Lower the bridge.
The High sheriff of Nottingham...
Prince John's chief henchmen...
And Richard reigns ance more.
Huntingdon!
Huntingdon!
HUNTINGDON!
Hear ye all!
Until now Richard has never bowed his head to man.
But I did mistrust my friend and with all humility do ask forgiveness.
To-night!
That night...
In the courtyard...
The bride and the groom escape the wedding revels...
Huntingdon!
The End
Be careful, Sterling don't let those Javanese sell you any jungles for tea plantations.
Phyllis, will you tell Mother!
Tell Mother!
I'll write!
Isn't this romantic? 
It's going to be our second honeymoon!
Come and have a last look at San Francisco.
I live in the center of the largest tea district in Java.
Since you are dealing in tea, 
Mr. Sterling, why not make my home your headquarters?
Any big game in Java?
I've always had a secret ambition to shoot a tiger.
If you will honor my house with a visit, I shall be happy to arrange a tiger hunt.
That would be great. I'll tell Mrs. Sterling.
Oh, you are married?
I'd like you to meet my wife.
Dear, I want you to meet Prince de Gace.
I'm sorry, but this is very important. I'll be right back.
Will you have some thing to drink?
I never drink.
Will you dance?
I never dance.
Don't you like dancing?
My wife loves to dance, too.
Your country has always interested me, with its worship of the great
God business.
The East is a country of the senses warm, mysterious, like the kiss of a lover.
You are like the orchids of your country, you have the same cold enchantment.
In Java the orchids grow wild and their perfume fills the air.
And the women of Java do they grow wild, too?
Not wild, but natural. They do not pretend to be cold
The heat, the everlasting heat strips everyone of all pretense.
It would be fascinating to learn whether your coldness is only a pretense.
I am furious!
The steward just told me my hunting outfit is not on board!
Don't worry, Mr. Sterling.
I can supply you with hunting equipment.
I am afraid of your Prince
This gun business gets my goat!
John, didn't you notice anything strange in the 
Prince's attitude toward me?
There's something strange about all foreigners!
He said. I was like an orchid...
He said: Java strips women of all pretense
And then,he took me in his arms and kissed me.
I had a terrible nightmare!
-JAVA-
A land of magic beauty, cursed with heat relentless heat
But you were just saying you wanted a nice, cold drink!
I won't accept anything from him!"
He's a fine chap, what's the matter with him?
I just don't like him!
And I begged you not to accept his invitation!
Don't be unreasonable, Lillie!
Why don't you like him?"
You know I've always wanted to shoot a tiger."
It's the heat.
It's just the heat, dear.
He says your beauty is more dazzling than the sun.
Reminds me of the Army!
Your room.
Your personal maids!
A little arrangement for lowering the temperature
Good Lord, a double-bed!
Now, Mr. Sterling i will show you your room.
Your personal maids.
Pardon, Madame.
Dinner is at eight."
What a fascinating costume!
I trust Madame has enjoyed the evening.
What in Heaven's name have you got on?
You look silly, dear take off that junk and go to bed.
Great eastern company about to bid tea propertiers you are interested
I advise close deals immediately
I've got to cover six plantations it's no trip for you!
Why can't you stay here, like a sensible woman?
Because I want to be with you.
The Prince is going with us.
I think Mrs. Sterling would enjoy it more if the top were down.
You would have the top down!
Now I suppose you'll catch cold!
Top up now, sir.
We'll have to wait for Mrs. Sterling.
You can't travel in that condition.
You'll have to stay here and we'll come back for you.
But, dear, I don't want to stay here alone.
I just told him if anything happened to Mrs. Sterling, 
I would cut his throat.
Your husband thought you would be safer if 
I remained with you.
Why have you shut yourself away from me all day?
You were afraid...
...afraid of yourself!
You wanted to come out hours ago
Where is Mrs. Sterling?
Mrs. Sterling went to her room after supper.
I thought you were never coming back!
Why are you so excited?
I was so worried about you.
Have you lost anything?
I just wanted to say good-night.
Then there is nothing to keep us in Java any longer, is there?
I don't want to leave Java until I've killed my tiger.
The jungle...
My pipe. I must have left it in my hunting coat.
Did you find it?
I have a head-ache
I think I'll go to bed.
Did you hear that?
Did you ever try to get one at night?"
It's exciting enough by daylight, on the back of an elephant.
I am afraid, he knows...
Don't be afraid. I'll see that he knows nothing!
The tiger must be very near camp.
I just heard him again.
Let's try to get a shot at him.
This is ridiculous!
I'm going back!
It's empty!
You ... 
What right had you to do this?
What right had you to take it for granted I loved him, was faithless to you?
You are blind blind, blind!
The doctor says he'll be all right in a few days.
I hope you'll forgive me, but you see I loved you, too.
John, you blind, foolish. Darling, will you never understand you are the only man I love?
SECRET OF A SOUL a Psychoanalytic Film
Inside every person there are desires and passions which remain...
...unknown to "consciousness".
In the dark hours of psychological conflict...
...these "unconscious" drives attempt to assert themselves....
...Mysterious illnesses arise from such struggles, the resolution...
...and cure of which form the field of psychoanalysis.
In the hands of the "psycho- analytically trained" doctor...
...the teaching of university professor Sigmund Freud...
...represent an important advance in the treatment...
...of these types of psychological illnesses.
The events in this film are taken from life. They do not deviate in...
...any important factual way from the actual medical case history.
"HELP!!!"
"Last night... with a razor...!"
"Come...
Papa's expecting us!"
Woman Gruesomely Murdered
"I'm from the homicide department.
We'd like to know if you observed...
...anything relevant to the crime committed last night in the house nearby."
"No... we just heard the cries for help this morning!"
Meanwhile... a surprise was waiting by the hearth.
"My friends! I am finally swimming toward home...
...Sumatra lies behind me, and in a short while
I shall be with you...
...I am sending these
'guest present' on ahead."
The Dream
Sincerely
Your Cousin Hans
"I dreamt terrible things...
It was horrible...!"
"Your wife says that her cousin has arrived."
"You must excuse me...
I cannot eat with you."
"I can't touch the knife!"
"You left this key lying in the café!"
"Is there some reason you're reluctant to enter your house?"
"Sorry, it's part of my job."
"My friend left his house last night, greatly agitated...
...and has not yet returned.
We're very concerned..."
"We fear an accident... since the murder in the neighboring house...
...my husband has been completely distraught..."
"We've received no reports of any accidents...
...Incidentally, the murderer was arrested today in Munich!"
"...and worst of all...
...last night I felt a sudden compulsion to kill my wife...
...whom I love more than anything...!"
"Do you know of no one who can help you?"
"You mean Dr. Orth.
He lives just across the way."
"I didn't expect that we would meet again so soon."
"I'm coming to you because
I'm totally distraught!...
...Tormented by inexplicable fears...!
...It is impossible for me to touch a knife...!"
"We do know of such illneses... and also of the possibility of their cure."
"But that's not all...!"
"I am  happily married and yet... yesterday evening...
...I was overcome with an almost irresistible urge...
...to kill my wife... isn't that crazy...?"
"No... but it may be a sign of serious psychological illness!"
"There's no reason to despair."
"Perhaps I can help you.
There is a method...
...called psychoanalysis...
...that I like to apply with such illnesses."
"I've reserved a room at a hotel.
Believe me, it's better that way."
"I'm taking charge of your husband's treatment."
"It is better during the treatment period, which will...
...last several months, that your husband does not live at home."
"That is everything, doctor!"
No... that is by no means everything. You can be cured...
...only when we have worked together to uncover...
...the 'unconscious' psychological conflicts which led to your illness!"
"You will start by telling me everything you see in your mind's eye!"
"Don't hold back anything because you think it is unimportant or nonsensical!"
"Thoughts will come up that you may not wish to express...
...Tell them to me anyway."
"A few day ago... in the morning...
...in my wife's bedroom...
I suddenly heard..."
"HELP!!!"
"Last night... with a razor...!"
"The impressions of that morning shook you greatly...
...psychologically...
...Had you recently quarreled with your wife?"
"No!"
"I grew up with my wife...
Marriage to her has given...
...my life its meaning."
"We were deeply in love, and wanted children... but..."
"Did something... happen... to cause you to give up hope of progeny?"
"I don't know... but lately...
...I have been plagued by terrible fantasies...
...I have seen my wife in shameful situations...!"
"What are the characteristics of this man who has appeared to you in these fantasies?"
"Wait a minute...!"
"I think I recognize him now... it's my childhood friend...
...my wife's cousin."
"Did your wife give you a reason to be jealous of her cousin?"
"He is my best friend.
Shortly after our wedding...
...he left us... to go to the tropics...
...I was never consciously jealous of him...
"As he took his leave from us...
I felt a strange emotion stirring in me..."
"Then, years went by.
On the day...
...before the outbreak of my illness...
...we received a letter from him that he was returning..."
Months passed of arduous work by doctor and patient...
...Finally today... an important new memory...
...rose to consciousness in the parient.
"On the night before the outbreak of my illness there was a bad storm."
"I had terrible dreams that night!"
"Since we have learned to interpret it...
...the dream has become the most important door...
...to our knowledge of the unconscious!"
"The images are muddled..."
"I don't want to look at them!"
"You may not give in to this resistance!"
"Arriving today at 10:30 a.m.
... Cousin Hans."
"When I got the telephone message that our cousin had arrives..."
"That is a typical mistake to make when receiving news...
...that is 'unconsciously' unwelcome."
"In the dream I stood before an Indian idol..."
Sincerely
Your Cousin Hans
"Why is this exotic image in your dream?"
"In the dream, a small Italian city...
...one I saw frequently on our honeymoon...
...emerged before my eyes...
...A bell tower grew steeply up out of the ground..."
"The laughing of these three women's heads was terrible!"
"Did you recognize the women?"
"These humiliations hit you in your most vulnerable spot!"
"Then, in the dream,
I stood before a prison cell...
...and looked through the bars."
"What did you see?"
"In your nightmare, the small wound on your wife's neck...
...flowed together with the crime in the nearby house...
...for this reason you saw yourself condemned as a murderer."
"These dream fantasies led, in your consciousness...
...to a morbid aversion to touching a knife."
"So this psychological illness kept you from killing your wife!"
"Were you finished with your dream of the trial?"
"No... I saw water... turbulent, dark water!"
"It has long been known that dreams of water...
...signify 'imminent' or
'wished for' birth...!"
"She gives the doll to her cousin!"
"Did you ever experience anything similar...
...in your childhood?"
"Back then she gave
'our' doll to her cousin!"
"The pain that you experienced when your wife gave 'our doll'...
...to her cousin has remained awake in your childless marriage!!"
"In the dream I got into a furious rage..."
"Have you notices what you're holding in your hand?"
"I am able to touch a knife again..."
"I've got a lot to apologize for!"
Epilogue
THE END english subtitles transcribed by
.:: Norgen (norgen@centrum.cz) ::.
West of Zanzibar
Ashes to ashes! Dust to dust!
Professor! Has she got a friend?
My little wife. You're more beautiful than an angel tonight.
You're tired, dear.
I'll put the things away.
Crane, dear, can't go awey without telling him. I've tried... but I can't.
I'll tell him, dear. You get dressed...
I'll meet you outside.
Aw, you poor blind idiot! 
Don't you understand? She's gone!
She loves me...do you hear? 
And I'm taking her to Africa!
Anna! Anna, I love you!
Don't go! I love you!
His wife'e come back... with a baby.
She went in the church.
I sent a kid to tell him.
He told me you loved him.
That's why I never followed you.
For all the suffering he brought her... he's going to pay!
I'll find him! I'll make him pay!
He and his brat will pay!
Eighteen years later– 
West of Zanzibar.
King Lunkaboola... he...come!
Dead-Legs, if you keep bringin' those blackbirds here for your daft shows...they'll tumble to our game! 
Forget it, Doc! Get my box of tricks!
We'll end up by being a mess of chops for those cannibals!
Chops...nothin'! I'm goin' to be king of the whole pack!
Fire! Only...thing...great...Evil Spirit...fears!
White master...greater...than...all...Evil Spirits!
He...fears...nathing!
The idea, Babe...wastin' our good gin on them cannibals.
We've got the gin, Tiny!
I put kerosene in that bottle!
MIDNIGHT-- along deadly trails in the Heart of the Jungle.
Elephant Tusks-Ivory-Gold of the Congo.
VOODOOS! EVIL SPIRITS!
The alarm spread...the jungle flared with fires lighted to drive off the natives black fear.
Voodoo...come! Big...like...elephant!
No...try...take...ivory...out...some...more!
White master...no...'fraid...voodoo! 
Go...tell...tribe!
Cripes, Gov'nor... the Evil Spirit is at it again!
Evil Spirit...my eys!
It's somebody robbing me of my ivory!
I'll root out this crook!
I'll find him!
Dead-Legs is crazy to keep stealin' that bloke's ivory! He'll get nailed ...sure! 
We're the ones who are crazy!
We'll get nailed... not him!
Hide that mask! If those cannbals find out you're the voodoo we'll land in the stew-pot!
Dead-Legs, we've robbed that trader of plenty!
Let's beat it before he gets us!
No...I'm even goin' to sent him word where to find the man who's robbin' him!
I said 'NO'! He made me this thing that crawls... now I'm ready to bite!
Yair...bite! I'll bet that's what the cannibals did to Babe!
Babe's all right! I sent him to Zanzibar!
He's bringin' back a little sweetheart... for Doc!
A blonde one!
Yes, I know...I'm too sweet and pretty for a dump like this! I've heard that before!
Sure...you hate to lose the girl. But Dead-Legs has paid you plenty for keepin' her, hasn't he?
You're to tell her I'm a gentleman who's found her father...and I'm takin' her to him.
And I'll miss you, too.
You're the only mother I've ever known.
No, Joe...I've taken my last drink of that stuff.
That's right, Maizie.
That stuff never did no one no good. 
No, brother. Such beverages have never soiled my virgin lips.
On second thought, perhaps a little... to check my malaria.
Get Doc in here to fix my back!
Don't let him cut into you tonight!
He's full of that stuff!
I don't look very nice to meet my father.
He'll be so happy to see you that he'll never notice it. 
Are you...my father?
I'm not your father!
Please excuse me...but, you see,
I've never seen my father.
What's your game...his lies about being a gentleman taking me to meet my father?
I'll tell you my game... when I'm ready!
You're lucky! You're just in time to see a big native funeral!
Dead-Legs is chief Evil Spirit chaser round here.
It's a lovely custom! When a man dies they always burn his wife or daughter with him! 
That's the law of the Congo... and nothin' can change it!
You're a puzzle, Dead-Legs. One minute you're a fiend and the next...you're almost human.
You ain't here to understand me, Doc!
You're here cause I need you to keep me crawlin'! 
At that, I guess it's healthier to be with you than against you.
I wouldn't try gettin' away again if I were you.
Don't worry...I won't!
I learned my lesson last night!
Thanks...I guess I need it.
Take this...it will make you feel better.
Break that glass!
I might drink out of it...by mistake!
Come on...eat. You may as well make the best of it.
I'm particular who I eat with!
Feed her on the floor!
I'm down pretty low...but not so far that I'll stand for this!
Yair? Well, you'll stand for anything I say!
Say, Mister!
Don't get in trouble on account of me.
I'll eat with her!
I'm particular who I eat with, too!
I'm so sorry. I thought you'd gone away... so I gave them your clothes.
There's nothing too low for you to do, is there?
Why let him feed you with that stuff? 
You look as if you used to be somebody.
Let's not talk about that.
Just seeing you has made me do enough thinking.
Funny world! You tryin' to forget who you are... and me tryin'to find out who I am.
You're only a kid. You've still got a chance to be anything you want.
So have you...if you'll get hold of yourself.
You're not old.
Not old? From all I've seen and done...
I'm as old as Santa Claus!
Santa Claus?
Yes...I've heard of him.
Me...do...like...you say. Me...tell...white trader... you...steal...ivory. Three days...he...be...here.
Now...go...tell...tribe! 
Whitr trader...white girl's...father!
Three days passed - three days of planning.
I've been waitin' for you.
Word comes to me that it's you who's been stealing my ivory.
And I intend to pay you for everything.
Phroso...the magician!
Right you are... 
Mr. Crane!
I've got to give you credit... you've got another beauty.
But you've certainly made a terrible wreck of this one.
Aw, stop teasing her!
Give her what she wants!
You poor kid...what's he done to you?
You'll finish feeding her with this stuff do you hear? You'll finish!
Go easy, Doc!
I don't need you any more!
No, you don't...but she does!
And I love her, do you understand! I love her!
No, no...you can't have any more!
Don't you see...I love you! That's why!
Well, Phroso...you're putting on a great show!
Come on! What's this all about?
What are you wrecking that girl for?
You'll find out.
That's why I brought you here.
That's Anna's child!
YOUR DAUGHTER!
When I found Anna...she was dead!
And this brat of yours was with her!
Babe, tell Bumbu to carry out my orders!
I had her raised in the lowest dive in Zanzibar
...so you could be proud of her!
And now I've got a real treat comin' for her... and her father!
You're her father...not ME!
She's...your daughter! YOURS!
Now listen! Your wife never went away with me...
Do you hear? She never went with me! 
When she found out what
I did to you...she hated me!
You're feelin' kinda shaky, ain't you?
A lot you care how I feel?
Tiny, get her some brandy.
I've got a boat waitin'.
I'm goin' to take you away from all this.
Please drink this.
It'll make you feel better.
I was right! There's nothing too vile for you to do!
Keep out of this, Doc!
I told you I don't need you any more!
We...do...like...you...say!
We...shoot...white girl's father!
How did God ever put a thing like you on this earth?
Tiny! Babe! Take him out of this room!
Get in there and keep him alive, Doc!
Don't you let him die!
If he dies...the natives will come and take her!
He's dead! That means the girl goes with him!
If she's going...Dead-Legs will go first!
My baby! My own little girl!
The drums! They know he's dead!
White man...dead.
We...come...get...him.
I'll tell you the truth, dear!
You'll believe me...won't you?
On my oath he was not your father!
Your father is~
~your father died years ago.
Get her in that room!
They're comin' for her!
We...come...get...white girl.
We...make...her...ready...for...funeral...here.
Bring...tribe.
I'll never leave you, dear!
I'll never leave you!
We'll fight for you!
Whatever... we're going though it together!
You've got to save her!
You've got to tell them the truth!
It's too late!
They'd never believe me now!
Then we've got to make a break for it!
We couldn't get her across the compound!
Their eyes are glued on her!
There isn't a chance to stop them!
We've got to go through the ceremony with her.
You'll never get away with that!
Go tell her what we've got to do!
Fire...ready...for...white...girl.
I know what I'm doin', Doc!
I've got it all figured out.
Doc, I'd like her to say good-bay to my.
No! Don't believe him!
He's lying! It's a trap for me!
Please! Please, don't believe him!
Don't let them take me!
But I believe him!
You've got to trust him!
Dear, we've got to forget hate. He couldn't do what he plans to do...and still hate.
Gee, but you're a strange man.
White girl...funeral...always...have...box.
White man...must...go.
Evil Spirit...come...take...white girl.
No...believe!
Die Nibelungen
Die Nibelungen
Dedicated to the German People
Siegfried
Canto I
How Siegfried slayed the dragon
Thus spoke Mime, the artful blacksmith: "Siegfried, son of King Siegmund, ride home to Xanten. Even I cannot teach you any more!"
Have you never before heard of the king's castle at Worms on the Rhine and the kings of Burgundy who reign there?
I shall go there to win Kriemhild!
Show me the way to Worms or you will lose your life!
Farewell, Siegfried, son of king Siegmund. You will never get to Worms!
Young Siegfried understood the bird's song:
If the dragon slayer would bathe in the dragon's blood, his body would become invincible, forever safe against sword and spear!
Here ends the First Canto
Canto II
Now Volker, the bard, sang of Siegfried in front of Kriemhild, and how Siegfried came to Worms.
The violin sounded and Volker sang:
The dragon slayer, the son of Siegmund entered the realm of the Nibelungen.
He won the fight against the dragon.
There is no one on earth like him.
Thus spoke Alberich, the Nibelung: Spare my life and I will give you the wonder cap. Whoever wears it becomes unseen or may take whatever form he chooses!
Spare my life, O hero, and I will make you the richest king on earth!
The crown of the King of the Northland, the ruler of the Ice Giants is being wrought here by the Nibelungen.
No sword on earth compares with Balmung. The Nibelungen forged it in fire of blood.
All is lost. Cursed be the heritage of the heir!  Return with me to stone all ye whom from stone were wrought.
The violin sounded and Volker sang:
Siegfried became the dragon slayer
The lord of the Nibelungen Treasure.
Twelve kingdoms subdued the powerful. Twelve kings became his vassals.
Kriemhild, the daughter of Ute: "Volker, take this cloak, as reward for your song! I embroidered it myself.
Siegfried, son of King Sigmund, is outside the castle door with twelve of his knights, and asks for an audience with King Gunther.
Thus spake Hagen Tronje:  King Gunther, let the dragon slayer go his ways, don't welcome him here!
No one shall say that at Worms one does not know the way kings greet each other! Siegfried, son of King Siegmund, has my welcome!
I dreamt last night an awful dream...
And now this dream comes to my mind!
I come, King Gunther, to ask for your sister Kriemhild's hand.
King Gunther, too, has marriage plans. He has set his heart on a bold and mighty maiden.
Her name is Brunhilde and she is Queen of Iceland. Ringed by fire, her invincible castle towers in the Northland.
Why must you speak of Brunhilde?  You know she has set dangerous conditions: Thrice must the suitor best her in feats of strength or die!
Siegfried, the unique hero, has come to Worms at an opportune moment.  He may help us win Brunhilde for you!
Twelve kings have I for vassals.  But vassal am I to no man, now or ever!
Prepare for the quest to get your bride, King Gunther. It is Siegfried the mighty hero who will win Brunhilde for you. 
Here ends the Second Canto.
Canto III
How Siegfried won Brunhilde for Gunther
The dragon ship is carrying foreign heroes to your shores!
The foreigners are nearing the flaming sea.
If he be strong enough and favored by the gods, the flames will consume themselves and die.
My maidens, help me put on my armor, this will be a a fight I've never fought before!
Welcome, hero, for the fight for life or death!
Neither life nor death do I desire from you, Brunhilde.  It is King Gunther who woos you!
Before it is evening, King Gunther, your smothered weapons will adorn my hall.
Give me leave, King Gunther, to make ready your ship for your royal bride. We should set sail for home before sundown!
Let the triple battle begin, King Gunther!
You have to defeat me three times, o king: with the stone, the spring, and the spear.
Fear not, o king! Make you the motions and my strength will win each contest. I'll throw the stone for you and carry you in the jump.
Here ends the Third Canto
Canto IV
How Brunhilde enters Worms and how the kings celebrated their wedding.
Start the prepartions for marriage! The king's ship is arriving!
We have reached our destination, my queen!
Are you really the man who defeated me threefold?
I am your captive, but I shall never be your wife!
Keep your word, King Gunther, as I have kept mine!
If Kriemhild gives her consent, o hero, we shall celebrate a double wedding here today.
Since when is it customary among Burgundians to give the King's daughter in marriage to a vassal?
Siegfried is no vassal. I love him as though he were my brother.  We shall become blood brothers today!
Blood is mingling with red blood, the drops fuse inseparably.  Whoever forsakes loyalty to the bloodbrother will perish at the wayside, all honor is lost!
Brunhilde has been defeated, not cowed.  Shall the king of Burgundy be scorned by an obstinate woman?
Damned be the deed half done!  Will you forsake your friend who gave you his own sister?
The magic cap will change you into what you wish.  Take Gunther's form and break Brunhilde's iron will.
Here ends the Fourth Canto
Canto V
How, after half a year, Siegfried's gift to his bride, the Nibelungen Treasure, arrives in Worms and how the two queens quarrel with each other.
O king, Burgundy's glory is waning, we need the Nibelungen treasure.
It would be folly to reject what Siegfried offers you as a brother and Kriemhild is worth more than all the gold in the world!
See what I found!
Put away the armlet, Kriemhild, it guards an ugly secret. The Mistress of the Nibelungen Treasure has no need for it!
Listen, Kriemhild, at how I won the armlet - and keep silent!
The Nibelungen treasure has arrived!
How long, King Gunther, will Siegfried and Kriemhild tarry at the court of Burgundy?
They stay for the sake of my mother.  Would you, Brunhilde, be willing to take up the daughter's place for Queen Ute?
Your brother's honor is entwined with this armlet. It never should be seen again by human eyes!
It seems to me high time, King Gunther, that you send Siegfried back home to Xanten!
Never! He shall leave of his own freewill!
I am going to attend mass, my daughter. Follow me soon!
I'll go to the cathedral in the regalia of the queen of Burgundy!
The wife of a vassal may not precede the Queen of Burgundy!
How did you dare refer to Siegfried, my husband?
Siegfried introduced himself to me as Gunther's vassal and servant.  He did servant's work for my husband!
You, whom he disdained. You, whom he gave away. You dare to belittle Siegfried?
Make way for the Queen of Burgundy, vassal woman!
You recognize this armlet, you queen of Burgundy?
How came that armlet into your hand?
The carrier of the magic helmet who, disguised as Gunther, defeated you three times - Siegfried, my husband gave it to me!
King! Speaks your sister the truth?
Kill Siegfried!
Kill Siegfried!
Your babbling, hero, was worse than murder!
Kill Siegfried!
Siegfried is safe from your wrath.  None can slay the dragon slayer!
Save in one spot, where the linden leaf clung, is he vulnerable as other men!
King Gunther, let me deal with the dragon slayer!
We pledged blood brotherhood.  How can I be party to his death?
The one who took the armlet from me made me his wife, took my maidenhood from me!
Tronje, announce to the people of Burgundy that I invite everybody to a royal hunt to kill a mad dog and a ravening.
Here ends the Fifth Canto.
Canto VI
How Gunther betrayed Siegfried.
Can you keep a secret Kriemhild?
I once broke the oath to be silent and never will do so again!
Well then, the upcoming hunt might easily turn into a chase for men. A secret message warns me of war against Burgundy!
Good for you, Kriemhild, that your husband is the dragon slayer, the invincible!
Who warrants me that in the heat of battle not a chance blade should pierce where the lime leaf fell?
If you want me to protect him, I have to know the exact spot where the invicible could be hurt!
You are good counsel, you truest of true. I shall mark the spot with a little cross myself!
I come to take leave, Brunhilde.  We are starting for the hunt in the Odenwald forest.
Mind my vow, King Gunther, I shall not eat nor drink until my disgrace has been vindicated!
O my dear lord, don't leave me.  I dreamt last night a furious boar tore you to pieces!
O my dear lord, don't leave me.  I dreamt further that two mountains collapsed and buried you!
Today Gunther and I will reconcile.  Who else is my enemy?
Mother, I feel as if blood is draining from my heart!
The hunt in the Odenwald forest lasted from morning until sundown.
A handful of red gold for a cooling draught of white wine!
A wheel broke from the wagon loaded with wine. But I know of a cool brook nearby!
I always heard of you as the fastest runner of all heroes, let's run, you and I, for the first draught!
Gunther, my brother, let's be friends again!
When you are back from the spring!
Grim Hagen spoke:  "The hunt is over!"
Here ends the Sixth Canto.
Canto VII
How Kriemhild swears revenge to Hagen Tronje.
You may break your fast, Brumhild, Siegfried is dead.
Hail to you King Gunther! For the sake of a woman's lie, you have slain your most loyal friend!
I call to you for justice, King Gunther!  Hagen Tronje has slain my husband!
Loyalty for loyalty, Kriemhild.  His deed is ours. His fate is ours.  Our breast is his shield.
You might try to hide among my clan, behind the altars of God, or at the end of the world - You cannot escape my vengeance. Hagen Tronje!
Announce to King Gunther, my brother, the Queen of Burgundy is dead!
Thus ends the tale of Siegfried.
"BLONDE VENUS" 
A beautiful girl ... 
... without voice or talent ... 
... idol of the boulevard ... 
... Nana. 
Bordenave, director of the variety show, cynical and crude. 
The Countess Sabine Muffat. 
The Count Muffat, 
Chamberlain to the Empress. 
The Count of Vandeuvres, distinguished, skeptical, .. 
... the latest in a great lineage, owner of a stable of horses. 
George Hugon, nephew of the
Comte de Vandeuvres. 
Fauchery, journalist and writer. 
"Bravo, what elegance!" 
A passionate admirer. 
Hector de la Faloise 
That woman is the most chic. 
I will cover her with flowers. 
"I will congratulate Bordenave on his success. " 
"Aren't you also in the queue ... 
... of Nana's worshippers? " 
Why not? 
Our young star will be very flattered by your visit ... 
... Monsieur le Comte. 
Dear friends, let me ... 
... I present your excellency, 
Count Muffat. 
Francis, Nana's hairdresser ... 
... and her occasional banker. 
Zoe, Nana's maid ... 
... with blind faith in her mistress's future. 
Francis, hand me the comb. 
In an empty room, far from the husband,...
... under the watchful eye of the cynical Bordenave ... 
... an affair begins. 
Couldn't wait to see you ... 
... later at dinner? 
Muffat is crazy for you ... 
... and Fauchery, for his part also ... 
... wants the Countess to be free. 
Poor Muffat! 
I think this is my opportunity. 
Fauchery accompanies 
Countess Muffat home. 
Has Monsieur le Comte returned? 
Give me my overcoat and hat.
I am going out. 
The next morning, the husband's evidence of guilt... 
... are found at the threshold of his now ruined home. 
There are rumors about the  bad economic situation ...</ i> 
 ... one of the most famous Parisian theaters. </ i> 
 However, its director has resolved to put on a new work. </ i> 
Bordenave distributed the roles in the new work. 
Nana dreamed of playing the role of "The Little Duchess." 
 "The Little Duchess" </ i> 
Like Rose Mignon. 
And the role of "The Little Duchess" ... 
... all grace and elegant distinction ... 
There is a magnificant speech. 
It will be you, my little Rosa ... 
... who gives life to that role. 
And I? Do not you think that I could ... 
... interpret the role of whore? 
It is a great role that is made for me. 
I would be great. 
You may laugh, but for the elegant role ... 
... there is nobody better than me. 
Forgive me, Nana. I love you ... 
... and would do anything for you. 
I can not accept it. 
Why? 
Ah, don't be a child! 
Just because you are young. 
Money!  I spit on it. 
Ah! if only someone gave me what I want ... 
I want to have the role of the honest woman in their machine. 
What honest woman? 
"The Little Duchess." 
I know the role, listen. 
Perhaps you should accept
Bordenave's money. 
Will that be me? 
Oh, how good you are, my pet! 
It is her new lover, my dear, the count! 
If you're ready, you'll have your opportunity. 
This is an eggcup, 
Monsieur le Comte. 
How about giving Nana the role of the Duchess? 
Devil may care, but what will I tell the author! 
Who is it? 
Fauchery. 
Nana will take the role, without question. 
Is it not the case, Monsieur le Comte? 
Not Nana at any price! 
That is what I demand! 
Somewhat prematurely, 
Mignon Rose's friends ... 
... congratulated her for having gotten such a wonderful role. 
My little Rose, giving it up is such a small sacrifice. 
Modesty isn't her strong point ... 
... Nana enjoying her triumph. 
Look at that filthy whore who 
Stole my role ...! 
Oh ... that woman is most vulgar. 
Despite the financial support of 
Comte de Muffat, ... 
... Nana, who wanted to enter the world of great art, 
... merely suffered a huge failure. 
No smoking 
His latest creation was, for his friends ... 
... the burial of many hopes. 
Such a charming character! 
I present the Comte de Vandeuvres. 
Mr. George Hugon. 
Will you give me a few moments, Monsieur le Comte? 
We have had many expenses in the repair of the roof ... 
... and replacment of the upholstery. 
Everything is the product of envy, ... a conspiracy ... by those who dislike me. 
Leave the theater. 
You will be all mine. 
Cancelled 
And Nana, unable to be a great actress, became a great courtesan. 
There was an avalanche of gifts at Nana's home. 
Zoe was unable to sort all of her mistress's dresses. 
In childish love, George Hugon followed the trail of Nana, ... 
... as a pet. 
It is not my fault, is it, that these things are worthless. 
My poor Zizi! 
But if all this is not done things will break! You'll see! 
The Count of Vandeuvres 
What is your uncle doing here?
He wants me to leave you, he doesn't want me to see you again. 
I am going to tame your uncle.
And Nana, changing her attitude, adopts an angelic pose. 
This is my nephew, 
George Hugon, ... who worries me ... by his conduct. 
His presence here is all wrong. 
Do you understand what I mean? 
My uncle is violent. I cannot leave Nana alone with him. 
Come on, don't let yourself get into such a state. 
I swear to you that this child is as a brother to me. 
Is that true? 
Is madam home? 
Insolence ... 
Isn't an honorable woman always at home?
Moreover, I was with the Count of Vandeuvres, ... 
... a true gentleman. 
The two Vandeuvres horses participating in the "Grand Prix". 
The favorite. 
The unknown. 
The Jockey of Nana. 
The Jockey of Lusignan. 
Bordenave, accompanied 
Tatan Nenad ... 
... and Maria Blond ... 
Vandeuvres dreamt of separating Nana ... from her generous protector ... it would require a lot of money! 
And the gentleman was so perverted by contact with the courtesan, ... that he thought of winning such a large sum ... by no matter what method. 
Lusignan, the favorite, should not win first place ... 
Do what is necessary. 
It's Nana who must win the 
"Grand Prix". 
Maréchal, runner, bookmaker, former coachman of Vandeuvres, ... 
... nominees of the latter. 
Accept for me all bets in favor of Lusignan. 
No matter the price. 
The favorite ...! 
But it is crazy! 
Do not worry, it doesn't matter. 
In addition, I will cover you in writing. 
But, Monsieur le Comte, what will happen to Nana? 
Oh no, my dear friend, it has no chance! 
Ah, my dear SATIN, men are like beasts. 
Look, I am wearing your colors! 
Would you kindly bet for me ... 
... 2,000 Louis on Nana? 
And the innocent La Faloise, ... 
... ignorant of the arrangement between Vandeuvres and Maréchal, ... 
... chose the only bookmaker that he shouldn't have. 
You are very clever. 
Nana's bet. 
Maréchal, seeing La Faloise give the tickets to Vandeuvres, 
... did not understand what his employer was doing. 
Nana! Nana! 
Nana has won, 
I have been robbed! 
Thief! Thief! 
 I accept my responsibility ,...</ i> 
 all bets ... in favor of Lusignan ...</ i> 
 ... up to the sum of 2,000 Louis </ i>. 
The man bet against his own horse. 
He knew very well it wouldn't win. 
He stole one hundred thousand francs from me. 
He bet it on Nana instead. 
Too bad, Sir! 
Nana, the unknowing center of these disasters, ... preserves the soul source of her beauty. 
The favorites ... 
The procurer ... 
The hairdresser ... 
The Count of Vandeuvres! 
Nana, I have dishonored my name for you. 
My life is ruined, but I can start again ... 
... if you agree to marry me. 
Whatever the calamity, you don't think 
I am going to support you? 
I, too, offer you my name. 
I love you! 
And you, baby, if I twisted your nose it would give milk. 
Oh, hell!
The uncle, the nephew and their destitution. 
I have had hard times, too! 
Before going to the Tuilleries to attend the Empress, Muffat ... 
Muffat! 
Escuse me, I am speaking of Nana. 
On behalf of our old friendship, ... 
... forget that woman, ... 
... she poisons everything that she touches! 
I know, my friend. 
Georges could not decide to leave ... the room adjoining... the bathroom, where ... 
... Nana's dresses gave off the voluptuous ... 
... odor of perfume ... 
And middled aged one will enter covered with gold. 
You're covered with brocade, my friend! 
Want a bonbon? 
Be good, beg for it. 
On all fours! 
To Georges, witness to such baseness, ... was filled with envy and jealousy. 
Muffat, don't leave me alone! 
Vandeuvres resolved to finish ... 
Take this, my friends, and go. 
I need to be alone here. 
Nana, succumbs to terror ... 
She is obsessed with the bloody memory of Georges ... 
... unremovable stains. 
 ... my beloved Nana. </ i> 
Muffat's misbehavior had wearied the Countess. 
The news of the suicide of Vandeuvres spread throughout Paris. 
Bordenave, with Rose Mignon, the star of his theater, ... 
... and the whole company, goes to Nana to express ... 
... the most emphatic condolences that he can. 
Do not forget that you are an artist, your public life is not yours. 
You have to be stoic before the pain and come with us ... 
We must pretend for appearances sake ... 
Come on! 
Meanwhile, the Countess Muffat, half-hearted lover, ... 
... leaving for unhappy destinations ... 
Muffat, concerned about the fate of Nana ... 
Hello! Is anyone there? 
You dare laugh... 
... when your lady must be sick with despair? 
The mistress is out for a little fun... 
She has gone dancing. 
Enough! 
Dancing
Nana, the cancan! 
Bravo, Nana! 
What brings you here, my pet? 
Nana, things can not go on like this ... 
... You must change your life or we must be separated. 
How can you reproach me ... 
I who has your heart in my hand! 
Do not think only of pleasure! 
Pleasure! Do you think all this amuses me? 
They come to my house to fool me and cause me great pain ... 
... and then they treat me badly! 
You fighten me to death. 
Goodbye, Nana! 
Cursed pig! And to think that 
And I had to love you! 
Muffat, my beloved! 
Well, then?  Are you crying because of a man? 
I have also had many men ... 
... and diamonds and pearls. 
I was called the "Pomare Queen". 
Go search for Nana. 
And it happened, with a desperate impossibility, ... 
Muffat received a final ... stroke of misfortune ... 
Sir  ,...</ i> 
 The indignity of your conduct has dishonored us and scandalized the Tuilleries. </ i> 
 This forces me to leave today for a home much better than my own. </ i> 
 Goodbye. 
Sabine Muffat. </ I> 
Rats abandon a sinking ship. 
The old servants of Nana, after a full-scale pillage of her things... 
... she is carried by her friends to her deserted home, seriously sick. 
Bosc returns with the doctor. 
It is an incomprehensible disease, doctor, a mental breakdown ... 
... and then fever, a terrible fever! 
A few moments later. 
It is smallpox! 
Do not enter, Monsieur le Comte! 
The disease!
"IT" is that quality possessed by some... which draws all others with its magnetic force.
With "IT" you win all men if you are a woman - and all women if you are a man.
"IT" can be a quality of the mind as well as a physical attraction.
<u>Elinor Glyn</u> [signature]
WALTHAM 
THE BIGGEST STORE 
IN THE WORLD
Leaving his department store to his son, Cyrus P. Waltham... has gone to Herrin, Illinois, for the shooting.
"A gentleman to see you, sir."
Good luck
"For a good boy - on his first work day."
"If you ever go to work, Monty,
I'll do as much for you."
"IT" by Elinor Glyn
"IT" is that peculiar attribute that some people have, which attracts the opposite sex. 
The possessor of "IT" has it unconsciously and has irresistible sexual magnetism.
Mothers spoil boys with "IT", and women never refuse them!
"Old fruit, you've got 'IT'!"
"What the devil are you doing?"
"No - too bad - but you haven't any 'IT'!"
"Run away, Monty, the keepers are coming."
"I'm to look over the store. Come along."
"Hot socks - the new boss!"
"Sweet Santa Claus, give me him!"
"Let's have a double wedding - you and him - and me and the Prince of Wales!"
"Where do you figure?
The Prince is going to be our best man!"
"I've inspected all the lady employees - and not one of them has 'IT'!"
"You went over big, dearie!"
"Just you wait - I'll take the snap out of your garters yet!"
"Look! If I ever saw 'IT', that's 'IT'!"
"Shall we gnaw a chop at the club tonight?"
"Thanks, but I have an engagement at the Ritz."
"Could I - is it asking too much - would it be possible for me to - to drive you home?"
"I'd be very glad to go with you - if you'd ride in my car."
Betty lived in that fashionable downtown suburb -
Gas-house Gables -
"Would - could - do you ever dine?"
"I'd love to -"
"- at the Ritz!"
"Shall we dress?"
"Of course - how absurd!"
"Then I'll pop around at eight?"
"Toodles is hungry."
"The doctor says I can't go back to the store for a month - and
I can't let you do any more for me."
"Don't be sill, Molly! I won't go back on a pal!"
"That pest of a landlady and her friend just left.
The baby shouldn't do this - and I shouldn't do that -"
"If this was my baby,
I'd tell 'em where to head in!"
"I'm dining out tonight
- at the Ritz!"
Every evening in America, eighteen million blondes prepare to dine with gentlemen. One of the eighteen million -
"Mother, would you approve of my being Mrs. Cyrus T. Waltham?"
"He hasn't proposed yet
- but he's going to!"
"Mademoiselle's car is without."
"A nice, quiet table - in the corner, Mr. Montgomery?"
"I don't crave this table.
When I'm in the swim,
I want to be with the goldfish!"
"I'll take the same!"
"Who is the girl with Monty?"
"I don't know - but isn't she attractive?"
"Who's the blonde with
Mr. Waltham?"
"Adela Van Norman - they've been friends for years. Some day they'll marry and end it all."
"Of course you're reading
Elinor Glyn's latest story, 'IT'?"
"Monty was raving about it today. What is 'IT'?"
"Here's Elinor Glyn herself!
Let's ask her to tell us something about 'IT'."
"Madame Glyn, we've been talking about your latest story.
Just what is this 'IT'?"
"Self-confidence and indifference as to whether you are pleasing or not - and something in you that gives the impression that you are not at all cold. That's 'IT'!"
"If you have 'IT', you will win the girl you love."
"Cyrus, do you believe in 'IT'?"
"I certainly do!"
"I'm going to get my wish!"
"Oh, I must telephone!"
"Who is that charming girl with you?"
"This is a great pleasure."
"I'll bet you won't even recognize me, the next time we meet."
"I'll take the bet - and you can name the stakes."
In a shopgirl's day, the first thousand customers are the crabbiest.
"She always takes goods on approval - wears them around for six months - and then finds she doesn't approve!"
"- and the girl insulted me!"
"See that the garment is replaced - and send the salesgirl to my office."
"Young lady, in this store the customer is always right -"
"I'm the salesgirl!
Go on - bawl me out!"
"Well, anyway, I lose the bet for not recognizing you. What's the forfeit?"
"Oh, that wasn't a real bet.
I don't want anything -"
"Thanks, Adela, I'll be very happy to dine with you tonight."
"If you insist on paying your bet, you can take me out tonight."
"All right! Where?"
"Let's go to the beach - and do it up right!"
HOT DOGS!
Tasty and satisfying!
The best on the beach!
House of Amusements
"Hold me tight,
Mr. Waltham."
"Happy?"
"So you're one of those 
Minute Men - the minute you know a girl you think you can kiss her!"
Poverty is no disgrace -- until meddling neighbors hear of it.
"There's no use arguing!
We're going to take that baby to the Home, until you're well!"
"Get that story."
"If women like you would stay home and have babies of your own, we'd all be better off!"
"We're doing our duty.
The mother is ill - and she has no means of support."
"This is my baby!"
"I don't believe it."
"I'm the baby's mother -
I'm not sick - and I've got a job! Laugh that off!"
"Haven't I a job, Monty - at Waltham's? Tell 'em!"
"Is that the baby's father?"
"Him? He couldn't even give birth to a suspicion!"
"Who is your husband?
Have you a husband?"
"None of your business!"
"I say, Betty, this isn't really your child, is it?"
"Are you blind? Can't you see the resemblance?"
...forgive me for last night, Betty, and come to the theater with me tonight?
I promise not to make the same mistake
"I have tashted the milk of human kindnesh - an' it's a lot of Fermillac!"
"B'lieve it or not - my baby is its mother!"
The young mother fights hard for her baby, like a tigress in the sand confronting social workers.
A sharp-dressed man of the city declared that the girl had means enough and was able to keep all the obligations
"I'm the chappie - the man about town -
I'm the ample means!"
"We are investigating the case of a girl who says she's employed here -"
"- she - she - there's a baby."
"She gave the name of Betty Lou Spence."
The young mother clutched the little boy to her chest and defied all who tried to take the child.
"Thank you. You see, we had to verify her story."
"She's the one. She told me it's her baby - told me with her own lipsh!"
"Will you issue the bonus checks now, Mr. Waltham?"
"Are you mad at me because I slapped you?"
"I'm sorry - but a girl
has to do that.
You know how those things are!"
"Let's forget it.
We've got each other straight now, haven't we?"
"Yes - we have!"
"It's a star sapphire."
"It's pretty - but
I like diamonds better."
"Would you like some diamonds for yourself?"
"Betty, I'm crazy about you -"
"I love you, too."
"I'll buy you diamonds - clothes - everything you want -"
"What are you trying to do?
Offer me one of those left-hand arrangements?"
"I'm crazy about you!
Isn't that enough?"
"I suppose that's what you men call love!"
"Cancel my appointments, please. I'm leaving town for a week."
Betty was too poor to quit her job - and too proud to stay. So she quit!
Woman Offered Job
"I - I've come to forgive you."
"You don't mean you thought the baby was really mine?"
"There's its mother!
Can't you see the resemblance?"
"What a joke on Waltham -
I told him it was your baby!"
"He thought it was mine?"
"And he wouldn't even give me the benefit of the doubt!"
"I'll make him propose to me - and when he does, I'll laugh in his face! And you're going to help me do it!"
"But - he's going on a yachting cruise and - and I'm going with him!"
"Fine! I'll yacht with you."
"But, I say - what about your clothes?"
"That's the joke on you - you're going to buy them for me."
"Give me your word you won't tell him - anything!"
"Is Mr. Waltham aboard?"
"Not yet, sir."
"The party's off. We might as well go back."
"Oh no, sir! Mr. Waltham's expecting you - he'll be here any minute."
"Shall I show you to your cabins?"
"Something I can get for you, Mr. Montgomery?"
"No, thanks - I'm just prowling about."
"Just going for some - some - cigars."
"Everything ready, Captain?"
"Let's get under way."
"I'm not feeling so well."
"Tea, sir?"
"Feeling better, Monty?"
"I feel so low, old chap, that I could get on stilts and walk under a dachshund!"
"Shall I call Miss Van Cortland, sir? She's in her cabin."
"I say, I almost forgot about Miss Van Cortland."
"Miss Van Cortland - the - the girl I asked when you asked me to ask someone."
"Monty, who is Miss
Van Cortland?"
"You - you tell them, old thing."
"She's a very nice girl. I -
I believe Monty met her in Paris last summer."
"You idiot!
Who is this girl?"
"She's a ripping sort, really!
She's positively topheavy with 'IT'."
"Oh, Monty, am I late for tea? I'm so sorry."
"Mr. Waltham! It's been years, hasn't it?"
"Won't you have some tea?"
"Haven't I seen you some place?"
"In Paris, perhaps.
I'm there so often."
"Desirez-vous du sucre?"
"What do you mean by bringing her?"
"You know what sort she is - with her fatherless child!"
"But, I say - it isn't fatherless -"
"I won't have her on board! We'll put back to port."
"Do you think we'll have as nice a day as this all day, Captain?"
"That's the last time I'll get you out of a scrape!"
"Miss Van Cortland seems to be rather lacking in reserve, doesn't she?"
"Personally, I think she has plenty - in reserve!"
"Betty, I've something to say to you."
"Won't it wait until morning?"
"I've been thinking things over, Betty. I want to talk to you - seriously."
"Be serious - with you?
How silly!"
"I don't care what you've been - I want you to marry me!"
"I'd rather marry your office boy!"
"He asked me - and I laughed at him - and now it doesn't seem so darned funny, after all!"
"It was a ghastly joke, old man - her baby's just a moth -
I mean a myth!"
"It's her friend's baby!
And she's crying for you -
I mean Betty, not the baby -"
"But you said yourself it was her baby -"
"Take the wheel, Monty
- I'm going to find her."
"The ballast has shifted to port, sir - but there's no danger!"
"Silly of me, but I'm afraid I overdid it - made a left-hand turn and what not -"
"Take your girl friend.
I had to knock her cold - but maybe it'll do her good."
"Betty, where are you going?"
"I'm going home!"
"Monty will get you."
"Monty, I wonder if there's anything between them?"
"I'm afraid there is."
"We're just a couple of
It-less 'ITS'!"
Soon after its premiere, the film Metropolis was severely truncated and alterations were made.
From that time onward, more than a quarter of the film was assumed to have been lost.
Then, in 2008, a virtually complete version of the film was discovered in Buenos Aires.
What had been preserved was, however, a heavily damaged copy of the film that had been printed to 16mm film stock, lacking the full frame of the picture's original aspect ratio.
A considerable amount of the film reconstruction was able to be completed and the correct sequence of its editing established by means of this Argentinian material.
Spanish intertitles have been translated into German with the aid of the censor-cards.
In order to display in their correct position on the image the cropped elements taken from the 16mm negative, the missing portion of the frame has been marked by black.
The intertitles appear with their original graphic treatment.
Those titles which appear in a different typeface (like the one used here) have been added to summarise the content of still-missing scenes as far as is necessary to facilitate an adequate understanding of the storyline.
Shorter gaps are indicated by small segments of black leader.
This film was produced by Ufa and is distributed courtesy of Parufamet.
Direction: Fritz Lang.
Scenario: Thea von Harbou.
Production Design: Otto Hunte,
Erich Kettelhut, Karl Vollbrecht.
At the Camera:
Karl Freund, Günther Rittau.
Music: Gottfried Huppertz.
Sculptor: Walter Schultze-Mittendorf.
Metropolis, a novel by Thea von Harbou, appeared in the publication
Illustriertes Blatt, Frankfurt, and in book form from August Scherl Verlag G.m.b.H.
The personages in the film:
Joh Fredersen - Alfred Abel
Freder, Joh Fredersen's son -
Gustav Fröhlich
Rotwang, the inventor
- Rudolf Klein-Rogge
The Thin Man - Fritz Rasp
Josaphat - Theodor Loos
11811 - Erwin Biswanger
Grot, the guardian of the Heart-Machine -
Heinrich George
The Creative Man
The Machine-Man
Death
The Seven Deadly Sins
Maria - Brigitte Helm
Epigraph:
THE MEDIATOR BETWEEN HEAD AND HANDS
MUST BE THE HEART!
Shift change.
Deep beneath the earth lay the
City of the Workers.
As deep beneath the earth as the City of the Workers lay, so high above it towered the complex known as the "Sons' Club", with its lecture halls and libraries, its theatres and stadiums.
Fathers, for whom every revolution of a mechanical wheel meant gold, had bestowed upon their sons the wonder of the Eternal Gardens.
Which of you ladies shall today have the honour of entertaining Master Freder,
Joh Fredersen's son?
Look! These are your brothers!
Look - !
These are your brothers!
Who - was that?
But this was what happened to Freder - the son of Joh Fredersen, the master of Metropolis - as he sought out the girl:
To the new Tower of Babel - to my father - !
Why is it, Josaphat, that I learn of this explosion from my son, and not from you - !
Details - !
What were you looking for in the Machine-Halls, Freder?
I wanted to look into the faces of the people whose little children are my brothers, my sisters...
Your magnificent city, Father - and you the brain of this city - and all of us within the light of this city... -
...and where are the people, Father, whose hands built your city - ?
Off where they belong...
...off where they belong...?
...in the Depths...?
And if those in the Depths one day rise against you?
The chief foreman of the Heart-Machine, Grot, - with an important message...
There were two more copies of those damnable plans, Herr Fredersen...
...in the pockets of two men who met with an accident today at the M-Machine...
How is it, Josaphat, that these plans were brought to me by Grot, rather than by you?
Apply to the G-Bank for your remaining wages...
Father, do you know what it means to be dismissed by you? -
It means: To be sent below! -
Father - below! Into the Depths - !
Do you know what it means to be dismissed like that by Joh Fredersen?
Would you like to come with me,
Josaphat?
Go home, Josaphat, and wait for me...
I still have a long way to go tonight...
Into the Depths, - to my brothers...
From today on I wish to be kept precisely informed of my son's every move...
Brother...
...the Machine! There needs to be someone at the Machine!
There will be someone at the machine...
ME.
Listen to me...
I want to trade my life with you...
Josaphat.
99th Block. House 7, 7th Floor.
Wait for me - both of you...
Josaphat.
99th Block. House 7, 7th Floor.
In the middle of Metropolis, there stands a strange house that the centuries had overlooked.
The man who dwelled within was Rotwang, the inventor.
Hel
Born to bring me happiness and a benediction to all mankind.
Lost to Joh Fredersen.
Died giving life to Freder, Joh Fredersen's son.
A mind like yours, Rotwang, should be able to forget...
Only one time in life did I forget something: that Hel was a woman - and you a man...
Let the dead lie, Rotwang...
She's dead for you as she is for me...
For me she isn't dead, Joh Fredersen - for me she lives - !
Do you think the loss of a hand is too high a price for recreating Hel - ?!
Do you wish to see her - ?!
Now, Joh Fredersen - ?!
Isn't it worth losing a hand to have created the man of the future - the Machine-Man - ?!
24 more hours of work - and no man, Joh Fredersen, will be able to differentiate the Machine-Man from a mortal - !
The woman is mine, Joh Fredersen!
Hel's son was yours!
And what brings you my way,
Joh Fredersen?
I need your advice - as usual, when all my experts fail me...
Can you decipher for me these plans that for months have been getting discovered in the pockets of my workers?
...at two... once my shift ends!
She has summoned us again...
Father - ! Father - !
Will ten hours never come to an end - ??! !
- it's a blueprint of the two-thousand-year-old catacombs deep below the lowest levels of your Metropolis...
I should like to glean what my workers are doing exactly in those catacombs...
Today I shall tell you the legend of THE CONSTRUCTION
OF THE TOWER OF BABEL...
The Legend of THE CONSTRUCTION
OF THE TOWER OF BABEL
Come! Let us build a tower whose zenith shall reach unto the stars!
And at the tower's zenith we shall write:
Great is the world and its Maker!
And great is Man!
...but those who had conceived of the Tower of Babel could not build the Tower of Babel.
The task was too great.
So they paid wages to outside hands...
But the hands that built the Tower of Babel knew nothing of the dream of which the head that had conceived it had been fantasising.
The hymns of praise of one man became the curses of others.
The same language was spoken, but these men did not understand one another...
Great is the world and its Maker and great is Man
HEAD and HANDS require a Mediator.
THE MEDIATOR BETWEEN HEAD AND HANDS
MUST BE THE HEART!
And where is our Mediator,
Maria - ?
Wait for him!
He will surely come!
We will wait, Maria...!
But not for much longer - !
Oh Mediator, have you finally come...
You summoned me - here I am!
Rotwang, give the Machine-Man the likeness of this woman...
I shall sow discord between them and her!
I shall destroy their belief in this woman -
Leave me alone now, Joh Fredersen...
You'll find the way back without me...
You fool! Now you shall also lose the last remaining thing you still had from Hel... your son...
Until tomorrow, in the cathedral!
END OF THE PRELUDE
INTERMEZZO
Freder witnesses a monk at the pulpit who preaches:
"Verily, I say unto you: the days of which the Apocalypse speaks draw nigh!"
The monk's hand points to the Bible, in which it is written:
"And I saw a woman sit upon a scarlet coloured beast, full of names of blasphemy, having seven heads and ten horns.
And the woman was arrayed in purple and scarlet colour, having a golden cup in her hand.
And upon her forehead was a name written, a mystery:
BABYLON THE GREAT, the Mother of Abominations ofthe Earth.
And I saw the woman drunken with the blood ofthe Saints."
You will annihilate Joh Fredersen - him and his city and his son - !
GLUTTONY
AVARICE
PRIDE
LUST
ENVY
ANGER
SLOTH
Had you come earlier, you wouldn't have frightened me...
I now beg of you: stay away from me and my beloved...!
Where is the one whose clothes you are wearing?
Josaphat.
99th Block. House 7, 7th Floor.
Would you please wake Georgy up?
He must lead me to the Workers' City at once...
No. 11811, get back to the Machine and forget that you ever left it - understood?
I have to have someone who's faithful to me, Josaphat, - otherwise, how shall I attain the end-goal of my path - ?!
I must go on, Josaphat, - must now, on my own, seek out the person to whom Georgy was supposed to lead me...
Tonight, Josaphat - tonight when I come back...
Josaphat.
99th Block. House 7, 7th Floor.
So, what price are you demanding for leaving this residence tonight?
You still don't seem to have grasped who sent me here...
CENTRAL BANK OF METROPOLIS
This man doesn't want his son to find you still here tonight!
In three hours' time
I shall be calling for you!
Come! It is time to give the Man-Machine your face!
Where is Maria - ?!
She's with your father...
I'm telling you, she is with your father - !
"She is the most perfect and most obedient tool that a man has ever possessed!
Tonight you shall see how she holds up before the eyes ofthe upper hundred.
You shall see her dance, and if only one single person recognises the machine in her,
I will call myself a bungler who never succeeded at anything!
C. Rotwang"
"C. A. Rotwang requests Herr Joh Fredersen to be his guest this evening."
I want you to go to those in the Depths in order to annihilate the work of your prototype!
"C. A. Rotwang requests Herr Joh Fredersen to be his guest this evening."
Verily, I say unto you: the days of which the Apocalypse speaks draw nigh...!
All Seven Deadly Sins, on her behalf - !
Death overtakes the City - !
END OF THE INTERMEZZO
The Revelation of St. John
Avalun Publishing, Hellerau
I escaped from the Thin Man wearing this attire...
But for ten days your father's bloodhound has been making the Workers' City unsafe...
The only thing keeping the workers in check is their expectation for the Mediator promised unto them...
Even stranger things have been happening, Freder...
On that evening when you fell ill...
...once the best of friends... because of that woman...
...the other man... on that same evening...
...the Eternal Gardens lie abandoned... but night after night in Yoshiwara...
And this woman, at whose feet all sins are heaped...
...is also called Maria...
That same woman that those in the Depths regard as a saint - ?!
Many now go to the City of the Dead, to a woman they have judged to be as true as gold.
The Mediator is not likely to miss that occasion...
Whatever happens tonight: it is my express order to allow the workers to do as they please...
Joh Fredersen wants to let those in the Depths use force and do wrong so that he can claim the right to use force against them...
When you spoke to your poor brothers, you talked about peace, Maria... today a mouthpiece of Joh Fredersen incites them to rebel against him...
She will destroy their belief in the Mediator!
You know I've always talked about peace... but your Mediator hasn't come...
You've waited long enough!
Your time has come - !
...but I've tricked Joh Fredersen!
Your clone does not obey his will - only mine alone!
Who is the living fodder for the machines for Metropolis - ?!
Who smears the machine-joints with their own marrow - ?!
Who feeds the machines with their own flesh - ?!
Let the machines starve, you fools - !
Finish them off - ! !
Do them in - these machines - ! !
You aren't Maria - ! ! !
YOU ARE NOT MARIA - !
Maria talks of peace, not murder - !
This is not Maria - ! !
Joh Fredersen's son - ! !
Do him in, the dog, in his white silken hide - ! ! !
Get your women, your sons, out of the Workers' City!
Let no-one stay behind!
Death to the machines - ! ! !
In the attic of his home,
Rotwang displays for Maria his ever-growing intoxication with his triumph over Fredersen:
" - and twice over did I trick Joh Fredersen - !
For I concealed from him that his son wants to be the Mediator of your brothers - and is in love with you - !"
Maria isn't the only one listening to Rotwang.
On the other side of the attic's window,
Joh Fredersen was eavesdropping...
Joh Fredersen breaks into Rotwang's attic.
He wrestles with his old rival and overtakes him.
Maria is free.
...faithful after all...
Come, Freder!
We still have to go through the Workers' City.
Women and men, let no-one miss out on today - !
Death to the machines - ! !
Not one man - not one woman has stayed behind - !
Leave the machines - !
Let them race to their death - !
To the Heart-Machine - !
DANGER
Open the gates!
You have to open the gates!
If the Heart-Machine perishes, nothing in the Machine-District will be left standing - ! !
Have you lost your minds - ??
If the Heart-Machine perishes, the entire Workers' City will be laid to waste - ! !
Where are your fathers, your mothers?
Do you have any idea that your son is amongst the workers?!
Yes - you! You're Maria - !
To the air shafts - quickly! Quickly!
The reservoirs have burst! The city is drowning - !
We'll take the children to the Sons' Club!
Why are all the lights out?
I need to know - !
Where is my son?! ! !
Tomorrow thousands will ask in fury and desperation:
Joh Fredersen, where is my son - ?!
Where are your children??!
The city is drowned, the shafts are totally flooded - ! !
Who bade you attack the machines, without which you're finished, you idiots - ??!
It's the witch's fault - !
We'll be looking on as the world goes to the devil - !
Find the witch; this is all her fault - !
Strike her dead - ! !
Now I'm going to take you home, my Hel - !
The witch - ! the witch - !
There she is - ! there she is - !
Where are our children, you witch, you - ??!
Burn the witch. -
To the stake with her! ! !
To the stake with her - ! !
Hel - ! My Hel - ! !
Your children... saved - ! ! !
Head and hands want to join together, but they don't have the heart to do it...
Oh Mediator, show them the way to one another...
THE MEDIATOR BETWEEN HEAD AND HANDS
MUST BE THE HEART!
Restoration: F. W. Murnau Stiftung, Wiesbaden jointly with Deutsche Kinemathek -
Museum für Film und Fernsehen, Berlin in co-operation with Museo del Cine Pablo
C. Ducros Hicken, Buenos Aires
Supported by:
Contributors of material and guidance:
Special Thanks:
Reconstruction and synchronisation of the original music by Gottfried Huppertz:
Frank Strobel
Instrumentation of the missing parts of the score:
Marco Jovic
Musical notation:
Jörg Peltzer
Edition on behalf of ZDF/ARTE:
Europäische Filmphilharmonie -
Die Film Philharmonie GmbH
Performed by the:
Rundfunk-Sinfonieorchester Berlin an ensemble of the
Rundfunk Orchester und Chöre GmbH
Musical direction:
Frank Strobel
Music production:
Nina Goslar, ZDF/ARTE
Stefan Lang,
Deutschlandradio Kultur
Here, overlooking the city, is the mansion of Claire Lescot, famous singer, and unusual woman 
Her riches release her from ordinary illusions. Claire Lescot has a kind of "international" salon, where she meets this afternoon with notable personalities of the world. 
The fantasy of that curious artist, a famous clown, an academic, a former minister a boxer, an industrialist, and a poet come together here pell-mell 
... with Frank Mahler, a great businessman (Kellerman).  
Kranine, "the Apostle", with his theory of the "humanitarian" 
... a practitioner of despotism, the maharajah Djorah of Nopur ... 
Philippe Hériat 
Among all those fans of Claire Lescot, the queen, there is a hidden rivalry... 
Each dreams of attracting this famous woman to himself. whose triumphs have not reduced loneliness. 
Concert ... the protests 
The return of Claire Lescot threatens to make much noise. The upcoming marriage of the singer to Frank M.lh.r was just announced.  He "merely" has twelve important theaters in the United States. 
This announcement, and the strange maneuvers precipitated it, would have upset certain rivals of the ambitious artist. 
And it could be that her recital tomorrow night will be enriched with an unexpected chorus of protests. 
At last!... Claire .... 
Even her close friends call her "The Inhuman Woman" 
Georgette LeBlanc 
In this small court of powerful international people where can be heard the most secret things... 
... the servants wear a judicious mask to make them deaf to what is said ... and always smiling. a final guest is late ... Claire decides not to wait for him. 
The late one ... 
... a young engineer, passionate about mechanical sports and the magic of modern science ... 
Einar Norse ... 
Jaques-Catelain
Claire, with her glory, her power, her mystery, deeply impresses this young fan... does he dare enter ... so late?
Yes, after my two concerts, I resolved to leave. I will take a trip around the world alone. 
... unless something detains me here ... 
SOMETHING 
Anything? 
WHAT? 
.. SUCCESS ... 
.. LOVE ... 
The unexpected ... 
She will go! He must speak to her this evening .. what would keep her there! 
Why this world tour? Why not go to America? There you may do as you please.  I offer you all my theaters. 
NO ... thanks ... I am not interested in what I conquer! 
Concerned about Claire's departure, "The Apostle" also proposes 
The wheel of society is always turning. 
For a woman of action such as you, what could be better than the PROGRESS OF HUMANITY 
... our movement is going forward in Mongolia. Imagine what role you could play ... there. 
I am not interested in humanity; I just want exceptional love. 
While Claire had provided for entertaining distractions 
Djorah ... himself ... 
... A "crown"? 
... I'm not dead yet! 
... Kill me first! 
Waiting ... 
Claire's indifference has exasperated the impatient Einar ... 
I do not want you to leave 
... because I ... you they are playing with fire ... 
I am tired of fighting ... of arguing with you ... I need your strength 
... you ... for myself alone
... if you refuse... 
... I will kill myself! 
If you can destroy your life so easily, it is not worth very much. 
Claire's irony increased Einar's desperation. 
SOMEONE SAID ... that our great singer Cl. r. Le.c.t has finally accepted the Indian crown that a charming maharajah offered her. 
Without you this world is hateful to me ... a blow in one will throw me into the other. 
Without you this world is hateful to me ... a blow in one will throw me into the other. a little farm girl, an "innocent" one... 
It is - already - the morning ... Claire has just learned ... 
... The search was in vain.  The body has been lost in the water ... 
This evening
 - Claire Lescot -
Vocal Recital 
Modern Music 
... She will not sing, I think, after that! 
News 
He loved the beautiful, too ... 
... and that is what has killed him.
Einar Norse, a young engineer who, yesterday afternoon, left Claire's house, was found dead, after crashing his car down a fatal slope. 
... "the Apostle" was excited for playing his part in the downfall of someone who frustrated his personal ambition. 
Punish this creature who insults humanity ... return, this evening, to her show. 
Tauberger Theater Director 
Champs Elysees 
Unable to sing tonight reimburse box office from personal income 
Claire Lescot 
This renunciation of her singing, due to social conventions imposed Claire, created a cruel hesitation but the reason for her rebellion against her sadness ... was it a betrayal of her duty to serve her art?  Must she disappoint those who expect her to perform? for fear of the murmurings ... of cowardice before the sentimental hypocrisy of humanity? 
Rumor has it that you will not sing this evening ... Is this true? ... 
... it is wrong ... I will sing this evening ... ... 
Everywhere, little by little, the slander curiously spreads. 
News 
He loved the beautiful one too much ... and that is what has killed 
Einar Norse, a young engineer who, yesterday evening, left Claire's house, was found dead (voluntarily, they say), thanks to a fall down a fatal slope. 
This Lescot, what an outrageous life! 
She should be locked up! 
A young engineer commits suicide for an artist. 
She shouldn't receive any forgiveness ... a woman without a stomach! 
BY THE AFTERNOON 
... The audience is large, shaken by the tragedy ... the scandal among the last to arrive 
The ballet is going to end.  The room is crowded 
After a brief intermission, Claire appears 
Now a curious noise greeted Claire's entry
Suddenly Kranine attacked 
The entire room is passionate - feverish - for or against this "inhuman" woman ... 
... to boldly hold her head up... 
... and achieve such a triumph and while the room is emptying 
No ... not for anyone! 
I would like to speak to you .. in another place - of Einar Norse ... 
They just found his body horribly mutilated ... to legally identify the body, two witnesses are required 
Please be the second witness ... in your home ... tomorrow ... at seven ... 
Towards the strange laboratory where Einar Norse's body lies ... at the appointed time 
Claire ... fainting from shock ... 
... unexpected music ... hateful ... in this tortured atmosphere, Claire is increasingly ... excited ... haunted ... suddenly the wind ... when she finally leaves to discover the Secret of her immense human suffering ... suddenly please excuse this ... mysterious ... 
At the top ... No: 
I did not leave your home to die, but, clearly, I remembered your saying
If you can destroy your life so easily, it is not worth very much. 
And then I wanted them to think me dead in order to make you know - even more strongly KNOW - what you hid ... 
You do not know anything! 
I know you're here! 
And that if not for this, you would never have come here! 
Yes! I know something more ... or here some thing is going to make you abandon your trip. 
While, unarmed, Claire smiled at this mystery, down below, Djorah ... 
Beware! 
This device is dangerous ... 
DANGER OF DEATH 
Until tomorrow ... here ... to KNOW? 
The prince's jealousy exasperates him ... 
Claire wants to be alone, her spirit surprisingly obsessed 
All this magical science at Einar's home attracts Claire so unexpectedly, like something as strong as love. 
At the scheduled time at the home of the wise "enchanting" modern 
THE WORLD IS HERE 
See ... Why leave? 
It is enough for you to just sing here in front of the microphone. 
And while the TSF radio voice will broadcast your voice everywhere, on the same waves, by a new process, the image of your listeners will come back. 
On this television screen you will be able to see, while you sing, the people who listen to you all over the earth. 
She travels without moving through space 
... across the joy and pain of people ... 
She forgets the time ... 
... And my concert! ... it is appalling ... 
And spectators in front of the theater 
Yes ... it is a new device attached to the one where you had to burn yesterday, and produces a force of unexpected effects. 
... perhaps it is possible to revive the movements of a heart, heal humanity from death, but I have not dared to experiment on anyone. attention ... The machine ... ... 
Will you be at home this evening ... after the theater? 
But ... yes. 
The concert is over 
I forbid you to go there. take care ... you will not arrive there alive 
From Einar. 
A reptile with a deadly poison from Asia 
To Mr. Norsen's house 
Then Einar, stupefied, discovers ... 
And now the great laboratory beats with activity ... 
He tries a bold experience to try to save Claire 
Einar decided to try again, and under his command everything was animated... 
... as in a symphony of work 
I wanted a dangerous experience at any price 
... it was for love of . .. 
... humanity ...
{250}{465}Sunrise|A Song of Two Humans
{2460}{2642}This song of the Man and his Wife|is of no place and every place:
{2652}{2818}you might hear it anywhere at any time.
{2842}{2973}For wherever the sun rises|and sets in the city's turmoil or
{2983}{3143}under the open sky on the farm
{3153}{3364}life is much the same:|sometimes bitter, sometimes sweet
{3466}{3638}Summertime... vacation time
{6038}{6114}Among the vacationists was|a Woman of the City.
{6116}{6188}Several weeks had passed since her coming|and still she lingered.
{13200}{13413}"They used to be like children, carefree...|always happy and laughing..."
{14127}{14208}"They used to be like children, carefree...|always happy and laughing..."
{14262}{14473}"Now he ruins himself for that woman from the city -|Money-lenders strip the farm - "
{14882}{15026}"Now he ruins himself for that woman from the city -|Money-lenders strip the farm -
{15028}{15102}and his wife sits alone."
{18871}{18948}"Tell me!|You are all mine?"
{19318}{19413}"Sell your farm...|come with me to the City."
{19618}{19668}"...and my wife?"
{19889}{19953}"Couldn't she get
{19960}{20063}"Couldn't she get drowned?
{20370}{20500}"...then overturn the boat...|it will look like an accident."
{21112}{21240}"Leave this behind...|come to the City!"
{21262}{21305}"Come to the City!"
{23780}{23913}"...after the boat has capsized,|save yourself with these bulrushes."
{23995}{24054}"The rushes will hold you up.
{24056}{24186}Scatter them before you reach the shore|and tell everyone she drowned by accident."
{34044}{34098}"We're going for a trip across the water.
{34100}{34191}I may not be back for quite a while."
{47018}{47093}"Don't be afraid of me!"
{51142}{51215}"Don't be afraid of me!"
{61076}{61241}"God is giving you,|in the holy blonds of matrimony, a trust.
{61243}{61313}She is young... and inexperienced.|Guide her and love her..."
{61363}{61469}"...keep and protect her from all harm."
{61980}{62038}"Wilt thou LOVE her?"
{63228}{63298}"Forgive me!"
{71332}{71373}"Manicure?"
{72210}{72290}"You'd look grand|with a high polish!"
{76526}{76576}"Come again!"
{76702}{76821}"Thank you!|And you must come and see us some time."
{78558}{78678}"Congratulations! She is the|sweetest bride I've seen this year."
{85095}{85129}"FARMERS!
{85131}{85228}If you want to sell your home|and move to the city... We Pay Cash!"
{88112}{88194}"Hit the hole...|make the little piggy roll!"
{95200}{95282}MIDSUMMER|(Peasant Dance)
{104646}{104715}"We'll sail home by moonlight...|another honeymoon."
{132373}{132409}"...I couldn't give up hope.
{132411}{132510}I know the tides...|I went around the Point..."
{135899}{136051}FINIS
Carl Laemmle presents The Phantom of the Opera
From the Celebrated Novel by Gaston Leroux
With Lon Chaney, Mary Philbin and Norman Kerry
Directed by Ruper Julian
The Phantom - Lon Chaney
Christine Daae - Mary Philbin
Vicomte Raoul de Chagny - Norman Kerry
Ledoux - Arthur Edward Carewe
Simon Buquet - Gibson Gowland
Comte Philip de Chagny - John Salnpolis
Florine Papillon - Srilla Edwards
Carlotta - Mary Fabian
Carlotta's Mother - Virginia Pearson
Sanctuary of song lovers,
The Paris Opera House, rising nobly over medieval torture chambers, hidden dungeons, long forgotten.
Melody floats through hall and corridor, even to the executive offices, where a strange deal is being closed.
Now the Notary's seal, gentlemen, and you are the fortunate new owners.
It is barely possible you may hear of a ghost, a Phantom of the Opera!
The attendant of Box Five will not laugh when you ask about the opera ghost!
You jest, Messieurs! We are not children!
Who occupies Box Five?
I do not know.
I have seen only the cloaked figure of a man who hides his face and will not speak!
Is it the Phantom?
The Phantom! The Phantom is up from the cellars again!
We saw him for an instant...a gray shadow...and he was gone!
He had no nose!
Yes, he did, it was enormous!
That man came out of the cellars...just after we saw the Phantom.
Could it be that he...?
Joseph Buquet has really seen the Phantom! Let's ask him...
His eyes are ghastly beads in which there is no light... like holes in a grinning skull!
His face is like leprous parchment, yellow skin strung tight over protruding bones!
His nose...there is no nose!
Have a care, Buquet...ghosts like not to be seen or talked about!
Come, I'll show you where I saw him... in the scene-dock of the third cellar.
I saw him there! A flash of shadow, and he was gone!
My daughter, Carlotta has been insulted!
She, the favorite prima donna of the Paris Opera!
Mlle Carlotte,
Christine Daaé will sing the role of "Marguerite", Wednesday night!
Any jealous attempt on your part to interefere with the performance will prove disastrous to your career.
The Phantom
"No ghost will frighten Carlotta!
Wednesday evening you will hear her singing!"
Wednesday night found Mlle.
Carlotta strangely ill, and Christine Daae singing "Marguerite'.
"What is this I hear about Christine favoring some mysterious admirer. instead of you, Raoul?"
"Don't worry, my dear Brother- nothing shall interfere with our love.
"I hear alot of rumors, Raoul-be careful!"
"At last you have realized your ambition, my darling, and now we shall be married."
"I can never leave the Opera, Raoul.
You must forget out love."
From hidden places beyond the walls a melodious voice, like the voice of an angel, spoke to her.
"Christine tonight I placed the world at your feet!"
"To you I have imparted the full measure of my art.
You will triumph - all Paris will worship you!"
But I warn you, you must forget all worldly things and think only of your career - and your Master!"
"Soon, Christine, this spirit will take form and command your love!"
"Call for me when you will. I shall be waiting."
In Mlle. Carolotta's correspondence there appeared another letter, edged in black!
Mlle Carlotta
If you appear tomorrow night you must be prepared for a great misfortune, and therefore I advise you to be "ill"
The Phantom
"Christine Daae's friends are plotting again!
But my daughter shall sing tomorrow night, come what may!"
My dear Managers -
The role of "Marguerite" shall be sung again tomorrow evening by Christine Daae, instead of Carlotta
The Phantom
P.S. If you refuse this you will present Faust in a house with a curse on it.
Encouraged by her mother, Carlotta defied every warning, and the following evening appeared as - "Marguerite'.
"So far so good - for a house with a curse on it!"
I cannot explain, but you must never intend to see me again. - Christine
"Beware! She is singing to bring down the chandelier!"
"Christine I have come for you -'
"I am ready, Master - waiting!"
Walk to your mirror, my dear - - have no fear!"
"Christine, it is I - your Master!"
"Look not upon my mask - think rather of my devotion which has brought you the gift of song."
A black lake, hidden from man and the sun, leading to the Phantom's rendezvous.
"I have brought you here - - five cellars underground -"
" - because I love you!"
"For long weary months I have awaited this hour!"
"So that which is good within me, aroused by your purity, might plead for your love."
"That is where I sleep."
"It keeps me reminded of that other dreamless sleep that cures all ills - forever!"
"You - Your are the Phantom!"
"If I am the Phantom, it is because man's hatred has made me so."
"If I shall be saved, it will be because your love redeems me."
"Men once knew me as Erik, but for many years I have lived in these cellars, a nameless legend."
Another Phantom Tragedy
Christine Daae Disappears
Opera Singer Mysteriously Vanishes Following Chandelier Disaster
The night passed - a night of vague horrors -- tortured dreams--
Christine
My dear Christine
You are in no peril as long as you do not touch my mask.
You will be free as long as your love for the spirit of Erik overcomes your fear.
Erik
Don Juan Triumphant
"Since first I saw your face, this music has been singing to me of you and of -
-- love triumphant!"
"Yet listen -- there sounds an ominous undercurrent of warning!"
"Feast, your eyes - glut your soul, on my accursed ugliness!"
"Oh, mad Christine, who would not heed my warning!"
"If you love me, as you say, let me go.
I promise to your slave forever!"
I shall prove tlo you the debth of my love.
You may return to your world for the present.
You may sing in the opera once more."
"But, remember, you are mine-mine-and you shall not see your lover again!
If you do, it is death to you both!"
"Oh, I swear it, I swear it! I shall never see him again!"
Although I gave my word never to see you again I must.
I will be at the Bal Masque tomorrow night, but not alone beware!
Christine
One night each year, all Paris mingled, forgetful of caste-- the merry. mad Bal Masque de l'Opera.
Into the midst of revelry, strode a spectral figure, robed in red.
"Beneath your dancing feet are the tombs of tortured men- this does the Red Death rebuke your merriment!"
High above Paris on the roof of the Opera!
Are we alone, Raoul? Can anyone overhear what we say?
I have seen him, Raoul! I have seen the Phantom!"
He is a monster- a loathsome beast!
You must saveme from him, Raoul!
Mlle. Carlotta, under the spell of his curse will never sing again.
Tomorrow I take her place in Faust.
After the performance you must take me away!"
I shall be at the stage door. We will flee to England.
She has betrayed me!
Not that way- this way!
That was the Opera ghost!
-ERIK-
Born during the Boulevard Massacre
Self educated musican and master of Black Art
Exited to Devil's Island for criminal insane
ESCAPED
NOW AT LARGE
This is your man. Monsleur le Prefect - The Phantom of the Opera!"
At nine o'clock the following evening a mysterious barouche stopped on the rotunda side of the Opera.
Wait for me at the west gate.
I have heard his voice once more, Raoul.
He knows our plans -- everything."
Believe in my love, Raoul. Save me from that monster - oh, save me!
My barouche is waiting outside.
We leave immediately after the performance!
Dry your tears, dear, and hasten -- you must make ready for your performance!
Come quick! The strangler's work again!
It was there!
I saw the body dangling in the air!
My brother - - poor Joseph, he knew too much about the Phantom!
The Punjab lasso - the strangler's cord!
Assassin! Hide yourself in the deepest shadows
- but I shall find you out!
Fear for his brother's safety, brought Comte de Chagny to the Opera house that night.
I think i can take you to Christine Daae
- if you do exactly as I tell you.
Who are you that knows the Phantom's secrets - and betrays them?
I am Ledoux of the Secret Police.
I have studied this Phantom for months.
I found his hiding place deep within the torture chambers where he himself was confined during the second Revolution.
Keep your hand up- the strangler's noose coils quick!
Your hand up - it is a matter of life or death
The discovery of this trap-door cost Joseph Buquet his life.
I am a messenger from the shadows
-- turn back ere ye perish!
You lied to me! Do you think you and your lover could cheat the Phantom?
Ungrateful fool! You have spurned the spirit that inspired you
-- the spirit that made you great!
Now, you shall see the evil spirit that makes my evil face!
No Longer like a toad in these foul cellarswill i secrete the venom of hatred -
- for you shall bring me love!
We should be within his hiding place, now.
We have fallen into the room of many mirrors-
- the old torture chamber!
I am human like other men -
- I will not be cheated of my happiness!
Raoul! Raoul! My Brother- where are you?
It seems we have callers.
Christine! Christine! Can you hear me?
Your voice sounds near-
Try to find a door that will lead to us.
Look about you - try to learn where he keeps the keys.
The callers have departed.
I have discovered the Phantom's hiding place
- tonight my brother will be avenged!
Did you hear voices?
Perhaps we have more callers.
Heat - intolerable heat!
Fools - do they think they can match their wits against Erik?
What do you offer for their lives?
Your answer. quick - they can survive but a few moments!
Gunpowder!
You have your chance of saving him. Will you be the bride of Erik, or do you prefer to watch your lover die?
Will you be the bride of Erik, or do you prefer to watch your lover die?
If you turn the Scorpion - you have said 'Yes' and spared de Chagny.
Turn the grasshopper -- and the Opera House is blown to a thousand bits!
I'll do anything you say, if you will only save them!
Finis
The Players
The Phantom Lon Chaney
Christine Daae - Mary Philbin
Viconte Raoul de Chagny - Norman Kerry
Ledoux - Arthur Edmund Carawe
Simon Buquet - Gibson Gowland
Comte Philip de Chagny - John Sainpolis
Florine Papillon - Snitz Edwards
Carlotta - Virginia Pearson
A German folk tale
Behold!
The portals of darkness are open, and the shadows of the dead hunt over the Earth...
"Back! Hold! Why dost thou scourge mankind with War, Plague, Famine?!"
"The Earth is mine!"
"Never will the Earth be thine:
Man belongs to God!"
"Look below!"
"All things in heaven and on Earth are wonderful!
But the greatest wonder is man's freedom to choose between good and evil!"
"Dost thou know Faust?"
"A knave like all others!
He preaches good and does evil!
He seeks to turn base metal into gold!
Behold his greed!"
"A wager: I will wrest
Faust's soul away from God!"
"If thou canst destroy what is divine in Faust, the Earth is thine!"
"No man can resist evil!
The bet is on!"
"The Plague! The Plague!"
The devastating pestilence raged: in a few days half the town lay dying.
To find a cure for the Plague,
Faust spent day and night in prayer with God.
And there was a great cry in Egypt, for there was not a house without its dead.
"Lord God, bless this act of redemption!
Only you can alleviate our misery!"
"Help... help!
My mother is dying!"
Mortal terror and fear of death swept through the town.
"Repent, fast, pray!
Only Faith can vanquish death!"
"Have respect for the dead!"
"We still live, we still love! We shall die dancing in each other's arms!"
"Who has faith shall live!
But death will take the sinners!"
"The Plague! The Plague!"
"Compassion, Faust!
Only you can help us!"
"Get hence! We are lost!
No faith is any help.
No knowledge is any help.
All is vanity... "
Mine God, thou art merciful and a great goodness.
The third great Key to the Force of the Ghost of Hell.
And if thou would summon the Prince of
Darkness to aid thee and give thee all the might and glory of the world, go to a crossroad and call on him three times.
"I invoke thy aid,
Spirit of Darkness: show thyself!"
"Come forth, demon of evil!"
"As thou art called with thy unholy name:
MEPHISTO appear!"
"You have summoned me!"
"Here I am!"
I renounce God and his heavenly legion, and so shall be mine the power and glory of the world.
"Be gone from me, Satan!"
"To have the power to help for only one day!"
"One day! Try it!
Just one trial day!"
"When the hour-glass has run out... "
"... you go free, the Pact canceled! Sign!" glory... power
"Can you help the hungry and the sick?"
"What you wish I will perform: you are the master and I am your servant. "
"A drop of blood!"
"Blood is quite a remarkable substance!"
"Only for one day?"
"Until the sand has run out!"
"Faust! Help us!"
"Then I shall help in the devil's name!"
"A miracle! A miracle!"
"In the name of Christ crucified, help my child!"
"He cannot look upon the Holy Cross!"
"He is in league with the devil!
Stone him! Stone him!"
"Deliver me, elixir of death!"
"You may not cheat me! Remember our pact: the trial day is not over yet. "
"Death sets all men free!"
"Is that death?"
"It is life, Faust, seducing you with the fair image of your youth. "
"Wretched Faust, why do you seek death? You have not yet lived!"
"I despise my life!"
"Your life was only the dust and mold of books! Pleasure is all!"
"I am too old!"
"I offer you the greateast happiness: youth! Seize it!"
"Give me youth!"
"I've caught you, old boy!"
"Take me to her!"
"Step upon my cloak... "
"... and the spinning Earth will spread before you!"
"The wedding feast for the Duchess of
Parma, the most beautiful woman in Italy!"
"Strange guests!"
"To pay tribute to the highest beauty, my lord brings you his kingdom's treasures!"
"The day is over! The sand has run out!
Be as you were!"
"Youth... Leave me youth!"
"Our pact stands for eternity?"
"You have tasted all of life's pleasures, Faust! From indulgence to indulgence, sensation without end, yet nothing satisfied you!"
"What will you: a woman, a game of chance, an orgy?
Whatever you wish, I must grant!"
"Do you want the Emperor's crown?"
"Home!"
"Take me home! And at once!"
"Is today a feast day in your town?"
"Are you heathen born that you have never heard of Holy Easter?"
"It is as if life had stood still:
All is as it once was!"
"An innocent little girl, running to a priest... she is not for you!"
"Tedeum laudamus
Praise the Lord. "
"Vacation, mother!"
"I know more obliging wenches. for you here!"
"I want only her.
Do as I command!"
"Brother Valentin!"
"Once she has this little golden chain in the house she will begin to feel the devil's power!"
"Good gracious, how pretty you are!"
"Any lovers yet?"
"What have you, child?"
"Tell the mother of God, if you cannot tell me!"
"May I visit Aunt Marthe?"
Frau Marthe Schwerdtlein
"Three little drops from this love potion by night and all the girls' hearts will be yours!"
"Look Aunt Marthe what I found in my drawer... "
"A rich treasure!"
"I found it in my jewelry box!"
"Just once let me try on the beautiful necklace!"
"A small bouquet for the bridegroom, a little wreath for the bride!"
"Pardon, lovely lady.
I seek Frau Marthe Schwerdtlein!"
"From your cousin... from Lombardy...!"
"He gave me this necklace as a gift for you!"
"Those we encircle within this ring shall be sweethearts...!"
"One, two, three.
Makes you free!"
"Pardon: my stomach is too weak for such a fiery drink!"
"Permit, that I mix myself a litle drink as I learned it in Padua!"
"My friend, a prince of the noblest blood!"
"He loves me...
...loves me not...
...loves me... "
"Yes, with all his heart he loves you!"
"She loves me... "
"She loves me not. "
"She loves you!"
"I am yours forever!"
"He loves me!"
"What are you waiting for?
Your sweetheart herself lights the way for you!"
"Cursed matchmaker!"
"I will keep the brother out of the way!"
"To the prettiest girl in town!"
"No other girl is as pretty as your sister: long live Gretchen!"
"A pretty girl is not pure!"
"Here's to Gretchen!"
"Here's to your Gretchen!"
"If you hurry you can catch her lover before he slips out of her room. "
"Flee!... Flee!... you have murdered him!"
"Murder!"
"Murder... murder!"
"Murder... Murder... Murder!"
"Flee!... Flee! The deputes already seek the murderer!"
"Touch me not, you wanton, your lover has slain me!"
"First read a requiem. Mass for me!
Then to the stocks with this harlot!"
"Gretchen... Gretchen!"
"Now death and nature with surprise Behold the trembling sinners rise To meet the Judge's searching eyes. "
"For now before the Judge severe
No crime can pass unpunished here. "
"All hidden things must plain appear. "
"Mother! Mother!"
"And has born a little child in the depth of winter. "
"Have mercy on my child!"
"Are you not Gretchen, who stood in the stocks?"
"Mercy! Mercy! My child is dying!"
"She has killed her child!
Seize her, the murderess!"
"Faust... Faust... help your Gretchen!"
"Mephisto!"
"You have betrayed me!
She suffers! She suffers!"
"To the stake with the child murderer!"
"Save her, save Gretchen!"
"Too late! Even now they build her funeral pyre!"
"You are still my servant!
Bring me to her, or the pact is broken!"
"My steed awaits!
Quick, before morning comes!"
"Faster! Faster!"
"Oh had I never wished for youth, that brought this misery!
Curse... curse the delusion of youth!"
"You have yourself cursed youth!
What you wish I must grant!"
"Be as you were: an old man!"
"Forgive... forgive me my sin!"
"Gretchen!"
"Here is no place for thee!"
"I claim my wager!"
"One Word breaks thy pact!"
"Tell me the Word!"
"The Word that wings joyfully throughout the universe, The Word that appeases every pain and grief, The Word that expiates all human guilt, the Eternal Word... dost thou not know it?"
"Tel me the Word!"
Love
THE END
THE GRAND DUKE'S FINANCES
An adventures tale by Frank Heller, adapted for motion pictures in six chapters by Thea von Harbou.
Chapter 1, wherein we will know an incredibly small island which might be in the Mediterranean Sea, the Great Dukedom of Abacco, its charming tyrant,
Ramon the 12th (Harry Liedtke), last heir to a little crown and to a quite big public debt,
Don Esteban Paqueno (Adolphe Engers), its pitiful Secretary of Economy, and the earthly Grand Duke's gods:
Augustina, his chief cook, and Joaquino, his personal aid (Hugo Block).
Unfortunately, we won't be able to help making awkward aquaintances:
Two people with no manners or conscience,
Semjon Marcowitz (Guido Herzfeld) and Mr Bekker (Hermann Vallentin), and some more evil characters, the four conspirators: the Dangerous (Georg August Koch), the Mysterious (Max Schreck), the Hunchback (Hans Hermann), the Miser (Walter Rilla).
And now begins the story.
"His Highness cannot be found anywhere in the castle!"
"Your Excellency, the Secretary of Finance, Don Esteban Paqueno."
"... but His Highness is still sleeping."
"Then I'll wait until he wakes up."
"His Highness enjoys throwing away what's left of his patrimony!"
"Marcowitz insists he must meet with His Highness!
The payments are due in three days time!
"His Highness must speak with him personally!"
"Well, dear Mr Marcowitz, what is it that you want?"
"My money, Your Highness!"
But these are not the only grey clouds in the Great Dukedom of Abacco's skies.
"Were I not to get my money within the next 3 days,
I'll keep your entire island!"
"My knowledge is gone, Your Highness!
How will we be saved now?"
"Yes, dear Paqueno, we'll have to find another solution..."
"Your Highness' marriage to the Great Duchess
Olga would save Abacco."
"God knows how grateful I am to the Great
Duke Nicolai for opposing to his sister's wedding to a man whose Dukedom is nothing but debt."
"Howdy, gentlemen!"
"I must speak to the Grand Duke!"
"His Highness, the Grand Duke of Abacco, does not wish to speak to anyone!"
"A great sum of money wouldn't do the trick?"
"Take a sit, I beg you, sir!"
"My name is Bekker, Your Highness, and I am here to buy Punta Hermosa."
"Punta Hermosa!?"
"If I were to give you 5 million Francs for Punta
Hermosa, you shouldn't care what I want it for."
"If it was up to me, even 10 million."
"Either you speak more clearly,
Bekker, or..."
"Mr Bekker, His Highness has terminated this meeting"
"This means I have discovered a vast deposit of sulfur at Punta Hermosa!"
"Sulfur...?!"
"...and, you intend to exploit the deposit with the help of my countrymen?"
"... for ten million...!"
"Never!!"
"¿Paqueno, do you really expect me to become a scoundrel to my subjects?"
"Someone, such as yourself, who is endebted up to his neck cannot be so choosy!"
"Maybe you think ten million is not enough, sir!"
"Maybe you want part of the profit!"
"Wait for me, kid!
I'll get you this time!"
"Thank God!
Abacco is saved!"
"I see no other solution for Abacco, unless it comes down from the sky!"
"Argggh, what a disgusting fellow!"
I have decided to become the Grand
Duchess of Abacco.
I know you as little as you know me, but I like you since I heard the trouble you went through... to help the shipwrecked people from the "Palestrina".
It doesn't matter that you don't have money,
I have plenty.
I'll get your economy under control!
Summing up -
Yours, Olga,
Grand Duchess of Russia
"Isn't she great?"
"Get the Grand Duke now! Throw him out of the island, which isn't even his anymore!"
"Revolutions cost money, gentlemen!"
"Never mind, gentlemen... I also have some unfinished business with the Grand Duke of Abacco."
"All right, then?"
End of Chapter 1.
Chapter 2, wherein we expand the number of our aquaintances including Philipp Collin, aka Profesor Pelotard (Alfred Abel), a gentleman who changes name and trade, and Mr Isaaks, businessman and recently elected Congressman
(Julius Falkenstein).
(His still recent follies of youth grant him our simpathies beforehand)
"Mr. Isaaks, can I congratulate you for being elected?"
"If you're not able to help me, my career in politics is over."
"One upon a time there was a spicy young lady..."
"... and those letters of mine, those incredibly reckless letters, belong now to the greatest blackmailer in the world."
"Trust me, Mr.
Isaaks, it will pass."
"You haven't found the letter yet?"
"I must confess to something to His Highness"
"Your Highness, I wanted to... get a deferment from Marcowitz with the Grand Duchess' letter."
It doesn't matter that you don't have any money,
I have plenty.
I'll get your economy under control!
Summing up -
Yours, Olga,
Grand Duchess of Russia
"No, dear, I'll keep the letter"
"So, the letter, the Grand Duchess' letter,
Marcowitz has it now?"
"Then, we'll have to go get the letter!"
Meanwhile, Philipp Collin was considering the matter.
Mr. Semjon Markowitz, I hereby let you know that I have come to own a letter for which certain people would pay great sums of money.
If you're interested, you may find me between 5 and 6 at Melchiorstr. 12, by the greenhouse, Boston and Klix."
Grand Duchess Olga -
Grand Duke Ramon -
It doesn't matter that you don't have any money,
I hace plenty.
I'll get...!
"Out!!"
Boston and Klix
Animal voices impersonators.
"Better is better."
"Now, professor, what are the fees?"
"50 thousand Pounds, Mr. Isaaks"
"As a loan."
"¿What the heck will you do with all that money, professor?"
"An amazing gamble in Abacco's treasury stocks."
"The head you just pulled from me is worth more than the whole of Abacco."
"And I can assure you that, if you buy Abacco's treasury stocks, you'll be able to buy India's throne within the next 8 days."
Should Philipp Collin not hurry with his
Stock Market's scheme, some people may ruin his plans.
"I therefore give you enough money to start a revolution and I support your Presidency.
In exchange, I get Punta Hermosa as it is."
"We're leaving tonight... in secret!
I don't anyone to find out about this trip to the continent. I believe we'll be back within the next 8 days."
"... You'll govern in the meantime."
"This is cracking."
"We must tell Mr. Bekker."
"Telegram, telegram!"
Today, at the Stock Markets in London,
Paris and Rome, 80 % of the Grand Dukedom of Abacco's public debt was purchased by an unknown buyer.
There's great unrest in all financial circles.
What's going on? Wire your answer.
Perez Agency.
"A play with Abacco's stocks...
That's the end of the world."
End of Chapter 2.
Chapter 3, wherein two misterious cars play an important role, and a young lady shows up who doesn't want to be recognised for now
(Mady Christians), because a descendant (Robert Scholz) from Ivan the Terrible is chasing her.
Stock Market's sensation!
Stranger buys Abacco's stocks.
Who is behind this play?
"Save me, sir, if you're a gentleman...
Talk to me as if I were your fiancée."
"Brandy, quick."
"I get dizzy when someone passes out."
"Is that car gone now?"
"I'm fine now. I'll pay the bill and then leave."
"How much for the brandy?"
"Will you... will you accept a ring as surety for your expenses, sir?"
"So far, my lady, you have granted me the honour of considering me a gentleman...
Surely I am not a pawnbroker!"
"Will you not tell me what I can do for you?
Are you running away from someone?"
"Would you be so kind as to take me to the Hotel l'Europe?"
"Turn around, driver, turn around."
"I have seen the red car drive past, but he wasn't in it!"
"The train for the South leaves at 7:45, your Imperial Highness!"
"To the station!"
"I'd rather be dead than found!"
"Do you trust me... unconditionally?"
"How long does it take to get to the station?"
"Twenty minutes!"
"Unconditionally!"
"I always pictured my wike like this!"
"Not in the train either!"
End of Chapter 3.
Chapter 4, wherein Mr. Philipp Collin meets the greatest problems caused by professor Pelotard, whom he had taken under his wing unsensibly.
"I have called you, professor, because I've been at the bank and I want to settle my account."
"First, let's see the bill!"
"No, some brandy first."
Mr. Philipp Collin sees a light!
Berlin Diary
Stock Market's sensation!
"Find out, Paqueno, when we'll be able to resume our journey,
I cannot leave so quickly my world fame!"
"... In Abacco!"
Revolution at Abacco!
The Grand Duke overthrown!
"Enjoy, Mr. Collin...!"
The Grand Duke's missing, possibly murdered.
The Grand Duke overthrown!
Louis Hernandez, President of the Republic.
"For God's sake, does His Highness know...?"
"In the long run, dear Paqueno, my abdication would have been inevitable."
"My throne in India!"
"Do you happen to know who's worst off in this story?"
"Can you imagine how quickly he will come here?"
"I know who is behind this!"
For overthrowing the Grand Duke all the people mentioned below will be paid 2.000 $.
Should the Grand Duke lose his life, the pay will rise to 5.000 $.
The delivery of Punta Hermosa
"We must return to Abacco at once!"
"All communications with Abacco are interrupted."
"Some boat must go there!
Listen, I must get to Abacco!"
"Perhaps Captain Treponte..."
"I've been told at the Port's Office captain, that he's a man who doesn't fear a single thing..."
"I must get to Abacco!"
"Yes,... this is the Grand Duke
Nicolai's car,
200 powerhorses!"
"I've been told at the Port's Office captain, that he's a man who doesn't fear a single thing..."
"My Stork has just been chartered for another trip to Abacco.
By professor Pelotard."
"By my wife!?"
"I appeal to your sense of justice, madam!"
It would be far worse than mere unsolidarity to leave for Abacco without me."
"Professor, see us as two simple travellers who must go to Abacco inexcusably."
"If you want to get to Abacco you don't need my consent, but my wife's!"
"I believe he's well tamed!"
"Two gentlemen from Abacco."
"Revolutionaries?"
"Friends to the Grand Duke!"
"Are you out of your mind, getting down with no disguise?
Don't you remember you're being chased?"
"I hope you want to go to Abacco to help the Grand Duke."
"I must go to Abacco at once!"
"Wait! Wait! I'm going too!"
"Didn't I tell you Marcowitz is in a hurry?"
Philipp Collin has had a new moment of inspiration and decides to address all his travel companions as "Highness" from then on.
"What ship is this?"
"It's a single engine... to the service of His Imperial Highness, the Grand Duke Nicolai of Russia..."
"I'll go to Abacco on that ship!"
End of Chapter 4.
Chapter 5, wherein some people reveal their identities and the Republic of
Abacco is threatened.
"Admiral! I beg of you!
I must get aboard, Admiral!"
"No way! His Imperial Highness is in a terible mood!"
Semjon Marcowitz, who can show recommendation from
Her Imperial Highness, the Grand Duchess Olga.
"Destination Abacco!"
"Are you aware that your interest in Abacco may be dangerous for your life?"
"I'm... a journalist!
I have to be where things are happening!"
"And your wife?
Is she a journalist too?"
"You wouldn't be asking that if you knew my wife!"
"For God's sake...!"
"What an extraordinary effect a little sea breeze has had!"
"I can't wait to get to Abacco!"
"What newspaper does your husband write for?"
"I... I've known him only for a little time!"
"Ah, you're on your honeymoon?"
"Good afternoon, Mr. President!"
"What have you done to
Joaquino and Augustina, you rascals?"
"... at the White Pavilion!"
"It's too much for your nerves, Your Highness.
Get some rest. I'll manage to find the White Pavilion."
End of Chapter 5.
Chapter 6
Heil the Grand Duke!
"Nice gallows, Your Highness!
Wouldn't you say so?"
"Revenge is sweet, my son!"
"Let's hang the
Grand Duke of Abacco!"
"... He's the Grand Duke!"
"... I'll buy his life from you!"
"How much is it worth for you, honey?"
"A million francs... each, will it do?"
"Don't let her fool you! If she has that much money, let's take it from her!"
"Don't touch him! As true as I am the Grand Duchess Olga,
I tell you I'll take your lives if you take his!"
"Well, you'll see him hung!"
"My brother!"
"Are you the Grand Duke of Abacco?"
"Get the gallows ready now!"
"Will you tell me why?"
"A man who uses the letters of the woman who loves him as an exchange item, deserves hanging."
"You'll have to prove it first!"
"Will you be deceived by this ridiculous forgery of my handwriting?"
"If this letter is false, where is the real one?"
"Here!"
"Caught!"
"Get the ship's chaplain! Get him to arrange a wedding! A punishment must take place!"
"I must have something, I always pass out when someone gets married."
"A toast for your marriage to be as happy an operation as mine with Abacco's public debt has been!"
THE END
Are you Englishmen or are you a lot of foreigners ?
Are you free and independent citizens... or are you a flock of bloomin' sheeps ?
Do you want England to be ruled by an outsider ?
No. No, you says.
Then who is this here Disraeli that he should be Prime Minister of England ?
A Jew whose grandfather was an Italian. A bloomin' foreigner.
Hear, hear !
What's he done for England, I ask ya ?
What's he done ?
Nothing.
Our friend here says nothing.
He must be blind, deaf and dumb...
... as well as intoxicated.
And what does he say now ?
He says Russia is looking at us with eyes of yearning.
That the Tsar has set up in his heart to rule the seven seas.
Bloomin' lot ! I says down with Disraeli.
Gladstone is the man for us.
I consider it an affront...
...to every English gentleman that the destinies of our nation should be in the hands of a person like Disraeli.
A man who poses as a great patriot...
...but who is in reality an unprincipled politician seeking only to gratify his mad lust for power.
And now he wants to involve us in serious international trouble... with this infernal nonsense about
Russia trying to undermine our power in India.
If the fellow keeps on he'll put England on the rocks.
What does the Governor of the Bank of England say ?
I say he's a dreamer. A dangerous visionary reaching out for Empire with greedy hands...
...committing us to a foreign policy of imperialism that makes me tremble for England's safety.
But thank God for Gladstone.
He's more than a match for Disraeli.
Foreign policy such as the right honorable gentleman proposes...
...would not only gain us, and deservedly, the ill will of other nations... but would ultimately involve us in that great calamity: war !
I say that in proposing such a policy...
... the right honorable gentleman has branded himself...
... as unworthy to be the Counselor of England's sovereign.
Unworthy to be the guardian of England's welfare.
Unworthy to hold the high office of Prime Minister.
And now that my honourable friend, Mr. Gladstone, with his customary eloquence and tact, has expressed his customary disapproval... the issue, gentlemen, is this:
Whether you are content to be a comfortable England... meeting in due course with a sad, inevitable fate... or whether you will be a great country... an imperial country... a country where your sons, when they rise... will rise to paramount positions...
...and obtain not merely the esteem of their own countrymen... but the esteem of the world.
Perhaps you think that because no war clouds darken the present horizon...
... that there is no danger.
Have you ever seen one of those moving landscapes of the coast of South America ?
You behold a range of exhausted volcanoes.
Not a flame flickers on a single palid peak.
But beneath... there is a dormant danger that will one day awake.
Dizzy, you're worrying about something.
No, no, my dear.
I sometimes think, but I never worry.
Well, I'll not bother you now about our garden party.
But I'm dying to be bothered.
Mary, my dear, your morning tribute.
Thank you, Dizzy.
Every morning, wherever we are, you never forget.
Nonsense, you know I married you for your money.
Let me see our list of invitations.
Lady Clarissa Pevensey...
...oh, and her father and mother, the Duke and Duchess of Glastonbury.
I'm afraid the Duke and Duchess shiver with contempt at the very name of Disraeli.
But Clarissa will see to it that they come.
Dear Clarissa.
She thinks you're the greatest man in the world.
And she's right.
She's quite right, my dear.
Young Deeford will condescend to come in order to protect Clarissa against my diabolical influence.
I'm quite sure your party will be a great success.
Mary, I want you to invite Borsinov.
Yes, dear.
The Russian Ambassador.
A most agreeable gentleman.
And I also want you to invite Mrs. Travers.
Mrs. Travers ?
Why, we scarcely know her.
That's why I want you to invite her.
I'm anxious to cultivate her acquaintance.
Mary...
Yes, dear.
Where have I met her before ?
Oh, we've met her at dinners...
No...
I mean long ago.
I connect her with something blue and white.
Now, Dizzy, you're off on one of your wild goose chases again.
Blue and white...
Mrs. Strauss.
Oh, my dear Mrs. Strauss.
You're looking more charming than usual.
Pease, sit down.
Did you learn anything ?
We've nothing immediate to fear from Disraeli.
He can't act without Parliament.
And Parliament has adjourned, thank the Lord.
Yes, England has obligingly tied the hands of the one man who might have blocked Russia's plans.
And long before his hands are free we shall have come to terms with Egypt.
Russia will control the Suez Canal.
And Disraeli's dream of British supremacy in Asia...
...will still be only a dream.
But don't forget...
Even whit his hands tied, Disraeli can still get things from up his sleeve.
He must be watched as closely as ever.
Mr. Foljambe is outside.
Oh, show him in.
Husbands always arrive at the wrong moment.
Hello, Foljambe.
Hello, dear.
Cigarette ?
No, thanks.
Anything new ?
Things will be at a standstill at Disraeli's office. until he comes back from abroad.
I got a note from him this morning...
...telling me I might have the rest of the week off...
...and thanking me for my faithful attention to his interests.
I'm afraid the great Disraeli is getting old.
Dear Clarissa.
Dear Lady Beaconsfield.
Viscount Deeford.
My dear, you look charming.
How do you do ?
The spirit of youth and beauty.
Deeford, behold !
Winter hand in hand with Spring.
Innocence with...
Guile ?
Experience.
Same thing.
May I be permitted ?
If something would only happen to Charles to make him human.
Perhaps something may happen to him, my dear.
With the help of Clarissa.
Oh.
What to a man of your sound judgement,
Mr. Disraeli's ideas must sometimes appear...
Utterly impractical.
Wildly fantastic.
The Bank of England's money will never back any of his crazy enterprises...
...as long as I can prevent it.
How fortunate England has men like you.
Why, Mrs. Travers, I...
May I be allowed to join you ?
Oh, yes. Certainly, sit down.
Thank you.
What a heavenly spot this is.
The Prime Minister's garden.
Why do you dislike Mr. Disraeli so much ?
I neither like him nor dislike him.
He's nothing to me.
Don't you feel lonely ?
Lonely ?
You're the only man in all the world who neither likes nor dislikes Mr. Disraeli.
Yes, yes. I know how much you admire him.
But we won't argue about that now.
May you be seated, Lady Clarissa ?
I have spoken to your mother and she has given me her gracious permission to address you.
Was her permission needed ?
Well, I'm rather a stickler for form, you know.
I know.
I consider it my duty to marry.
Yes ?
I am much interested in the working man.
I have plans for building model cottages with improved sanitary appliances.
I trust, my wife and I,
...will show our friends a model English household.... model children, in short a model...
One moment. What have all these models to do with me ?
Have I not made myself clear ?
Since first I had the privilege of meeting you,
I have watched you closely.
And, Clarissa...
May I call you Clarissa ?
I have decided that in time... you will become admirably suited to occupy the position I have adumbrated.
I beg your pardon.
Adumbrated. Outlined.
Oh, thank you.
You will think me very silly, Charles...
May I call you Charles ?
Thank you...
...but is this really an offer of marriage ?
I hoped I had made that clear without offensive plainness of speech.
How wonderful.
Oh, but you have the right to expect a high matrimonial alliance.
I mean the manner of your proposal.
Oh, surely...
You are a young man of 25,
I'm a girl of 19 and you come to me with an essay on political economy.
I'm a man of heavy responsibilities, not a hero of romance.
You will enter a family of which the men have never done anything to be ashamed of.
Have they ever done anything ?
Nothing, thank God, to attract attention.
Well, I think the next thing will be to announce our betrothal.
Not quite.
I'm very much honored, Lord Deeford, but I must decline the responsibilities and the privileges.
I beg your pardon !
Oh, Charles, you've made a horrible hash of the whole thing.
Hash ?
Yes, but please, let me talk or I shall have hysterics.
I did like you.
I liked you very much.
But your model cottages leave me cold, because I know the laborer wants bread, not bricks.
And all those model children.
I want flesh and blood children who tear their pinafores and smear their faces with jam.
But Lady Clarissa...
If ever I marry... and I hope I shall...
I want a husband who is at the bottom and is climbing.
Climbing on hands and knees.
Bleeding hands and bleeding knees.
With his eyes fixed on the summit.
Never mind if he never gets there.
I can help him to climb, and if he falls, I can fall with him.
But Cla...
No, you were born at the top.
You sit in a rarefied atmosphere like the gods on Olympus.
Oh !
I see I have made a mistake.
Well. You refused him, eh ?
Oh, how did you know ?
That back was eloquent of refusal.
You have no sympathy with readymade greatness.
You refused Deeford because he's a mere descendent and not an ancestor.
Well, am I not right ?
Well, he may become an ancestor, you know.
Tell me...
Are you fond of him ?
I like him very much.
If he had simply said, "Clarissa, will you marry me?",
I might have answered just as simply, "Yes".
But he lectured me on model cottages and the model family.
You know, I have a very high opinion of him.
You ? But he has no initiative.
Who knows ?
If the opportunity occurred, he might rise to it.
A man should make his own opportunity.
And it's no use talking.
I refused him and I told him why.
Did you.
Quite frankly.
Did you.
I told him I must have a man with pride.
As he is now, I would sooner marry a bricklayer.
He does lay bricks and he may build a cathedral.
Don't be hard on Deeford.
Go along and tell him you're sorry.
Very good advice, Mr. Disraeli, which I'm not going to follow.
A telegram, sir.
All right.
Personally, I can't endure these Disraelis.
But Clarissa would come...
I can't stand the fellow's confounded assurance.
Pardon me. Sir Michael, will you come into the library a moment ?
There's a little matter on which I particularly want your advice.
Oh, very well.
You'll excuse me.
Mrs. Travers, Duke,
I'm sure you'll forgive me for taking Sir Michael away.
Sit down, Sir Michael, sit down.
I've just had private information.
Khedive Ismail Pasha is in desperate need of money.
As you know, he holds the controlling shares of the Suez Canal.
Probert, this is an unparalleled opportunity for England.
Opportunity for England ?
You don't mean that in earnest.
Pardon me ? In dead earnest.
Do you seriously mean that you're thinking of purchasing the Suez Canal for England ?
I heave seldom meant anything half so seriously.
And you are about to suggest to me that the Bank of England should back you ?
I am.
Until Parliament meets again.
Then let me tell you, sir, at once.
I shall never consent. Never.
Wait a moment.
No, sir. There's nothing to wait for.
I'll not allow the Bank to play ducks and drakes with its money.
On an Egyptian ditch.
An Egyptian ditch ? That's rather neat.
They won't be ducks and drakes because the government will be at your back.
How do I know...
I say so.
Suppose the government falls.
Dear man, it's always falling.
What difference does that make ?
Don't the Conservatives invariably go on just where the Radicals left off...
...and vice-versa ?
Besides, in this case it hasn't time to fall.
This thing must be done within the next three weeks.
Long before Parliament meets.
But why such a hurry ?
Because Russia...
Oh, that ancient bugbear. that ever present peril,
...knows of this opportunity, they'll purchase the highroad to India.
Then why hasn't she purchased ?
She's not ready.
She has no fleets. But she's watching us.
She's watching me.
The spy mania.
And if she sees the slightest move on my part...
... she'll snap up the Canal...
... fleet or no fleet.
Hmm... a pretty woman, Mrs. Travers.
Yes.
Such pretty ears.
Well, sir, after that delightful interlude...
No, sir. Your scheme is hare-brained.
Unconstitutional, and the Bank will be no party to it.
I tell you there is no time...
You exaggerate the importance of the thing.
You have the Eastern imagination.
Because this Canal runs through a desert...
... you see it in a dream. In a mirage.
Neat again.
The Canal is a confessed failure.
Oh...
Whatever doesn't pay is a failure.
The tonnage that passed throuhgh it last year...
Oh, please !
And its filling up... filling up...
Soon the only ship sailing on it will be the.... the ship of the desert.
I mean the camel, sir.
Yes, I thought you meant the camel.
Beware of the East. Remember Pharaoh, sir, remember Pharaoh.
Yes, but what about Moses ?
He was a Jew.
That is, he was privileged.
In short ?
In short, I disapprove of your imperialistic ideas, Mr. Disraeli.
And the Bank will not stir a finger to further that.
Why are you er...
I feared you were getting too warm.
I rejoice to think that I have made this rash enterprise impossible.
Oh, but you haven't.
Where would you go for the money ?
Where Pharaoh went. Where all Christians go.
I shall go to Moses.
At any rate, understand it will be no use coming to me.
This, sir, is definite and final.
Nothing is final, Sir Michael.
In the unlikely event of Moses failing me...
I may send for you again.
And I shall not come, sir.
I think you will.
Dizzy. What were you and Sir Michael talking about ?
Lady Probert's in a dreadful way.
She's missed her husband.
Has she ?
He's missed his opportunity.
Come dear. Everybody will wonder what's become of you.
All right, my dear.
I must get hold of Hugh Meyers.
Hugh Meyers, tha banker ?
Hugh Meyers, the banker.
That's the man, Mary. That's the man.
Be very kind to send that telegram.
Dizzy, you're not worrying about money ?
No, no, my dear.
Probert and I were just talking politics.
There's Deeford.
You know I told you something might happen to him.
Yes.
Well, it has happened.
He has asked Clarissa to marry him.
That will be a good match, I suppose.
Yes, but she has refused.
Mary, I'm going to play fairy godfather and bring them together.
You a matchmaker.
The Prime Minister neglecting his work ?
The less a Prime Minister does, the fewer mistakes he's apt to make.
Thats rather good.
I must say that in the guestroom one night in the house.
I've been searching for a young man.
With such a prize as Clarissa,
Charles may become just what I need.
Think what a splendid couple they'd make.
Oh, Dizzy. Always dreaming a romance.
And living one, my dear, while you are by my side.
Is it Deeford ?
Yes.
Run along, my dear. He's eager to speak to me.
I think he wants to kill me.
Mr. Disraeli.
Hm ?
I know that tone of voice so well.
What do you mean, Sir ?
It's the tone of an angry man.
Now, what can have put you out ?
No, no, don't speak.
Interruptions are annoying.
If they hadn't interrupted me the first time I addressed the House of Commons,
I might have become a vestryman, and respectable.
Really, Mr. Disraeli, you make it difficult to talk to you seriously.
Never talk seriously.
Keep your grave face for your jokes.
I, er... never make jokes.
A man who never makes jokes is a standing joke to the world.
Humor is of several kinds. We Oxford men have a humor of our own.
I know.
An unconscious humor.
Mr. Disraeli...
Clarissa has refused me.
Yes ?
And I, sir, I attribute her refusal to your influence.
I see.
I was thoroughly justified in thinking well of you.
What do you mean ?
You have courage, or you would never say that to me.
And why should I not say it ?
Because it's true.
And when a young man speaks an unpleasant truth to a very old one...
... he shows absolutely reckless courage.
There was no other way.
A hundred.
You take a girl's no as final ?
I suppose she knows her own mind.
Certainly. Make her change it.
How ?
I'm glad you're asking me to help you.
Because I'm interested in you.
Interested in me ?
Deeply.
Why ?
Because England stands in terrible need of men like you.
I can't see that.
England was never so prosperous as now.
She has a wise aristocracy, an industrious middle class, a contented and happy peasantry.
Bravo, bravo !
How many old Tory squires have I heard talk just like that ?
And that's how they've talked since the beginning of things.
That's how they talked when they lost America.
When the Indian mutiny bashed upon us.
When our soldiers froze and starved in the Crimea.
When we deserted Denmark, and when we remained idle while France and Germany flew at each other's throats.
It's just that talk that has lost us all our friendships.
Oh, Continental friendships.
Frog-eaters, bear-swillers.
Is that how you talk to Clarissa ?
I do not discuss politics with women.
I do.
Think, man, think.
England is as isolated as a ship lying off the coast.
Her crew know nothing about what they call the land-lubbers.
They go on shore now and then for a debauch.
But as they only hunt out the vice, they come back with a headache...
...and righteously thank God they're not as other men.
I tell you, a ferment is at work all over the world...
...titanic forces take shape in America.
Forces you have no conception of.
The spirit of nationality is aroused in France, in Italy, in Germany.
New wine is being poured into old bottles and an explosion will follow sooner or later.
I shall not live to see it, but I hear the seething of the yeast.
But you... my God, what things you will witness.
Take care you are not asleep.
All the nations must expand and everywhere our Empire is in their way.
Russia, for instance.
Now, while England stands alone, while France is crippled, and before Germany is recovered... now is Russia's opportunity for snatching India.
With India lost, a whole fabric crumbles and England sinks into insignificance.
A Belgium at sea.
Now do you see why Clarissa refused you ?
These are the things I have shown her.
You wonder she wants a man of action ?
You wonder she's not contented with being a mere Duke's wife ?
I see.
I see, but...
... but what can I do ?
What can any one man do ?
What one man has already done.
You, sir ? But how can I hope to emulate you ?
You can learn. We'll learn.
Will you teach me, sir ?
Yes.
How can I begin ?
Leave your small ideals.
Or better still, grow from small ideals to greater.
You have begun well.
You're putting your house in order.
Now pass on. Pass on to parish. To the Empire.
To parish. How small it seems and...
...everything I've done in politics, how utterly insignificant.
In politics nothing is insignificant.
Contrast it with this question of India.
Whether we hold it or lose it.
What's the solution ? War ?
War is never a solution.
It's an aggravation.
What then is the solution ?
A very small thing.
A thing men are laughing at.
What, sir, what ?
A ditch.
A ditch dug in sand.
A ditch ?
A ditch dug in shifting sand.
You mean the...
I mean that a ditch dug in sand grows the very best celery.
Oh, Mrs. Travers. We were just in the thick of the the most interesting horticultural argument.
Really ?
Yes.
Mary !
Yes, dear ?
Lord Deeford has done me the honor of accepting a secretaryship.
What ?
Lord Deeford working ?
Clarissa, isn't that unexpected ?
Not altogether.
And how he'll have to work.
You'll have so much to teach him.
Mr. Disraeli has already begun.
Yes. I've been teaching him what it took me many years to learn.
What is that ?
My dear lady, that a ditch dug in sand grows the very best celery.
Dizzy, what do you mean ?
Celery ?
Good morning, Mr. Disraeli.
Oh, good morning, Mr. Foljambe.
Good morning, sir.
You didn't tell me Mr. Foljambe was waiting.
He was not here, sir.
These are ready for delivery, sir.
Thank you, Terle.
Dispatches from Russia.
Good, Deeford. Thank you.
You might look over these figures, will you ?
And have those delivered for me.
Is there anything else, sir ?
Nothing else, Mr. Foljambe.
Oh, Mr. Foljambe.
You have the figures about the fortification ?
Yes, sir.
The...
These are the dispatches from Russia, aren't they ?
I beg your pardon, sir.
Quite a natural mistake.
Mr. Hugh Meyers, sir.
Ah, Meyers.
How do you do ?
Well ?
The money is on its way.
From the Argentine.
When will it arrive ?
In three weeks.
Good.
To be placed at my disposal in the Bank of England.
The Bank of England ?
That's rather humorous.
Why ?
I was thinking of Probert.
Oh.
Deeford.
This is Mr. Hugh Meyers.
One of the world's greatest powers.
We have to raise money, you know, for the fortifications of the Gulf of Aden.
I hoped it was something much more romantic than that, sir.
Oh, what ?
The Suez Canal.
Did you ?
You're quite right.
It is the Suez Canal.
Since you've hit on the truth, it's better that I should tell you...
...that until I am ready, not a syllable must be breathed on this matter.
Is that clear ?
On my honor, sir.
Good.
Will you come into my room, Mr. Meyers.
Excuse me, sir.
I forgot to give you your list of engagements.
Oh, thank you, Mr. Foljambe.
Mr. Meyers, this is Mr. Foljambe.
Such a working man.
Let me see... what was the exact amount required for the fortification of the Gulf of Aden ?
You have the papers, you know, the blue one.
I'll find out, sir.
Thank you.
Come, Mr. Meyers.
Do you know why Mr. Meyers is here ?
I'm very busy.
He's not here for any fortification scheme.
He's here for the Suez Canal.
Lady Clarissa Pevensey and Mrs. Travers are here.
Here's an invasion.
Delighted.
Mrs. Travers and I were dying to see how you looked in the throes of toil.
Well, it hasn't undermined my constitution yet.
We expected to find you with a wet towel around your head.
Oh, no, so far I've done nothing but look on.
This is a wonderful opportunity for you.
That will be a bombshell for Probert.
I'm delighted.
Well, well, well.
Come to see the neophyte, eh ?
Ah, Mrs. Travers.
You know, I half expected this visit.
Allow me. Mr. Hugh Meyers,
Lady Clarissa Pevensey, Mrs... Travers.
How do you do ?
My dear ladies, you'll excuse us.
Was this a momentous interview ?
I really cannot tell you.
That means that it was.
How exciting to be in all the State secrets.
But I am not.
I am only an apprentice.
How humbly you speak of yourself.
I know now that I know nothing.
That's a great stride towards your goal, isn't it ?
Is it ?
I think so.
May we ?
Please do. Just let an old woman rest her weary bones.
Agatha !
Shhhh.
Meyers ?
Yes.
About the Canal ?
Yes.
They're agreed.
How do you know ?
Both radiant.
Then ?
Cairo. Start now.
Yes, but I...
Now !
Instructions ?
At Trieste.
Trieste ? How ?
By way of Ostend.
Ostend ?
Oh, hello, Mrs. Travers.
Oh, Mr. Foljambe.
Here are the papers giving the figures you asked for, sir.
Thank you.
The blue one and the white one.
Blue and white.
Curious.
Mrs. Travers, this is Mr. Foljambe.
Such a worker.
How's your poor husband ?
No better, I fear.
Still abroad. Taking the waters, you know.
Will you kindly make my excuses to the young people.
They're out there.
You're not going so abruptly.
I'm sorry, but dear Lady Probert is organizing a bazaar.
Always occupied in good work.
Always with your hand... in some great undertaking.
It's secret too ?
Goodbye, Mr. Disraeli.
Goodbye, Lady Travers.
No, not a step, not a step, goodbye.
Goodbye, Mrs. Travers.
Ostend.
Ostend.
I beg your pardon, sir.
I thought you called.
Charles ! Charles !
Very sorry, sir.
Did Foljambe make any comments about... Meyers' visit ?
Yes. I thought him rather impertinent.
How ?
Shall I go ?
No, no, my dear. Well ?
He asked questions. But I snubbed him.
Finally he had the impertinence to say that you were seeing Meyers about...
Well ?
Am I to speak in Lady Clarissa's...
Yes, go on.
About the Suez Canal.
And what did you say ?
Not a word, of course.
How did you snub him ?
I merely stood up.
And looked at him.
Ooooh !
What, sir ?
What more could you have told him if you talked for an hour ?
Do you accuse me of speaking ?
No, sir, I accuse you of holding your tongue too eloquently.
Oh, well, he's easily muzzled.
How ?
Put him on his parole. I'll fetch him.
Yes, fetch him, fetch him.
Mr. Terle ! Mr. Terle !
Yes, sir. Send for the senior Queen's messenger quickly.
Yes, sir.
Well ? He's not there.
He's not in his room, sir.
No. So, do you know where he is ?
He's at Victoria Station.
Catching the 10:30 express on his way to Ostend, Trieste and so to Cairo.
For God's sake, sir, who is he ?
He's Mrs. Travers' husband.
What ?
Yes. He and she are agents.
Spies Russia has sent here to discover what you have told them.
Have him arrested.
How ?
On what grounds ? What has he done ?
Sir, why did you employ him knowing he was a spy ?
Because I knew it.
Because I wanted to have the man under my eye.
For weeks he has been secretly entering this room. I knew it.
I've planted papers I know he was trying to read.
I had him on the wrong scent when you...
When I blundered.
When you lost control of your features.
Would you tell us why silence is so important ?
Now it's of no importance whatever.
Yes. You ought to know.
So that in future...
Future ? What future is there for me ?
... in future you may learn to control your features as well as your tongue.
Sit down.
Ismael Pasha, the khedive of Egypt, is under the impression that he is Rameses, the Great.
And the only pyramid he has raised is the pyramid of death.
Egypt is a dry bone out of which he has sucked the last ounce of marrow.
The last assets he has are the controlling shares in the Suez Canal.
And these he is dying to sell to the highest bidder.
France built the Canal but is too poor to buy it.
Russia covets it as a means of snatching India.
England has the means of defending it.
Both pretend the purchase is the last thing in the world they're thinking of.
Both are watching each other like cats.
And Ismael sits and waits for the cat to jump.
Those shares I mean to have.
How ?
The Bank of England refuses to back me, but today Meyers is giving me a blank check...
...and I felt the thing was done.
But now Foljambe knows, Russia knows.
In a week Foljambe will be in Cairo and whatever sum they offer he will double.
Now do you see the importance of it ?
There's no remedy.
Of course there is.
What, sir, what ?
I must send a man to the khedive.
With unlimited powers.
Ready to outbid anything, ready to pay on the nail.
What must be the man's qualifications ?
A strong, stern, silent man.
Subtle and cunning.
Fighting wilyness with wilyness.
Have you such a man, sir ?
I've sent for him.
What is it, Clarissa ?
What is it, my dear ?
Oh, I thought for a minute, while you were speaking...
...that perhaps Charles might...
Oh, don't say it. Clarissa, don't say it.
Yes, do say it Clarissa.
Do say it.
For there is another kind of man who might be twice as useful.
What kind ?
A man so honest that the rogues would think him a rogue.
So truthful, they'd swear he was lying.
So simple, they'd never fathom him.
Why laugh at me so ? I feel my folly bitterly enough !
What's the matter, Charles ?
Disgust. Utter disgust with myself and despair.
Why despair ?
Queen's messenger !
Not wanted !
You are the man !
I ?
I am to be trusted with this mission after what I've done ?
Why not ?
Because I'm a useless, conceited idler and a perfect and complete fool.
Well, granting that... what, I didn't say it.
But, granting that, that's a very good reason for sending you.
But I've failed already.
Nearly all my successes are founded on previous failures.
On your own showing, no one will ever suspect you.
You have only to meet all their cunning with that stolid British face of yours...
... and the schemes will be disarmed. Come, will you go ?
Will I go ?
Ah ! There's your man of action, Clarissa.
I warn you: there will be grave danger.
Are you ready to meet it ?
Yes, sir.
I mean danger of death.
Yes, sir.
Death ?
Every step of the way.
Every hour of the day.
Danger lurking in every disguise.
And once he is in Egypt, if his errand be known, his life wil not be worth a moment's purchase.
Oh, I didn't know. I didn't know !
Clarissa, my child. Do you forbid him to go ?
I ? I cannot forbid.
Yes, you can. He shall obey you.
But think a moment. If you forbid and he obeys and I send that other man, how will you feel ?
Clarissa.
You must go !
Well done !
I think I may tell him, may I not ?
That a great reward is awaiting his return.
If I succeed ?
Whether you succeed or fail, eh ?
Good !
Now, then. When can you be ready to start ?
I think I could start the day after tomorrow.
Capital ! That will make the enterprise so much more interesting.
How do you mean, sir ?
Foljambe will have a 48 hours start with Ismael.
You mean I shall be too late ?
I'm trying to convey that impression.
Well... tomorrow then, if it must be.
That's better.
Although Foljambe can do a great deal in a day...
Well, there's a night mail tonight at nine.
Now.
Now ? You don't mean...
I mean in ten minutes.
But my luggage. I shan't even have a clean collar.
Damn your collar. Catch the Dover Express Delivery from Charing Cross.
You'll be in Marseilles tomorrow and in Cairo a day ahead of Foljambe.
A day ahead !
By Jove, I'll do it !
Of course you will.
Now, children...
... say goodbye to one another, while I write your instructions.
Clarissa. Did you hear what Mr. Disraeli said just now ?
The hope he allowed... of reward ?
If he had not said it I should have.
A reward will be mine if I succeed.
Or if you fail.
Clarissa, do you love me, then ?
I love you.
Time's up.
Ready, sir.
Now, then...
Here's all you need.
Money, instructions and the code for telegrams.
I keep the duplicate. Now be on.
No, no ! Departure should be sudden.
Good luck.
Goodbye.
And God bless you.
Well. Now then.
What am I to do ? What am I to do ?
Would you care to go for a drive ?
Oh, you're heartless.
How am I to wait ?
How am I to wait ?
You ? You don't love him.
No ? Then why did I send him ?
Listen ! I've got an idea.
What ?
Come to the country and see peacocks.
Very noble and inteligent birds, I assure you.
Peacocks !
Well, I say they are intelligent birds.
Master, where are we going with that spade ?
What ? Why, bless my soul.
And them dirty boots.
Splendid morning's work, eh, Potter ?
Don't blame me if you caught your death.
Caught me death ? What do you mean ?
'Tis well known you ought to be in your bed.
Why ?
I'm not ill.
Yes, you are.
Mortal dead, you are. Says so in print.
Oh ?
Where ?
Last night's Globe.
I read it with me own eyes.
A highly respectable sheet.
What does it say ?
Says Dr. Williams has been seen going in and out o' here.
And that'd be true, too.
For he just strolled by and left this bottle of stuff for ye.
For me ?
Oh, no.
For Lady Beaconsfield.
Very kind of them to be so anxious about me.
Dr. Williams has been here twice to see Lady Beaconsfield, who had a fainting fit.
And that's all.
Oh, them London newspapers.
Ah, my coffee.
Good morning, Mr. Bascot.
Good morning, sir.
Is your mistress stirring ?
I believe so, sir.
And Lady Clarissa ?
Yes, sir.
Oh !
Good morning, Mr. Disraeli.
Good morning, my dear.
Any news of Charles ?
Not yet.
Not yet, not yet. It should have come days ago, shouldn't it ?
Are you so deeply in love ?
Oh, dreadfully.
Have you had breakfast ?
Oh, breakfast.
Tell me. How's the secret ?
About Mrs. Travers ?
Yes.
You've heard from her ?
Not a sound. She's keeping very quiet.
I don't like people who keep quiet.
She might do a great deal of mischief.
So Lady Beaconsfield has persuaded her to come here today.
I want to have that glorious creature where I can see her.
Ah, Mary, my dear.
Good morning, Dizzy.
Had a good night ?
Of course I have. Slept like a top.
Sure ?
Now, Clarissa, listen to him. He doubts everybody's words.
He doubts mine.
I never can believe anything you say about yourself, Mary.
Do you know what this foolish woman did a little while ago ?
She drove with me one night to the House of Commons...
... when I had to make a very important speech.
The footman slammed the carriage door and crushed her finger in it.
Oh !
Yes.
That poor finger.
And because she knew how distressed I should be...
... she never uttered a sound...
... and bore the agony unflinchingly.
And I knew nothing about it until I got home.
How wonderful.
Wait till you're married, my dear.
You'll be doing just as wonderful things...
... and thinking just as little of them.
Well, if you're telling the truth...
... you shall have your morning offering.
Clarissa, never allude to my health before Dizzy.
Promise me.
It worries him.
And heaven knows he has worries enough without that.
Is anything the matter ?
Nothing... nothing to make a fuss about.
Dr. Williams says I must be careful.
I am, so that's all right.
Now mind, not a word to Dizzy.
A crushed finger again ?
Gladly, every day for his sake.
The last rose of summer.
Thank you, Dizzy.
Telegram, sir.
Oh !
Thank you, Mr. Bascot.
Open it. Open it. Open it !
Mary, do look after that silly child.
While I read this telegram from my tailor.
Ah !
For pity's sake !
It is from Cairo !
What does it say ?
The celery is ripe to cut.
The celery is ripe to cut ?
I must say I hardly think it was worthwhile going to the extent...
What does it mean ?
A great deal more than it says.
Look.
What's that ?
A copy of the code I gave him. See ?
"The celery is ripe to cut".
The parallel sentence: "The Suez Canal purchase is completed and the check accepted.
Dizzy !
He did it !
Yes, superbly !
Oh, thank God ! Thank God !
Clarissa !
Let her cry, Mary, let her cry. It's worth it.
How glad you must be.
Glad, for now that other dream of mine will be realized.
What dream ?
To make my sovereign Empress of India.
Empress of India ?
Ah, sounds well, Mary, doesn't it ?
Mary, you shall be my messenger when the time is ripe.
You, Lady Beaconsfield, shall carry the news to our beloved Queen...
... and you shall be there, and you shall be proud...
... when I stand up to announce the new title to Our Majesty's faithful Common.
Yes, Dizzy, when will that be ?
Oh, some time must elapse.
This must be formally ratified.
Public opinion must be created.
Make haste, Dizzy, make haste.
Impatient woman.
Will Charles come back soon ?
There's another impatient woman, Mary.
I must telegraph this to Meyers.
Yes.
Meyers made this thing possible.
Another Jew, Mary.
There'll be a peerage for him.
How furious old Probert will be.
"Hugh Meyers, London Wall.
The Suez Canal purchase is completed and the check accepted".
But you haven't answered my question !
Will Charles come home soon ?
Yes, with drums beating, trumpets blowing...
...flags flying.
Oh, I don't care anything about that.
And wedding bells ringing.
A station cab !
Can that be Mrs. Travers ?
Mrs. Travers ?
We can't have Mrs. Travers here now.
She'd worm this out of you in no time.
She'd read it in both your faces.
Dizzy, you made me like her.
Well, get rid of her, send her away, kill her.
Put your wits together, both of you.
Tell her I'm very ill.
That I'm very ill indeed.
Hugh Meyers. It's Hugh Meyers !
Show him in at once.
That's splendid. Is it possible he heard the news ?
Would Charles have cabled him ?
No, no. These millionares know everything by a sort of instinct.
If he's coming to tell us, don't spoil its effect.
Don't tell him. I'll spring it on him later.
Ah, Mr. Meyers, delighted to see you.
Good morning.
How do you do, Mr. Meyers ?
Lady Clarissa Pevencey you know.
What happy winds... ?
Can I have a few moments in private with you, sir ?
Oh, these ladies...
Forgive me if I insist.
Why, of course.
Mary...
You'll stay for luncheon.
I'm sorry, that is impossible. But thank you very much.
Come, Clarissa.
Mr. Meyers, I was just about to send you this...
One moment, sir.
I want you to hear me first.
What I have to say...
Well ?
Sit down. Sit down.
Well ?
I don't know how to tell you.
It's so much harder than I expected.
Come, come. Tell me.
Mr. Disraeli...
I... I...
I am bankrupt.
What ?
I didn't quite catch.
Our house is bankrupt.
Bankrupt ?
Meyers bankrupt ?
You're mad ?
I wish to God I were.
You mean you're temporarily pressed, you're in temporary difficulties.
I mean we are bankrupt.
But that seems impossible.
It's the truth.
A house like yours, an historical firm, you might as well say the Bank of England !
So I should have thought.
What have you been doing ?
What... !
Stop. It's not our fault.
Well ?
First our ship with the bullion from the Argentine.
Yes ?
Gone down.
What ?
Scuttled.
You mean...
I mean purposely and criminally sunk.
All the crew saved. A conspiracy.
It will take weeks, months to recover the insurance.
And that is not all.
What else ?
For a long time, ever since our  interview in Downing Street, rumors affecting my credit have been spread abroad.
And now this mysterious wreck.
I'm being pressed.
I see.
On and on this power has been working in the dark.
My liabilities have been bought up... ah, feel angry as you like.
You're justified. I've been an honest man all my life.
And now I come before you in the light of a common cheat... oh !
Mr. Meyers...
I know you, sir.
Tell me... you say some power is behind active in this.
Who do you mean ?
I don't know. They're working through an agent.
And who is that ?
Samuel Llewelyn, a great solicitor.
Does anyone else know ?
Not a living soul.
I've come to you first because, of course, we cannot carry out the Canal contract.
Thank heaven I'm in time.
Thank heaven that has not gone through.
When will it be known, Meyers ?
When will it be known ?
Tonight, tomorrow morning.
Pray the Lord, it shall not !
Get back to town quickly.
Get to your office. Stay there. Stay there !
I must know you are there ! Don't budge if I keep you there all night.
But...
Don't breathe a word of this...
Don't let anyone else. Don't give the slightest hint of anything unusual.
We have to act lightly. Watch your words, watch your looks.
Something may happen.
Something shall happen !
What, sir ? What ?
God knows. God knows.
Mr. Disraeli...
Yes. Yes.
Mary.
Mary !
Yes, dear ?
I want you.
What is it ?
Mary... You've stood by me in many horrible predicaments.
I'm in the worst I was ever in.
Dizzy !
Meyers.
Meyers is bankrupt.
Does that mean we are poor ?
No. No.
Oh, if that were all.
Then ?
Meyers was finding the money for the Canal.
Oh !
Wait !
Deeford has passed the check.
Now Meyers is failed, we can't pay.
And you ?
I ?
Yes, dear.
I want to know how this will affect you.
What does that matter ?
It's all that matters to me.
I hadn't thought of that.
What will happen to me.
Disgrace. Utter and irretrievable.
The kind of disgrace no man can bear.
No man can live through.
Dizzy !
Yes, by heaven I will bear it !
I'll face the nation !
I'll bear it alone !
Not alone dear.
Thank God for you, Mary.
Thank God.
Have you done anything yet ?
So soon ? what could I do ?
Shouldn't we go up to town ?
I can't. I daren't. I can't move secretly.
The Prime Minister can't stir without setting the whole world agog.
The papers have said I'm ill. If I'm seen in Downing Street now during the recess when I'm supposed to be ill...
... every newspaper in the world would grow hysterical.
It's horrible, Mary.
I'm bound hand and foot.
Mrs. Travers.
What ?
Mrs. Travers in a station cab, sir.
I'll get rid of her.
Get rid of her ? Mr. Bascot, ask her to wait...
Show her in when I ring.
Surely you will not receive her now.
We must keep her here.
Why ?
She must stay here. We mustn't let her out of our site.
Dizzy, what is this play acting ?
I'm ill.
Very ill.
If the newspapers have said I'm ill, she'll see the sickest man she ever saw in her life.
Mrs. Travers is here. Shall I send her away ?
No, no, no.
Chain her. Hand and foot.
But, Mr Disraeli !
Shhh.
I'm ill.
Very ill.
Mrs. Travers.
Ah, dear Lady Beaconsfield.
I'm so sorry. I heard Mr. Disraeli was ill.
I didn't know whether to come or not.
I'm sure you can't want to see me.
Is that Mrs. Travers, dear ?
Yes, dear.
Dear Mrs. Travers.
It's so good of you.
I'm very weak. Very weak.
I'm so sorry. What is the matter ?
Well, I'm...
I'm very weak.
I'm very glad to see you. You're so bright.
So young, and so...
How's your poor husband ?
Still abroad. In search of health, you know.
Very sad.
And you have come to see the poor sick man.
Isn't it good of her, Mary ?
Yes, dear.
Do sit down.... there...
... where I can see you.
Sweet Clarissa, more beautiful every day.
I saw the dear Duchess, your mother, yesterday.
She seems very anxious about Lord Deeford.
He's abroad too, isn't he ?
Egypt or somewhere.
Yes, he is abroad.
Yes, he is in Egypt.
I do hope he's not too venturesome.
Cairo is such a dreadful place.
Those Orientals, you know.
One can never trust them.
No...
So sly, and deceitful...
Ah...
Dear sympathetic creature. Isn't she sympathetic, Mary ?
Yes, dear.
But don't be uneasy. We've just heard from Deeford.
Indeed ?
Mary,
Yes, dear.
Isn't it time I had my beef tea ?
You say you have heard ?
What, Mrs. Travers ?
Oh, from Deeford.
Yes, we had a telegram.
Where is that telegram, Mary ?
On the table, dear.
Help me up, dear.
Why, there it is. Under the paper weight.
Read it for yourself, Mrs. Travers.
Heavens, how pale I am.
The celery is ripe to cut.
How odd.
Yes. Why odd ?
Well, that anyone should cable all the way from Egypt about celery.
Well, you know, he's engaged in a very interesting agricultural experiment.
You remember we were discussing that very subject at the garden party.
Oh, yes. And what a delightful party that was.
And all dispersed. Lord Deeford in Egypt, poor Mr. Disraeli very ill...
... Sir Michael Probert out of town...
I beg your pardon ?
A twinge. I thank you so  much.
I've been trying to remember his name all day.
Probert, of course.
Is that one of the famous peacocks ?
Yes. Dizzy is very proud of them. And of the swans.
I've heard so much about them.
May I have a look at them ?
Yes.
He has given them such funny names.
She has the code. Don't let her read it.
Follow her. Stick to her.
Such funny things.
I'll show you their houses.
Oh, please don't trouble.
No trouble.
Mary.
Yes, dear.
You know the Probert country place.
You can drive there in 3 minutes.
I want you to fetch him at once.
I'll order the carriage.
Wait !
Is Mrs. Travers' cab still there ?
Yes.
Well, you can take that.
But if he refuses to come ?
You tell him it's a matter of life and death.
But Mrs. Travers ?
I'll look after her.
Mary !
Yes, dear.
Take Clarissa with you.
I want that woman alone.
That must be signed.
Yes, they are beautiful.
And so tame.
I'm so glad you liked them.
Do come and sit down.
But I really ought to be going.
Oh, no. Do sit down.
Lady Beaconsfield and Clarissa have to go and meet the specialist.
We shall be gone only a very few moments.
Come, Clarissa.
Specialist ? Oh, are you so ill ?
Yes.
But he'll cure me. He'll cure me.
And you should stay and nurse the poor sick man.
I'm dreadfully sorry, but...
You must stay.
Till they come back.
But my cab is waiting.
No. I've sent that away.
Really ?
Now, don't be angry.
What a dainty hand.
Such supple fingers.
So long and thin.
So exquisitely shaped.
Please...
They're so quick to grasp things.
Unconsidered trifles, scraps of paper...
Oh, just let me go. You're hurting me.
You're in such a hurry to get away from the poor sick man ?
To get away and read... the code ?
Well ? What of it ?
Ah... that's better.
That's how I remember you.
Remember me ?
So strange. When we first met at the Duke of Glastonbury's...
... I remembered you, but I couldn't place you.
I connected you with something blue and white.
Milk and water ?
No.
Snow and water.
Mont Blanc and the Lake of Geneva.
Geneva in the '60s.
Russian refugees and their English sympathisers.
A man called Lumley and his ravishing... shall I say... wife ?
No. Comrade. That was the term.
Charming relationship. Delightful couple.
So good to the unhappy exiles. But people are cruel.
Thay said the good Mr. Lumley and his charming comrade were agents.
Decoys in Russian pay, engaged in worming out the secrets of the refugees... in tempting them back to Russia, to Siberia, to death.
And pray what has all this to do with me ?
Ah, what indeed ?
With you, the friend of Dukes and bankers, with Mr. Lumley and his charming comrade... who were driven out of Geneva by the slanderers.
And where do you think I saw him next ?
In Downing Street.
He had changed his name to Foljambe.
I was so sorry for him that I gave him work.
But you did more.
You gave him instructions...
... to hurry to Trieste. Now do I know you ?
Dear Mrs. Lumley Travers Foljambe ?
Well ? And what next ?
Admiration.
Profound admiration.
Until this moment. Today you have disappointed me.
Why steal that ?
Weak. Very weak.
You had only to ask me and I would have told you.
"The celery is ripe to cut" means the Suez Canal purchase is completed and the check accepted.
Poor dear old Lumley has had all that tiresome journey for nothing.
I congratulate you.
Your apple-faced boy has blundered into success.
Ah, that's what any of us do, Mrs. Travers.
A success that will cost you dear.
That's the sort of thing Gladstone will say.
It's what the world will say when it knows that Meyers is bankrupt.
The world knows what ?
Meyers is bankrupt. Bankrupt, bankrupt.
Mrs Travers, I'm very weak. Don't jest with me.
Meyers is bankrupt and his check waste paper.
Wait, wait. It's easy for you to tell me this, but why should I believe you ?
Because it was my invention.
You thought to circumvent me with your apple-faced boy.
What do you say now, Mr. Disraeli ?
You can't expect me to say much.
I am a child in your hands.
Oh, Mr. Disraeli, I'm sorry to hear that you are ill.
I'm so much better.
Mrs. Travers' stimulating company...
Sir Michael Probert.
How do you do ?
But he's not a...
A specialist ? Oh, yes he is.
Why, what's going on ?
If you're not ill, why have you sent for me ?
Probert, sit down.
I want to tell you a little story.
Don't go, Mrs Travers.
This may interest you, too
I repeat. Why have you sent for me ?
I told you I might send for you.
When ? What do you mean ?
When we had our last delightful interview.
Oh, I thought as much.
Your hare-brained scheme.
Moses has failed you and you had to give it up.
Well, it's no use appealing to me...
Moses has not failed me.
... and I've carried the scheme through.
What ?
Do you mean to tell me that you have purchased the Suez Canal ?
The power and the glory of my country were at stake.
I had to act quickly and I had to act on my own responsibility.
Then let me tell you, sir, you have committed a crime.
As Parliament was not sitting to vote the money I had to seek it elsewhere.
Five million sterling, you refused.
I did and I'm proud of it.
I went to the wealthiest private firm, to Hugh Meyers.
A Jew.
Meyers, not being a party man but a patriot, saw the greatness of the idea and stood beside me.
I sent Deeford to Ismael.
Spies got wind of what I was doing and Russia knew.
So Deeford had to go in a hurry. A race for an Empire.
He has succeeded, understand me ?
I put the matter quite simply.
Deeford has bought the Canal and has paid for it with Meyers' check drawn on the Bank of England. Wait !
Meanwhile, Russia has been at work, by the intermediary of one of the most charming women of my acquaintance.
Meyers is bankrupt.
What ?
Yes. Russia has ruined him.
Mr. Disraeli, I warned you of this.
I foresaw it. Your high-handed action has landed you just where I said it would.
You must get out of it as best you can.
It's no use appealing to me.
No, and I will not appeal to you. I will command you.
What ?
You will sign this note giving Meyers unlimited credit.
Meyers ? Are you mad ?
I've never been more sane in my life.
If Meyers's position is saved, we can gain time.
The Bank of England must give him unlimited credit today, now !
You don't know what you're saying.
You don't know to whom you're speaking.
I refuse...
You can't.
I refuse emphatically !
You've mistaken your man. I'm an Englishman.
The head of a great national institution.
And I'm not to be ordered about by... an alien. A Jew.
The alien, the Jew happens to be the better citizen.
Moreover, he happens to be the Prime Minister.
You threaten me ?
Yes, if you force me to it.
Oh, empty threats.
You think so ? If you say the Bank is a national institution... what becomes of that title if it refuses to save the Nation ?
What becomes of you ?
Mr. Disraeli !
When it is known that the lack of patriotism of one man... has placed our country in the position of a person who is trying to pass a fraudulent check...
... expose the nation to the ridicule of the world... lost the Canal, lost India, baffled England, beaten and disgraced her, dragged her through the mud...
What becomes of the Bank ?
You can't touch the Bank !
I'll smash the Bank !
Parliament's granted the Bank it's charter...
Parliament can withdraw it and shall withdraw it at my bidding... your Board of Directors will be swept away... your shareholders bankrupt, the Bank ruined...
... and you displaced.
I am Prime Minister. I can do this...
... and if you don't sign, by God I will !
Now...
Take your paper. I have signed it.
I have signed it to save the Bank.
That's an outrage, that a man like you should have such power.
Oh, Mr. Disraeli, thank God you have such power.
I haven't, dear child, but he doesn't know that.
Oh !
She must on no account be disturbed.
Let her sleep as long as possible.
Yes, sir.
Well ?
Can't tell. I'm very hopeful of the result of this deep sleep.
But I can't say anything more at present.
I can't go. I can't leave her like this.
Mr. Disraeli, I know how you feel,
... but you must go.
I feel bound to remind you that Queen Victoria is going to attend your reception in person.
That is an honor she has never before paid to a Prime Minister.
All the Court will be there.
Every country in the world will be represented.
And all to pay homage to you.
And Mary won't be there.
You know she always loved people to flatter me.
All England will be at your feet tonight.
And Mary won't be there.
I promised her that we would meet the Queen...
... hand in hand.
How can I go through with it ?
The glitter, the music, the dancing.
And what to all the congratulations.
Alone.
You've always been a fighter, Mr. Disraeli.
If it were possible for you to stay I would advise it.
But you cannot break faith with Her Majesty.
The Queen would understand and pardon me.
But you are right. I cannot break faith with the Nation.
I must go.
If there's any change for the worse,
I'll send you a telegram and you can be home in a few hours.
Home ?
Without her, I have no home.
When she wakes...
... give her this.
From me.
What a day this has been for Dizzy, eh Belinda ?
It's all very astonishing.
They say the Queen is delighted with her new title, Empress of India.
And how Disraeli swayed the House when he announced the new title.
Even Gladstone was delighted.
Dizzy is a great man.
Oh, father, so you've come round to that at last.
Well, there's no use denying it now.
I never denied his greatness.
Oh, Meyers, on your legs again.
Thanks to you, Sir Michael.
Yes, yes. Great patriotic idea.
Dizzy and I talked it over long before you came in.
So he told me.
And the Bank was a great patriotic institution... couldn't let it drop.
How fortunate you saw it in that light.
Glad to help you. Glad to help you.
Mr. Meyers.
Lady Clarissa.
The Viscount Deeford has come home.
Yes. To think of it. I've not been allowed to see him yet.
Too bad. Too bad, Why not ?
He only arrived half an hour ago...
... and had to come straight to Downing Street.
Naturally.
They say Lady Beaconsfield is ill.
Mr. Meyers, I'm dreadfully anxious.
Nothing serious, I hope.
I don't know, and I daren't ask Mr. Disraeli.
Her absence tonight is such a horrible disappointment for him.
Of course, of course.
Mr. Disraeli.
Mr. Disraeli.
Dear Mr. Disraeli.
Lady Probert. Charmed, charmed
So sorry dearest Lady Beaconsfield cannot be here tonight.
So is she.
And so am I.
So am I.
No doubt only a passing indisposition.
I trust so.
My dear child.
How is she ? Really.
Don't ask me. I daren't trust myself to speak.
I'm horribly anxious.
Dr. Williams reassured me, or I shoudn't be here now.
Not even to meet the Empress of India.
Her Majesty is on her way.
Before she arrives, I want to thank those men who have so splendidly stood at my side...
... and made our enterprise successful.
First, there's my friend, Mr. Hugh Meyers,
Mr. Meyers...
...concerning whose services I cannot speak too highly.
Next, there's Sir Michael Probert...
... at a moment of grave crisis, he came to my aid against his... shall I say...
... prejudice.
Mr. Meyers, Sir Michael Probert, it is my privilege to inform you...
... that in recognition of your patriotic action... your sovereign has bestowed a peerage upon each of you.
My congratulations.
Thank you.
May I add mine ?
Your grace is most kind.
Lastly, you'll be glad to know that my young friend... who carried through the delicate negotiations... with such consummate tact, I refer to Charles Viscont Deeford...
... arrived in London half an hour ago.
Viscount Deeford !
Charles !
Her Majesty desires to confer the Ribbon of the Bath upon you...
... with her own hand.
Clarissa.
Charles.
My dear.
Oh, hang all these people.
Why didn't you come earlier ?
Well, I had to see Dizzy and get into this rig.
My dear Mr. Meyers.
I beg your pardon, sir.
But this telegram has been waiting.
Charles, I'm frightened.
Why ?
Lady Beaconsfield has been very ill.
You don't mean...
It may be...
...news of her death.
Dizzy,
Mary !
I didn't know.
But the doctor sent you a telegram, dear.
Yes.
Buster Keaton in The Saphead
Directed by Herbert Blache
Written by June Mathis
"The New Henrietta" was a
Broadway play in which...
Douglas Fairbanks scored a major success in 1913.
It was first filmed with him
1915 under the name THE LAMB.
When it was to be remade by Metro in 1920,...
Fairbanks himself suggested Buster Keaton for his former role.
Keaton was then under an exclusive contract with...
Joseph M. Schenck who agreed to loan him to Metro.
It was Keaton's first appearance in a feature-length film.
THE SAPHEAD'S great success earned Keaton star billings in his subsequent films.
A little street where money is everything- and everything is money.
Nicholas Van Alstyne- known, loved, and feared as "The Old Nick of The Street."
Old Nick's very private secretary -- "Mr. Musgrave."
"You tell him that Jim Hardy from Arizona is here."
"I used to pal with this old boy out west."
"What the blazes brought you east, Jim?"
"The Henrietta mine -- she's the all-fired biggest proposition I ever seen."
"Jim, you know more about a mine than anybody on earth -- except me --"
"I want a broker -- send for Watson Flint."
"If you say the Henrietta is that big -- watch me gamble on her!"
Mark Turner had succeeded in marrying Old Nick's daughter -
- but had never succeeded at anything else.
MARK TURNER
BROKER
His morning mail as usual was all bills and no business.
"There's a girl outside that wants to see you personal."
I am destitute and very ill. I must see you. Henrietta Reynolds
"Your wife's outside, sir."
"Go back and tell her she'll hear from me in a day or two."
"I came to invite you to lunch."
"I'm afraid you'd find me rotten company."
"I work like a dog, Rose -- but I don't get anywhere."
"Your father's commissions are worth a fortune to a broker -
- but he never gives me an order."
"I'll have a talk with Dad about you
-- when he gets home this afternoon."
Old Nick's castle.
Bertie Van Alstyne, Esquire, his father's hope and pride, breakfasts early -- in the afternoon.
"I want to talk to you about the way you treat Mark."
I am destitute and very ill. I must see you. Henrietta Reynolds
"You keep away -- I'll see her, and try to get your letters back."
"If you'll stop talking I'll see what I can do for your Mark."
Bertie had been in love for years and decided something must be done about it.
Nick's ward, Agnes, was the girl
Bertie loved. He had confided this -
- to his sister and his valet -- but had never mentioned it to her.
"Agnes has telegraphed that she's coming home from school today."
"Don't get excited ---- you'll have plenty of time to meet her ---
- the train doesn't arrive until 6:30."
"What's happened to you lately?
Getting home at daylight -
- and having a picture of Henrietta, the dancer, in your room--"
"I am leading a fast life because
I am in love with Agnes."
How to win the modern girl by Judith Blakely
How to win the modern girl. THE Modern Girl has no use for the old-fashioned man. She prefers -
- sports to saints. Few girls now-a-days can resist a dashing, gambling, drinking devil.
Agnes was to arrive at the Grand Central -
- so Bertie went to meet her at the Pennsylvania.
Six-thirty at the Grand Central.
Agnes was an orphan -- whom Nick has brought up as his own child.
"Nobody met me."
"The saphead! I suppose he forgot all about you."
"Ask Hutchins to let me know as soon as Mr. Bertie comes in."
"Mr. Bertie is never home before three in the morning, Miss."
"I was waiting for someone
-- but she didn't come."
Trash
The Gay White Way failing to cheer Bertie - his friends try the side streets.
"I'm having rotten luck -- lend me a couple of thousand."
"Are those things worth two thousand dollars?"
"What are they made of?"
"I'm awfully tired of this -- would you mind very much if I stop?"
"Your winnings, Mr. V.
-- thirty-eight thousand."
"Are you quite sure you can spare it?"
Bertie sees a chance to get a real reputation as a sport --
"Will you see to arresting me, please?"
Morning
RAID ON GAMBLING PALACE.
SON OF NICHOLAS VAN ALSTYNE
AMONG THOSE PRESENT.
Young Men of Prominent Families
Given Free Ride to Police Station.
"But they might come and take him to jail!"
"Is it true you were in that dreadful place?"
"I was there because I love Agnes."
"If you love Agnes, why didn't you meet her?"
"I did -- but she didn't come."
"Bertie -- you've changed somehow."
"I heard you tell Rose that you loved me -- and I love you, too."
"I've tricked you into loving me -- when you know the truth -
- I'm afraid you won't care for me any more."
"Tell me --"
"I'm good!"
"I've tried my best to get over it -- but I can't -- and I still kneel down -
- and say my prayers every morning -- before I go to bed."
"Bertie, who is Henrietta?"
"I bought her picture- but I never met her."
"Agnes, you'd better go."
"You've got to get out and shift for yourself --
- this is the last check you'll get from me!"
Bankers Trust Company
10,000 $   -  Nicholas Van Alstyne
"How can you be so cruel!
I love Bertie, whether you do or not, and I'm going to be his wife!"
"If you've had the impertinence to ask Agnes to marry you--"
"-- I suppose I've got to give you a little more."
Bankers Trust Company
"Not another cent!"
"Not another word about marrying
Agnes until you go to work ----
- and make something of yourself!"
Poor Bertie-- cut off with a million -- moved into humble quarters at the Ritz.
Watson Flint -- Nick's broker, and a friend of the family.
"I've got to go into business like you and Mark Turner."
Dearest Agnes, you wanted me to go into business so I have gone.
"I bought a seat on the Stock Exchange for a hundred thousand dollars."
"A hundred thousand dollars for a seat?"
"Well, furniture is way up now-a-days."
"I want to show you an engagement ring."
"You asked me to look after it, sir."
"If father won't let us marry, perhaps you'll keep it to remember me by."
"No matter what Uncle Nick says, I'll marry you whenever you want me --"
"We can't now, Bertie -- we must make arrangements first --
- let's say next Tuesday!"
"Leon, we're to be married secretly Tuesday evening --
- please make all the arrangements."
"It would be a wonderful surprise for her --
- if we could only get it ready in time."
"We must!"
You can never be sure a woman will be on time -- even for her wedding.
"I'm going to marry Bertie tonight."
"But, Agnes -- you mustn't run away
-- we'll have the wedding here!"
"Get out one of her little white dresses
-- and she can wear my wedding veil."
"I'll manage father, and send for the Reverend Murray Hilton."
"I took you into business because Rose wanted me to -
- and you're making good!"
"I've given you power of attorney because
I'm going on a cruise Wednesday -
- and you'll be in charge while I'm away."
"Bertie and Agnes are going to be married tonight --"
"Perhaps they've locked her up."
"All right -- let 'em be married in here
-- or down cellar -- or on the roof --"
"-- but I won't see them."
"I have called for Agnes."
"I'm through with you --"
"-- and as for Agnes, she has disobeyed me --"
"Now ask Bertie to forgive you."
"We're going to be married here!"
For the Minister
"Anything else?"
"I'll put one in every pocket -- then when the minister asks me -- there you are!"
Henrietta Reynolds
518 S. Vine St, Omaha, Nebraska
"If I die -- promise me you'll put these into Mrs. Turner's hands."
"I want Mrs. Turner!"
"Henrietta is dead -- and I gave her my sacred word I'd put these into your hands."
A dying mother appeals to you -
Have mercy on my little one. -
- The letters from her father which I send with this will tell you the rest.
Henrietta Reynolds
"I'm sorry this blow has come, Rose
-- I've tried to keep it from you --"
"Bertie, these belong to you
---- they're from Henrietta."
Bertie's valet had planned a great surprise for the bridal couple.
Tortured by thoughts of Agnes
-- Bertie hopes a visit to -
- the Stock Exchange may help him to forget.
"This is a new member
-- Mr. Van Alstyne."
"Mr. Turner wants to see you at
Van Alstyne's office right away."
"Do all these seats cost a hundred thousand dollars?"
HE'S NEW
MAKE HIM WELCOME
Knowing that the truth about Henrietta
Reynolds must soon come to light,
Mark has induced Nick to go on his yachting trip as planned.
With Nick out of the way, Mark sees a chance to clean up a fortune -
- before his relations with Henrietta
Reynolds are discovered.
"Mr. Van Alstyne notified you that I would be in -
- complete authority here during his absence -- ?"
"I want you to sell 'Henrietta
Mine' until you have -
- knocked the price down fifty points!"
"I can't accept a commission of that size without security."
"Great heavens, Turner! -- these securities belong to your father-in-law!"
"While he is away they are mine."
Bertie's introduction to the Floor grows more and more informal.
"All they do here is knock off hats -- but I enjoy it -- it occupies the mind."
"I'm going out to get some new ones so I can play it again."
The raid on Henrietta.
"They've started a raid on 'Henrietta'
-- you ought to be on the Floor!"
"When I want your advice
I'll send for you!"
"Mr. Tildon of the National City is here."
BIG SLUMP IN HENRIETTA MINING STOCK
"Mr. Van Alstyne won't return for a week
-- and Mr. Turner is in charge."
"Tell Turner if we don't receive collateral by three o'clock we'll be forced to -
- throw Van Alstyne's holdings on the market!"
"Thank God you've come, sir!"
"Thank God!
I was seasick--"
...PA           ...HEN               ...INP
"Call up Mr. Tildon -- and send to the Stock Exchange for Mark Turner!"
"Mr. Turner hasn't been on the Floor today!"
"Mark Turner is responsible for this raid, sir."
"Because he's a cheat -
I found out he was responsible for -
- that Henrietta girl, and put the blame on Mr. Bertie-"
"I'm sorry to hurry you -- but it's two-thirty, and your securities must be in the bank before the market closes."
"It's almost three o'clock.
There's nothing on earth I can do."
"You're too late. Flint's on the Floor now, knocking the last breath out of -
- the 'Henrietta' -- and I can buy your holdings for next to nothing!"
"Get the police!"
"All the police in the world can't prevent your losing control of the Henrietta Mine -
- when the gong rings in the
Stock Exchange!"
-HENRIETTA
-HENRIETTA
-HENRIETTA
-HENRIETTA!
-HENRIETTA!!
-HENRIETTA!!
-HENRIETTA
-HENRIETTA
-HENRIETTA
"Sir, you're insulting me!-- and I demand that you stop yelling that woman's name!"
HENRIETTA!
HENRIETTA
"They're all yelling that woman's name at me --
- and I can't make them stop!"
"Bertie, listen! -- I'll tell you something that will stop them!"
"Every time you hear a man yelling 'Henrietta' -
- you grab him and say -- 'I TAKE IT'!"
It seems to Bertie that the whole Stock Exchange -
- is taunting him by yelling
Henrietta's name.
"She's up forty points and going like a rocket!"
Van Alstyne's Henrietta Pounded to a Pulp
...HEN                                   LAST
"I've been saved, Flint!
-- saved by a miracle!"
"It was no miracle -- it was Bertie!
He's the latest member of -
- the Stock Exchange!"
"He's bought a cottage on Long Island
-- this is his address."
"I have been on the Floor of the Stock Exchange."
"Why, my boy -- you've saved 'Henrietta'!"
"I mean the Henrietta mine! Now get dressed, because I've sent for
Agnes and the minister."
THE END
Subtitle By : Reza Fa
For decades The Lost World could be seen only in an abridged version...
...about an hour in length. This edition combines portions of eight prints...
...to present the most complete reconstruction believed possible.
Sir Arthur Conan Doyle's Stupendous
Story of Adventure And Romance
THE LOST WORLD
By arrangement with
Watterson R. Rothacker
Introducting Sir Arthur Conan Doyle, author of the story.
I have wrought my simple plan
If I give one hour of joy
To the boy who's half a man
Or the man who's half a boy.
LONDON
I have a presentiment that you are going to propose, Ed.
I do wish you wouldn't, for this are so much nicer as they are.
But why can't you love me, Gladys?
Now tell me what's amiss with me.
I will only marry a man of great deeds and strange experiences...
- a man who can look death in the face without flinching!
In the office of the
London-Record Journal.
I want your legal advice. Profesor
Challenger threatens to sue my paper... for doubting his yarn about live dinosaurs.
FAMOUS ZOOLOGISTS RETURNS FROM SOUTH
AMERICA WITHOUTH PROOFS OF STRANGE TALE
Profesor Challenger, well-known author and scientist, has returned to London...
...with a strange tale of Mammoths,
Pterodoctyls and other prehistoric monsters...
...roaming at large somewhere on the upper reaches of the Amazon. Unfortunately...
...for the professor's reputation for veracity, he refuses to give the exact location of his alleged...
...discoveries, and still more unfortunately, the photographs in his possession are so badly damaged...
(when the Professor's canoe is said to have been overturned)
...that they certainly cannot be acepted...
...as evidence in this case.
I believe Challenger is insane!
He nearly killed three reporters
I sent to interview him today!
Mr. McArdle, couldn't you send me on a dangerous assignment?
All I need is an opportunity -
You seem very anxious to lose your life!
Have you been interviewing
Challenger, Malone?
Don't apologize - hurry over to Zoological
Hall and cover Challenger's lecture.
Reporters are barred
- but get in!
There's Sir John Roxton
- famous hunter and explorer.
He's here to check up on
Challenger's cock-and-bull story.
Well, Malone, we're in for a lively session tonight.
- the students are out in force to heckle old Challenger.
Challenger has made himself a public laughing
- stock by his tale about live dinosaurs!
What can he hope to gain by such lies?
The back country of the
Amazon contains over...
...fifty thousand miles of unexplored water-ways.
Who can say what may be living in that jungle - as vast as all Europe?
But how can Challenger's story be true?
These creatures have all been dead ten million years!
You might at least do him the justice to hear him state his own case.
Reporters are barred-
...if I show my press pass I'll get kicked out. I wonder if you -
Gladly - I'll take you in on my pass.
That's profesor Summerlee, the eminent coleopterist.
- owing to lack of proofs, this
Society cannot sponsor Profesor...
...Challenger's statement, but is glad to afford him this opportunity to state his case, and, we trust, clear his name.
Bring on your mastodons!
Bring on your mammoths!
I will - if any of you spineless worms are brave enough to go back with me...
...into the trackless jungles where these monsters live!
I told you old Challenger is sincere!
And I'm not here tonight to defend my statements - but to demand that...
...a committee be formed to go back to the Lost World with me -
Looks like a riot.
It's a beastly shame!
When dealing with undeveloped minds,
...it is useless to appeal to reason
- for they have none!
I am calling for volunteers!
Volunteers to face death - or worse
- for the sake of science.
I am sixty-seven years of age - but, because I think you are a liar and a fraud -
I accept your challenge, sir!
Accepted! Better an old fool - than a young coward!
I'm neither a student nor a scientist
- but I'd like to be counted in on this!
My friend, Sir John Roxton!
Accepted!
Your record as a hunter of big game will add weight to your testimony - if we return!
Professor Challenger,
I'd like to go on this expedition!
Probably the brain of a child
- but the body of an athlete.
Accepted.
What is your name?
Edward E. Malone -
And your occupation?
I- I'm a-a-er-a reporter, sir.
London-Record Journal.
Take me home - I've had enough of this!
Eleven Enmore Park, Kensington, West!
Professor Challenger, I've got to go on this expedition! The girl...
...I'm engaged to won't marry me until I've faced death or -
This man attacked me!
Do you give him in charge, sir?
No. I was to blame.
I intruded upon him.
Now, sir, can't we talk this expedition over sanely?
Sir John Roxton is a friend of mine-
Why didn't you mention that before?
You've hurt another nice young man!
I saw you from the dining room window!
If my husband gets abusive again - just call me!
You betrayed a glimmer of intelligence just now while talking to the policeman-
Sit down!
Do you want to join this expedition because you believe my statements are true?
Austin!
Tell Miss White
I wish to see her at once!
Have you shown Malone - the diary?
Property of Maple White?
BRONTOSAURUS
Miss Paula White - daughter of poor Maple White - the unfortunate explorer whose notebook you hold in your hands.
Miss White was her father's trained assistant.
She will tell you why she came to me.
I was in camp with jungle fever when my father...
...went up to explore that terrible plateau.
Carnivorous beast Allosaurus.
Evidently already almost externet even lea for I saw few of they.
A Living Brontosaurus
You mean that you actually saw living descendants of these monsters...
...that are supposed to have been dead for millions of years?
Yes, they were tremendous in size and ferocity.
Our bearers were so terrified they deserted-
...carrying me back to the coast - leaving my father...
...marooned up there - with those beasts -
He would go
- in spite of what we had - seen.
My husband promised to raise funds for a rescue party - but instead of...
...getting people to help him, he throws them out of windows and things!
Why, this is a great
human interest story -
And even if my paper was not convinced of the scientific value of your statements -
...it might finance a rescue party provided that the exclusive publication rights-
I'll swear not to send an article back to my paper without your full approval, sir!
If Sir John Roxton will go with me -
I believe we can make my managing editor see this thing!
I'm sure you know why I am going on this rescue party, Paula - don't you?
LIVERPOOL
AMAZON RIVER
I will not bore those whom this narrative may reach by an account of our voyage.
Eventually we found ourselves in that no-man's-land...
...which is formed by the half-defined frontiers...
...between Peru,
Brazil and Colombia.
The sealed map we promised Challenger to not open untill we arrived here is only...
...a blank page.
Excepting a miracle, our expedition seems to have come to a premature end.
May I come in?
From henceforth
I take command of this expedition.
Let it be clear that you are all perfectly helpless without me!
If that mischievious beast is to go with us,
I remain behind!
Jocko knows which berries and roots in the forest are edible, and which are poisonous...
- he will be far more use to us than you, my dear sir!
RECORD
EXPLORERS REACH LAST
OUTPOST OF CIVILIZATION
Record-Journal Party Searching for Lost Scientist to Make Way into Mystery World via Secret Rivers.
MAY NOT BE HEARD
FROM AGAIN FOR MONTHS
It's a Brazilian sloth - they always walk head downward. See the baby clinging to her?
Dear Mr. McArdle: It is three weeks since we sent back the canoes...
...and tonight we are camping at the base of the great plateau upon which...
...Maple White was marooned.
Challenger has guided us to this spot, and proven that...
...the Plateau is a fact -
...but we have no reason to believe that any monsters are roaming...
...about up there.
In fact, I don't think...
They're not cubs - but full grown
"spectacle bears" - great camp followers.
Paula says her father felled one of the trees on that pinnacle so that it dropped across...
...the chasm and made a bridge.
You can still see the stump of the old tree.
In the morning we'll climb the pinnacle - and drop the other tree over.
A Pterodactyl -
...proving definitely that the statements in poor Maple White's diary are true!
A Brontosaurus
- feeding merely on leaves.
Perfectly harmless - unless it happens to step on us.
Who would believe this! My elephant gun might as well be a bean-shooter!
Great guns!
We can't get back!
We're prisoners
- exactly like Maple White!
That means our folk are still alive!
What are you thinking of, Paula
- in this lost world of ours?
I was thinking if my father were still alive
- he would have seen our fire...
- and come to us.
An Allosaurus - a meat-eater - the most vicious pest of the ancient world.
The barrier might as well thistle-down
- and fire may not work with the next one...
- we've got to find a safe camp!
Jocko will be mighty lonesome down here without Miss.
Paula
- he climbed that big rock...
...this morning to get to her - he can't bear that girl out of his sight!
I have an idea! After supper bring all those hammocks into the tent!
We must establish camp here - our only refuge from these monsters -
...if we'll live long enough to search for your father.
Now that we've found these caves we could live here the rest of our lives -
...if we had some weapon capable of making a dent in a dinosaur!
I am now inventing such a weapon.
We can't rest until every inch of this plateau is explored!
It's miles in length - your father may have found other caves -
When I release the tree it will snap back with terrific force -
...and by calculating the curve the rock will describe as it rushes through the air-
A curve? Nonsense! Any school boy could tell you the rock will describe a parabola.
A curve!
A parabola!
I was right - you described a curve!
We'll work all night and make enough ladder to get you in the morning.
Fine! But how in thunder do you expect to get it up to us?
Bring Miss Paula to call Jocko - he'll climb anything to get to her!
There's only a small cave above this -
...but your father must be somewhere on the plateau...
- it's impossible to get away!
Do you mean we are to be here - always?
What difference does it make where we are
Paula - so long as we are - together?
But your engagement to - Gadys?
Paula, dear, we're as cut off from the world and its obligations and promises...
...as if we were on the moon.
I'm going to ask Professor
Summerlee to marry us.
You know he used to be a minister.
Go hunt up the professors
- I have something to - tell Paula-
A lovely specimen!
We'll stalk it and observe its habits!
That dormant volcano is waking!
The whole plateau will be covered in lava!
But this has been going on for hours -
I'm afraid they're lost -
If they get back we must be here to show them the way to the tunnel opening.
It's their only hope of escape!
The professors and Mr. Malone are safe - they'll be here in a minute or two!
I certainly hope that mud holds!
We're back in the world
- and its obligations.
Why should we let Gladys rob us of happiness, Paula?
I can't steal my happiness from another woman.
I'm Major Hibbard, of the
Brazilian geodetic Survey.
Yesterday I saw a cloud of smoke over the plateau -
And we smoked out quite a rat, Major!
I'd give my entrie personal fortune to get that beast to London - alive!
I'll send for men to dredge out this stream
- built a steel cage and a raft -
...and when the big rains come next month, we might float your "rat" out!
If we once could get our raft as far as the Amazon, you could charter a steamer from there!
Later - In London.
Tonight you will not jeer -
...for I have brought back a living proof of my statements!
May I ask what you mean when you say
"proof", Professor Challenger?
A living Brontosaurus
- nearly sixty feet long...
...from the nose to the tip of the tail!
Mr. Edward Malone, through whose efforts this expedition, was financed, is now superintending the unloading of the monster...
...from the ship we chartered-
The message I have been expecting has come!
I'll inform you in a moment when and where the Brontosaurus will be on view!
As we swung the cage out over the dock the cables broke-
The fall smashed the cage
- and it got out!
It's running wild
- the streets are in an uproar!
My Brontosaurus has escaped! Keep off the streets, untill I recapture it!
This is outrage - we've been hoaxed again -
Challenger should be run out of town!
How d'ydo, Gladys.
You see I'm - back.
And, as you really owe it all to me,
I hope you'll forgive me - for not waiting.
My husband, Percy Potts.
May I ask what great stunt, what heroic deed Mr. Potts performed -
...to win you, Gladys?
That was just my girlish whim!
Percy is a clerk at a store, and has never been out of London in his life!
Excuse me!
She didn't wait for me - she's married!
That's Sir John Roxton
- sportsman.
{52}{83}Speak softly
{626}{749}As I wander alone in the streets...
{755}{875}...people stop to stare and drink in|my beauty from head to toe
{1301}{1336}Tie me to my chair!
{1345}{1378}What will people say?
{1454}{1543}'As I see the flames of mute desire...
{1549}{1646}'...in their eager, entreating eyes...
{2012}{2205}'...l am transported by a swelling tid|'of my own yearning'
{2553}{2652}This silly song turns my stomach
{2776}{2895}- 'You know, you remember, you suffer'|- The poor girl is quite in love
{3058}{3187}'You cannot avoid me! I feel the'|'anguish you never show...'
{3300}{3428}'l know you well,'|'you feel dead inside!'
{3523}{3557}What will people say?
{3573}{3683}Marcello loved her once, but the|vixen left him for the easy life
{3697}{3784}Lovers adore their chains,|both the binder and the bound
{3793}{3916}Colline will never fall|into such a trap
{4142}{4215}She's very pretty, I grant you...
{4259}{4332}The braggard is about to give in
{4550}{4658}-Softly, please, softly...|-I'll do as I please! Leave me be!
{4674}{4775}-The poor girl moves me to pity|-Sullied love should be avenged!
{4792}{4879}Leave me be!|'l must get rid of the old boy!'
{5087}{5118}What is it?
{5128}{5160}Such pain, it's burning!
{5254}{5278}Where?
{5377}{5416}My foot!
{5569}{5664}'My youth is not dead yet'
{5713}{5791}There's a shoe shop over there,|hurry!
{5800}{5847}'My memory of you is not yet dead!'
{5864}{5937}Go and buy me another pair!
{5946}{6075}'lf you were to knock at my door'|'l would run to open it'
{6753}{6809}You siren!
{6875}{6936}We've reached the last act!
{7034}{7065}The bill!
{7094}{7131}So soon?
{7155}{7203}Who asked for it?
{7233}{7268}Let's see
{7389}{7463}-It's a lot|-Out with the money
{7531}{7589}The rear guard!
{7677}{7741}Where's my fortune gone?
{7816}{7845}The rear guard is coming!
{7861}{7917}Let me have the bill
{8171}{8212}Quickly, add this to the other bill
{8256}{8334}The gentleman I was with will|take care of it
{8470}{8518}The gentleman will pay
{8559}{8685}Put it at his table and give him|my respects!
{8955}{9063}Let's get lost before the old boy|catches us with his prey
{15416}{15497}You there... open up!
{15718}{15783}We're the street sweepers...
{15954}{15991}It's snowing
{16023}{16105}Hurry up! We're freezing
{16170}{16196}Coming!
{16264}{16480}'Who found pleasure in his glass'|'and love in a pair of lips?'
{17011}{17119}'There's pleasure in a glass'
{17172}{17277}' But young lips are made for love'
{17577}{17610}The milk-maids are here
{18128}{18163}Butter and cheese!
{18257}{18299}Poultry and eggs!
{18344}{18387}Which way are you going?
{18403}{18448}To Saint Michel
{18460}{18504}Shall we meet later?
{18518}{18562}At noon!
{19811}{19920}Can you tell me...|which way is the inn?
{19938}{20032}There's a painter here,|painting some inn
{20210}{20397}Good woman, would you go and fetch|the painter, Marcello
{20433}{20516}I have to talk to him urgently
{20530}{20656}Tell him Mimi is waiting for him|out here
{20771}{20805}What's in that basket?
{20890}{20933}-It's empty|-Pass!
{21394}{21442}I hoped I'd find you
{21458}{21555}We've been living here a month|at the innkeeper's expense
{21579}{21712}Musetta gives the guests|singing lessons
{21758}{21851}And I paint the soldiers|and decorate the inn's walls
{21936}{21977}It's cold
{22005}{22032}Come on in
{22098}{22170}-Is Rodolfo in?|-Yes
{22221}{22287}Then I can't go in - I can't
{22298}{22346}Why not?
{22448}{22542}Dear Marcello, help me
{22664}{22728}What's happened?
{22840}{22909}Rodolfo loves me
{22932}{23027}He loves me yet he shuns me...
{23173}{23262}He is eaten up with jealousy
{23479}{23622}A gesture, a word, a friendly kiss,|a flower...
{23633}{23717}Anything will make him suspicious
{23733}{23831}He quarrels with me,|he gets into rages
{23852}{23976}At night, I often pretend to sleep...
{24020}{24202}...and I can feel him trying to pry|even into my dreams
{24345}{24502}He keeps yelling:|You're not for me!
{24546}{24710}Get yourself another lover! You're not for me!
{24884}{24963}It's his anger speaking, I know...
{24999}{25092}But what can I say to him, Marcello?
{25111}{25304}A love like yours makes it hard|to live together
{25338}{25392}You're right, that is true...
{25435}{25515}We must separate
{25563}{25612}Will you help us?
{25623}{25757}We've tried to help ourselves,|but we cannot do it
{25766}{25952}I don't worry about Musetta,|nor does she about me
{25958}{26086}- We love in fun and laughter|- It's true
{26123}{26192}Yes, we must separate
{26198}{26302}Songs and laughter - these are|the blooms of constant passion
{26325}{26389}Do what you can for us
{26427}{26480}Very well
{26510}{26627}-I'll wake him up|-ls he asleep?
{26686}{26849}He came in about an hour before|dawn and fell asleep on a bench
{26928}{26977}Look
{27176}{27227}That cough...
{27267}{27375}It's been wearing me out|since yesterday
{27381}{27477}He fled from me last night,|saying:
{27496}{27550}It's over!
{27618}{27707}At daybreak I hurried over here|to find you
{27945}{28025}He's awake, he's getting up...
{28043}{28087}He's looking for me...
{28166}{28232}-He's coming|-He mustn't see me
{28263}{28360}Go on in, Mimi, for pity's sake
{28395}{28469}Don't make a scene!
{29193}{29291}That's it, Marcello!|No one can overhear us now
{29327}{29400}I want to part with Mimi
{29416}{29460}Are you so volatile then?
{29481}{29596}Once before, I thought that|my heart had died
{29633}{29802}But in her blue eyes it found|so much to live for
{29845}{29911}But it's all so tedious now
{29923}{29967}You wish to mourn another?
{29998}{30014}Once and for all
{30023}{30057}Change your rhymes
{30072}{30149}This gloomy love of yours...
{30165}{30232}...can lead only to tears
{30253}{30369}Without fun and laughter|love grows weak and fragile
{30433}{30516}-You're jealous|-A little
{30522}{30661}You are an angry, prejudiced,|tiresome and stubborn lunatic
{30677}{30744}Now he'll make him angry!|Poor me!
{30787}{30877}Mimi is a flirt
{30927}{30992}She toys with them all
{30998}{31112}Some Viscount dandy makes|eyes at her...
{31133}{31265}...and she lifts her skirt and shows|her ankles, full of promise
{31298}{31318}Need I say it?
{31339}{31397}You don't sound sincere
{31495}{31590}You're right, I'm not
{31712}{31800}In vain I try to hide my true misery
{31948}{32062}I love Mimi above all else
{32190}{32276}I love her but I'm so afraid
{32545}{32648}Mimi is so ill!
{32712}{32815}She declines every day
{32828}{32933}The poor girl is condemned
{32976}{33026}What does he mean?
{33103}{33234}A terrible cough shakes|her fragile chest...
{33343}{33449}...and her cheeks are already|drained and ashen
{33716}{33772}Alas, I am dying...
{33810}{33914}My room is a squalid hovel
{33937}{34011}The stove is dead
{34033}{34148}Only the north winds come in|to play there
{34354}{34487}She sings and smiles|and I'm consumed by remorse
{34513}{34654}I am the culprit leading her|to her death!
{34697}{34740}What can we do?
{34793}{34873}Oh, my life is over!
{34966}{35091}-Mimi is a hot-house bloom|-How pitiful!
{35098}{35185}-Poverty has robbed her strength|-Poor creature
{35205}{35319}My love alone cannot bring her|back to life
{35854}{35909}What? Mimi, you're here?
{35948}{36023}'-So she was listening...'|-You overheard me?
{36041}{36142}I worry so easily and|panic over nothing
{36152}{36207}-Come in to the warmth|-No, it's stifling in there
{36379}{36443}That's Musetta's flirtatious laughter!
{36489}{36542}You flirt! I'll teach you
{36645}{36685}Farewell!
{36793}{36840}You're leaving?
{37060}{37217}I came in with joy|when your love called me
{37345}{37482}Now Mimi must go back|to her lonely nest
{37705}{37826}Back to her embroidery|and her flowers
{38028}{38066}Goodbye...
{38191}{38251}And no regrets!
{38305}{38356}Listen to me!
{38428}{38583}Gather up the few things|I've left behind
{38685}{38814}There are things I locked away|in my little chest
{38830}{38996}My gold bracelet, the ribbons|and my prayer book
{39200}{39294}Wrap them up in an apron
{39411}{39533}And I'll send someone to get them
{39802}{39996}Under my pillow you'll find|my pink-coloured bonnet
{40257}{40389}Keep it, if you like,|as a memento of our love
{40759}{40814}Farewell...
{40940}{41060}Goodbye, with no regrets!
{42020}{42123}Then it really is all over?
{42191}{42273}You're leaving, my little darling?
{42392}{42492}Farewell, my dream of love
{42643}{42747}Farewell, sweet morning|awakenings!
{42920}{43042}-Goodbye, life of dreams!|-Goodbye, quarrels and jealousy
{43048}{43158}Those quarrels that your smile|soon soothed away
{43280}{43355}-Goodbye, suspicions...|-...and kisses...
{43373}{43454}...and poignant bitterness...
{43499}{43627}The bitterness which l, the poet,|rhymed with "tenderness"
{44045}{44185}-ln winter one can die of loneliness|-Loneliness is too unbearable
{44353}{44483}Whilst as spring awakens,|we have the sun!
{44726}{44811}-What were you doing with that man?|-What do you mean?
{44963}{45033}'No one is ever alone in April'
{45053}{45100}When I came in you changed colour
{45106}{45224}He asked if I like to dance...|I said I could dance all night
{45237}{45335}'The whispers of lilies and roses'
{45341}{45442}'The sweet chattering of birds'
{45475}{45569}-Deceitful excuses!|-I must have my freedom!
{45588}{45644}You won't find horns under my hat!
{45667}{45764}'When spring blooms'|'we have the sun!'
{45898}{46032}I hate lovers who behave|like husbands!
{46073}{46242}'The fountains murmur and evening'|'breezes bring balm to human anguish'
{46358}{46491}'Shall we wait for another spring?'
{46514}{46665}-Sir, I'm delighted to say goodbye|-Your servant, and I'm off
{47247}{47299}-House painter!|-Viper!
{47315}{47350}-Toad!|-Witch!
{47513}{47626}'Forever yours, for life'
{47732}{47806}'We must part...'
{47854}{47984}' But let us part when the flowers'|'are in season'
{48227}{48353}'lf only the winter could last forever
{52604}{52630}In a coupe?
{52636}{52708}With livery and pair;|she smiled at me
{52735}{52854}Well, Musetta, I said,|and how is the heart?
{52863}{52954}Either it stopped beating or I can't hear it...
{52994}{53065}...covered by velvet as it is!
{53086}{53122}How very interesting
{53140}{53231}Go on, you fraud!|You suffer, yet you laugh
{53242}{53293}Her heart stopped beating?|Good!
{53452}{53542}- l, too, met... - Musetta|- No, Mimi...
{53558}{53611}You saw her... did you now?
{53621}{53731}She went past in a carriage,|dressed like a queen
{53752}{53799}Good, I'm happy to hear it
{53808}{53844}The liar, he's in agony
{53859}{53911}-Back to work!|-To work!
{54215}{54245}Useless pen!
{54259}{54301}Useless brush!
{55051}{55225}Mimi, gone never to return,|those lovely days...
{55273}{55412}Those tiny hands,|that fragrant hair...
{55456}{55548}My brush seems to be|at her command...
{55559}{55623}That snow-white skin...
{55654}{55828}-Mimi, my brief youth|-lt paints against my will!
{55845}{56024}If I want to paint skies or land|or winter or spring...
{56076}{56232}...it still traces two dark eyes...
{56342}{56458}...and red, smiling lips
{56562}{56712}It's the face of Musetta|over and over again
{56939}{57059}-And you, gay bonnet...|-And there is Musetta's face...
{57065}{57208}-...which she left under her pillow|-...all charm and deceit
{57222}{57337}-You, witness to our short-lived joy..|-Yet Musetta blooms and flourishes...
{57345}{57442}-Come to my dead heart...|-And my humble heart calls to her...
{57457}{57617}-Come to me, for love is dead...|-My heart calls to her and waits...
{58632}{58662}What time is it?
{58673}{58703}Time for yesterday's dinner
{58713}{58760}And Schaunard isn't back?
{58899}{58954}-Here we are|-Well?
{59003}{59081}A dish worthy of Demosthenes:
{59091}{59191}-A herring! - Salted|-Dinner is served!
{59208}{59256}This is a veritable horn of plenty
{59290}{59352}Put the champagne on ice
{59447}{59525}Choose, Baron, trout or salmon?
{59572}{59649}Perhaps a parrot's tongue, Duke?
{59737}{59842}Thank you, no, it's too filling...|I'm going to a ball tonight
{60042}{60067}Finished already?
{60083}{60147}I'm late - the King expects me
{60190}{60231}Not another conspiracy!
{60470}{60548}The King has summoned me|to the Ministry
{60565}{60585}Good!
{60626}{60711}However... I shall see...|Guizot
{60764}{60786}Hand me the goblet
{60818}{60859}You drink - I'll eat
{60923}{61000}I beg permission of this|noble assembly...
{61020}{61092}-Enough! - What a concoction!|-Away with the heel!
{61126}{61248}I feel irresistibly inspired|by a romanza
{61331}{61411}-A choreographic piece then?|-Yes!
{61571}{61658}A dance to a vocal accompaniment
{61739}{61786}Clear the floor
{62219}{62239}A gavotte
{62254}{62282}A minuet
{62304}{62337}A pavane
{62358}{62396}A fandango
{62454}{62562}I propose a quadrille
{62573}{62617}Choose your partners
{62632}{62655}I'll do the calling
{62866}{62947}A charming maiden...
{62958}{63036}A little respect for my modesty,|pray...
{63114}{63139}' Balancez'
{63171}{63231}-The 'Rondo' first!|-No, you fool!
{63290}{63342}The manners of a lackey!
{63363}{63392}I believe I've been insulted!
{63425}{63492}-Draw you blade!|-Ready! Try me!
{63539}{63585}I'm thirsty for your blood
{63618}{63672}One of us will end up minced
{63695}{63759}Fetch a hearse
{63767}{63842}Fetch a cemetery
{63879}{63949}And as the duel rages,|Rigaudon whirls and dances
{64631}{64689}I've brought Mimi! She's ill
{64698}{64798}-Where is she?|-She's too weak to climb the stairs
{65113}{65152}Bring the bed forward
{65302}{65339}Some water...
{65525}{65547}Hush now...
{65581}{65617}You must rest
{65766}{65817}My Rodolfo!
{65898}{66017}Do you want me here with you?
{66110}{66187}My Mimi...
{66223}{66284}Always, forever!
{66358}{66450}I heard that Mimi had left|the Viscount...
{66470}{66539}She was fading fast
{66553}{66660}But where could she be?|I searched and searched...
{66683}{66787}And just now I saw her|on the street...
{66829}{66911}She was hardly able to walk
{66962}{67083}'l cannot last', she said.|'I'm dying, I know it...
{67158}{67264}'l want to die with him!|He may be waiting for me'
{67284}{67375}I feel better already
{67437}{67485}'Come with me, Musetta', she said
{67622}{67696}I want to look around...
{67939}{68042}How good it is to be here
{68138}{68187}I feel revived...
{68504}{68617}-I can feel life returning|-Blessed lips...
{68806}{68912}-You will never leave me again...|-To hear your voice again...
{68929}{69047}We've nothing in the house!|Ah, poverty!
{69085}{69167}She won't last the hour
{69271}{69342}I'm so cold, so cold...
{69420}{69502}If only I had a muff!
{69673}{69760}Will these hands never feel|warm again?
{69991}{70081}Here, warm them in mine
{70121}{70206}Hush now!|Talking tires you
{70225}{70348}It's just a slight cough!|I'm used to it
{70559}{70642}Good day, Marcello...
{70750}{70863}Schaunard, Colline, good day...
{70944}{71042}Here you all are...
{71094}{71213}-You're smiling at Mimi again|-Don't speak
{71227}{71289}I'll speak softly, don't worry
{71365}{71522}Marcello, listen to me -|Musetta is so good and kind
{71534}{71563}I know
{71809}{71831}Here, take these...
{71870}{72007}Sell them and bring back a cordial...
{72030}{72077}And fetch a doctor
{72128}{72246}-Rest now|-You won't leave me?
{72435}{72567}This may be the last time|she'll ever express a wish...
{72587}{72652}The poor thing!
{72728}{72805}I'll buy her a muff...
{72838}{72932}I'll come with you
{73029}{73160}You're a kind soul, Musetta
{73336}{73432}Well, my old trusty cloak...
{73441}{73577}I stay, but you must climb up|the sacred mount as my pledge
{73705}{73798}Let me express my gratitude now
{73897}{74092}Never have you bent your ancient|back to the rich and powerful...
{74197}{74270}But many are the philosophers|and poets...
{74322}{74417}...who have passed through the|tranquil chambers of your pockets
{74618}{74708}Now those pleasant days are over
{74820}{74942}So I say farewell, my faithful friend
{75946}{76112}Schaunard, we can both do an act|of kindness, each in his own manner
{76266}{76323}I - with this coat
{76348}{76377}And you...
{76437}{76508}...by leaving them to themselves
{76652}{76740}Philosopher, you talk sense
{76784}{76863}It's true, I'll go
{78721}{78787}Have they all gone?
{78845}{78932}I pretended to be asleep...
{79023}{79160}Because I wanted to be alone|with you...
{79285}{79391}There are so many things to say...
{79688}{79816}Or perhaps only one thing -|as vast as the sea...
{79995}{80104}...as the deep, limitless sea
{80318}{80441}You are my love and my life!
{81114}{81202}Mimi, my lovely Mlmi...
{81330}{81424}Am I still lovely then?
{81507}{81604}As lovely as the dawn
{81648}{81734}You've used the wrong expression...
{81858}{81964}You meant to say as lovely|as the sunset
{82214}{82289}They call me Mimi...
{82741}{82839}I don't know why...
{82872}{82971}The swallow has returned|to the nest
{83247}{83277}My bonnet!
{83447}{83609}Remember the very first time|I came here?
{83615}{83664}As if I could ever forget...
{83687}{83754}My candle had gone out
{83775}{83952}You were so perturbed...|then you lost your key
{83965}{84077}And you were groping in the dark|to find it
{84086}{84157}I searched and searched...
{84180}{84324}My cunning boy...|I can tell you now
{84370}{84496}I know you found it almost at once
{84579}{84692}I was only assisting destiny
{84772}{84900}It was dark and you couldn't see|my blushes
{85100}{85212}Your tiny hand is frozen!
{85282}{85367}Please, let me warm it
{85517}{85633}It was dark and you took my hand
{86108}{86126}What is it?
{86142}{86217}It's nothing, I'm fine
{86295}{86356}Hush now, for pity's sake
{86456}{86555}Yes, forgive me...|I'll be good
{86881}{86958}-ls she asleep?|-Only resting
{86968}{87072}I saw the doctor!|He'll be here soon
{87105}{87154}Here is the cordial
{87197}{87262}Who is that?
{87397}{87452}It's me, Musetta
{87703}{87811}How lovely and soft it is...
{88012}{88107}No more frozen hands, now...
{88190}{88234}How warm...
{88278}{88337}It feels so good...
{88410}{88502}-Did you get it for me?|-Yes!
{88577}{88667}You... how extravagant...
{88692}{88756}Thank you!
{88780}{88859}It must have cost a lot...
{88916}{88973}Are you crying?
{88990}{89067}But I feel fine...
{89160}{89272}Why are you crying then?
{89431}{89485}My love...
{89529}{89589}...is always with you!
{89646}{89710}My hands...
{89751}{89819}...so nice and warm...
{90017}{90102}...to sleep
{90333}{90417}-What did the doctor say?|-He's coming
{90437}{90496}Blessed Madonna...
{90502}{90627}Grant your grace to this poor girl|and do not let her die
{90683}{90780}We need some sort of shield...|the flame is flickering
{90872}{90952}Please, make her well again...
{90962}{91095}Holy Madonna, I am unworthy|of forgiveness
{91116}{91242}But Mimi is an angel from Heaven
{91303}{91412}-I still hope. Does she seem worse?|-I don't think so
{91426}{91492}Marcello, she is dead!
{91593}{91621}Musetta, take this
{92120}{92142}How is she?
{92183}{92240}As you see, she is peaceful
{92310}{92396}Why is everyone runing around?
{92425}{92469}Why do you look at me like this?
{92570}{92594}You must be brave!
The Adventures of Prince Achmed
A silhouette film by Lotte Reiniger
A Comenius-Film Production
The Sorcerer
Dinarzade
Achmed
Peri Banu
Aladdin
The Witch
Great was the might of the African Sorcerer ln the city of the Caliph they were celebrating the ruler's birthday
The Great Caliph
"A magic horse, Exalted Caliph, which flies through the air"
Princess Dinarzade, the Caliph's daughter
Prince Achmed, her brother
"l will not part with this horse for mere gold!"
"So choose any of my treasures"
"May l have whatever l desire?"
"l swear it - by the
Beard of the Prophet!"
The Story of Prince Achmed
"How can one bring the horse back down to earth?"
"The lever at the head drives it into the air..."
"...and the lever at the tail brings it to earth"
"Does the Prince know this?"
Far from his homeland he landed on one of the magic islands of Waq Waq
The Prince was young, and brave and eager for adventure
"Who are you, maidens?"
"We serve the Princess Peri Banu, ruler of the spirit land of Waq Waq"
"Stay with us, handsome stranger"
On a neighbouring island lay a magic lake
...where every night the exquisite
Peri Banu and her attendants bathed
"Give back my cloak of feathers!"
"Come with me to my beautiful homeland"
Thus was the Princess Peri Banu taken from the land of spirits
The horse carried them to far away China
"Do not be afraid of me"
"l am yours to command to the end of time"
"You do not know the power of the spirits of Waq Waq!"
"They will kill you!"
"Allah's mercy will protect us if you will be my wife"
Meanwhile, the Sorcerer searched for his magic horse
"We will find our home and you will forget all about Waq Waq"
"l will follow you!"
"The Prince sends you this garment"
"He bids me lead you to him"
Adventures in China
The Emperor of China
The Emperor's Jester
Hither the Sorcerer brought Peri Banu to sell her to the Emperor
The Emperor smiled upon Peri Banu
"Kill her, or take her to wife!"
"Now, my brave Prince, l shall return to your sister" ln this mountain dwelt the
Sorcerer's greatest enemy...
...the Fire Mountain Witch
"How dare you come to my magic mountain?"
"The African Sorcerer brought me hither"
"He is my greatest enemy!"
"And we are friends"
The Bridegroom
"Help me free Peri Banu"
"l fear no spirits!"
"With these weapons you can conquer the spirits"
The Bride
Far below, at that moment, the wedding of Peri Banu
"We must stop the wedding"
The spirits of Waq Waq look for their mistress
"Take me to Waq Waq"
THE GATES OF WAQ WAQ...
...OPEN ONLY TO THE ONE...
...WHO...
...THE...
...MAGlC LAMP OF ALADDlN...
...POSSESSES
Aladdin and the Magic Lamp
"l am Aladdin"
"Where is the Magic Lamp?"
"Do you not have it?"
"l will tell you"
"l was a poor tailor in the city of the Caliph"
"One day l was visited by a mysterious stranger"
"Behold Dinarzade, the daughter of the Caliph"
"You shall have her, once you do something for me"
"He led me to a high mountain"
The Magic Lamp
"Fetch the Lamp"
"Give me the Lamp!"
"First let me out!"
"Then die! l have other ways to obtain the Lamp!"
"l languished long in the dark cave...
...until l succeeded in lighting the Lamp"
"What is your command, O Master?"
"l am your servant, l and all the Spirits of the Lamp"
"Take me home"
"Now l knew l could win the Princess Dinarzade"
"ln a single night l built her a splendid palace"
"Next morning the astounded Caliph visited the enchanted building"
"So she became my wife"
"The Caliph is my father,
Dinarzade - my sister"
"Tell me, what happened further?"
"One day everything vanished - the palace, Dinarzade and the Lamp"
"l fled before the fury of the Caliph"
"l set out to sea"
"A fearful storm blew up"
"And so you found me"
"Do you know who did this to you?"
"The African Sorcerer!"
"He loved Dinarzade"
"Hurry, Achmed, and free Peri Banu"
"The spirits want to kill her, because she left to follow you"
"The Sorcerer has stolen the
Magic Lamp"
"Only the Lamp can open the gates of Waq Waq"
"Kill the Sorcerer and the Lamp is yours!"
"Kill him!"
"l will try"
"Your enemy is dead!"
The Spirit Battle of Waq Waq
The spirits rose up against their faithless mistress
"Prince Achmed stands before the gates!"
"Bring out Peri Banu!"
"Summon the Spirits of the Lamp,
Aladdin!"
Yet the spirits of darkness came before him
Aladdin was overwhelmed
"The Lamp!"
The Witch intervened
Now legions of benevolent spirits streamed out of the Magic Lamp
"Behold! The palace!"
"Return and seek happiness in the land of mortals"
"Dinarzade must be in the palace"
The towers of the Caliph's city soon appeared before them
"Aladdin's palace has returned!"
Meanwhile, the call to morning prayer sounded from the minarets
The Hands of Orlac
Beloved, In one day and one night I will again be with you.  I will hold you in my arms ... my hands will run over your hair
I will feel your body tremble under my hands
Orlac's concert 
Madam, it is 9 o'clock and the train arrives at 11
To Montgeron
He is alive!
It is 6:30, Professor.  Vasseur will be executed at 6 o'clock, and 8 minutes later the car will bring the body to the clinic.
A train accident.  Mr. Orlac is severely injured.
And yet there is hope. There is damage at the base of the skull, where we will operateà only à only his hands
The hands ... holy God ... the hands ...
Save his hands ... his hands are his life ....
Save his hands ... his hands are more important than his life.
Save his hands ...
I will try.
After only a short time, you can come home ... and sun, light and many flowers will greet you, when you come.
We will remove your bandages - a little at a time.  Today you will see your face again.
Your eyes - how I love you ... your hair ... and your hands ... your beautiful, dear hands ...
There ... his head ... doesn't he see my hands?
"Is he laughing?"
Now ... he is so strong!
Tell me, what are under these bandages?  What secret do they hide?
Well, then, in God's name, we will reveal the secret.
Can these hands ever play again?
The spirit rules the hands ... nature and a strong will can do anything.
Tomorrow ... back tomorrow! 
I will wait here ... his first kiss and the first stroke of his hands.
The last night.
Your hands were not saved ...
Dr. Serral gave you different ones.
The hands of the executed murderer Vasseur.
Is it true?  Do I have the hands of the murderer Vasseur?  
How much longer?
In half an hour.  No, only 30 minutes.
These hands will never strike a man again.  
How much longer
I love you ... I love you ...
Do you have the paper for January 15?
The murderer Vasseur before his judges.
Vasseur denied the act ... but the fingerprints which were found gave the real evidence.
The dagger, which was stuck into the heart of the old racketeer, bore the same X mark on the handle. 
Also, the dagger bore Vasseur's unmistakable fingerprints.  
The evidence was so clear that he received the death penalty.
I feel it also go out ... the arms spread ... until then in the soul ... cold, terrible, grim.
Twisted - twisted hands!
I don't want to save you?  I will not come ... not my ... no more ... 
I cannot any more ... you are coming to kill ... . but I will not follow your terrible orders any more ... no more
Don't come any closer to me!
Go away ... I will not listen to you any longer.
...Debauch your hands...
Don't mix ... away with your hands ... such murderer's hands ...
Take away your hands.  I don't want these terrible hands.
Creditors
Only wait a short time ... one month ...
I know it ... You demand blood  ... Crimes ... Murder ...
Only one week!
Men don't just control the hands ...
The head, the heart control the body ..., also the hands ...
Until tomorrow!
My hat and my coat ...
I am going to my husband's father.  He is rich ... he can help ... if he will ...
Don't go there ... he is an evil man ... he hates all men and even more so your husband ...
I can't leave anyone to him ...
At the least everyone from ... there
Mr. Orlac - you know, what bad luck has happened to him
Mr. Orlac - Paul cannot play now.  
So we are in need.  But Paul doesn't know ... help us.
He is your son ... your flesh and blood ... will you let us be ground in to the earth ...
Yes, I would like to see it!  I hate him ...
Mr. Orlac must himself go to see his father ... today!
How will madam pay ...
Beloved, yet one day and one night, and then I will be with you again.  I will hold you in my arms ... my ...
That was ... once ... my handwriting
After one day and one night, 
Go to your father ... today ... he must help us ... we can't go on ...
He refused to help ... and I have begged him so ... he is not a good man, your father ... he is evil.  I fear him..
Murder!
The murderer Vasseur's dagger!
The fingerprints of the criminal Vasseur!
Your sister is very ill ... come right away, if you want to see her while she is still alive ... come today ...
Vasseur's handwriting!
I do not know what secret he is going to give us.  
Vasseur has been dead for years, but his hands still live.
Paul Orlac, you are your father's heir.  
You will bring me a million tomorrow.  At this time!
Money?  Money?  
And therefore you follow me awake and in my dreams?
Why?
For my hands!
Who are you?
I am Vasseur, who was executed on July 13th.
The experiment that Professor Serral performed with your hands his assistant made off with my head.
If I don't get the million tomorrow at this time 
I will go to the State Prosecutor and tell him who your father's murderer is.
Who is the murderer?
You are ... Paul Orlac!
These fingerprints, which are clearly visible are the fingerprints of Vasseur.
And who has those fingers now - you, Paul Orlac!
The letter, which passed through all the servants in the house, was written by the hand of Vasseur, and this hand is now - your hand!
The dagger, with which the murder was done is Vasseur's dagger with the X.  
Your maid will swear, that she saw you with it - in your hand..
Perhaps you did not do the murder - but you cannot deny ....
What is  happening to me?  Am I crazy?
Won't you tell me what is bothering you?
I have the feeling, that these hands are drawing me ... to crime ....
I must bring him the money.
You will tell the State Prosecutor everything ...
Who will believe me?
They will believe you - as I believe you.
I go in a free man.
Wait, perhaps, and we will have news for the evening paper.
It is odd, but I don't know, whether I am experiencing reality or a dream.
It is odd, but I don't know, whether I am experiencing reality or a dream.
A stranger.
He was then executed ... I have seen with my own eyes the work of the guillotine on a neck.
He was then executed ... I have seen with my own eyes the work of the guillotine on a neck.
Mr. Orlac, we thank you for your evidence ...
Go this evening, bring the money with you to the stranger,
And we will follow you.
Someone well known to us - Mr. Nera, at last.  Assistant to Professor Serral,
One of the least talented crooks in the world.
I am also a blackmailer.  But, you are searching for the murderer?
Haven't you considered, that the murderer has Vasseur's hands ... I don't have those hands.
Haven't you considered, that the murderer has Vasseur's hands ... I don't have those hands.
I can tell you who has those hands.
Mr. Orlac, I arrest you!
Mr. Orlac is not guilty - Nera is the murderer.
Keep silent!
Explain the fingerprints of the executed Vasseur!
Nera was Vasseur's friend ...
He secretly made imprints of Vasseur's fingerprints 
And then he had rubber gloves made ... with Vasseur's fingerprints. 
And so he killed the elder Orlac ...
And so he killed the old racketeer and then made it look as if Vasseur had done it.  Vasseur is not guilty of the death.
If Vasseur was not guilty ... then my hands are pure ...
I can die peacefully because I seen a great love.
In the Masters' house.
Tell Mr. Michael to bring my Algerian sketches to me.
I would like to speak with Mr. Zoret the butler. the princess.
Switt, the journalist.
Claude Zoret, the Master.
"Already I have been offered 30000 dollars for these sketches, but I could not bring myself, to let go of them."
Why not? we are not going thus to sell our most beautiful memories.
Please, tell Mr. Zoret,
I will return again before the beginning of the opera.
So, one of these Russian princesses whom at all costs love to be painted by the Master. have they for instance a monopoly on being painted by the Master?
How come you were made a model by the Master, and almost his son?
It was four years ago...
These sketches are not worth anything
Come back when you have learned to see correctly.
I would like to paint to you!
Would you model for me?
You owe much to him, Michael!
But the Master also must thank you!
His glory was born on the paintings in which you modelled.
At table, the conversation turns to death.
It is strange how, sometimes I fear dying so much that I do not know like thinking of it.
I run away from the horror!
I do not fear death because prediction must be fulfilled
I cannot imagine a more beautiful end than to die for being adored
For me, death is simply the last stage of life
You know that your conversation has inspired in me a new picture?
I want to paint Caesar assassinated by Brutus, his adoptive son. and who will look like Brutus?
Switt takes notes from our table conversation for the work that he is writing on the Master
What is your prediction, Duke, of what was spoken at table?
That the last Monthieu will know a great happiness
... and will pay with his life
The butler announces to them that the carriage is leaving
I regret much, I never paint pictures to order but since there is time
I am nevertheless going to paint to you
Michael, the spotlight!
The finances of the princess must be rather disordered
Possibly she hopes to increase her credit by being painted by the Master.
There we are!
I can come in the morning for the first pose?
The "winner" is my best picture,
I give it to you
There will come a day when all will belong to you
Never had a picture given as much pain to Master as the picture of princess Zamikow
You have been up three nights without sleeping!
Is that sensible?
When I am alone,
I see it in front of me, it goes well
But when she is seated here, everything vanishes
Where is Michael?
He goes every afternoon to the Opera to ogle a young ballerina .
Go now, I want to work
I will return after food
You are the culprit of my sleepless nights, princess
Serve the food, we will eat!
We do not wait for Michael?
Today, we will drink in English glasses
The gentleman and the lady are already seated at table
You have sat down to eat without me?
Never have I been treated thus before
Never!
It is your eyes
I cannot render them
It looks right?
You try!
Yes, now, those are her eyes!
Only the youth can guess that
Good eyes
It was Michael who painted them
How did you knew my eyes so well?
Where have you been throughout this time?
I was in the country.
Unfortunately I must leave
I go to the theater this evening.
You are the only one that does not suspect to anything with regard to Michael and Zamikow
Ah so
Tell the butler to take the English glasses to my apartment the Master gave permission
Take away the board,
Mr. Michael has gone out.
Close the window
On this evening, the ballet danced
Tchaikovski's  "Swan Lake"
You do not feel, do not see what I suffer?
Have pity on me, my friend...
Do you desire to have supper with us after the performance, Mr. Switt?
Go now, we meet soon
I want only to believe that the eternity exists.
The visits of Michael to the Master were made more and more rarely only dictated by the last conscience of having to
The thing itself is just a triviality
He came to request lately to me large amounts of money several times
Youth wants to live totally and youth costs money
Book this sum to my account!
From now on you will have your own account with my banker. and then you will be able to begin a new page
Now leave me alone, Michael
"We could see in its last work a picture of princess Z. no brush stroke truer only the eyes make an exception. the effect is so unrealistic that we would swear that the eyes have been painted by another hand "
Who knows the story of the eyes of the Zamikow?
Us
Yes, and he?
Perhaps that to somebody he says the truth and the truth to you, is... that you hated him from first day
Because he broke into  my life, where you wanted to be the only one that played a role
Nobody knows when I am unique
Nobody has the right to increase to my solitude
Claude Zoret, I request to you... that you save the bitterer deceptions.
Let go of the boy
No, Charles,
I do not want to die without my boy.
Why you spoke to me never of this?
Call Mercier, the art dealer
That passes immediately
Calm yourself, my darling
Everything is going to fix itself, I found a solution.
Leave Michael's place setting
Where is Michael? painting in the country.
And Alice?
How is she?
She is well, thanks
Mr. Leblanc, art dealer
I requested that you came, Mr. Leblanc, because I would like through you to sell my "Caesar and Brutus"
That is gorgeous, but...
How to say, I mean... an atmosphere can be cool, not true? and atmosphere can be warm
So in this situation
Another one of your canvases is on the market...
The "Conqueror"...
I want to rescue the "Conqueror" under a pseudonym the price little concerns me
Put the picture in the appartment of Michael, that is its place.
As of that day,
Claude Zoret closed the door to everybody to create his masterpiece completely alone and when this was finished,
Michael returned.
Bring wine!
For the sky,
I have been inspired by the Algerian sketches
Today, for the celebration of return of Michael, we will drink in English glasses
I have borrowed them
I have enough of you pretending
I have enough of being your model, the instrument of your glory
I want finally to be a free man,
Not to depend anymore on your good thanks
Princess Zamikow asks for Mr. Michael to the telephone.
I will never respond to you to what you've just said to me, Michael.
The homecoming....
Why you do not say anything?  speak then
What could I say, that does not make you suffer? finally came the day in which the Master exposed his work. the Duchess, widow of Monthieu Wilhelmine Sandrock
Pardon my preoccupation, Mr. Zoret:
Have you seen my son?
That is a man who has lost all
My girl, pardon this question of a tormented mother:
Do you know where is my son?
Tell Alice that the last Monthieu has paid for his happiness the painter of the pain... the glory of the nation...
Where is Michael?
Soon calm reigned again in the mansion of the Master.
I am sorry I could not come,
I have brought the criticism with me
I can read it for you?
Not now.
I have brought the criticism with me
I can read it for you?
All write about the sky of your work is the most wonderful thing that you have ever painted
Now, we propose to you
60000 dollars for the sketches
To the fact, where are your Algerian sketches?
I would much like to see them again
But Mr. Michael has just left.. with a large folder of drawings
Possibly  he has...
Is true nevertheless,
I had forgotten... that I gave the sketches to him
Yes, Charles, now I am tired
I want to sleep now, to sleep...
But in the course at night, the fate of the Master is fulfilled.
The Master is dying.  Switt.
Take this as fast as is possible to Mr. Michael
I, Claude Zoret, that knows the solitude in this world,
I will my last dispositions here
All my goods must go to my adoptive son, Eugène Michael.
Have you found Michael?
Is he coming soon?
Mr. Michael will not be spoken to
I want  to rest in the middle of a field
Where germinate the seeds and grows the grass, and nobody will have to know the place where I am buried,
Swear that for me?
Jules, my friend, do not cry more.
I go where my heart will know rest
Why you smile, Claude?
Charles, now I can die peacefully. because I knew a great love
Mr. Michael, the Master has died!
Be quiet,be still...
I am with you.
The End
MASTER OF THE HOUSE
This is the story of a spoilt husband... a type that is extinct in the country, but exists abroad.
And it is the story also a heroine... not the brilliant, beautifully gowned... and shingled heroine of the film play-- but just and ordinary wife and mother... whose life is compassed by the four walls of her suburban home.
6.30 AM.
And because Mary Allmen faced the sacrifices, the heavy tasks, the drab monotony so cheerfully,
John her husband, had come to take everything for granted.
''I'l light the fire, Kathleen - you mustn't spoil your hands.''
''Where are my slippers?''
- This was going to be one of his bad days.
''Get the breakfast tray ready for father.''
''Hurry up, mother -
Dad's getting up.''
''Mother, will you hear my tables?''
''How many times I've asked you to let me have my coffee first!''
''I'll try and squeeze enough out of the housekeeping money to get your other pair back from the menders, dear.''
''No spoons!''
''Bread and scrapel!''
''Oh, so you weren't short of butter?''
''Those wretched birds!''
''Oh, never mind now!''
''Has my coat been brushed?''
''There's a little of yesterday's joint left for lunch... will you have it hot or cold, dear?''
''Cold!''
''Oh, heavens, are we going to have you here again to-day?''
''Nana'' Marsh, who had nursed John as a baby, and who now lent an occasional helping hand in the little home.
''I can't do anything with this stocking of Dick's.''
''Look! They'll make Kathleen a fine pair of mittens.''
''What are nine eights?''
''Seventy-two.''
''Baby's awake.''
''Look... there's Nana!''
''Each day brought its allotted tasks; each morning was a struggle against time, in order to be ready for father.''
''It's no use unless you pull... hard!''
''Tell Dick to run and get a pound of cooking apples.
Father loves them baked.''
''That's too heavy for you, dear.
Run and get me some potatoes instead.''
''Kathleen haven't I told you not to do the vegetables?
You'll simply ruin your hands.''
''Whatever has become of Dick?''
''Buck up, Dick... father will be here soon.''
''No wonder you've never got a decent pair of shoes to your feet!
Do you think
I'm made of money?''
''I can hear John outside... grambling as usual!''
''Go and serve the porridge, so as not to keep father waiting.''
''Nana, dear, don't say anything... for my sake!''
''I'll teach you, you young scoundrel!
You'll stand in th corner instead of having any lunch!''
''Why can't you keep an eye on the boy?
You've nothing else to do all day!''
''For goodness sake, keep that brat quiet!''
''The dozens of times I've said
I won't have clothes drying in here!''
''Can't the boy change his wet stockings first?
He might catch cold.''
''Let him catch cold.
Perhaps it'll teach him a lesson.''
''Hands behind your back!''
''I said good afternoon,
Your Highness!''
''This stuff is full of lumps.''
''Why does nobody hear that kettle except me?''
''Are we never to have a meal without you jumping up and down the whole time?''
''Go and put the water on for the coffee, dear.''
''Cold meat again!''
''Three apples between five people!''
''I'm not going to stand by and see you treated like this any longer...''
''I'm going to feth your mother!''
''BRUTE!''
''I'm so glad I've met you,
Mrs. Nelson... I was just on my way to fetch you.''
''If it were only a question of money I could help, but it's just his selfishness that is doing the mischief.''
''In spite of everything,
I'm certain they're still fond of one another.
Let us two old women see if we can't put matters right.''
''Why aren't you more careful?''
''Your mother brought them, did she? I hate this
Lady Bountiful treatment.''
''When you were a schoolboy
I gave you a trashing that I expect you have remember to this day.''
''It did you a lot of good.''
''If your mother and that old harridan are not out of this house... by the time I come back.
I'll clear out for good.
You can choose between us.''
''Well, I've done my part; now it's your turn.
You must get her to leave here before he comes back.''
''Get a porridge plate.''
''My dear, this state of things cannot go on any longer... even you must admin that.''
''I expect I'm partly to blame...
I must try to manage better.''
''John's the only one to blame, my dear - he's wearing you out, body and soul.''
''You all say that John is bad...''
''But he's not... he's not!''
''Since he lost his business he's had a hard struggle... to keep us going, and it's made him irritable.''
''But I shared the good years with him... and I couldn't have had a better husband.
I've got to be patient with him now.''
''Sonny, hadn't mother better hear your home lessons for tomorrow?''
''From page thirty-six, down to the paragraph marked with a cross.''
''...and he ruled over his House wisely and well...
...but gradually he became...
...a fierce tyrant and those who had once loved him...
...now went in hourly fear of him..."
''What's a tyrant, mum?''
''My girl, don't you realise that you are on the verge of a serious break-down?''
''You must leave all this and get away for a complete rest...
John will appreciate you all the more when you come back.''
''But who is to look after my home and kiddies?''
''Will you do it, Nana?''
''Promise me that you won't be hard and cruel to John.''
''Cruel - no! Hard? - well that depends - on John!''
''Go and fetch a cab, Dick.''
''I've saved these few shillings to get little extras for John... but don't let him know they're from me.''
''Let him catch cold.
Perhaps it'll teach him a lesson.''
''It's your bath night, Dick.
Bring the big tub in...
I'll get it ready for you.''
Later.
''Good evening, dear.''
''Yes, those are mine.''
''Where is Mary?''
''Gone away!''
''Your wife is seriously ill.
She's gone away for a complete rest.''
''A very ingenious idea!''
''I suppose you meddling old women... have made Mary think
I illtreat her?''
''And I'm to be frightened into rushing up to my mother-in-law's... to beg forgiveness for things
I haven't done?''
''Well, your plan won't work!
Mary will be the one to apologise not I!''
''We must economise now...
I'm not the good manager your wife is.''
''It's no use trying to show off with me, young man... and I'll ask you to be a little more polite.''
''I'm mistress here now!
Do you understand?''
''Take that kettle off!''
''Do it yourself!''
''That just proves you're a fool, John.
Now you'll have to pay to have 'em washed all over again.''
''I'm not going to have you here.
Take your rubbish and clear out!''
''Daddy!''
''FATHER!''
''Brute!''
''Where is your mother?''
''I don't know... Granny's taken her away because she's ill.''
''You've made mother ill, and if she dies, it'll be
your fault!''
''Mummy made me promise
I wouldn't tell you... but I think you ought to know...''
''For months she's been sitting up at night sewing... so as to be able to buy you little extras with the money she earned.''
''Daddy! What are you going to do?''
''I'm going to Granny's... to fetch mother.''
''Yes, dear, it hurts us to punish those we love... but for your mother's sake, we must make... your father really repentant.''
''At her mother's house
Mary had at last succumbed... to the weariness of mind and body which her gallant spirits... had defied so long.''
''Your daughter's only chance is to get away into the country, somewhere she can get a complete rest.''
''And, of course, she must not be worried with any domestic affairs.''
''Dear, for your own sake, promise me not to let John know where you are.''
This is a plan case of a woman over-working... and half-starving herself for the sake of her family.
Only complete isolation and rest will restore her to health.
''Take my advice... go home and wait patiently... until my treatment and the country air have done their work.''
''It was a very humbled
John who returned home...
He had seen himself through the eyes of others... and the picture was not pleasant.''
''Good-night, Nana.''
''In the space of one short month, thirty years seemed to have rolled back... and John was one more a small boy... terrified of his nurses wrath...''
''It's takem you a long time to stir yourself.''
''Take the bird's glass with you.''
''What on earth have you been doing all this time?''
''Put this lamp oil away.''
''There is a Mrs. Higgins outside.''
''Oh, it's the washerwoman.
Ask her in.''
''Did you imagine I was going to slave at a wash-tub... to save you a few shillings?''
''Take this bucket down please.''
''Pretty Dick... tweet...''
''You do like the birds really daddy don't you!''
''Come and sit here by me, Kathleen.''
''Don't you wish mother were back with us?''
''Haven't you any idea when she will be home?''
''Nana says she won't let mother come home until you've... stood in the corner!''
''Kathleen, fetch a tea spoon.''
''Do you know what I've been thinking of buying for you?
A bicycle... as soon as I can spare the instalment.''
''If I buy it for you will you tell me where mother is?''
My dear Nana,
I am pleased to say... that I am feeling almost well again in spite of the way in which I miss...
John and the children,
I feel happeir than
I have ever done.
''Much as Nana enjoyed her victory over the fallen tyrant... she often secretly pitied him.''
''Here are a fes goodies, John... you know my old habit.''
''Mother, you must tell me where Mary is...
I can't stand this uncertainly any longer!''
''I've been utterly miserable since she's been away...
I can't go on without her.''
''Is that so?''
''You've changed John.
A month ago you would not have admitted that!''
''What fools we men are!''
''Just because we bring home the wages, we imagine we do all the work, whereas...''
''Whereas your wives do three times the works... and get no wages but grunts or black looks!''
''I swear I'll turn over a new leaf... if only Mary will give me another chance.''
''You must try to arrange things with Nana... you know her terms.''
''Take the opportunity while I'm out in the kitchen.''
''Nana, I want to talk to you about something.''
''You're... er... losing a hairpin.''
''John. I want to talk to you about something.''
''Your... er... tie isn't straight.''
I've found out where Mother is.
But I am not going to tell.
''Have you taken leave of your senses?''
''Attend to the stove.''
I no longer feel lonely now that I have Peter... who seems to think that
I am the most wonderful woman in the world.
Yours sincerely Mary.
''Do shut that stove!''
''Who is Peter?''
''Seems to be a man.''
''That's enough!
Now I want to talk!''
SIT DOWN!!!
''You men are all alike!''
''Arrogant.''
''Selfish.''
''And stupid.''
''When first you marry, your wife is an angel... you want to kneel at her feet and worship her...''
''But later on, when she really deserves your homage... you treat her like a galley slave!''
''Will you admit that you deserve a good thrashing?''
''Well. I'll let you off that but if you want to know where Mary is... you've got to do as I said... stand in the corner!''
''Hands behind your back!''
''Ssssh!''
''John, my dear!''
''Dick, come up quickly... mother's home!''
''Who is Peter?''
''It has been a pretty severe lesson, dear, but it has made me realise... all that you mean to me.''
''But my teeth are nice and clean, mother!''
''You're not going to be rude about my
''tuck box'' any more... are you John?''
OPTICIAN'S SHOP
A fine optician's shop situated in a provincial town... is immediately for sale.
10.000,- Kroner cash.
Write box 4327.
''And here is the money in cheque so that you can take over the shop!''
''Are you two love birds going to stay there all night?
The coffee's getting cold!''
''And the wise old clock seemed to tick:
''Mary's back - at's all right,
Mary's back - at's all right''... ''
THE END
BY ROCKET TO THE MOON
("WOMAN IN THE MOON")
This film is the result of collaboration by:
And the cast:
Scenario:
Thea von Harbou
Direction:
Fritz Lang
Photography:
Cast:
Prof. Georg Manfeldt:
Klaus Pohl
Wolf Helius:
Willy Fritsch
Engineer Hans Windegger
Gustav von Wangenheim
Astro Student Friede Velten:
Gerda Maurus
Gustav:
Gustl Stark-Gstettenbaur
The man who presently goes by
Walter Turner: Fritz Rasp
Five brains and chequebooks:
The man at the microphone:
Karl Platen
The mouse:
Josephine
Artistic collaborators:
Scientific collaborator:
Prof. Hermann Oberth
Head of production:
Eduard Kubat
The novel Woman In the Moon by Thea von Harbou is published by
August Scherl
For the human mind, there is no Never, - only a Not Yet.
Georg Manfeldt, Ph.D.
Professor of Astronomy
You should have let that skunk break his neck, Helius -!
For thirty years I live like a dog for the sake of my ideas - and then comes this louse-fellow speculating on my misery, and wants to buy my manuscript from me as a curiosity -!
I'd like to have dinner with you,
Professor - can you spare some bread?
I found this in my coat when you left the other day - buy yourself some bread with it, Mr. Helius -!
Spare me having to take handouts from my only friend, Helius...
If you don't join me, Professor,
I won't be able to enjoy it!
FOOL OR SWINDLER?
Thursday, 17 August, 1896
Hypothetical Account
of the Gold Content
In the Mountains
of the Moon
I maintain, after many years of comparative analyses, that primitive moon-rock contains more gold than the earth's mountains.
One day, the first spaceship will fly to the moon, to bring its gold back to the earth!
Laughter, gentlemen, is the argument of idiots against every new idea -!!
The progress of the world will not fail due to learned ignoramuses lacking in fantasy whose brains work in inverse proportion to their calcification -!!!
Professor - I've decided to go...
But not without me, Helius - not without me -!!
Now your idea will triumph after all, Professor...
Naturally Windegger will go along?
What -? Windegger won't -? Your collaborator and best friend?
Friede Velten, student of astronomy, and Hans Windegger, Chief Engineer of Helius Hangars are engaged.
Dear Friede!
Best wishes to you and Hans!
Don't be upset that I can't come tonight to your engagement party!
Please accept the flowers as a substitute.
Yours, Wolf Helius.
He doesn't even know anything about my decision - no-one does - except for you...
I tell you, Helius, more people than you and I know of your plan -
- and the fellow whom I threw down the stairs before is one of them -!
Three nights ago -
So you think someone knows of my plans and is thus also interested in your moon-gold theory?
Helius, don't be angry - it's my life's work - go home -
I can't rest until I know the manuscript is in your safe!
Dear Helius! I write to you in incomparable bliss and you should be the first to know that Friede has agreed to be my wife.
Perhaps I took her a bit by surprise, but she said yes!
Come tonight to the engagement party at Friede's apartment!
I am ridiculously happy!
Windegger
Fresh violets, sir?
Wolf Helius, Bergstr. 86-3
To be delivered in person
Mr. Helius isn't home...
Please... let me wait for Mr. Helius anyway. Mr. Windegger sent me...
To be delivered In person
Dear Helius! Accept this poor soul, if you can, and give him work and a chance to make a life - he won't disappoint you.
Warmest regards,
Windegger
Drive to the nearest police station - don't hold things up with long explanations - just bring some sort of officer here to me!
MINGO:
NICK CARTER OF THE SKY
Saturn-Pirates
The thieves' craft approaches
unlucky Saturn!
God in Heaven: You must have some idea when you last phoned -!
Did you leave the flat unattended -?
Only for a moment, when
Gustav came to get me... but then there was that man whom Mr. Windegger had sent -!
Would you allow me to use your telephone?
My phone isn't working...
Christ, madame - someone has to pick up - there's at least half a dozen people sitting around that phone -!
I'm only the foreman of Helius Hangars - but if you keep working like this, you, Miss Friede, will soon be the forewoman of us all!
I was supposed to have sent you somebody with a letter of recommendation -?!
I'm begging you, Hans, get over here...
I can't tell you over the telephone what this is all about... just, please, come...
You can be assured, Hans, that I would not call you away from your engagement party if it weren't absolutely necessary...
We'll be there right away,
Helius!
Allow me to introduce myself -:
Turner...
If you go flying down those steps again, Mr. Turner,
I won't be standing at the bottom to catch you...
Believe me, Mr. Helius, there's no wiser way to pass the time till the arrival of Ms. Velten and Mr. Windegger than to have a chat with me...
First, a small request... tell your chauffeur it's no longer necessary to inform the police...
The police have already been informed, Mr. Turner...
Just a measure of caution,
Mr. Helius, - as well as this...
Also a measure of caution,
Mr. Turner?
I now grasp the phenomenon,
Mr. Turner, how you haven't been whiling away in prison all this time -!
You do flatter,
Mr. Helius!
Perhaps you can also reveal to me, Mr. Turner, where the stolen manuscript - and the contents missing from my safe are located -?!
Five of the wealthiest and cleverest minds who wish to keep the earth's gold-reserve under their control -
One of the most interesting documents, madame and sirs...
To prove the accessibility of the moon,
Helius sent the unmanned trial-rocket H. 23 filled with magnesium, moonward - the explosion of which, upon impact, was viewed and photographed from the earth!
Thanks to the competence of our representative
I can show you something completely different - things that Helius himself has thus far not made available to the scientific community.
Cinematographic images of the surface of the moon by H. 32 during its first orbit of the moon.
The unmanned register-rocket H.32, equipped with automatic imaging-instruments.
The rocket-jet.
In its nose-cone...
...is located the egg-shaped register-chamber with the automated imaging-instruments.
The imaging-instrument, linked to a clockwork.
The mirror tele-objective.
Schematic depiction of the H.32's trajectory.
Gravitational Field
of the Moon
Zero-G Zone
Trajectory of H.32
Necessary starting speed
11,200 metres per second
First image of the moon,
36 hours after liftoff:
Distance of the rocket from the moon: Approx. 40,000 km.
At an altitude of approx. 1000 km
H.32 flies over the moon-crater Eratosthenes -
- in its depths the astronomer
W. H. Pickering, director of Mandeville
Observatory, Jamaica, believes to have observed swarms of insects.
The objective's eye sees what no man's eye has ever seen:
The opposite side of the moon turned away from the earth.
Cryptic, monochrome planes of colossal dimensions -
Vegetation? Fog?
Water? -
- all seem to confirm the theory of Prof. Peter Andreas Hansen
- of the Seeberg Observatory near Gotha - that on the opposite side of the moon exists an atmosphere and, therefore, life.
Why lose more time?
I for one want the moon's riches of gold, should they actually prove to exist, to fall into the hands of businessmen and not visionaries and idealists!
At this moment our representative is making
Mr. Helius aware of our intentions in a very concrete manner...
You have only two choices,
Mr. Helius:
Either make the trip to the moon in our employ -
- or not at all...
If we don't come to an agreement, Mr. Helius, five minutes after my departure, your hangar, along with the nearly completed spaceship, will be reduced to a heap of rubble...
What would you gain, by killing me off, Mr. Helius? - at the most, a travel companion who is less considerate!
You still don't get the picture, Mr. Helius... we'd rather annihilate all of your plans than let you shut us out of the operation...
Tell your clients,
Mr. Turner, that I do not aim to found upon the moon a criminal-colony...
Give me 24 hours to think it over...
Will your... plans be seriously affected by the theft, Helius?
Don't worry about the plans -!
I have duplicates of everything, safe in my desk's secret compartment!
Hans dear, if I were you, I wouldn't be so sure about that!
Why did you conceal from us,
Helius, the fact that you now actually want to take on the voyage to the moon?
You've called me your good comrade so often at work - in the laboratory - in this very room... now you want to lie to me, Helius?
I didn't mean to lie to you, Friede -
I just wanted to spare
Hans the conflict between his love for you and his sense of duty towards the work we've been doing!
But do you really believe, Helius, that Hans would ever be capable of letting you down?!
Oh no, Helius! You won't make the trip to the moon without Windegger...
- and not without me -!
Have you forgotten, Friede, how those fared that dared this trip to the moon before us -
IN MEMORY OF...
TO THE BOLD PIONEERS
OF SPACE NAVIGATION
WHO DID NOT RETURN FROM
THEIR JOURNEY INTO OUTER-SPACE
THE Y LIVED AND DIED FOR
A GREAT IDEA
HONOUR THEIR MEMORY
Friede - don't you get it?!
I just couldn't stand to know you were in danger -
God in heaven - and what danger indeed -!!!
He's decided to travel to the moon, Hans...
So when do we start -?
And who will go with us?
Ask Friede...
Friede... you want to go with me -?
...in exactly 24 hours...
Mr. Helius, the 24 hours for consideration were up 61 minutes ago...
The explosion is of no concern, Mr. Helius - it's nothing but a small accentuation of my offers...
The price of this first warning, Mr. Windegger, is the hangar:
Just a shack... the second one will cost the lives of men... the third, the spaceship...
Don't force me, Mr. Helius, to take stronger measures:
Choose the lesser of two evils -: Me!
I give you my word,
Mr. Helius, the very hour that we come to an agreement, you'll get your stolen material back, complete and in perfect condition...
...the Spaceship "FRIEDE"
("Peace") is ready for launch...
...at moonrise the spaceship will soar into outer-space...
...only to land - if God sees fit - 36 hours later upon the opposite side of the moon...
...at this moment bells will ring - the sirens of all the factories, trains and ships around the world will wail to honour the pioneers of space navigation...
In this final hour I must once again warn all of you...
You, Manfeldt, and you -
Mr. Turner:
I'm leaving out Windegger:
And as for you... Friede -!
Friede... in this last minute... -
I'm begging you -
Don't beg me, Helius!
Helius, in this last instant, do you want to shame me as a woman?
...the whole world's eyes are directed upon us... -
...the whole world's ears are listening to us...
Everyone to their stations...
We launch in 50 minutes -!
...the whole world's eyes are directed upon us... -
...the whole world's ears are listening to us...
Just now
Just now the
Just now the spaceship
Just now the spaceship has
Just now the spaceship has reached
Just now the spaceship has reached the
Just now the spaceship has reached the launch pad...
...because the spaceship is built too light to stand freely, it's submerged in a water-basin in which it floats upright...
From the moment of launch till attaining the necessary speed of 11,200 km per second...
SPEED
...there will be 8 critical minutes in the battle with the increase in speed, with G-force, which has a fatal effect upon human organisms when it goes over
40 metres per second...
G-FORCE
...after these 8 minutes, during which we'll feel an intolerable burden pulling our bodies back to earth, we'll be victors in the battle with gravitational force... or -
...and if we aren't able to maintain our speed of 11200... then we'll hurtle - and hurtle - further - and further still -
- irretrievably lost in outer-space - never again... never again... to return to the earth...
I'll be the one to pull the stop-lever, Windegger!
60 seconds to go -!
20 seconds to go - lie still - take a deep breath -!
10 seconds to go -!
Seconds to go!
NOW
Launch-rocket depleted!
Full-throttle on middle-rocket!
Win-degger... jet-tison... middle... - ro-cket...
Turn... back!!!
Maybe this chap is dead?!
I think Josephine needs a brandy!
I think Mr. Turner needs one even more -!
Don't you see, someone is stowed away in the cargo hold!
Okay, you wretched scoundrel, how did you get in here?!
I've devoted my whole life to moon-issues, Mr. Helius!
Moon Vampire
The Mystery of the
Deadly Moon-Rays
The earth... where is our earth -!?
The sun is rising on our earth...
Logbook of the Spaceship
FRIEDE
Turning the spaceship's black side toward the sun... to absorb warmth. -
All's well on board.
227,000 km from earth.
Stopping the last jets, flying without propulsion.
Weightlessness on board.
Have entered the moon's gravitational field. -
Are within 9000 km of the moon.
Through the directional boosts mentioned above weight regained on board.
Turning the spaceship with the jets in direction of destination to fire brake boosts to prevent premature crash on the moon. -
Are about to reach the side of the moon facing away from earth.
Watching the earth set.
We're seeing it again, Hans... we're seeing it again!
And when are we finally going to land?!
If we had a spark of reason in us, we wouldn't ever land -!
You're just afraid - you wimp -!!
Tell him he has no right to jeopardise all our lives for the sake of his ambition!
By God now is not the time for arguments, Hans -
Shut the window-hatches -!
Full brake-power - we're plummeting -!
Hold on tight -!!!!
The ignition cable probably isn't going to fix itself!
The moon awaits!
First though we have to do an air-sample, to tell whether we can breathe outside!
Do what you want!
I'm only interested in how
I'll get back out of here!
I'll tell you just one thing, Friede, as soon as I have the spaceship ready to launch again, I'll fly back to earth - and neither Helius nor
Manfeldt will stop me -!
Do you really aim to stab Helius in the back?
Do you really aim to stab me in the back?
Now Helius has no choice but to prepare right away for the trip back -!
But Helius is convinced that we'll find water with the divining rod!
You know what the only thing is that we'll find on the moon -!
- Death!
Professor, please, help me with the air-sample!
For God's sake, don't open it -!!
If he opens the outer door and outside there's no breathable atmosphere, then we're done for good!
He's taken the divining rod with him!
It's as if the rod is pulling him forward!
Mingo would follow this trail, Mr. Helius!
The main objective should be to look for water!
I have enough to do, to get us ready to launch again!
May I volunteer to look for Professor Manfeldt and, at the same time, water?
Atmosfere breathable, not yet analised.
Törner on the trale for 3 hours of Manfeldt searching for water.
Since when is Gustav your secretary?
I can't stand it anymore...
I'm going to look for Manfeldt -!
From Miss Friede... so you won't go hungry!
Professor -!
Professor -!
Professor -!!
Professor -! Manfeldt -!!
Professor -!!!
Don't let him into the ship!!
Don't let him into the ship!!!
Is there anyone in the world to whom we should relay your last regards - if we get back to earth?
The oxygen containers - the shot hit the oxygen containers -!!!!
What does this mean,
Miss Friede, with the oxygen containers?!
Let's pray to God it means nothing!
We've lost more than half of the oxygen!
That means: One of us can't go back to earth -!
One of us has to stay on the moon -!!
Yes, Windegger:
One of us!
Do you know what this means - do you?!
To stay here - alone on the moon - just because you didn't want to listen to me - you and him!!
Short one loses - long one wins... and we draw three times... how's that?!
You draw -!
So draw then -!
Would it be easier for you, Hans, if I stayed with you on the moon?
I have only one desire:
To get back to earth -!!
Let's drink to a happy homecoming to earth - for all of us...
...to a happy homecoming - for all of us, Hans!
The base-camp is ready,
Mr. Helius!
Now you must prove, Gustav, that I can rely upon you!
I'm staying back here on the moon...
- and you will guide the spaceship away from the moon!
Do you want Mr. Windegger to perish -?
And Miss Friede, who loves him -?
The enormous shock of the launch will naturally wake the sleepers - and then Mr. Windegger will take over the command...
Dear Hans! I am convinced that you won't let me down just as I haven't let you down.
I shall wait calmly and with confidence that you'll come to get me.
My greetings to Friede! - Helius.
Farewell!
SEX IN CHAINS
This film is based on a work about the sexual desire of prisoners, by Franz Höllering, and on actual statements by Karl Plättner, the author of the detailed book
"Eros in Prison", the material for which he collected during his eight-year imprisonment.
Following the premiere in Berlin, the German Human Rights League assumed responsibility for this film.
Part 1
Franz Sommer,
Engineer.
Father!
I am just passing through and have only an hour stopover.
This is the maid's day off.
How is your husband?
May I say good-day to him?
I will call the factory to see if he's available.
Too bad... Franz and one of his executives are en route to an important meeting
Help Wanted.
Franz, look sharp, customers arriving!
You have just been filmed!
You still haven't found a job, my dear Sommer?
Go there, maybe my recommendation will be helpful.
Alfred Wernicke asks that you cordially receive the bearer of this card
Full-time employment is out of the question, but if you'd like to act as a sales representative on commission...
- please do.
With such a glum look you won't get anywhere. You need to smile.
Another attempt
- maybe something will come of it.
My father was here, he brought it along.
While we hide our situation from father, you cannot expect anything else from him.
In response to your application, we are willing to engage you.
You may begin work as soon as tomorrow.
Respectfully.
Before you were laid off, we savored the good times together.
Now that times are hard,
I want to help earn our living.
Maybe you can also show us how the device cleans furniture, entirely without obligation of course!
Oh Fifi, it's just the thing for you!
We work all day and still never get done.
Clean already?
The device seems very practical, but
I just can't decide whether to buy it.
Well, here's your commission
- quite a nice start.
You've given me too much by mistake.
Thank goodness you're here
- some guy has been pestering me all night.
Please leave me alone
- I'll lose my job.
Leave my wife alone.
LEAVE MY WIFE ALONE!!!
End of Part 1
Part 2
Did I call Steinau... - or Sommer!?
Don't be so desperate... he will recuperate.
Then you will surely be acquitted!
Keep me in your heart!
If I find out whose lies sent me up,
I'll kill him!
If only she doesn't have to starve!
Nice state of affairs - when some informer can send an innocent man to prison!
Is that your final word?
I don't care if he's found guilty
- I will not get divorced!
Then we have nothing more to say to one another.
I'll sustain a loss from the downtime while I'm imprisoned.
I will be acquitted in the end, but who compensates for my damage?
The bail is accepted. You are free!
I will keep my promise to you:
I shall help your wife.
Jail has taught me to look at the world with new eyes.
From her husband in prison?
Dear Madam,
I promised your husband to relieve his concern for you and for that reason ask you to call on me in my office at your earliest convenience.
Respectfully,
Paul Steiner
I was imprisoned together with your husband during investigation...
Would you care to accept a position in my business?
We can only hope the injured man will live, or the matter can become serious for you.
Abandonment of the proceedings against the Steinau plants
...the State Attorney's Office has dropped the charges filed against the owner of the Steinau plants.
Steinau intends to file suit...
...Max Wallraff, who was knocked down by engineer Franz Sommer, presently held in prison, has succumbed to the injuries...
Now he is in for it.
However I can help you, I shall!
In the name of the people.
- Despite the gravity of the deed...
- emotional act...
- the immaculate past life...
- after long indecision, the court has...
- decreed a sentence of three years of prison...
End of Part 2
Part 3
Three years...! Can one survive that?!
In the night only Friedland stars can beam!
Has it seized you yet?
Just wait, this too will pass.
I've lived to see someone unman himself, just so he could finally sleep.
Human beings will always be such, even if they have sinned against society!
Is it not hard enough to be locked away from the world... must also one punish the culprit in a way that his punishment also hurts the innocent?
Not for me, Mr. Baron,
- My imagination lets me do without such gimmicks!
Why are we allowed to eat, drink, sleep, and only that?
Are we not human?
Stay at home... you're excused for today.
Let me work... otherwise
I don't know how I shall bear it.
I've lived to see someone unman himself, just so he could finally sleep.
To the doctor
Allow me to go to my girl just once or I'll go mad!
Simulator!
Just imagine, a naked woman molded from breadcrumbs. It is hell here.
Even the strongest weakens under this depravation. At the same time
I can understand this man, because I too suffer terribly from the distance to you.
A person gone once astray must not despair of the moral order in prison and become a real criminal!
To be part of this solution shall be my life's work!
End of Part 3
Part 4
Mrs. Sommer!
Are you doing well?
You must not worry about me;
Mr. Steinau is a true friend.
He also gave me employment.
End of visiting time!
Well, Mr Baron, how did the 8 days of sanatorium agree with you?
Plead for me that I'll be allowed my bride... only one day... else I cannot live on.
You've brought the handkerchief back from visitation.
Three days of solitary! Dismissed!
Who is this, who enters there?
Oh, look who's coming there!
He smells like outside!
Tell me about outside.
My husband
My husband...
My husband!...
My husband!......
Husband!......
Husband......
End of Part 4
Part 5
Yield not to temptation, but turn your hearts aloft and
God shall carry you through.
I cannot describe my sufferings to you.
It is horrible here and only thoughts of you, of your fidelity and bravery, hold me up. When I get out...
You shall know everything, everything, everything.
Alfred, what are you thinking of?
Place your hand over your heart and promise that you won't laugh at me!
I shall never laugh at you.
Why don't you say something
- do you despise me?
Prison Warden
Punishment should not be an act of social revenge, but one of instruction for mankind in living together.
We prison officers have no higher duty.
If it isn't always successful, it isn't always due to us.
Why are husband and wife not allowed to spend their few visiting hours unsupervised?
For once I will make an exception!
Just a quarter of an hour
I was with him...
I wanted to tell him everything but I could not do it.
What has become of me!
I am to blame for everything!
You are no more guilty than he or I
- the laws men make are bad and brutal... they mercilessly plunge us into the depths!
If I were to ask him to release you and you were to become my wife...!
No! No! I love him... only him!
End of Part 5
Part 6
Mr Marquis, please honor us with your presence soon again.
Mr von Sommer, you are next.
I thank you with all my heart for everything you have done for me.
Now I will visit Sommer in prison
- he has to release you.
I beg you not to do that.
Live for your idea to moderate the penal system, and forget me!
I hoped to have you at my side as my wife in this battle...
Penal System Reform
Why don't the prisoners themselves complain?
Because they are afraid, Mr. Representative.
Is it not to weep when millions are spent to help horses, cats and dogs... and so little for the betterment of men!
There can surely be no argument that prison must be less agreeable than freedom.
I know in theory there is a modern penal system.
In practice however, everything remains unaffected.
Isn't being caged enough?
Allow the possibility of short leaves instead of trying to contain natural drives with exercise and saltpetre.
Punishment must remain a penalty.
We cannot put sofas in the cells!
Thank you, Mr Representative. In any case,
I know whom not to elect in the future!
To be postponed until further notice
Tomorrow he will come out of prison!
If he is rich, you can get a nice little sum out of him.
This will advise that your husband will be released from prison on October 1, 1928 at 10:00.
Your husband would like you to come for him.
FIRST YEAR
SECOND YEAR
THIRD YEAR
Now I can go wherever I wish
- but no longer to you!
So Steinau has spoken with you after all?!
What is Steinau supposed to have talked about with me?
Back then someone touched you and I struck him down
- today everything is so different!
Forget?... I will never forget how strong and upright was our commitment!
And now... truly,
The Law punishes thoroughly!
Madam, if I've destroyed your happiness
- forgive me.
I cannot continue living... go, you are free.
We belong together... as in love, as in guilt.
Even if it can end only this way?
In the end, too!
The Sheik
In this world of peace and flame
Lies a palm garden of the Sahara
A blessed oasis of the sands
Where the children of Araby dwell
In happy ignorance that Civilization has passed them by.
Maidens chosen for the marriage market.
An ancients custom by which.
Wives are secured for the wealthy sons of Allah.
Zilah, one of the prizes destined for the marriage lottery.
Ruth Miller
A tribal chieftain protests the sale of his sweetheart.
Youseef...George Waggener
The Sheik, Ahmed Ben Hassan, upon whose shoulders has fallen the heritage of leadership.
Rudolph Valentino
When love is more desired than riches, it is will of Allah.
Let another be chosen.
On the way to the harems Of the rich merchants.
To obey and serve like chattel slaves.
Biskra, the Beautiful.
Gateway to the desert.
A city of adventure. Where the new civilization Rubs elbows with the old.
Are you going to attend Diana Mayo's farewell dance this evening?
I am not! I thoroughly disapprove of this young madcap's wild scheme!
The idea of Diana Mayo planing a tour alone into the desert, with only native camel-drivers and Arabs!
The subject of all the gossip, the orphan daughter of an English peer,
Lady Diana Mayo. Agnes Ayres
Her brother, Sir Aubrey, who for years has vainty striven to curb Diana's reckless spirit of daring Frank Butler
Diana's guide into the desert,
Mustapha Ali
Charles Brindley
I have a good mind to make you give up this insane trip.
I've made up my mind, dear brother.
Evening in the Monte Carlo of the Sahara
Diana, I love you. Postpone this trip and give me the right to go with you.
Marriage is captivity - the end of independence.
I am content with my life as it is.
It is the great Sheik Ahmed Ben Hassan.
He is entertaining at the Casino tonight.
Mademioselle will be disappointed- the Casino is closed to all except Arabs.
And why should a savage desert bandit keep us out of any public place?
Sheik Ahmed is not a savage.
He is a rish tribal prince, who was educated in Paris.
In Biskra his slightest wish is law.
Go to the dancer and ask if I may borrow one of her costumes for the evening.
Like a page from the Arabian Nights.
The marriage gamble Where bridge are won On the turn of a wheel.
Oh, sons of Allah! Gaze upon the charms of Halima, loveliest flower of the desert.
To the cultured English girl this marriage fair suggests the slave of the barbarous past.
The pale hands and golden hair of a white woman.
By whose invitation do you come here?
I wanted to see the savage who could bar me from this Casino.
With your permission, the savage will escort you to the door.
It is the English woman whom
I am to guide into the desert tomorrow.
Dawn- with the Arab under the lure of the defiant English girl.
Pale hands I love, Beside the Shalimar,
Where are you now?
Who lies beneath your spell?
Into the sand garden of the sun. with her brother accompanying her on the first day's journey
Don't worry, Aubrey, I shall join you in London in a month - goodbye.
Lie still, you little fool!
Her exultant dream of freedom ended- a helpless captive in the desert wastes.
Gaston, the French valet, in the Sheik's service since his school days in France.
Lucien Littlefield.
Why have you brought me here?
Are you not woman enough to know?
Do you know how beautiful you are?
I am not accustomed to having my orders disobeyed.
And I am not accustomed to obeying orders.
You will learn!
You make a very charming boy, but it was not a boy
I saw two nights ago in Biskra.
Your luggage has arrived.
You will dress for dinner.
See that Mademoiselle is given every comfort and attend to her luggage at once.
I speak French, Madame, and come to serve my master's bride.
An hour of anguished revolt, while a savage sand-storm sweeps in from the fevered wastes.
Do you think can keep me here when I am missed by my friends in Biskra?
You will not be missed until it is too late... too late for anyone to learn your whereabouts- the desert is a great hidingplace
Better remain here, for in that sand fury you would not live an hour.
You are so pretty and if I choose,
I can make you love me.
I would rather you killed me.
Master, the horses!
They have broken loose!
Through the dull slumber of despair.
Until morning tempts back.
A desire to live.
For Madame to wear the master's orders.
After a week of sullen obedience.
To my friend, Ahmed Ben Hassan from Raoul de st. Hubert
That I can at last make another visit to you in the desert.
I count the days until you meet me in Biskra. Affection stely Raoul
Pale hands I love, Beside the Shalimar,
Where are you now?
Who lies beneath your spell?
Pale hands, pink tipped!
Then it was you who sang beneath my window in Biskra?
I always sing when I am happy when events and things please me.
My friend from Paris is coming for a visit Raoul de St. Hubert,
That is why I am happy that is why I sing.
Are you going to bring him here and let him see me- like this?
You are here and so it is my wish that you should cordially receive my guest.
You will return Mademoiselle's possession to her at once.
I am leaving for Biskra to be gone three days.
During my absence, amuse yourself.
You will have the saddle horses and Gaston to keep you company.
Gaston will return your clothes.
You hate them so mush my kisses?
As the hour approaches when Diana must face the humiliating ordeal of meeting a man from her own world.
The French novelist, Dr. Raoul de St. Hubert
Adolphe Menjaou
She is very fascinating, Raoul.
Be careful - she will surely bewitch you.
"Does the past mean so little to you that you now steal white women and make love to them like a savage?"
"When an Arab sees a woman that he wants, he takes her!"
A desert bandit trespasses
In the domain of the Sheik Ahmed,
Under the guise of a holy caravan.
Omair, the bandit.
Walter Long
"Where is Gaston?
What are you doing here?"
I did not have the courage to face the stranger.
Oh, be kind to me Ahmed, please!
If I had arrived a moment later, you would have been picked up by that caravan and carried away from me.
At dinner St. Hubert reveals himself as a chivalrous gentleman of tact.
If you will permit me,
I should like to retire, sir!
You might have spared her.
My presence here!
The humiliation of meeting a man from her own world!
She is content.
Desert days bring to the captive and the novelist a closer understanding.
Your story is wonderful, but is it real?
Does there really exit such a man as you have drawn.
As tender and faithful as your hero?
I do know such a man.
One who could develop into such a character.
The men in my life have not known the meaning of tenderness.
Have thought only of themselves.
Unfortunately, beautiful women provoke in some men all that is base in their characters.
And the women pays for the beauty God has given her.
Excuse me. My ideals cannot possibly interest you.
On the contrary, they interest me profoundly.
As what. A subject for vivisection?
The victim is ready.
It will make interesting material for your next book.
If you will honor me with your friendship, my life is at your service.
Come quickly, doctor!
There been an accident!
Ahmed!
One of the men.
A gun exploded in his hand.
You see, Mademoiselle, it is all right!
In the harem of
Omair, the bandit.
The white woman of Ahmed Ben Hassan.
Bring me word of her.
Learn if she is guarded well.
I cannot ride today.
Gaston will accompany you.
You won't run away again?
I want you to carry this always.
The spies of Omair are still in the neighborhood.
I trust you.
You have not changed your mind about Mademoiselle?
Eventide, when the vast undulating sand dunes throw their shadows.
A spy of Omair, the bandit.
One more reason for restoring
Mademoiselle to her people.
Let take her with me when
I return to Biskra.
Has she bewitched you, too?
You want her for yourself!
How I have made her suffer!
Merciful Allah, why does it give me so little pleasure?
Because you love her.
Ahmed I love you
You are right. I cannot see her again.
Take her safely to Biskra.
Bid her goodbye for me. Then, my friend, return to me in my loneliness.
Do not let me fall into their hands.
The stronghold of the barbarous Omair.
Ahmed I love you
Monsieur!
Madame - Omair!
Nightfall on the oasis.
Where the tribal clans gather.
At the call of their chiftain.
I have sent for reinforcements.
When they arrive let them follow.
Bring forth the white gazelle and guard closely the jealous one.
Ahmed! Ahmed!
Call, beautiful one! Your lover will not come! He has forgotten you.
Is he dying?
It rest with Allah.
We must get him away from here.
White tribal hearts appeal to Allah.
He is sleeping.
There is still hope.
His hands is so large an Arab.
He is not an Arab. His father was an Englishman, his mother a Spaniard.
Twenty-five years ago the old
Sheik Ben Hassan found Ahmed's mother and father deserted by their escort.
Left to die on the desert.
Growing to manhood as an Arab, he was sent to Paris to be educated and upon the Sheik's death, returned to the desert to assume leadership of the tribe.
Pray God, dear friend, to save his life.
Oh, if He would only accept my life in exchange for his!
Diana, my beloved!
The darkness has passed and now the sunshine.
All things are with Allah!
At the beginning of the Middle Ages the legend of the mandrake was born. 
According to legend, a root was transformed into a human being. 
We have to go out at night to find the root, when the clock strikes midnight. 
You should place the stick into the ground below the gallows. 
The root of the mandrake, with its strength and
Magic brought fortune to men, but misfortune and pain. 
His Excellency, Professor 
Jakob ten Brink was famous for his ability to experiment with the hereditary character of man. 
During my studies, I have found the legend of the mandrake, and now 
I look at this old superstition scientifically. 
We know the wind carries pollen from flower to flower ... without any will, without a certain goal. 
And thus was born in the laboratory the animal laboratory. I wanted to discover: Is character inherited from the parents or just by chance? 
I always say to my students: 
We should overcome the road open for experiments 
Teacher's Voronoff. XXX
Above all, we should pay attention to the results. Because then we open new possibilities for the study of humanity. 
Franz Braun, nephew of the teacher. 
Wouldn't these men just mock you, uncle? 
On the contrary! It would be the biggest experiment of my life: 
Creating a man in the laboratory. 
A being with a hereditary character that does not come influenced by the parents. 
The woman must be of the same qualities as the land fertilized under the gallows, the "mandrake" must come from the dregs of society
While the prison administration got a man for the professor, 
Franz Braun was looking for women for his uncle needed to perfect the experiment. 
Alraune, daughter of sin ... from the dark days of superstition. 
Franz Baum his uncle was looking for the ideal woman he needed for his experiment 
I am warning you. Forget that your plan violates nature, the finest of life ... 
Beware: the legend of the mandrake is real! It will become a living being, but it lacks the warmth of life, and bears the cold of death inside. 
I tell you, the legend of the mandrake is true.
It is a living being that lacks the warmth of life and bears the cold of death within itself. 
Be on guard ... 
... consequences of your action ... 
Nature will have her revenge! 
Alraune be educated at school 
Convent of the Sacred-Heart. 
I cannot do this to my parents! 
I want to do everything you want. 
On the bank of the Industry and Credit. 
Mom sends you greetings. 
And the Mandrake? 
The evolution of Mandrake. 
24 October 1908 
It is a success, with the help of my nephew, the creation of a Mandrake root. 
He is a dreamer, I, by contrast, am a man of science ... I am above prejudice. 
According to legend, the mandrake brings fortune and wealth. Today I have selected a name: Alraune ten Brink. 
It is blasphemy ... and you will be punished.
Alraune disappears without a trace ... 
-School of the Sacred Heart convent. 
I want champagne! 
At one stop, Alraune lies for the first time to people from a traveling circus. 
Aren't you afraid of a mouse? 
After months of investigation, 
Alraune ten Brink was found. 
In the end, I knew I would succeed. 
Alraune, doesn't it embarrass you? 
I'm scared of you. 
You used to be my nephew. We moved away until your story was forgotten. 
Enough of this visit by a gentleman. 
Who do you think is your father? 
I offend, Alraune. 
If you knew where you came from!  
... and then presented in high society.
Father, come here! 
Surprisingly, father, we seem so little alike. 
Do I look more like my mother? 
Yes ... I think of your mother often. 
What if she looks like her mother? 
Never! 
Dear lady, I want to ask the professor for you hand. 
Sorry, sir ... Alraune is yet very young and should remain with me. 
Tonight at eleven I flee with her. 
What a shame ... An experiment by a cynical scientist ... a daughter of vice and crime. 
What is my place among men? 
I play him. I get even with him. 
You are right ... I stayed with him. 
Dear Dad, I think you're jealous. 
His letter was brought to me here. 
In the diary of my "father" I read everything that happened before my birth. 
Have mercy on me ... 
I want to know everything. 
I'll give you everything you want, but we go from here. 
Alraune ... you and me ... 
You're a cheater! What were you thinking? 
I have now learned that this woman is not you daughter. 
I cannot deceive you. 
You must stay with me, or I will kill you ... 
Dear Professor! It is as if a ghost followed you ... as if a devil wanted to harm another. 
All speculation has failed ... 
She has destroyed ... 
Come to the gaming table, Alraune. 
You will bring me luck. 
Play red, the color of good fortune. 
Red five times in a row. 
Place your bets! 
For the ninth time the ball has landed on red. 
I want to leave. 
We have not lost everything yet, Alraune. 
We still have your jewels. 
We have not lost everything, Alraune.
We still have your jewelry.
Yes ... but not with you ... 
Take me out of here ... 
Give me another soul, a heart ... and I will become a human being and love as a human being. 
Alraune began a new life together the one she loved. And the one who violated the laws of nature, fell into a hell of loneliness and insanity.
{529}{692}HAPPINESS MUST BE EARNED
{797}{972}Praise be to Allah- the Beneficent King-|The Creator of the Universe-
{976}{1142}...Lord of the Three Worlds!|The Koran
{1164}{1314}Verily the works of those gone|before us have become
{1318}{1468}instances and examples to men|of our modern day,
{1472}{1622}that folk may view what admonishing chances|befel other folk and may there...
{1626}{1756}from take the warning.|INTRODUCTION TO THE ARABIAN NIGHTS
{1786}{2002}A street in Bagdad, dream city|of the ancient East...
{4601}{4790}If it be his purse, let|him tell what is in it.
{4895}{4950}'Tis empty.
{8983}{9052}The magic basket...
{9921}{10046}The magic rope of Ispahán...
{10050}{10175}...woven from a witch's hair in|the caverns of the Jinn.
{12678}{12829}Come to prayer! Come to prayer!|Come to prayer!
{15891}{15991}O true believers, gathered in...
{15995}{16095}...this sacred mosque,|earn thy happiness...
{16099}{16195}...in the name of the|true God...
{16381}{16481}Toil... for by toil the sweets
{16485}{16565}...of human life are found
{16770}{16832}Thou liest!
{17542}{17692}What I want - I take.|My reward is here.
{17696}{17862}Paradise is a fool's dream and Allah is a myth.
{18431}{18506}Honest citizens of Bagdad,
{18510}{18610}...here is a thief to be flogged.
{19914}{20024}Let all thieves beware! Four|and twenty lashes for the
{20028}{20141}stealing of this jewel.
{21387}{21469}Alms! O ye merciful!|Alms!
{22978}{23140}Rouse yourself, bird of evil.|I have brought home treasure.
{24258}{24473}It is a magic rope. With it we can|scale the highest walls.
{24724}{24849}In far eastern Asia, a Mongol Prince|in his...
{24853}{24981}...Palace at Ho Sho...
{25755}{25857}The Palace of the Caliph of Bagdad.
{26141}{26286}It shall be mine. What|I want - I take.
{26572}{26657}Celestial Majesty, at the next moon,
{26661}{26761}...suitors do go to Bagdad,
{26765}{26849}...seeking in marriage its royal Princess.
{27197}{27307}The gods of our dynasty|direct us.
{27311}{27425}We shall enter Bagdad|as a suitor.
{27828}{28050}Open wide the gates of Bagdad!|Open wide the gates of Bagdad!
{28139}{28300}We be porters bound for| the Palace of the Caliph.
{28350}{28500}We bear gifts and viands to feast|the suitors who, on the tomorrow,
{28504}{28650}...come to woo our Princess.
{32103}{32186}Tonight - with the magic rope.
{33252}{33348}Beasts and scimitars|guard the Palace.
{34744}{34890}When night reaches|its noon...
{40583}{40652}The Princess sleeps.
{49766}{49860}The treasure-where is it?
{49978}{50016}'This here-
{50522}{50660}The melody of the oriental night|dies in the dawn.
{50664}{50794}And it is morning-.
{51181}{51281}It is the birthday of our Princess...
{51285}{51446}and royal suitors come from all the East|to seek her hand in marriage.
{51756}{51978}On the balcony of the Princess,|a slave girl reads a fortune-
{52582}{52689}The sands of Mecca|shape a rose.
{52854}{52954}This is the meaning:
{52958}{53145}Thou wilt wed the suitor who first|toucheth the rose-tree in thy garden.
{56505}{56556}'This here-
{56593}{56637}'This here-
{57012}{57116}Nizzy noodle!|He's turned love-bird.
{58934}{59065}She is a rare jewel, my love-bird.
{59389}{59496}Something beyond your reach,| you prince of thieves.
{59746}{59896}Yet- once upon a time- a Princesa|was stolen from a Palace...
{59900}{60050}under the very eye of Harun-al-Rashid.
{60409}{60559}They found a way into the Palace|and, with a subtle drug, they...
{60563}{60711}...drowsed her and carrier her away.
{61303}{61419}The suitors are at the Palace gates.
{61725}{61868}The Prince of the Indies whose palace|is covered with an hundred thousand rubies.
{62325}{62481}He glowers. I like him not -|with all his rubies.
{62508}{62634}Allah grant he touch|not the rose-tree.
{62830}{62934}He touched not the rose-tree.
{63359}{63484}In the bazaars of the sleepy merchants,|thy nimble fingers can ...
{63488}{63595}...procure us princely raiment.
{64061}{64146}The Prince of Persia whose fathers|fought at Feyjoo...
{64150}{64270}...five hundred years ago.
{64686}{64847}He's fat and gross as if he fed on lard.
{65268}{65394}Praise Allah! He touched not the rose-tree.
{65492}{65647}The bazaars of the merchants...
{66982}{67152}Cham Shang the Great,|Prince of Mongols, King of Ho Sho...
{67156}{67323}...Governor of Wah Hoo|and the Island of Wak.
{67970}{68070}Bagdad is a mighty city.
{68074}{68217}Fail I to win the Princess,|it shall be mine by strategy.
{68740}{68869}O horrible! He chills|my blood with fear!
{69221}{69431}Ahmed, Prince of the Isles, of the|Seas, and of the Seven Palaces.
{69538}{69735}Ahmed, Prince of the Isles, of the|Seas, and of the Seven Palaces.
{70049}{70163}See how he rides - |a Prince indeed!
{70447}{70664}'This he would make me happy. Allah|guide him to touch the rose.
{70797}{71018}Ahmed, Prince of the Isles, of the|Seas, and of the Seven Palaces.
{71098}{71195}There's no such rank nor title.
{71505}{71630}Celestial Majesty,|the superstition of the Princess...
{71634}{71799}...centers on that rose-tree.|Fail not to touch it.
{73410}{73560}How tragic, O Prince,|if you had been killed...
{73564}{73690}...and an end put to your|illustrious family.
{74064}{74164}We must make haste to steal her.
{74168}{74259}The Mongol pig suspect us.
{75891}{76005}Prince of the Isles and the Seas.
{79118}{79234}Behold! Allah foretold thee with a rose.
{83605}{83752}We must away from here.|'Twas wrong to come.
{84014}{84101}The Caliph awaits the suitors.
{85176}{85338}To possess Bagdad I have|now a two-fold reason.
{85726}{85833}In the Throne Room....
{86110}{86189}The Prince of the Indies...
{86288}{86354}The Prince of Persia.
{86551}{86635}The Prince of the Mongols...
{86843}{87044}The Just One, the Holy, the High-Born...|the Caliph of Bagdad.
{87107}{87232}The Princess, according to ancient custom|of our House...
{87236}{87336}...hath made her choice.
{87903}{88078}Let her ring be placed upon|the hand of the chosen.
{88836}{88931}He has not wed her yet.
{89832}{89991}My daughter's choice and heir|to the throne of Bagdad.
{90037}{90137}The word is said.
{90141}{90241}If any have protest, voice it now.
{90245}{90345}When the moon tips the cypress...
{90349}{90451}...the betrothal will be consummate in feast.|Come.
{92218}{92366}He is the thief who yesternight|did rob the Palace.
{93136}{93311}Desecration most foul, O mighty Caliph,|hath been wrought upon thy noble House!
{93315}{93465}This Ahmed is but a common thief.
{94719}{94894}This Ahmed who calls himself a Prince,|hunt him down!
{95860}{95938}I am not a Prince.
{96278}{96465}I am less than the slave who serves you..|a wretched outcast... a thief.
{97197}{97410}What i wanted, I took.|I wanted you... I tried to take you...
{97473}{97623}But, when I held you in my arms...|the very world did change.
{97627}{97763}The evil in me died.
{98341}{98567}I can bear a thousand tortures,|endure a thousand deaths...|but not thy tears.
{98709}{98872}This Arab Prince is but a thief.|Seek him out!
{99253}{99470}Quick! Hide thyself. If thou art|found with me, they will be merciless.
{100020}{100089}I love you.
{101564}{101712}Thou dog! What torments|can we devise for thee!
{101955}{102033}Flog him!
{103311}{103475}Fling him to the ape!|Let him be torn to pieces.
{104899}{105024}A pearl to every guard.
{105028}{105184}Have him placed in safety through|the secret panel into the streets.
{105640}{105718}She shall choose again.
{106012}{106104}The secret panel into the streets...
{107108}{107182}Choose! I command you.
{107512}{107615}I myself will make the choice.
{107947}{108022}Betray not the sands of Mecca.
{108026}{108140}Gain time. Defer the outcome.
{108837}{108962}Send them to distant lands to seek some rare treasure.
{108966}{109091}At the seventh moon let them return.
{109095}{109248}Who brings the rarest treasure I will wed.
{109593}{109777}When marriage plans have gone amiss,|The seventh moon betokens bliss.
{110265}{110333}Morning...
{112192}{112317}Come, if you still wouldst steal her.
{112321}{112449}I have found a way through|the tunnels of the tigers.
{113252}{113401}The Princes will return at the|seventh moon bearing treasure.
{113405}{113530}The one who brings the rarest wins the Princess.
{114047}{114212}Lose not thy hope, the rose persists,|and something good will come of this.
{115186}{115352}Turned lily-white he now goes|mewling to the mosque. Bah!
{116351}{116397}Thou art wounded.
{116631}{116705}In heart and soul.
{117068}{117138}I love a Princess.
{117283}{117364}Make thyself a Prince.
{117658}{117773}Allah hath made thy soul|to yearn for happiness...
{117777}{117881}...but thou must earn it.
{118479}{118554}Stay you in Bagdad.
{118558}{118658}I will send soldiers under guise|of porters bearing gifts.
{118662}{118742}Build me an army within the walls.
{119639}{119811}And so.. on the bedrock of humility|thou canst build any structure.
{119904}{119989}Come with me and I will set thy feet...
{119993}{120099}...on the path that leads to treasure|beyond thy dreams.
{120515}{120590}Three suitors leave thy city gate...
{120594}{120682}...But four are numbered in her fate.
{121162}{121243}At the end of the way is a silver chest...
{121247}{121328}...that doth contain the greatest magic.
{121332}{121429}Thou must be brave. Go now.|Control thy destiny.
{121917}{122045}Give this to her who hath|already my heart.
{122694}{122824}A day's journey from Bagdad...|a caravansary in the desert...
{123135}{123256}Thus far the three Princes|have traveled in company.
{123410}{123485}Great Lords of Asia,|good fortune to you...
{123489}{123565}...second only to mine own!
{123569}{123644}Let us meet here at the end|of the sixth moon.
{124823}{124900}Set spies to follow each.
{125355}{125459}A Defile in the Mountains|of Dread Adventure...
{125751}{125832}The Hermit of the Defile.
{125972}{126130}I seek a magic chest that|lies beyond this defile.
{126263}{126353}Knowest thou, rash youth...|devouring flames,
{126357}{126456}...foul monsters, shapes of death|beset the path?
{126532}{126607}A hundred years have I been here.
{126611}{126731}Many have gone this way|and none returned.
{126773}{126927}But, if thy resolve be firm,|I will help thee.
{126964}{127089}If thou dost reach the Cavern|of Enchanted Trees...
{127093}{127231}...touch with this talisman the midmost tree.
{128159}{128274}In Bagdad, the pavilion|of the Princess...
{128682}{128804}He too may return by the seventh moon.
{129111}{129259}... but his road is hard.|You must pray for him.
{129624}{129760}The first moon.
{129823}{129897}The Valley of Fire...
{131879}{131936}The second moon.
{131990}{132198}In search of rare treasure, The Persian Prince|came to the bazaars of Shiraz.
{132855}{132978}A crippled beggar knew a priceless secret.
{133121}{133250}The magic carpet.|They know not its value.
{133987}{134072}My Prince, here is|the greatest rarity in the world,
{134076}{134164}...the flying carpet.
{134788}{134895}The third moon.
{134956}{135086}The Valley of the Monsters.
{136705}{136854}The Cavern of the Enchanted Trees.
{137703}{137783}Thou hast shown great courage...
{137787}{137866}...but thy way is yet hard.
{138196}{138391}This is the chart to guide thee to|the Old Man of the Midnight Sea.
{139582}{139695}The fourth moon.
{139749}{139874}In search of rare treasure,|the Prince of the Indies...
{139878}{140028}...came to a forgotten idol|near Kandahar.
{143056}{143226}This is the greatest rarity in|the world, the magic crystal.
{143728}{143835}The fifth moon.
{143862}{144023}The Old Man of the|Midnight Sea.
{144771}{144921}At the bottom of the sea|is an iron-bound box.
{144925}{145071}There thou wilt find a star-shaped key.
{150886}{151035}Now you must climb to the|Abode of the Winged Horse.
{151039}{151217}That star-shaped key will|give you entrance here.
{151312}{151429}The Abode of the|Winged Horse...
{152458}{152566}The sixth moon.
{152632}{152782}In search of rare treasure,|the Prince of the Mongols...
{152786}{152915}...came to the Island of Wak.
{153144}{153260}A court magician knew|a secret shrine.
{155691}{155761}The magic apple...
{156534}{156591}That fisherman.
{159913}{160039}Far rarer than India's crystal|or Persia's carpet.
{160291}{160361}Thou wilt haste to Bagdad and,|at the end of
{160365}{160442}this sixth moon, give order|that the Prince be poisoned.
{160488}{160616}The Citadel of the Moon...
{161003}{161159}The magic chest is wrapped|in a cloak of invisibility.
{161537}{161724}The Cloak of Invisibility|and the Magic Chest...
{162607}{162714}At the end of the|sixth moon...
{164765}{164975}A day's journey from Bagdad..|again the caravansary in the desert.
{166231}{166313}Let us haste to Bagdad.
{166643}{166768}O Prince of the Indies,|discover this with the crystal.
{166772}{166921}...Does the Princess wait as she pledged?
{167966}{168032}Spread the flying carpet.
{168203}{168349}With the magic apple we|shall save her life.
{169337}{169457}The learned doctor,|Zakariya of Kufa.
{171783}{171845}Out of the clouds...
{174871}{174996}I was at the portals of death|and now I glow with health.
{175000}{175089}...What miracle is this?
{175439}{175489}I was I who brought you back.
{175493}{175611}No other gift can match|my golden apple.
{176006}{176105}He makes rash claim.|'Twas this rare crystal...
{176109}{176175}...disclosed your desperate plight.
{176590}{176679}My magic carpet brought us here.
{176683}{176799}By the beard of the Prophet,|it is rarest.
{177089}{177169}Her life belongs to me.
{177206}{177242}¡To me!
{177311}{177351}To me!
{177599}{177740}It is for me to decide|which gift is rarest.
{178607}{178770}A moment, O Princes!|Who can say which gift is rarest?
{178986}{179086}Without the crystal you|could not have known.
{179090}{179190}Without the carpet you could not have come.
{179194}{179297}...Without the apple you|could not have cured me.
{179357}{179457}Apple.. crystal.. carpet.|No one of them is rarest.
{179461}{179554}Each had been useless without|the other two.
{179948}{180071}Cease! There's wisdom here.|'Tis best that we deliberate.
{180365}{180440}Bide your time.
{180444}{180547}You have twenty thousand troops|within the walls.
{180769}{180917}Yourself hath said it.|'Tis best that we deliberate.
{181505}{181607}Through the night...
{183484}{183597}The Mongols are|taking the city!
{186339}{186404}Bagdad is yours!
{186717}{186842}The courier of the dawn...
{188495}{188585}We shall be wed at once.|Prepare thyself.
{188649}{188720}It is my command.
{189187}{189321}Bagdad is in the hands|of the Mongols.
{189990}{190168}You shall add joy to the wedding|festival by being boiled in oil.
{191499}{191591}Open wide the gates|of Bagdad!
{191663}{191736}Open wide the gates|of Bagdad!
{193640}{193740}Fly for your lives!|A great magician comes.
{193744}{193852}He summons armies from the earth itself!
{194598}{194683}A magic army, a hundred thousand|strong, surrounds the walls.
{194687}{194793}...Thy troops have fled.
{194856}{194971}Set my guard at|the Palace gates!
{195103}{195220}Open wide the gates|to our deliverer!
{196179}{196311}Great Khan, every way|of escape is blocked.
{197598}{197699}The flying carpet...|and the Princess.
{199136}{199202}Quick... the magic carpet.
{204150}{204270}I give thee gladly to|this great Prince.
{207519}{207611}HAPPINESS|MUST BE EARNED
{208000}{208100}ripped by Orion1
{208100}{208200}>> Napisy pobrane z http://napisy.org <<|>>>>>>>> nowa wizja napisów <<<<<<<<
CARROT TOP
A drama in five parts from the book by Jules RENARD
Directed by Julien Duvivier
In a small provincial town.
Mrs. Lepic, gossipmonger, hypocritical, spiteful.
Mr. Lepic, indifferent, egoistic.
She gathered the town gossips together once a week to let her tongue wag freely.
"They just can't keep their mouths shut, those cursed magpies!"
"Are you going out again, my dear?"
"You don't like it when I have people over!"
"To think that I've put up with that boor for twenty years!"
"Can you tell me where the Lepic family lives?"
"My name is Annette.
I'm the new maid."
"With Mrs. Lepic, life won't be easy."
"But Mr. Lepic is a good man.
I know him quite well."
"If you're honest and hardworking, you'll get along with him."
"This is Felix, my favorite son."
"But I don't see any pictures of the youngest boy?
"Carrot Top?
He's a lying, thieving, stupid redhead!"
At the local county school.
Francois, the Lepics' youngest son, came into the world when the dissension between his parents was a fait accompli.
COMPOSITION
Your thoughts about the family.
The family is a group of people living under the same roof who cannot stand each other.
In a so-called artistic cabaret in town.
Felix, the Lepics' oldest son, spent most of his evenings in this place.
"Your schoolboy admirer has arrived."
Maria Milon, a realist singer.
By the time the holidays came around
Felix had succeeded in softening pretty Maria's heart.
"Will you come join me? Promise me!"
"You promised, don't forget!"
An intimate family scene.
Ernestine, the sister of Felix and Francois.
"Felix, my son, help yourself."
"There's no more melon for you.
Anyway, you're like me, you don't like it."
"Can't you answer when you're spoken to?"
"I've told you never to talk with your mouth full!"
"Could you pass me some bread to finish off my compote?"
"Stop meddling, will you?
Just do your job, that's all that's asked of you!"
The next day.
"Whose turn is it to go hunting with me?"
"Hey, you hens!
I'm going hunting!"
"Felix! Dad's taking me hunting with him!"
"Fighting with Felix again!
Leave him alone!"
"Go get me some cream from the farm."
"Mom, please...
Let me go hunting with dad..."
"Do as I say!"
"Are you ready? Let's go!"
"After thinking about it,
I'd rather stay here."
"Another one of your whims!
You're as fickle as the wind!
Stay here then, my friend, and whine all you like!"
"Why do I act like that?
To avoid getting a thrashing and since dad thrashes less..."
You're so far away, not being able to see you,
I can't bear it anymore. Come, Felix.
Maria, who was only interested in Felix as a source of money, sought out information on the Lepics' wealth.
Felix Lepic is the oldest son.
The Lepics are well-off.
A small, but secure fortune.
"Annette, have you put the hens in the henhouse?"
"Go close up the henhouse!
"It's dark, I'm scared!"
"I'm not a coward...
I was just pretending to be scared!"
"You were scared, weren't you?"
"Carrot Top, you'll close up the henhouse every evening."
"Please, God...
I don't want to go to the henhouse again tomorrow night."
"Where's the chamber pot..."
"What in heaven's name have I done to deserve such a child!"
"There was no pot in the room.
I'm sure there wasn't...
She just put it in there now."
"There wasn't any pot here last night... I promise!"
The next day, while Mr. Lepic was in town.
"It's my day off.
Come, I'll take you for a stroll."
"No one will ever love me like that!"
"No one loves me.
Everyone rejects me."
Mathilde,
Carrot Top's little girlfriend.
"Why doesn't your family like you?"
"My mother says it's because I'm so ugly."
In the train that was bringing
Mr. Lepic back home.
Pretty Maria was coming to see Felix.
"I forbid him to play at getting married to my little Mathilde."
"Why did you go off with Annette without my permission?"
Seeing her husband,
Mrs. Lepic changes her attitude.
"Who do you like better, your father or your mother?"
"I like mommy better."
"Go away, Annette...
It would be better if I were dead."
"Not everyone can be an orphan."
"I should never have come.
You don't love me!"
"I'm dying of boredom here,
I'm going to leave tonight."
"The person who truly loves me would take me to Paris."
"To run away, we need money.
Wait a little longer and I'll get some."
Felix's sister, Ernestine, happened to come upon this scene.
"I won't say anything if you give me money."
"Mr. Lepic, your son is treated unfairly. He's unhappy."
"No, Carrot Top. Mrs. Lepic is always going after him."
"If you want to get on Mrs. Lepic's good side, say bad things about me."
"I know my father isn't happy... but he doesn't want anyone to know."
"And Mrs. Lepic doesn't like me because I take pity on him."
"Carrot Top!
It's always Carrot Top!"
"I can't take it, no other boy could be as unhappy as me."
"What are you doing here,
Carrot Top?"
"You know...
I'm going to kill myself."
The next day, a delegation came to ask Mr. Lepic to run for mayor.
"Please be our candidate for mayor!"
Then he thought about his little friends.
"Where is Carrot Top?
Have you seen him?"
"You've completely lost your mind!
You stupid boy!"
"My son, Francois.
"My little Carrot Top..."
"My little Carrot Top, go feed the dog."
"It's your turn to work, you go feed the dog."
"Mom, don't cry...
I'll go feed the dog."
Meanwhile, the way Felix was acting with Maria was scandalizing everyone around.
"The Lepics' son..."
"This small change is hardly enough to keep me here with you."
"Just wait,
I'll get the money we need."
"Someone stole another 100 francs from me today."
"You're the one who stole it!"
"Oh, Madame!
Francois would never do that!"
"Stay out of this,
I didn't ask you!"
"Did you see him? Are you sure?"
"I think so..."
"He who starts by stealing an egg!"
"Will steal an ox!"
"And finally end up in prison!"
"Leave the boy alone!"
"I told you to leave the boy alone!"
"That's enough!"
On Sunday, the next day,
Mr. Lepic's election fell on the same day as the village fair.
The barn...
A beam...
A rope...
"The train doesn't leave for another two hours.Let's go to the fair!"
The barn...
A beam...
A rope...
A beam...
A rope...
"We'll never get married, Mathilde, because I'm going to kill myself."
To distract Carrot Top from carrying out his plan,
Mathilde had Annette take her to the fair.
"Gentlemen,
I declare my three ideals to you: unity - equality - morality."
"Rather than look after the town's business, you should look after your own!"
"What do you mean?
You'd better tell me!"
"Are you saying you don't know your wife ill-treats your youngest son?"
"I say that your son Felix is scandalizing the town!"
"A girl, of the worst sort!"
"What is Francois doing?"
"He's going to kill himself."
"Where is Felix?"
"Naturally, you accuse Felix!"
"Goodbye, old Dick!"
"What have you done with the money! Thief!"
"I didn't take anything, and I can go out with anyone I want!"
"You! You'd better keep out of this!"
"Madame, the boy is going to harm himself."
"Sir, Carrot Top is trying to kill himself!"
His life... His pathetic life still held him back...
"What were you doing?"
"Go ahead, cry, my boy...
Tears will do you good."
"Why did you want to die?"
"I have a mother... who doesn't love me and I don't love her."
"What about me, do you think I love her?"
"Be quiet...
After all, she is your mother."
"My poor little boy..."
"You came into the world too late, against your mother's will.
She never forgave you."
"From now on, no one will hurt you anymore."
"Now, the two of us are together."
THE END
Hello.
- Nice day' isn't it?
- Yes, isn't it!
It's swell.
It's perfect.
- Just like you.
- Ah' shut up!
You know' it's a lucky thing
I didn't go out on my yacht today.
- I wouldn't have met you.
- Have you a yacht?
Have I?
A regular floating palace!
You know' I had to put straps on it for people to hang on to...
I have so many friends.
I never heard of straps on a yacht.
Well, ya see, I got the idea... when I was going to work every morning... on the subway to Wall Street.
Are you in Wall Street?
Am I!
Say, I've got 80 acres right in the center of the financial district.
Why, if it was out in California,
I'd subdivide it... and I'd buy you the whole world.
You're kidding.
- My name's Jim. What's yours?
- Mary.
- I'll bet it's Mary Smith.
- I'll bet it isn't.
Well, Mary... you found your little lamb.
Now I'm gonna follow you wherever you go.
Gee, we're alone!
And our day is almost over.
Oh, it isn't over.
It's just beginning.
- For I'm going to make you a promise.
- Promise what?
That we'll never be lonesome anymore.
If I had known when I first saw you... that you were only a telephone operator instead of a swell...
I'd have proposed to you right on the spot.
And if I had known that you were just a punch presser...
I... I would have accepted.
Gee, it's funny how lonesome a fella can be... especially with a million people around him.
You know, you just can't be happy in a hotel room... especially when all your friends... have homes and kiddies.
All my life I've wanted a little white house... out in the country, with blue shingles.
I don't like blue shingles.
But you like the white house.
And I'd paint the shingles any color you like.
- Lavender?
- Sure!
Or pink?
Oh, Mary,
I'd rather have them blue.
Then they'd be just the color of your eyes.
Of course, you could have them black, or brown, or green, or... any color you like, just so long as you're there.
Mary...
Mary.
Gee, that's a pretty name!
- But Sergeant, I —
- Calm yourself, baby!
I'll get to you in a moment.
Now tell me where you found him.
A jane was hurt down at the roller coaster.
This monkey tried to run over me about it!
- Disturbing the peace, eh, kiddo?
- Oh, listen to me, Sergeant.
That's what I was trying to tell this man: that it was my girl that was hurt.
I was trying to get to her to help her.
So it was your girl that was hurt, eh?
What is her name?
- Mary, sir.
- Mary what?
I... I don't know.
You see, we only met today.
- Picked her up, eh?
- Oh, no, sir.
You wouldn't say that if you saw her.
She's not that kind of a girl.
She's a good kid, a sweet kid.
That ain't much of a description.
You're officially charged... with picking up girls and resisting arrest.
- Take him away.
- I wish I could make you realize, sir... that you've got to let me go.
I don't know that girl's name, but I love her.
And if I don't get to her,
I'll lose her.
And I'm gonna marry her... if she'll have me.
Dear me!
Isn't that thrilling!
- Do go on!
- Yes, I'll go on... and I'll tell you what I think of you.
You don't know when a man's sincere and when he's not.
What a great policeman you are!
You're so used to dealing with lousy, rotten people... you're rotten yourself!
Run along to your little Mary, sonny.
I hope you find her.
Do you — do you mean it?
Sure I mean it.
Don't mind me.
I'm just playful today.
Now run along.
Thanks.
As for you, you big ham, you go jump in the lake!
Hey, you go jump in the lake!
I'll be loving you always
With a love that's true always
When the things you've planned need a helping hand
I will understand always
Always
Days may not be fair always
That's when I'll be there always
Not for just an hour
Not for just a day
Not for just a year but always
Lonesome me
Poor little lonesome me
So near and yet so far
From happiness
How I pray
We'll meet again someday
To love and laugh
Three different negatives were created for the film Der letzte Mann.
One of them was for Germany, one for general export, and the third for the US A.
The surviving German negative was preserved only incompletely, and was reconstructed in 2001/2002 with the aid of the following materials: an original negative from the
Bundesarchiv-Filmarchiv Berlin: a print from the Museum of
Modern Art, New York, produced in Germany in 1936: fragments of a duplicate possessed by the
Friedrich-Wilhelm-Murnau-Stiftung of a missing German print: as well as fragments of a print kept by the Cinémathèque Suisse in Lausanne.
The reconstruction took place in cooperation with the Bundesarchiv-Filmarchiv,
Berlin / Koblenz: the Cinémathèque Suisse, Lausanne: the Museum of Modern Art, New York, and the
Friedrich-Wilhelm-Murnau-Stiftung,
Wiesbaden.
Labwork:
L'Immagine Ritrovata, Bologna
THE LAST MAN
In the Lead-Role:
EMIL JANNINGS
Direction:
F. W. MURNAU
Today, you are the first, respected by everyone, a minister, a general, maybe even a prince... -
Do you know what you'll be tomorrow?!
For tlhe Weddlng Guests however, due to your period of service of many years' standing, we've created an open position for you by sending the oldest employee of our firm to a shelter, effective today.
The reason for this measure is your old-age.
Here, at the place of his humiliation, the old man would waste away miserably for the rest of his life and here the story would, strictly speaking, be over.
But the author is looking out for him who has been abandoned by everyone, and so he bestows upon him an epilogue, telling a story that... - unfortunately... - usually doesn't occur in real life.
A SENSATIONAL INHERITANCE
As reported a short time ago, the celebrated Mexican multimillionaire
Mr. A. G. Monen died whilst washing his hands in the lavatory of the Atlantic-Hotel.
Upon going through his papers, a sensational will for this eccentric man was found to the effect that the person in whose arms he would happen to die was to become the sole heir to his enormous fortune.
Hence, the biblical promise, that the last shall be the first, seems already to have been fulfilled on earth, for the lucky one is... -
THE IMAGINARY VOYAGE by Renè Clair (1925)
One summer morning,in a small country town.
A poor and shy young man was going to work in a bank.
Auguste, a work mate.
Albert, another employee.
Lucie, a typist.
The bank manager.
Rosa Koslex,
"authorized" palmist.
"I see three men who love you!"
"You will marry the man you love!"
"You will marry the woman you love!"
"A most beautiful future!"
That afternoon...
"Jean, don't be upset at me!"
"I don't love Albert"
My dear Jean, it's you I love. here is your engagement ring.
Your Lucie.
"Thanks to your kiss, I Gracias a su beso, I've recovered my power! Look..."
"I am a fairy! Hundreds years ago a magician stole my powers away.
Only a young man's kiss could restore them..."
"Follow me: you shall be rewarded!"
"We are in the hospice for old fairies"
"Nowadays, nobody believes in fairies anymore.
So, my old sisters shut themselves up in this antrum."
"They want you to kiss them... all!"
"Resign yourself!"
That one is Silvayne, a bad fairy.
Watch out, she is really evil!
"These are your old friends,
Puss in Boots..."
"Bluebeard..."
"... Cinderella and the Prínce..."
"Be happy, the fairies will give you immortality.
You're going to live with us forever! "
"I don't want to live forever, if Lucie is not with me! "
"Since you can't stay without her, we shall bring her here!"
"Look, your fiancée!"
"I wanted your friends to be here also!"
A fascinating life begins.
Thanks to the two sweethearts, an atmosphere of... tenderness permeates the old antrum of the fairies.
The evil Silvayne is jealous of
Lucie. I fear her power.
Lucie must leave.
"Take this as a keepsake.
With this ring, you must only... express a wish and it will come true!"
"If I accept to grant you the girl, you must solemnly promise something that will ensure her happiness! "
"Repeat: with all my heart, I want to be like a faithful dog for Lucie."
A DOG !!
"We made it! His oath transformed him!
Suddenly he turned into a dog!"
But where is Jean?
NO DOGS ADMITTED.
Jean said we would meet here.
For the thief, the ring has lost its magic power.
"Don't wait for Jean. This damned ring has turned him into a dog!
He's in your hands!"
"Jean, is it you?"
At midnight...
Through the power of imagination, with a normal ring, Jean has gained his self confidence.
Look how he has changed.
THE END.
THE IMAGINARY VOYAGE (1925)
Renè Clair
ARSENAL The revolution epic story
Screenplay by, director - Oleksandr Dovzhenko
Cinematography by D. Demutskyi
Production design by: Y. Shpinel, V. Miuller
Cast:
Tymish - S. Svashenko
Red Army man - G. Kharkov
Bespectacled German soldier - A. Buchma
German officer - D. Erdman
German soldier - S. Petrov
Nationalist - Mikhaylovskiy
Nikolay II - A. Yevdakov
PRODUCTION of the All-Ukrainian Administration of Photography and Cinematography (VUFKU)
Oh, a mother had three sons
There was a war
The mother doesn't have three sons
September, 12. I killed a crow.
The weather is nice.
Niki.
You've missed your aim, Ivan.
There exist gases that amuse a human soul.
Where is the enemy?
- Everything rushed and buzzed along Ukrainian paths.
Give back, foe, our Ukrainian boots!
- For three hundred years I was tortured by the damned Katsap.
Is it about me?
Arrived at the post, at "Volynskyi".
- I can't go further, comrades. Here is a slope.
The breaks broke.
You drive? - No.
You drive? - No.
You drive?
- Calm down, lads, we'll fix the breaks by ourselves.
- By the name of the Ukrainian
People's Republic, lay down the weapons!
By the name of the Ukrainian nation?
Who said that?
How to steer the train?
Move, Havrylo!
Hey, move, Havrylo!
Hey, move, move up, Havrylo!
Turn the piston!
I will become an engine operator.
Who?
Who?
Who?
Who?
- Demobilized soldier from the Arsenal,
I have an honour to come back.
Ukrainian?
Deserter?
Go back, Timish, to the barracks.
The time will come and revolution committee will call you.
Let us pray to God for our God-saved free mother-Ukraine...
Orthodox people!
Gymnasia pupils!
Students!
Teachers!
Teachers!
Co-operators!
Actors!
Long live!
Let, let it be!
Let! Let! Let it be!
For three hundred years we were...
The Christ will rise from the dead!
The Christ has risen from the dead!
Do you know who Bohdan Khmelnytskyi was?
One of the Khokhol's generals.
Soldiers! The Central Council calls upon you!
- I wonder, can we kill bourgeois and officers on a street if we meet them?
And you are Ukrainian?
Yes, a worker.
Yes, a worker.
- We have the congress here as good people do
- the first Pan-Ukrainian one.
- This is that Ukrainian presidium, which the teacher told us about.
- The representative of the Bolsheviks is taking the floor.
- We, workers, we support Ukraine too, but we demand factories, land...
The Soviet power!
Let us see how you will commit the self-justice over unarmed representatives of workers and peasants!
- Well, good, you say that the power is Ukrainian, than whom land belongs?
And land belongs to lords or peasants?
- The floor is taken by general ataman Symon Petliura.
- Gentlemen, we have received the greeting from the Black Sea Fleet.
Do not lie to our brothers and sons, because they'll see soon your reality and you will be cursed by all Ukraine's sons.
Do not rely on the Black Sea Fleet, because we will be the first ones who will aim twenty-inch guns at you.
Gentlemen, this is mistake...
I'm voting, gentlemen.
Who is for to considerthis a mistake?
Who is against?
Dreadnought Maria!
Three apostles!
Donbas! Poltava!
Bohunians!
Taraschanians!
Arsenal was listening.
Strike.
The proletariat is cancelling trains.
Arsenal.
Well, lads, let us start working!
Come on!
It seems they are shooting already.
I bow low...
I bow down to the raw earth for you...
And what is the address?
Whom should the letter be addressed to?
He bowed down to the raw earth for you...
And asked everybody of you whether one can kill bourgeoises and officers outdoors if one meets them.
Yes you can!
Bakhmach and Nizhyn are flooded with blood.
Hey you, my brothers, comrades in arms...
Served for four years and was in four wars...
And one year as a civil, brothers...
Petliura wounded me by a bullet, and I feel my heroic death.
Bury me at home for a half an hour.
I have not seen it for nine years.
Hurry up, brothers, Arsenal is dying.
Hey, you, our battle horses!
Hurry up to bury our friend...
The dead fighter of the revolution!
We hear...
We hear, our masters!
We are rushing on our 24 legs!
- Take, mother, we have no time to explain.
Our life and death are revolutionary.
Armoured vehicle "Vilna Ukraina"
("Free Ukraine").
You toppled over our "Free Ukraine".
- Stand with your face to the wall so I could kill you in your back.
Can you if I look into your eyes?
And why can I?
Seventy second hour.
What weather will we have tomorrow?
We stopped...
I think that tomorrow we will be done.
We stopped...
We moved and then stopped.
Shells!
Where is the father?
Where is the husband?
Where is the son?
- Where is metalworker?
- We do not have one.
- Where is the smith?
- We do not have one.
Freeze! Name yourself!
A Ukrainian worker. Shoot at me!
- Down! Down...
You are wearing an armour, or what?
The film was restored on the "MOSFILM" studio in 1972
Music, conductor - V. Ovchinnikov
The End
THE CIRCUS
THE CIRCUS
"So you missed the hoop again."
"Father, I couldn't help it."
"For that you don't eat tonight."
"And you're supposed to be funny!"
"Look at that house; empty!"
Around the Side Shows hungry and broke.
"Here you are, sir."
"Count it."
"Is it all there?"
"Say, gimme that money!"
"How d'you get out of here?"
"Rotten!"
"Get off!"
"Where's the funny man?"
"Bring on the funny man!"
The Funny Man.
Meal-time after the Show.
"Father won't let me."
"Do you want a job?"
"Be here in the morning, and we'll try you out."
Early the next morning.
Hungry.
"Run along home!"
"I live here."
"Excuse me, my cane."
The Tryout.
"Go ahead and be funny."
"That's awful!"
"Put on the William Tell act."
"Now then, watch this and see if you can do it."
"Go ahead and try it."
"Put on the barber-shop act."
"Now I must hit you."
"Now hit me!"
"I can't see."
"Just a moment!"
"We haven't talked terms yet."
"Get out and stay out!"
"Show's starting!"
"Aren't you coming in?"
"You're not leaving?"
"You see, we couldn't come to terms."
"Thank you for the egg."
The Show on.
Trouble with the
Property Men.
"How about our back pay?"
"Get to work!"
"We quit!"
"They've quit."
"Get anybody!"
"Do you want a job?"
"Don't touch that button!"
"He's a sensation, but he doesn't know it."
"Keep him on as a property man."
The Circus prospered, but not the property man.
And the girl led the same hard life.
"Keep him busy and don't let him know he's the hit of the show."
A Sick Horse.
"Blow this pill down the horse's neck!"
"The horse blew first --"
"Open the door, quick!"
"I told you the lions were dangerous!"
"Where's that pill?"
"Come here!"
"I've got to see a doctor!"
"It's a shame the way they make you work --"
"And you the hit of the show."
"Why of course!"
"All the crowds, all the applause is just for you."
"I knew it!"
"If you strike that girl, I'll quit!"
"And what's more
I want what I'm worth --"
"I'll give you fifty dollars a week."
"Sixty!"
"I'll double it!"
"Nothing less than a hundred."
The Next Show.
The success of the Tramp made life easier for the girl and himself.
"Oh, Merna, you must have your fortune told!"
"I see love and marriage with a dark, handsome man who is near you now."
A New Added Attraction,
Rex, a tight-rope walker.
"Pardon me."
"Go right ahead."
"I'll give you
Five Dollars for it."
"It's happened; I'm in love!"
"He's a tight-rope walker."
"I've just met him."
"Hurry up, you're on!"
The Act Over.
"What's the matter?"
"You hardly got a laugh!"
"This is my friend."
"I don't like tight-rope walkers."
Time brought many changes to the Circus;
New Hopes and
New Ambitions.
His New Ambition.
"Never mind the rope."
"You'd better try and be funny again or you'll go!"
The next performance- and not a smile.
"I've had enough of this;"
"You get one more chance."
"Where's Rex?"
"Rex, the tight-rope walker, hasn't shown up."
"Is Rex here?"
"You can do the act, can't you?"
"You'll do it or quit!"
"I'll do it; find his clothes!"
"There's the clothes!"
"You follow her!"
"He'll kill himself."
"That's all right;"
"I've got him insured."
"Take your time, there's another act to go on."
"Why, what is the meaning of this?"
"I am taking his place on the rope."
"You'll get killed."
"Oh, no, I have a charmed life."
"I'll give you five dollars if you'll do it."
"Not a word to anybody."
"Please don't do this."
"You've forgotten your tights."
"You're on!"
"You're through!!!"
That Night.
"I've run away from the circus."
"I'll never go back."
"Can't you take me with you?"
"I've got an idea."
"You stay here."
"Have you seen Merna?"
"She's run away --"
"I can do nothing for her -- --"
"Now, there's one way out."
"She's there now?"
"Take me to her!"
The Next Morning.
The Circus ready to leave.
"So you've come back -- You -- !"
"You're speaking to my wife!"
"Will you go on with the show?"
"-- -- if you take him."
"The end wagon for you."
"Come in with us."
Subtitles by necdeath
The highly popular revues at the Pleasure Garden Theater are staged by Mr. Hamilton
...George Snell smoking prohibited
That's an exquisite chorus line, Mr. Hamilton
Meet patsy Brand
             ...Virginia Valli
I had to meet you because I was charmed by that lovely curl of hair.
Then I give it to you and hope you have a nice time
Now, yhat wasn't a very clever line, was it?
I'm Jill Cheyne, and I have a letter of introduction to
Mr. Hamilton
              ...Carmelita Geraghty
... that was all the money
I had, and now I don't know what to do!
Well, you can stay with me, and tomorrow I'll take you in to see Mr. Hamilton
This is my fiance back home.
I was getting nowhere, keeping company to an old lady out in the country.
I went to the theater straight from the station
Did you expect him to hire you just like that, with the cab waiting?
The man who gave me the letter said he was a good friend of
Hamilton's, so I thought...
Well, don't worry about it, luckily you have me to take care of you.
Passion Flowers
The Entire Company to be on stage for full rehearsal tomorrow, wednesday,
June 5th. at 11 a.m. Sharp
Stage Manager
Take a chance, Mr. Hamilton, and I'll show you some real hot steps!
No, I haven't danced anywhere professionally
Folks, I have a great artist here, who has never been on stage in her life but is sure she can show us how to dance.
Just anything in the charleston line will do.
I hate to admit it but you're pretty good. How's five pounds a week?
You know I'm better than that.
I'll take twenty to start.
Patsy, Miss Jill's fiance is here.
You must be the roommate, Patsy!
Jill was written me how nice you've been to her. I'm Hugh
Fieldding.
Sorry Jill isn't in right now, she's trying on a costume for the new revue.
At Hamilton's apartment
Let's not have any suggestions like that...
...until I have my own place
I could invite you to!
My company is sending me to the plantation overseas for two years - but after that I'll have enough to marry, and 
Jill has promissed to wait.
Patsy, I asked Mr.Levet to pick me up here. We work for the same outfit.
                 Miles Mander
In fact, Levet is already stationed out here, and is here for a two-month furlough.
We'll be working on the same plantation.
You have no idea, Miss Brand, how empty and lonely life out there...
Do you believe in love?
Her number's coming up next!
I'm so lucky to have a terrific girl for a fiancee!
May you have not only fame,
Jill, but also happiness!
This is Prince Ivan, Jill.
He wants to congratulate you in person.
It is a rare pleasure to watch you perform, and I intend to indulge myself often.
I know how you feel, Hugh, but I'll steer her away from these stage-door tomcats if I can.
I'm afraid poor Hugh has a rather dewy-eyed conception of his childhood sweetheart.
Soon after Hugh's departure overseas, Jill took a step up in the theatrical world.
Dear Paley
I am so sorry to leave you so soon but
I have had the opportunity to take a tiny furuislud flat for myself, because you will value that I couldn't stay in cheap lodgings
I am nearly a slave
Jill 
Midfull of her promise to
Hugh, Patsy makes a last attempt to straighten out
Jill.
Aren't you afraid of your reputation as a kept woman?
I cannot stand by and watch you throw yourself away like this...
...especially with a fine man like Hugh waiting for you!
Would you believe it, Prince, one of my casual friends form the chorus is trying to run my life!
I'm worried about Jill, Mr.
Levet. I promised to keep her out of danger, and now she's fooling around with that phony Prince.
I wouldn't woory, Patsy, that girl knows exactly what she's doing - and she likes it.
Odd, isn't it - he never barked at Hugh.
Maybe because he had no reason to be jealous of Hugh
I've got to nahd it to Jill - she'll make that fool marry her yet, I bet!
Patsy - I have only a short time here - can't we share our loneliness together?
There's a month left before
I have to go back out there for two years. What do you say?
If you are proposing, then my answer is Yes. I have come to love you in the last few weeks.
I'd like to, Patsy, but it really wouldn't be fair to you.
My position with the firm is no such that they'd let me take a wife out there.
I'll be glad to keep working and wait - as Mrs.Levet!
And I know you'll work your way up so you can send for me very soon.
...and he fixed it up so we can get married the day after tomorrow!
For a honeymoon, he's taking me to Italy!
I'm so happy!
The day of the wedding.
Sorry, Cuddles - I can't take you with me, but I'll be back in a month.
Honeymooning at Lake Como.
I asked God to grant us a happy life life together.
Don't let these thieving little brats make a fool of you!
You threw away the rose
I gave you.
Had to - it had wilted.
Glad to see you again, old chap. Tell me about Jill.
Sorry but, to tell you the truth, I didn't see her since she moved to her own place.
Still working at the Pleasure
Garden, Patsy now lives for but one thing ... the first letter from her husband.
Stop worrying so much - you can find a girl just as good or better anywhere.
Dear patsy,
I must go to him - he's sick and my place is with him.
Jill, all I ask is enough money to pay my fare out there.
Can't do, patsy - I'm spending everthing on my trousseau.
The Prince and I will be married soon.
How about Hugh's engagement ring, then - surely you won't need that now!
She's marrying the Prince and wouldn't lend me a penny!
You must be crazy if you think I could ever stay with you after this!
You filthy animal!
You're my wife - so you've got to stay with me!
Please take me away from here - this man's crazy!
Listen, maybe you can help nurse his friend, who's down with the fever, until you have to catch your next boat.
Poor Hugh, I'll stay with you until you get well!
Jill, my darling ... so good of you to come!
How about a kiss, sweetheart?
Patsy! It's you!
What happened?
That's my wife you're fooling around with, Hugh - and you'll pay for it!
You'd better come back, unless you want to see him with his head bashed in!
I can't let him go on like this while he's out of his mind. I'll go with him for now but will return as soon as I can.
Get away from me - my wife's here now. I don't need you any more!
She wants me to use the sword - she won't let me rest until
I've killed you, too!
Hugh told me what happened.
I'm having him brought in.
Don't thank me, Patsy - just seeing you saved my life, and I'm simply paying you back.
I'm sorry that Jill's turned out no good -
I hope you'll get over her, as I must try to get over this...
You're the only woman for me now, Patsy - I was blind not to see it before!
Coming home, Patsy
How do you like that -
Cuddles knew all the time!
The End
Please! Take me with you!
Hey! Take me!
Hey!
Lift up the ramp.
Do not leave me here, dad!
Save yourself, Gwynplaine!
You can't come with us.
Your presence would cause us trouble.
But I'll be back.
I promise!
Please dad, don't leave me here!
You will survive!
And I will find you!
You are a part of me.
Hello there!
Open the door!
Help us!
Don't die! Please don't die!
Be quiet damn wolf!
What are you doing there?
Have no place to go?
Oh, not everyone can be happy. Keep walking, you will find another village.
There you'll find better accommodations.
- I�m just coming back from there.
No one helped me.
- Oh, but listen to this... there great Christian charity.
Well, come inside. Come on.
It's cold.
Come on!
What are you hiding there?
Ah, great, that was missing.
Where is she from?
- Not far from here.
Her mother died from cold.
Died? At least she's happy.
Hmm ...
The snow made her blind.
For her is always night.
Dea. Let's call her Dea.
What about you, what's your name?
Gwynplaine.
- Gwynplaine?
Who did this to you?
The Doctor.
Monsieur Jean ... Pablo.
Is the Doctor Hardquanonne?
The head of the "comprachicos"?
You don't remember anything, do you?
- No.
Not even your parents?
What have they done to me?
Have you never seen it?
Your face looks like one from a Gargoyle.
But don't worry.
It doesn't make you less human. rheumatism, insomnia, tuberculosis ...
Every evil has its cure in a leave, in a root or or in a herb.
Even leprosy or the plague...
Sir, I see you suffer from gout.
Do you know that there is a tree that could heal you?
You talking about lime tea?
He's not gonna understand you.
To those magical words?
It has no use!
I see the lady knows herbs as well.
Lime tea but with which kind of flower?
Queen of the meadows?
The Queen of the meadows!
This name fits with you.
But against gout is the elderberry flower.
Plants have no secrets with me.
The consultation is free.
But do not forget, tomorrow at dawn, will be too late.
I will be gone by then.
Do you think it will work here?
I hope so.
We need money.
Come on, move!
Hmm .. a cat?
No.
And this?
What is it?
You know.
A. .. a wolf?
Almost.
Small, long ...
A fox.
Bravo.
Gwynplaine, he is hungry.
Don't worry, he will be done in a minute.
There is a farm near the village.
Give them this and they will give you six eggs and a bottle of milk.
Can I go?
No, it's too dangerous for you.
Go now, run!
Don't forget your scarf.
The scarf!
Do you have a cleft lip?
Thank you, ma'am.
Take off the scarf.
We want to see your cleft lip.
Did you hear? Take it off.
Take this off!
- Stop!
Come on, get him!
Monster! Monster!
Monster! Monster!
Monster!
You should not leave the house!
Leave him or I send the wolf!
Get out of here, you bastards!
Gwynplaine, Gwynplaine!
Gwynplaine, are you okay?
Are you okay?
- Yes, allright.
People are not necessarily bad.
Only when they are afraid.
Everything that is different, unusual, scares them.
As you grow older your smile will become more visible.
And people will be more scared of it.
And they will reject you.
That's why you have to always wear the scarf.
Understand?
Do you think I never had reason to cry?
However, this one you see now in front of you, never, never cried.
I cooked a stew.
Don't need to eat the roots.
It's only to take off the bitterness.
Mmmm!
Mmmm!
God protects only our souls.
But the well-being of our body is a matter for nature.
Gwymplaine, I'm hungry.
For all evils there are cures.
Infusions, potions, inhalations ... poultices, gargles.
Knowledge passed down from father to son since the time of the druids.
The consultation is free. The price of herbs depends on its rarity.
That having been said, as a nomad, I know the value of a piece of bacon or half a dozen eggs.
Observe the face of this child.
Look! He was possessed by the devil and  he was exorcised.
The devil was cast out of your body with a large explosion.
This laughter was indelibly marked in your face for eternity.
Since then, this boy can fight against the evil eye.
A single strand of his hair is enough to end any big eye.
Five cents for a piece of his hair.
Come on, there's enough for everyone.
Raise your hands!
Raise your hands!
A ... five cents!
Five cents!
The capital of the kingdom.
If there's people in all those houses it'd take a lifetime to meet them.
But why did we have to come here?
Fame.
The success of "The Man Who Laughs".
The country became small for us.
No shame in admitting that.
The most frequented places are those offering a bigger chance of success.
You decide, Gwymplaine.
Let's go!
Come on, speak up! 
What do you see?
It's ...
It's wonderful!
What is it?
- A musician.
He is playing with a saw.
A saw to cut trees.
Thank you.
My dear public, the man you are about to see, is called Gwymplaine.
As a child, Gwymplaine was abducted by
"comprachicos". who mutilated his lips.
He had never seen his face.
From that day on, Gwymplaine decided to hide his face forever ... in order to not insult the daylight.
It's starting to get full.
On a stormy day ...
- More and more people. the carriage of a Prince got lost in the forest and fell inti a ravine.
Only his daughter, blind, has survived.
Then came the spring.
As she was blind, he was not afraid she could see his face.
For one good thing, another bad one.
They participated in the universal law which is ... to please oneself ... to seek oneself... and to find oneself.
Bravo!
Bravo!
Can you hear it? It worked! It worked.
- Yes, it worked.
Go back, they're waiting.
Go! Go!
Gwymplaine! One portrait, just one portrait!
Great for him!
You will see, soon he's gonna be overimpressed by this success.
Hi there! I would love to have my neighbors for longer!
What you mean? - I imagine you will be sailing off tomorrow,
But you're coming with us.
You are part of the show now.
I can't stay there anymore.
I need fresh air.
Come with me.
We leave through the back.
Go.
This way.
Thank you.
Are we close to the water?
Yes, it is a river.
The moon is reflecting on it?
Yes.
Must be nice.
It is very ... very romantic.
It looks so beautiful.
The water shines like a clear mirror.
Gwymplaine.
I'm afraid.
Of what?
- Fear of losing you in this city.
There are too many people.
Many things that I do not understand.
Do not worry.
No one can separate us.
You notice that we don't spend much time together anymore?
Like when we were kids.
That's because ... we are no longer children.
Sometimes I think on certain things ...
Thoughts that I shouldn't have.
Why?
Thoughts that a brother cannot have for his sister.
But you are not my brother.
And I have these thoughts, too.
You wouldn't have these thoughts if you could see how ugly I am.
Ugly?
What does it mean to be ugly?
Hurting is ugly.
And you just make me good.
In our shows ... when you hear people laughing, they are laughing at me.
Because of my face.
It's disgusting.
You are wrong.
They laugh because you make them laugh.
You also make them feel good.
I can't sleep.
Can I sleep with you?
Hm-hmm.
Dea.
Hm?
What happened between us was not a good idea.
Let's stay as before.
We have always been happy together, no?
There is nothing better in the world than to be with you.
I think so, too.
You know what is most important in the world to me?
You are at the same time my sister and my daughter.
I like to think like that.
Are you sleeping, Ursus?
Like it was easy.
Don't you think we look happy, the three of us together?
I have never been happy in my life.
Not even about myself.
I'm only proud of my dry eyes.
I never cried in my life.
Never.
Not for me, not for others.
And you are happy, right?
See that no one sees you. Be discreet, try to be smaller than you already are.
Happiness will shine through your ass, then.
What are with these caresses?
And also I'm tired.
Looks like a goddess.
It is more than a goddess.
It's a duchess.
Attracting the royalty is the first step towards glory.
We should excel ourselves.
- What for?
Well, she knows princes, princesses. Even the queen!
The crowned heads have always been the best clients of "comprachicos".
The court loves the monstruous. Be monstruous and you will excel yourself.
In her castle, Dea fell more and more in love with Gwymplaine.
And with Gwymplaine, was the same.
He loved her.
They could not live without each other.
Night after night he could be seen wandering along the river.
One night he managed to infiltrate in the palace gardens,
Dea, feeling his presence, left her room and went downstairs.
Gwymplaine!
Finally!
Gwymplaine was for Dea a brother, a friend, a guide.
Where everyone could only see a monster, she saw an Archangel.
You are so beautiful!
Her blindness could in fact see his soul.
If you had eyes to see me, you would be scared of my ugliness.
The view is something that hides the truth?
I see nothing,
I feel.
How do you dare to provoke the Duchess like this?
Whether to ban the show?
And what about that endless kiss?!
They can censor us because of it.
Do whatever you want behind the curtains, but not in front of them.
A lot of things we do in front of the curtains we do because you tell us to.
This has nothing to do with censorship.
And also I am the author.
It was the Duchess who provoked me, with her air of contempt over everyone!
The world is like that.
There's no point in making a scene.
Go give attention to the public.
And let the duchess alone!
Everyone is excited about Gwymplaine ... but, for me, you were radiant.
They are all talking about the Duchess.
- She must be very beautiful, no?
More than that.
So that's why.
- How so?
I am blind but I know when you are looking at me.
And you weren't looking at me earlier when I was talking to you.
Dea, I spend my life looking at you.
As soon as I open my eyes you are the first thing I see.
Well, I'm gonna have a walk by the river.
Take this. It will be good for you.
You shouldn't get so attached to
Gwymplaine.
Men are hard to be understood.
Especially when they are successful.
It is dangerous to live only by one person.
Happy are those who can be happy only with themselves.
You'll feel better in a minute.
Gwymplaine!
When you were with "comprachicos", don't you remember seeing a girl she's about two years.
Redhead with some problem in her eyes.
No.
I don't remember.
Sir.
Someone is waiting for you.
Follow me, please.
Come on in, Gwymplaine.
Because of you I had a wonderful evening.
You made me laugh ...
You touched me ... and disturbed me.
You were less shy early on the scene.
Had more spark in your eyes.
What do you want from me?
- Your smile.
When I look at you ...
I feel inside of me a fingernail scratching a blackboard.
I love it.
I've heard the court loves the monstruous.
It is true. Do you know why?
- So they forget themselves?
Not only that.
The uglier the more fascinating.
You fascinate me.
You attract me.
Don't you think I'm disgusting?
- On the contrary.
I like you,
Gwymplaine.
No man has ever looked at me like you do.
When you look at me I feel pure.
No one can hear us, no one can see us ...
Kiss me.
Kiss me as if I were Dea.
Madame ...
I'm glad you enjoyed our show.
I'm yours.
Sorry, Dea.
I could never make you happy.
I just can't.
Only you can make me happy.
Maybe not.
What about Sylvain?
I really like him.
But if I can't hear your voice ... or feel your presence ...
I will have no more reason to live.
The love of a Princess for a monster coming from the obscurity.
In vain the two lovers tried to hide.
But they were discovered ... and Leviathan was punished.
Gwymplaine.
Because God took from them the small piece of paradise they had, they could only be together on the other side.
They left behind them a trail of pain.
That's the lesson of this fable.
Life is but a long loss of those we love.
Goodbye, Dea!
If I had been rich ... and noble as you, they would have allowed us to love.
The princes, princesses, the duchess, can fall in love with their servants.
But what if a servant dares to love someone of a higher class?
You will punished!
The hell of the poor is the paradise of the rich.
What has gotten into you?
Want to get us in trouble?
I say only what you taught me!
If what you want is to insult who you feel attracted to, just forget it.
I knew you would come back.
So?
Will you dare to get what you came after?
That's not what I want.
Oh, Gwymplaine.
No man has ever made me feel this way.
You are the solution to my boredom.
I will bring you to the Court.
You will present your show to the Queen.
You will be rich in a matter of days.
These fairs will be only a vague memory.
No, ma'am.
The court is not a place for me.
I belong here, to these fairs.
I offer you the Court and wealth and you refuse?
Yes.
I offer myself to you and you say no?
Here is where I belong. Your presence here is an insult to poverty.
Go back to your paradise.
And please, don't ever come back.
Ursus?
Gwynplaine?
Who's there?
What do you want?
Where is Gwynplaine?
He left.
Do not hurt Gwynplaine.
Who are you?
I'm just a ...
I'm his father.
You're not his father.
- And you are not his sister.
What difference does it make if there's love involved?
You are not welcome here,
Doctor Hardquanonne. - Ursus!
I am here because of a promise.
What promise?
Of one day come back for him.
He will never leave us.
He hates you.
I cast his flesh, shaped his spirit.
He is my work, my creation.
My son.
- Never! He will never be with you.
He loves Dea and "The Man Who Laughs".
He loves success.
He loves to see the shining eyes of the public.
Especially the eyes from the beautiful duchess.
You also noticed it, didn�t you?
Ursus!
Hello, Gwynplaine.
It's him!
It's him.
He is Dr. Hardquanonne.
The head of the "comprachicos".
He kidnapped my daughter.
Where is my daughter?
Killer!
Where is my daughter?
His victory will be brief,
Ursus!
Gwynplaine will lose, just like you.
Gwynplaine!
Think about it again. Let's not waste this chicken with golden eggs.
It's already decided.
Right Dea?
Yes, I'm looking forward to going back to our old life.
Listen to the wind hitting against the trees.
But it's not worth to leave now.
Just when Boucharet started ...
To attract the court?
We have more to do than to entertain the duchess.
Enough, Gwynplaine.
Stay with Dea, marry with her.
Have a child with her. Two, three!
To educate them, bathe, put to sleep ...
And they will scream and run around you.
Because our creations are alive!
Think about all of this!
Who among you answers to the name of Gwynplaine?
I am Gwynplaine.
On behalf of Her Majesty the Queen, please follow me for a hearing in the Supreme Court.
He is my kid. 
I�m coming too.
No, sir.
Any attempt to obstruct this will be punished.
Gwymplaine.
Once again I'm leaving you.
Only this time I won't be back.
It is him.
Lord Marquis of Clancharlie ...
I'm Barkilphedro, your valet.
I served your father.
I saw you being born.
And your father, God rest his soul, went against the king.
The monarch thought he could make your father surrender by kidnapping you.
You were only two years old.
Your father refused to give in to blackmail...
And the king, in retaliation, sold you to Dr. Hardquanonne ... so he could make you ...
Gwymplaine.
I lived all my life,
Gwymplaine, surrounded by children.
And I've never got attached to any of them.
With you ...
I always felt there was something... different.
I will be available to your lordship, day and night, in order to help you have your kingdom back ...
Excuse me ... Gwymplaine.
The young man you brought here earlier.
Where is he?
You can close your business,
Gwymplaine is dead.
Gwymplaine.
Why he had to say those things? Why to be such a rebel? What imprudence!
He was supposed to stay hidden, not to expose himself!
They found him in the end.
He's dead!
He is dead! They killed him!
Gwymplaine, my boy, my son!
My son is dead!
Is your Lordship looking for something?
Yes, the exit.
The exit?
I want to go home, tell my family I'm fine.
We are in the castle Clancharlie.
As the sole heir of the Clancharlie, you are at home.
This is your home.
My name Barkilphedro, I'm your ...
- Valet, I know.
Is there any law that forces me to accept this heritage?
Hmm .. no.
So I rather go back to my old life.
- I respect your choice ... but I'm not sure you ... really understand what you are about to give up to.
Come and see.
All this is yours.
The vineyards, but also the hills back there.
From the river to the border with the kingdom, everything belongs to you.
Castles, forests, farms and villages included.
And all this is mine?
- Yes, it is.
And the title and privileges.
What do I do with all this?
Whatever pleases your lordship.
No. My place is on the stage next to mine.
You are not only rich.
You are powerful.
Powerful?
Why powerful?
You have a seat in the parliament.
In the Parliament?
Can I change the laws?
- Yes, like any parliamentarian.
I must have a carriage too.
- Indeed, several.
Wanna know the exact number?
- No.
I want you to prepare me one.
I will get Ursus and Dea at the fair.
They need to know that.
I'm not sure here would be the place for such people.
They are my family.
I will never leave them.
I'm gonna get them.
- It's not possible.
Not possible?
I have the power to change the laws ... but not to leave my own house.
But you can't leave. The Queen is coming tonight with all the court.
You have to get ready for her.
The Queen comes to visit me?
Of course.
And if you want to take your seat at the Parliament, before you must officially receive your title.
And when is the next session?
- In a few days.
If we send a carriage to your friends ... they could attend to the reception tonight.
Very good!
I'm counting on you,
Barkilphedro.
I am here to serve your Lordship.
Sylvain is there.
Good morning, Sylvain.
Morning.
Can you play a bit?
Yes.
More.
Wherever he is right now, he is living like a prince.
He's waiting for me next to a marble staircase.
Dea, Gwymplaine will always be in your heart, as well in mine.
But he didn't turn into a prince.
He is not waiting for you in a castle, nor he's coming with a carriage.
Sir Ursus and Madam Dea,
The Marquis de Clancharlie, known to you as Gwymplaine, invites you to join him in his
Castle Clancharlie.
A carriage is waiting at the entrance of the fair.
Your mother.
My mother?
Is she still ...
- No, she died giving birth ... when the Lord came into the world.
She looks sad.
Your father!
Member of Parliament!
A painting of you shortly before the kidnapping.
If memory serves me, the painter almost went crazy, because it was hard to make you stand still.
So, how is the castle?
- If that's the one... looks wonderful.
It is almost as great as the palace of the Queen.
Must be immense, as in fairy tales.
There will be guards in uniform, with flags all the way.
It's exactly like that.
I saw it in my dreams.
It looks just like your dreams.
Look at me.
And the queen?
I introduce myself to her?
The Queen has just informed that state affairs have retained her in the palace.
Ah ...
What a pity.
I had so much to tell her.
I was gonna tell her about all the misery I saw in the kingdom.
I'm sure she has no idea.
With your permission, your Honor.
I will go to my room.
Your Lordship the Marquis of Clancharlie.
How ugly!
Is the scarf covering his mouth?
No, his face is uncovered.
Looks like the ass of a monkey.
Unclean!
Repulsive. Abject.
I think it's horrible.
I miss you so much!
I have so much to tell you!
I'm a Marquis now! 
Can you imagine that!
Come with us.
Do not stay here with these people.
They pretend to respect you.
- You are wrong.
They are sufficiently educated to accept me as I am.
You're the blind one.
They are sufficiently educated to hide what they really think.
Inside they all think the same as our public. Even worst.
The duchess has just arrived and wants to see you.
You should come see her.
Here my title gives me the right to show my face.
In the Court or in the Parliament.
My son, you bit the golden fruit.
You'll end up spitting ashes.
So, my cousin?
It seems that now we are cousins.
Should we follow the protocol?
I enjoyed "The Man Who Laughs" in the fair. I really did.
Girl, you look like what all women want to see on the other side of the mirror.
The image of purity.
I'm sorry to have to take him ... but royal life is filled with tedious obligations.
Come, my cousin.
It's time for the toast.
To fate, that gave me back my title, my family, and my possessions.
To my father, who always trusted me.
In all circumstances.
To my cousin, who we missed so much.
Finally he is with his real family.
You are so beautiful.
As much as Dea?
It's not the same thing.
- I know.
Dea is pure and intact.
She is beautiful like an angel.
Untouchable.
I am beautiful like a woman.
A woman you want.
You want to touch, you want to caress.
Gwymplaine ... we were made for each other.
The monster that you are outside,
I am inside.
I was looking for you.
We wait our driver to take us back home.
Ah!
The Marquis finally escaped from his obligations.
And he is resting now.
If you wish to go and meet him ...
Oh no! Only Dea is requested by your lordship.
For now.
You can go.
Walk a few steps ahead.
The Marquis, or rather Gwymplaine will be waiting for you.
Just behind the bed.
Oh, Gwymplaine ...
I love you.
Say it again!
I love you!
Hey, guys!
Look at what we got here!
Stop! Are you looking for the exit?
Yes!
- Then follow me.
Follow me, milady.
Come, come on.
Come, come ...
No, no, here, here ...
This way.
Over here!
Just do not lose anything.
Let's have some fun.
Let's dance.
Let her go!
Stop it!
I will smash your heads!
Cowards!
It's with the weak that the mean show his worst side.
Come, Dea.
Cowards!
Even when we don't see you you are present anyway, Barkilphedro.
Something I have in common with the ghosts.
Or with the rats.
- Do not be so severe, Lady Duchess.
We have common interests.
Common interests?
If Gwymplaine renounce to his title you lose your yours of chamberlain.
If he leaves you will be nothing.
This is your interest.
What would be mine, in your opinion?
I noticed lady feels something ... different for your cousin.
You may not like very much to see him back with the young Dea.
I do not need you,
Barkilphedro.
And I never asked you to serve me this young lady's head on a tray.
I would offer you her soul.
But I wasn't asked to.
Your servility disgusts me.
I don't want to harm Gwymplaine.
His fate now no longer interests me.
I received this from the coachman who drove the artists.
He was told to deliver it to the Marquis.
Gwymplaine,
I know you have to do what your heart says.
We will wait as long as it on Thursday.
I know you will come back.
I know that your tenderness, your trust and your love are the most important parts of the fortune you will always have.
Ursus and Dea.
Give a good money to this driver ... and tell him that his duty was accomplished.
Hey!
No one disturbs the Marquis.
I hope that Your Lordship slept well.
I wish you a great day.
Your breakfast will be served in a minute.
Take it as you get ready for the day as there are several hearings scheduled.
Are Ursus and Dea comfortable?
Oh, your lordship did not know?
They returned last night.
Despite of our insistence.
It was my fault, I should have taken care of them myself.
Well, I'm going to see them.
Ursus left you a letter.
Gwymplaine,
We don't belong to the same world anymore.
Each must live in his.
You found your destiny, and we must follow ours.
I prefer to be among artists than with the royalty..
Dea can not compete with a duchess.
Let's leave it like this, it will be better.
Be happy if you can. 
And forget us.
It's not possible.
I'm going to talk to them.
They will understand.
They left the city this morning.
No one knows where to.
I'm sorry your lordship.
Thank you, my cousin, for this deliciously melancholy concert.
My cousin, I need to talk to you.
Unfortunately
I do not have time to hear it.
Last night you had time.
Last night I wanted everyone to know how abject I am.
Today they all know.
I know you loved me... in your own way.
I can have the man I want.
The most beautiful, the most brilliant.
But a man grotesque and ridiculous a disgraceful man, was great.
Do not forget that I am just like you.
Better, you are my mirror.
If my soul could talk it will laugh.
Now I see your true face.
And I love as you are, anyway.
Do you love me?
Your laughter is sadder than mine.
Gwymplaine.
The Marquis de Clancharlie.
Your Majesty ... members of the parliament.
I am the Marquis of Clancharlie.
But my real name is a name from the poor:
Gwymplaine.
Some of you knew my father.
I've never met him.
I am a miserable, made from a great man, by a king for his work and grace.
But my heart is not here.
But I felt I need to address myself to you.
Why?
To warn you.
Gentlemen, I'm here to tell you the latest news!
The human race exists!
Lower the look.
Look around you, beneath you.
You are marching on thousands of heads.
Observe the laws you create.
Yes, people are terrible.
There is unemployment everywhere.
We want grimace, not speeches.
Minstrel! Shaker!
Clown! Get out of there!
Idiot!
Laugh, yes laugh louder!
I've already suffered all contempt one could.
I grew up in the poverty.
And shivered in the winter.
The hunger, I had a taste of it.
I drank the shame.
And I will vomit it on you.
Enough Sir Clancharlie!
Stop immediately with this, unworthy of a gentleman.
Honor your position!
Majesty!
What they have done to my face, you do with people.
They are mutilated.
You deformed their rights, their justice, their truth, and reason and intelligence.
As I am deformed because my mouth.
Look at me.
I am the people.
Take care, Your Majesty!
The real lord will come knocking at the door.
Clown!
Laugh as much as you can, gentlemen!
One day you won't be masters anymore.
No more kingdom!
No more unequality.
No more ignorance!
And courtisans, and ballet, and the king!
Only freemen and the light!
Go back to your cage!
And you go back to your wealth!
To your indigestion!
One day we'll eat your guts!
We will eviscerate you. With our teeth we will rip your hearts off.
My dear.
My child.
If you could leave behind an illness the same way we leave a city ... you could hear the breeze knocking on the trees.
Unfortunately Gwymplaine left.
And here you are.
Laying in the arms of death.
Calm down. Everything is gonna be fine.
Gwymplaine?
Oh, Gwymplaine ...
Forgive me, Dea.
We are together.
All evil is over.
No need to be afraid anymore.
Oh, Gwymplaine ...
My love.
What's wrong?
- Nothing is wrong.
I felt a blow, a blow of happiness.
I felt something pounding in my chest.
What's wrong with you?
She took arsenic.
There is nothing else to do.
I will die, Gwymplaine.
You can not die.
You're all I have, Dea.
It's too late.
How difficult it is to be happy.
Remember when we were kids?
And we slept under the bearskin?
I need to say it again:
I love you, Gwymplaine.
Do not forget my voice.
Take me to the river.
It was there where we first kissed.
It was like we would stay together forever.
What a beautiful life we had.
I would like to have lived longer.
Gwymplaine!
Will you remember me?
I will need it when I will be dead.
Do not let me waiting for you too long, Gwymplaine.
Kiss me one more time.
The light!
I can see it ...
Subtitles: mortauxvaches

''STRlKE'', the first film of prominent director
Sergei Eisenstein, has been released in 1924. lt played a considerable part in the development of the art of cinema.
A Production of the
First State Film Factory.
The film has been restored in Gorki studios in 1969.
STRlKE
Scenario PROLETKULT Under the Editorship of V. Pletnykov
Performed by the First
Workers' Theatre of Proletkult
Directed by
Sergei Eisenstein
Camera
Eduard Tisse
Sets
V. Rakhals
''The strength of the working class is organization.
Without organization of the masses, the proletariat is nothing.
Organized, it is everything.
Being organized means unity of action, the unity of pratical activity.''
Lenin, 1907
PART ONE :
All is calm at the factory
All is calm at the factory,
BUT...
There is trouble brewing.
They hurry to...
The Director
Reporting
He laid down the law.
Through the hierarchy.
''Get me the files on the factory district.'' lnformation of
''Private Agents''.
List of Agents who spy:
The Monkey, The Quiet One,
The Patriarch, The Fellow-Countryman,
Zoya, Bulldog, The Fox, The Taylor,
The Shepherd, The Owl, The Fly-by-night.
Preparations.
''The Fox''
Alms for the Blind.
''The Owl''
To the meeting place.
''The Monkey''
''The Bulldog''
A group of activists.
''They've pushed us into a corner, so we've got to strike.''
''With our people...''
''lt would be better if the people didn't go out on strike.''
Preparations.
''Agitate everywhere.''
''The Owl'' is in a tight spot.
A spy.
Secret meetings.
They're stirring up the people.
Accordion accompaniment.
''You've become even more insolent, you scum.''
Meanwhile, in the underground...
CALLS TO STRlKE
The boys are taking action.
''Enough of patience. Let's go out on strike, comrades, into the struggle.''
PART TWO
A REASON TO STRlKE
The micrometer is stolen.
The price of the micrometer is 25 rubles.
A loss of three weeks pay.
To the office to report the loss.
''We haven't had any thieves before.''
The Manager.
''Thief!''
Thief...
Comrades, the boss accused me of the theft. l'm not guilty but l can't prove it. l cannot leave the factory with the stigma of a thief. So l have decided to put an end to myself.
Goodbye and remember l'm not guilty.
Yakov Strongen.''
''Break it up!''
''Stop work!''
The master craftsmen.
''Blow the whistle!''
''Go to hell!''
For the whistle.
To the Old Foundry.
The assembly.
The Old Foundry resists.
''C'mon, lads, let's take it!''
''To the office, comrades!''
''Don't open the gates!
Let no one in or out.''
The Tribune of Labor. ln the office.
''Without our labor the furnaces will go out, the machines will stop, the plant will die.''
''We have the power, we are the power, if we are united to struggle against the capital.''
A ''carriage'' for the administration.
''Why didn't you warn us about all this?!''
PART THREE
THE PLANT STOOD STOCK-STlLL
The first days.
''Get up for work.''
Copying their fathers.
Orders pour in...
Everything on which their thrones rest is made by the worker's hands.
''ls that on strike too?!''
Formulating demands.
''We demand an eight hour work day.''
''...Fair treatment by the management.''
''A 30% increase in wages.''
At the police station.
''There are no cowards or traitors among us.
We'll defend our demands to the end.''
The stockholders.
''l'll read them.''
''A 6 hour work day for minors.''
''They're demanding a 30% wage increase.''
''lt's shocking. They've brought the factory into politics.''
''This is impudence.''
''And now, gentlemen...''
Police!
Sit down !
''Oh, that isn't all...''
''You press down hard and you get...juice.''
The demands.
''The administration, having considered the workers' demands with the utmost care...''
''Clean it up.''
A nice reply.
And late into the night they studied the workers' welfare.
PART FOUR
THE STRlKE DRAGS ON
Notice
Food store closed for repairs
''He's hungry.''
To the flea market.
The tobacco pouch is empty.
''Want my dinner, Daddy.''
On the prowl.
The Owl sees by day as well.
''Having reviewed the workers' demands with the utmost care, the administration considers them impractical for the following reasons:
1 . The eight hour work day is completely illegal and does not depend upon the administration.
2 ) The wage increase...
At a prearranged place.
A civil manner from the administration is recommended only if the workers submit unconditionally. ln the evening. ln the night.
''Beat him !''
''Beat him !''
The next night.
''Article 102 : 4 to 6 years of hard labor... or...''
Towards morning.
''They've brought him around.''
''The leader.. and dangerous.''.
They are discussing the refusal.
''Who is for continuing the strike?''
''Against?''
''A minority for work.''
PART FlVE
THE PROVOCATlON TO DlSASTER
The Czarist police are not squeamish.
''l'll announce you immediately.''
''The King''
A shady deal.
''My realms are limitless.''.
The Kadushkino Cemetery.
Tough sorts.
''l need five unscrupulous men.''
They're ALL without conscience!
Down to ''business''.
The Monkey works in wholesale, the Owl in retail.
Pass it on.
The war council.
Liquor store.
From a meeting.
At ''work''.
Worming their way in...
SMASH lT!
The ''King's'' boys go into action.
Press the button.
Wait for the firemen.
''lt's provocation.
Call out the firemen.''
Stop gossiping and guard the fire alarm or they will foil the plan.
''Comrades, follow me!''
''They want to buy us with vodka!
Don't be provoked!''
''Provocateurs are here working with the police.''
''Everybody go home,
Comrades!'' lt's been foiled...
''Follow me!''
''Fools!''
A dead end.
Struggling for a way out.
They have broken through.
''He got away.''
''Flush out'' the ringleaders!
''You scum ! Your own people...''
They've caught him.
PART SlX
LlQUlDATlON ln the factory district a State Liquor Store was smashed, looted and burned by the strikers.
The crowd was dispersed with water hoses.
The situation is tense.
There is fear of further unrest.
Troops have been sent to the district by order of the Governor.
The First Strike
''DlS-PER-SE !''
''Comrades, help!''
''To the forge, comrades, to the sledge hammers.''
''Go to your apartments.''
They have broken in.
Wild animals.
''You can't put them all in prison.
Our boys will hold out.''.
''The boys...''
''Your little district...''
''...is already...''
''But you, young man, could maybe join us... we could help you.
What do you say?''
''Back to my cell!''
The carnage.
The defeat.
And like bloody unforgettable scars on the body of the proletariat lay the wounds of Lena,
Talka, Zlataust, Yaro,
Slavl, Tsaritsin and Kosteroma.
REMEMBER !
PROLETARlANS!
''STRlKE'', the first film of prominent director
Sergei Eisenstein, has been released in 1924. lt played a considerable part in the development of the art of cinema.
A Production of the
First State Film Factory.
The film has been restored in Gorki studios in 1969.
STRlKE
Scenario PROLETKULT Under the Editorship of V. Pletnykov
Performed by the First
Workers' Theatre of Proletkult
Directed by
Sergei Eisenstein
Camera
Eduard Tisse
Sets
V. Rakhals
''The strength of the working class is organization.
Without organization of the masses, the proletariat is nothing.
Organized, it is everything.
Being organized means unity of action, the unity of pratical activity.''
Lenin, 1907
PART ONE :
All is calm at the factory
All is calm at the factory,
BUT...
There is trouble brewing.
They hurry to...
The Director
Reporting
He laid down the law.
Through the hierarchy.
''Get me the files on the factory district.'' lnformation of
''Private Agents''.
List of Agents who spy:
The Monkey, The Quiet One,
The Patriarch, The Fellow-Countryman,
Zoya, Bulldog, The Fox, The Taylor,
The Shepherd, The Owl, The Fly-by-night.
Preparations.
''The Fox''
Alms for the Blind.
''The Owl''
To the meeting place.
''The Monkey''
''The Bulldog''
A group of activists.
''They've pushed us into a corner, so we've got to strike.''
''With our people...''
''lt would be better if the people didn't go out on strike.''
Preparations.
''Agitate everywhere.''
''The Owl'' is in a tight spot.
A spy.
Secret meetings.
They're stirring up the people.
Accordion accompaniment.
''You've become even more insolent, you scum.''
Meanwhile, in the underground...
CALLS TO STRlKE
The boys are taking action.
''Enough of patience. Let's go out on strike, comrades, into the struggle.''
PART TWO
A REASON TO STRlKE
The micrometer is stolen.
The price of the micrometer is 25 rubles.
A loss of three weeks pay.
To the office to report the loss.
''We haven't had any thieves before.''
The Manager.
''Thief!''
Thief...
Comrades, the boss accused me of the theft. l'm not guilty but l can't prove it. l cannot leave the factory with the stigma of a thief. So l have decided to put an end to myself.
Goodbye and remember l'm not guilty.
Yakov Strongen.''
''Break it up!''
''Stop work!''
The master craftsmen.
''Blow the whistle!''
''Go to hell!''
For the whistle.
To the Old Foundry.
The assembly.
The Old Foundry resists.
''C'mon, lads, let's take it!''
''To the office, comrades!''
''Don't open the gates!
Let no one in or out.''
The Tribune of Labor. ln the office.
''Without our labor the furnaces will go out, the machines will stop, the plant will die.''
''We have the power, we are the power, if we are united to struggle against the capital.''
A ''carriage'' for the administration.
''Why didn't you warn us about all this?!''
PART THREE
THE PLANT STOOD STOCK-STlLL
The first days.
''Get up for work.''
Copying their fathers.
Orders pour in...
Everything on which their thrones rest is made by the worker's hands.
''ls that on strike too?!''
Formulating demands.
''We demand an eight hour work day.''
''...Fair treatment by the management.''
''A 30% increase in wages.''
At the police station.
''There are no cowards or traitors among us.
We'll defend our demands to the end.''
The stockholders.
''l'll read them.''
''A 6 hour work day for minors.''
''They're demanding a 30% wage increase.''
''lt's shocking. They've brought the factory into politics.''
''This is impudence.''
''And now, gentlemen...''
Police!
Sit down !
''Oh, that isn't all...''
''You press down hard and you get...juice.''
The demands.
''The administration, having considered the workers' demands with the utmost care...''
''Clean it up.''
A nice reply.
And late into the night they studied the workers' welfare.
PART FOUR
THE STRlKE DRAGS ON
Notice
Food store closed for repairs
''He's hungry.''
To the flea market.
The tobacco pouch is empty.
''Want my dinner, Daddy.''
On the prowl.
The Owl sees by day as well.
''Having reviewed the workers' demands with the utmost care, the administration considers them impractical for the following reasons:
1 . The eight hour work day is completely illegal and does not depend upon the administration.
2 ) The wage increase...
At a prearranged place.
A civil manner from the administration is recommended only if the workers submit unconditionally. ln the evening. ln the night.
''Beat him !''
''Beat him !''
The next night.
''Article 102 : 4 to 6 years of hard labor... or...''
Towards morning.
''They've brought him around.''
''The leader.. and dangerous.''.
They are discussing the refusal.
''Who is for continuing the strike?''
''Against?''
''A minority for work.''
PART FlVE
THE PROVOCATlON TO DlSASTER
The Czarist police are not squeamish.
''l'll announce you immediately.''
''The King''
A shady deal.
''My realms are limitless.''.
The Kadushkino Cemetery.
Tough sorts.
''l need five unscrupulous men.''
They're ALL without conscience!
Down to ''business''.
The Monkey works in wholesale, the Owl in retail.
Pass it on.
The war council.
Liquor store.
From a meeting.
At ''work''.
Worming their way in...
SMASH lT!
The ''King's'' boys go into action.
Press the button.
Wait for the firemen.
''lt's provocation.
Call out the firemen.''
Stop gossiping and guard the fire alarm or they will foil the plan.
''Comrades, follow me!''
''They want to buy us with vodka!
Don't be provoked!''
''Provocateurs are here working with the police.''
''Everybody go home,
Comrades!'' lt's been foiled...
''Follow me!''
''Fools!''
A dead end.
Struggling for a way out.
They have broken through.
''He got away.''
''Flush out'' the ringleaders!
''You scum ! Your own people...''
They've caught him.
PART SlX
LlQUlDATlON ln the factory district a State Liquor Store was smashed, looted and burned by the strikers.
The crowd was dispersed with water hoses.
The situation is tense.
There is fear of further unrest.
Troops have been sent to the district by order of the Governor.
The First Strike
''DlS-PER-SE !''
''Comrades, help!''
''To the forge, comrades, to the sledge hammers.''
''Go to your apartments.''
They have broken in.
Wild animals.
''You can't put them all in prison.
Our boys will hold out.''.
''The boys...''
''Your little district...''
''...is already...''
''But you, young man, could maybe join us... we could help you.
What do you say?''
''Back to my cell!''
The carnage.
The defeat.
And like bloody unforgettable scars on the body of the proletariat lay the wounds of Lena,
Talka, Zlataust, Yaro,
Slavl, Tsaritsin and Kosteroma.
REMEMBER !
PROLETARlANS!
The first professional film by
Josef von Sternberg was unusually bold both subject matter and technical skill.
It framed the style of all gangster films to come.
A great city in the dead of night...
...streets lonely, moon-flooded...
...buildings empty as the cliff-dwellings of a forgotten age -
"The great Bull Weed - closing another bank account."
"That's what makes bums and squealers!"
"I may be a bum, but I am no squealer.
I might say, sir, that I am a
Rolls-Royce for silence."
"All right, Rolls Royce - I'll give you a chance to prove that."
"Keep your eyes off her!
What do you think I'm here for?"
"Watch me show that dame what I think of money."
"Buck Mulligan's looking for trouble."
"How'd you like to pick up ten bucks?"
"Pick it up or I'll send you to the morgue!"
"Give me that gun!"
"Rolls Royce, meet Feathers - my girl."
"How long since you had the body washed and polished, Rolls Royce?"
"If you don't want Mulligan to bump you off, Professor, you'd better stick with me."
"With pleasure, sir."
"Come on, let's drift!"
"Can I possibly be of any assistance?"
"The city is yours, Kid - what'll you have?"
"Attila, the Hun, at the gates of Rome."
"Who's Attila? The leader of some wop gang?"
"You were born two thousand years too late. You can't get away with your stuff - nowadays."
"They'll never get me!"
"I'm either a missionary or a sucker, but I'm going to put you on your feet."
"What could I do to help you?"
"Help me? Nobody helps me! I help other people!"
"I'm going to bury that guy while these lilies are still fresh!"
But Buck should have used wax flowers, for long after his lilies had faded - -
"You don't want that junk. It's too vulgar!"
"Why, it's the old hideaway!
Why did you bring me here?"
"Don't you know it's wrong to steal?"
"Look at him - cost me a thousand - looks like a million!"
"He's read every book in the case - he likes to read!"
"Let's have the key, Professor."
"A perfect getaway - - through our warehouse to the next block.
And nitro couldn't blow those 
         doors!"
"No, thanks. I've got to go out on important business."
"The police all know Mulligan's
Special. Plant the little flower where it will do the most good."
"I told you that guy had brains."
"You stay here. You may have the brains, but I've got the guts."
"What were you before Bull Weed picked you up?"
"A lawyer sometimes - a drunkard always ... what does it matter?"
"A woman, I suppose."
"I'm not interested in women."
"The Captain wants to see you."
"Say - what is this - a pinch?"
"Somebody framed me!"
"Framed you? Since when are you a picture, Buck?"
"You've got the wrong guy this time.
I'll be out in twenty minutes."
"Is this why you're called Feathers?"
"I wear feathers all over."
"What were you before
Bull Weed - er - found you?"
"I thought you weren't interested in women!"
"Bull Weed's our best friend, isn't he?"
"This is the first time in a long while that I've felt ashamed."
"Well, I planted that flower. They've probably pinched Mulligan by now."
"See you at the Ball tonight?"
"You've got to show. Everybody with a police record will be there!"
"Besides, I'm going to make
Feathers queen of the ball."
"- be there! Them's orders!"
The underworld's annual armistice - when, until dawn, rival gangsters...
...bury the hatchet and park the machine-gun.
"Check your gats!"
"Vote for Feathers!"
"Throwing away any ten-dollar bills tonight?"
"Who said you could dance with her - with-out asking me?"
"Our friend has gone back to his booze again!"
"- but I don't want you to drink!"
"Please .... don't!"
"You're Bull Weed's girl - aren't you?"
Elsewhere the night deepened into silence and rest. But here the brutal din...
...of cheap music - booze - hate
- lust - made a devil's carnival.
"F-F-Feathershelected!"
"You tell her now."
"The committee is waiting to crown you Queen o' the Ball."
"You needn't worry about your sweetie. He's out - - for the night!"
"Before sentencing you, I declare to you and your kind...
...that no man, or band of men, can defeat the Law."
"Others have tried it before, and,
I regret to say, will try it again -
- but their fate must be the same as yours."
"All your life you have dealt with the Law as an enemy. And now...
...by a final deed of violence, you have compelled it to end your career."
"I sentence you to hang by the neck until you are dead - -"
"- and may God have mercy on your soul!"
"How are we going to help him now?"
"Don't worry. They haven't hanged him yet."
The Law took no chances. Bull Weed was isolated from his world.
No messages delivered, no visitors admitted.
"- before sunrise tomorrow, to hang the said Bull Weed by the neck until he is dead."
"Any last request?"
"Tell Paloma to bring me the juiciest steak in Dreamland."
"The only one who'll see Bull is Paloma - when he brings him his last meal."
"Here's the plan - the hearse will come to the outer court...
...an hour before the hanging -"
"- and you wait in your car at
Three Corners Road, for
Bull to join you."
"You have Paloma tell Bull -
I'll attend to the hearse."
"Does that mean any danger - for you?"
"The police will only see me buying two tickets at the railroad station -"
"Then they'll be sure Bull is leaving town with me."
"Then I won't see you again?"
"This is good-bye."
"If I lose you, it's my finish.
I love you so -"
"I can't let you go - !"
"We have a chance to lead a decent life. If we get Bull out - we're his again!"
"We can't double-cross him - - we owe him everything."
"We do love each other, don't we?"
"We can't do this - - we couldn't be happy if we betrayed him!"
"You see - you taught me how to be decent."
"Rolls Royce says watch for
 the hearse - two o'clock...
...The gang will be in it - - they'll cover the guards and spring you!"
"That's a lie! Rolls Royce doesn't want me to get out!"
"You've got him wrong, Bull - that hearse will come crashing through like a tank!"
"On the level, Ed - has Rolls
Royce or Feathers ever really tried to see me?"
"Maybe I hadn't ought to tell you - but the whole town knows how they're carrying on."
"Ed, is there time for another game of checkers?"
"You hate to leave the old burg - don't you?"
"Do you think Rolls Royce is still in town?"
"What do you care? You'll be hanging in an hour."
"There's one guy I'd like to get before I hang."
"You're in a tight place now."
"It's your move."
"The plan went wrong - the guards got wise, somehow."
"It's all over with him by now."
"Extra! Bull Weed escapes!"
"What's the extra about?"
"Nothing - just a boob breaking jail!"
"So you've brought the police, too. You little rat!"
"Now you can wait and take what you framed up for me!"
"Bull - listen - we were on the level - we tried to get you out -"
"He sure cinched my finish - he's got those keys!"
"We've got the Bull cornered at his old hangout!"
"If you're waiting for Bull Weed, you'll have a long wait."
"They'll get us both in a few minutes, Bull. Why should I lie to you now?"
"If I could get my hands
 on that lousy skunk...
...I'd go back and
let 'em hang me!"
"I'm sorry things went wrong - but there's still time - for you - to get away!"
"Now you see - - how much he double-crossed you!"
"I've been all wrong, Feathers -
I know it now - I've been wrong all the way -"
"And all this got you was another hour!"
"There was something I had to find out - - and that hour was worth more to me than my whole life."
DOWNHILL
Subtitles by <<necdeath>>
Here is a tale of two school-boys who made a pact of loyalty.
One of them kept it -- at a price.
The World of Youth.
"I wish you had more sons like
Roddy to send us, Sir Thomas."
Darling boy
I'll be alone at the shop after six do came
Love, Mabel
RAYNFORD SCHOLARSHIP
All entries for the above leaving-scholarship must be handed to the bursar not later than feb 22nd.
"Certanly, Tim - and if you get it,
I may be able to afford to send you to Oxford."
"This is my sister, sir."
"... ad tuam gloriam utamur, per Jesum Christum,
Dominum nostrum."
Darling boy
I'll be alone at the shop after six do came
Love, Mabel
We close on wednesday at 1 O'clock
"... and he has been appointed
Captain of the School for the ensuing year."
Honour
We close at one on wednesdays
We close at one on wednesdays.
"The Headmaster wants you in his study."
"You, too."
"You boys can no doubt guess why I have sent for you."
"This girl has brought a charge - a most serious charge."
"Which boy is it?"
"Wakeley, you can go."
We close at one on wednesday at 1.O'clock
"His father's rolling in money he's got to see me through it!"
"Have you nothing to say, my boy?"
"In the circumstances, Berwick, you cannot remain here another night."
"I couldn't speak, Roddy.
My scholarship -- it would have broken Dad's heart."
"I know. That's why I kept silent."
"You needn't be afraid. 
I won't sneak."
"I- I've come back early for a special reason, Mother."
"I've heard great things about you, my boy."
"Term doesn't end for another week.
Why have you come home?"
"That waitress, the day of the match?
That servant-girl?"
"Expelled!"
"But, father, I swear
I did nothing -"
"LIAR!"
"Do you think I'm going to stay here, after being called a liar?"
So the pact was kept
-- at a price.
The world of make-believe.
"You forgot your cigarette-case again to-night."
"I - I never wear an overcoat -"
"Why, you silly boy, I believe you're falling in love with me."
Another cloak? Do you want to ruin me?
Dear sir,
As administrators of the estate of the late Mrs. Claude Hudson, your 
God-mother, we have to inform you that you have been left a legacy of thirty thousand pounds (30,000), unconditionally.
SUPPER?
"Hullo! Come in for some money?"
"They're yours, dear boy.
Regard them as an entrance fee."
FAMOUS ACTRESS WEDS. 
Miss Julia Forheringale, the well-known actress, who was married in London yesterday to Mr. Roddy Berwick.
"Au revoir."
"better send them to your own bank before the crash comes."
Two hundred and twelve pounds.
"Get out - both of you!"
"You made the flat over to me so you can get out yourself!"
The world of lost Illusions.
Madame la patronne, expert in human nature.
"There is a nice English boy, very cheap at fifty frances a dance."
"That will make you owing me forty-five now."
"... and very cheap at fifty frances a dance."
"You poor boy, how did you come down to -- this?"
"It sometimes helps - to talk.
Why not tell me - - I shall understand."
"... and then I married, and that was the worst mess of all."
"I don't know why I am telling you all this -"
"You seem different, somehow among all this artificiality-"
Searching, relentless sun-light.
Downhill - till what was left of him was thrown to the rats of a Marseilles dockside.
"Best take him back to London this trip. He got friends there mebbe they give you something."
"You've got to take me back, father, you've got to take me back!"
"He's dotty - he's seein' things."
Dear Tim,
I am done for. If even you get this it will mean that I'm dead a buried. But I want you to know that I've kept my promise.
Roddy
After five days and nights in a world of delirium.
Blind instict led him home.
"Sir Thomas is out, Master Roddy, and your mother."
"I have been searching for you, my boy - to ask your pardon.
I know everthing."
"Roddy, can you ever forgive me?"
The old boys' match.
The End subtitles <<necdeath>>
This version of LAILA (1929) is based on a reconstruction from 1974 made by Helge Lunde (producer) and Arne Pedersen (archivist).
The film was released on October 12, 1929. lt was shot in Outer Billefjord,
Skoganvarre, Karasjok,
Bossekop in Finnmark,
Skjervøy in Nordland as well as Geilo and Ustaoset.
The interiors were shot at Nordisk Films Company's studio in Copenhagen.
Norwegian Film Institute presents
Based on the story by professor J. A. Friis
Production..
Helge Lunde
Director..
George Schnéevoigt
Cinematographer..
Valdemar Christensen
Cast..
Aslak Lågje, a wealthy Lapp...
Peter Malberg
Mor Lågje, Aslak's wife...
Cally Monrad
Mellet, the Lågjes' foster son...
Henry Gleditsch
Jåmpa, Aslak's servant...
Tryggve Larssen
Merchant Lind...
Finn Bernhoft
Lind's wife...
Lilly Larson Lund
Laila, the Linds' daughter...
Mona Mårtenson
Magga, the Linds' servant girl...
Ibe Brekke
Anders Lind, Lind's nephew...
Harald Schwenzen lnger, Anders Lind's sister...
Alice O'Fredericks
Lasse, a servant...
Aslag Aslagsen Sara lnger and Anders' father...
Rasmus Christiansen
Mellet as a boy...
Mattis Morotaja
The story takes place in Finnmark a long, long time ago.
Deep in the desolate
Finnmark plateau lies a small village called Karasjok.
With the exception of a Norwegian merchant and his wife its population is exclusively Lapps.
The merchant Lind.
Are you ready so we can go? lt is the day before Christmas Eve, and they are setting off on a long journey.
The married couple's little daughter is to be baptized at Kautokeino Church on Christmas Day.
Too bad that the priest comes here only once a year. l'm really dreading this long journey.
Aslak Lågje owned thousands of reindeer and was the richest man in all of Finnmark.
Jåmpa was Lågje's servant.
He was a strange mix of man and beast.
Wolves are attacking the reindeer herds!
As evening approached, the merchant and his followers were not far from the cabin where they would stay.
Fresh wolf tracks.
Take care of the baby, Magga!
Go to the cabin. l am going back to look for them. l have lost the baby.
We cannot find the baby before dawn.
But she is well wrapped and will not freeze.
Jåmpa was skiing after the wolf.
Lågje's mark.
May Satan or Jåmpa catch you, you bloodhound!
At daybreak.
Four desperate people searching for the baby.
Lågje has gathered all his reindeer.
Lågje's wife was childless.
Therefore, they had adopted their nephew Mellet and raised him as their own.
The Northern Lights beamed in the sky when Jåmpa returned to Lågje's camp.
God grant us that we may keep this child and make her our own.
You can say that you have adopted a foster child who can grow up with little Mellet.
The following year as well
Lågje made his winter camp at Akkanas mountain.
The little girl had been baptized at Kautokeino Church and had been christened Laila.
As time went on, Lågje's love for Laila grew more and more.
Tie my best reindeer to the sled. l want to go down to the merchant and buy Christmas decorations and toys.
All over Finnmark, preparations were made for Christmas.
The wealthy Aslak Lågje is here.
Let's go in and have a Christmas drink. l have come to buy
Christmas decorations and toys.
Toys? But you have no children,
Aslak Lågje.
Oh, yes. l have a foster son and a little daughter as well.
And you? Have you any children?
We lost our little girl a year ago.
We were on our way to Kautokeino to get her baptized.
Wolves got to her.
When Lågje returned the following morning, he was a completely different man.
Lågje sat silently by the fireplace the whole day.
No one dared to speak to him. l know who Laila's parents are.
She is the daughter of the merchant Lind in Karasjok.
Can we not keep her anyway?
The Northern Lights were glowing in the night sky. l know who Laila's parents are.
Laila is the daughter of the merchant Lind in Karasjok. l found her, and no power on Earth shall take her away from us.
Had you seen the unhappy mother, your conscience would give you no peace.
You should take her there tonight. ln Karasjok, the church bells were ringing for Christmas.
Tonight all should be happy. lt is your child. l found it.
We had her baptized.
Her name is Laila.
The next summer. lt appears that we have visitors.
God help us and be merciful.
The plague has arrived.
The plague had broken out in East Finnmark.
Anyone who could fled westward and brought the disease with them. lt spread like wildfire.
Where are you coming from?
From Karasjok, where the worst plague rages.
Anyone who has not left is doomed.
Have you heard anything about the merchant Lind?
Where are you going?
Why do you ask when you already know?
Two days later,
Jåmpa reached Karasjok.
What do you want here?
Don't you know that you have come to the town of death?
Rich and poor are all the same when death comes along.
The wealthy merchant Lind's daughter is risking her life living with the poorest folk in Karasjok.
Laila! Jåmpa's beloved Laila! l am taking her with me to Aslak Lågje.
Take her with you.
But never forget that she is Norwegian and that daro blood runs through her veins!
For two days and nights,
Lågje waited on Akkanas mountain.
19 years have passed and Laila has grown up.
Mellet has long yearned to be married to Laila.
Can you imagine a more beautiful couple?
Give me a kiss! lf you manage to get to Jåmpa before me, l will kiss you!
Where did you get hold of this great reindeer? lt is a wild deer l captured and tamed. l call him Stormwind and he is yours!
Down by the coast lies the trading center Bossekop.
Every winter, a huge market is held here where Lapps of both genders meet to barter and trade.
Anders Lind had come to Bossekop to trade with the Lapps. lnger, Anders Lind's sister.
Word quickly spread that the wealthy Aslak Lågje had come to the market.
Do you live here with your father?
Does your father have a big family?
No, he had a brother who died during the great plague
19 years ago.
The plague also took his wife and child.
This is my daughter Laila.
We want to buy fabric for a wedding dress. l like your face.
Shall we be friends?
She is getting married next winter to my nephew Mellet.
There are many beautiful girls here at the market.
Perhaps you are not married?
No Norwegian proposes to a Lapp girl and no Lapp girl marries a daro.
You yourself know this best,
Aslak Lågje.
He is your brother?
Will you sell me this Bible? l'll give you two reindeer for it. l will not sell it even if you gave me
20 reindeer for it.
You are and will always be a daro, a really evil daro!
Allow a daro to give the daughter of the wealthy Aslak Lågje a modest gift!
The market ended with a race.
Would you sell me your reindeer?
Not for anything in the world would l sell Stormwind.
The next day found Aslak Lågje's reindeer high up in the mountains.
Did you not travel with the others?
Yes, but now l am here again.
Laila has gone crazy!
She wants to give you Stormwind!
May you break your neck the first time you ride with him!
Once again it has become summer, and Aslak Lågje has pitched his tents by Ravdo Lake.
The Lind family lived down in the valley.
Old Lind was the father of Anders and Inger.
We have suffered significant losses on leather lately.
Have you seen Laila? l caught a bird for her.
Your eyes remind me of someone, but l do not know who.
What ails you, Laila?
You have been acting so strange lately.
Here is my home!
Come, let's throw a lasso.
Big, strong daro.
You cannot compare with Mellet!
Days turned into weeks, and autumn was soon approaching. l know where you are going! l hate the daro! l will soon move camp from here. l do not like Laila's frequent visits down at Lind's.
Laila has always been able to decide for herself.
We will set up camp far away this year, and your wedding requires extensive preparations. ln order to say good, -bye to Anders Lind
Laila decides to take the shortest route to his home.
Laila! Come ashore!
You cannot make it!
A boat has capsized at the big falls!
Somebody is hanging in the birch tree! l had no idea it was you! l love you, Laila! l am just a poor Lapp girl!
You mean everything to me!
Look out, the rope!
Meet me at midnight at the cairn on Gaisa mountain. lt is night.
Laila knew that when the sun reached the tip of the high peaks, it was midnight.
You must not go now, Anders!
Father will draw his last breath at any moment.
You betrayed me, Anders!
Why did you save me, only to let me down? l loved you, but now l hate you!
When Anders Lind came up to Ravdo Lake two days later, the Lapps had disappeared. l was here, you did not come,
Laila
Winter had come, and Lågje had set the day of the wedding.
Would you betray me as the daro betrayed you? l saw you at the cairn that night.
Had he come, l would have strangled him with my lasso.
Believe me, Laila no daro marries a Lap!p girl.
Jåmpa makes a decision.
That same night
Jåmpa disappeared.
Jåmpa had driven as if possessed and finally reached his goal.
You betrayed Laila.
Therefore, you shall die!
No, l did not betray her.
My father died that night. l could not leave him in his last moments.
So you would have married a Lapp girl?
Do you still have Stormwind?
The bridal crown weighs heavily upon Laila. lt was as if the weather gods had erected an insurmountable wall between Anders and Laila.
Go on. l will be okay.
Hurry up.
Laila is getting married today.
Laila is Norwegian.
She is your cousin.
We took her in when her parents had died.
Will you take Aslak Lågje's daughter,
Laila, to be your wedded wife?
Will you take Mellet to be your husband?
Stop, Father!
For God's sake, stop!
How dare you disturb the peace of the church?
Laila is not Aslak Lågje's daughter.
She is my relative and shall be my wife before God and man!
Forgive me, father Lågje.
So it is you who has betrayed us? l could not do otherwise. l was just thinking of Laila's happiness.
Beloved Laila, you get the poorest man in all of Finnmark!
Do not forget that she was the daughter of the wealthy Lågje.
Bad Jåmpa, dearest Jåmpa!
The End.
Based on the novel ''Laila'' by
Jens Andreas Friis (1821-1896)
Written and directed by
George Schnéevoight (1893-1961)
Production Manager
Helge Lunde (1900-1987)
Cinematography by
Valdemar Christensen (1898-1971) and Allan Lynge
Make-up by M. Gericke
Cast..
Negative scanned at
Nordisk Film Post Production, Oslo.
16 bps to HDCAM SR.
Spots removed on Teranex.
Edited on Avid Nitris HD.
Copy recorded directly onto 35mm film with Cinevator.
Norwegian Film Institute 2006
HAROLD LLOYD
IN
"THE KID BROTHER"
PROF. POWER
ORIGINAL - MAMMOTH
POWERS - STRENGTH - HEALTH
MEDICINE SHOW
The recent death of
"Prof." Powers has left his daughter Mary with the problem of carrying on the medicine show.
Flash", I'm sorry
I let you persuade me to keep on with the show.
Forget it, Mary.
It wouldn't be a show without you. Besides, everything's going to be O.K.
Sheriff Jim Hickory and his two oldest sons have made the family name famous throughout the country.
Harold, the youngest Hichory, was born on April Fool's Day.
The stork that brought him could hardly fly for laughing.
We'll be leaving for the meeting directly... how about my Sunday shirt?
If anything happens to that shirt, young man,
I'll whale the life out of you.
Hank Hooper, Harold's sworn enemy ever since Harold sold him a dozen door knobs for fresh eggs in the dark.
Well, I see the town raised the money for the dam all right.
It will be a big thing for Hickoryville.
And a bigger thing for you... eh, Sheriff?
Son, how many times have I told you we don't want any more trouble with these Hickorys?
Where is this metropolis of Hickoryville… and who signs the permits for the shows there?
Sheriff Jim Hickory... but he ain't got any use for medicine shows... he run the last one out of town.
You stay here, son... the town meeting's no place for boys.
Hi, Sheriff!
I've brought this show all the way from New York just to play your wonderful city.
Sheriff, I’d like you to autograph this little permit.
STOP! LOOK! LISTEN!
DR. PODERES MAMMOTH
MEDICINE SHOW
FREE: CONSULTATION
ADVICE - ENTERTAINMENT
Subscribers to Country Dam
The undersigned Citizens of
Hickoryville have paid their share for the new dam.
I move we give Sheriff Hickory a vote of thanks and place the money in his keeping until it is time to turn it over.
I appreciate your confidence,
Mr. Chairman... and I'll write the State Treasurer tonight.
I'd rather see that much money in a real safe place.
You're hinting that it won't be safe with me?
I got some money in there... and I don't want to see it... mislaid!
Keep back... or some-one might get hurt.
Mr. Hickory, I... I don't know how to thank you.
Who told you my name?
Every one n the state knows the Hickory…
...and I'm proud to have met the man who made the Hickory name famous.
You mean my father and brothers.
You're modest... but I like you for it.
What's your name?
Where do you live?
With the Medicine Show... down by the river.
Goodbye!"
This is a great day for Hickoryville... and we Hickorys have something to be proud of.
Never mind the letter... do those supper dishes.
Hickoryville
May 6
State Treasurer:
The Hickoryville citizens have collected their share for the dam and it is now in my keeping.
We are now waiting further instructions from you regarding the dam money.
Respectfully
Sheriff Jim Hickory
How does that sound to you?
Now you boys can sign it.
Goin' to the show?
That big medicine show in the village.
Who gave them permission to play here?
I thought I'd mail our letter.
Did you give them permission?
As you seem to be taking over the duties of sheriff... go down and stop the show.
This medicine is not only good for man and beast but is recommended as a furniture polish and for cleaning harness.
My father sent me down to stop the show... if you don't mind.
Now folks, on the count of three, this trick will prove that the little sheriff is out of sight.
Now folks, we will again be entertained by our little beauty!
If you don't stop the show, I'll have you arrested.
Where's your authority?
One moment, Sheriff,
I've got a little present for you... first.
I'm giving you 24 hours to get out of here!
I'll get the key,
Mr. Hickory...
The kid is as much at fault as anybody.
I'll attend to him when we get home.
Will these do for tonight?
Would you get me a glass of water, please?
Wouldn’t you rather have some hot coffee?
It's the wind.
Me and mama have come to take the girl home.
She can't stay here where there's no womenfolks. It ain't decent.
I suppose I'd better go.
Will you go with me to the celebration for the dam tomorrow?
Good night, Mary...
I'm going to sleep in the barn.
Next morning...
MONEY COLLECTED FOR
COUNTRY DAM
SHERIFF JIM HICKORY
REALIZES LIFE-LONG
AMBITION
The money will now remaining the Sheriff's keeping until the celebration tomorrow when he will turn it over to the state officials who will be present.
Where's that Harold?
Sleeping in the barn.
The girl from the medicine show came home with him.
She's asleep in the parlor.
Miss... I'm going to fetch you some breakfast.
Everything all right, miss?
Here's your breakfast,
Miss.
Get to work... that boy
Harold does more work than both of you.
...and if you fellows ever try anything like that again, I won't let you off so easy.
I'm earning my board at the Hoopers' by helping with the housework.
I'll get my wraps.
You go in and get her wraps...
I want to speak to her a moment.
The older he grows. the worse he gets.
You boys better get dressed for the celebration.
Come on, you're going with me to the celebration.
If you don't go with me, you won't go with anybody.
The money for the dam has been stolen!
All I know is...
I found the strong box open and the money gone.
Some one broke into your house, opened the box... and you didn't hear nothing?
It sounds funny to me...
Haven't you any clue, Jim?
GIGANTE DR. PODERES
MEDICINE SHOW
FREE
I just got an idea who did this and I'm going out and get them.
We ain't satisfied with your goin' and I reckon you better stay here till we are.
Then I'll deputize my sons.
Boys, it's those two fellows with the medicine show.
Bring them back here.
Son, you get hurt.
This is a man's job.
Harold, aren't you going with your brothers?
You see... my father and brothers don't reckon much on me... and I guess they're right
I'm not what you think I am. I was just pretending.
But you can be what
I think you are... without pretending.
...and no matter what anybody else thinks, have confidence in yourself and you can't lose.
Do you really believe in me?
There's that girl from the medicine show... and he's helping her to get away.
Pop, I reckon they got away.
BLACK GHOST
Subscribers to country Dam
The undersigned citizens of
Hickoryville have paid their share for the new dam.
Hello, SHERIFF
You keep him covered,
Sheriff, while I get the money.
Help! Help! I can't swim!
I went clear beyond the county line but not a trace of them.
Jim Hickory, I believe you stole that money!
Let's put him under arrest and take the law in our own hands.
The leading citizen of
Hickotyville may soon find himself at the end of his rope.
Son, you're a real
Hickory!
FINIS
Buster Keaton in College
Directed by : James W. Horne
On the sunkist slopes of the Pacific, where land and water meet - -
California.
High School Graduation Day, where the next step is either go to college or go to work.
A few drops of rain couldn't dampen a mother's -
- enthusiasm on her son's Graduation Day.
MAIN STREET DEPT. STORE
Mary Haynes - winner of every popularity contest -
- in which the boys were allowed to vote.
89 CENTS
Jeff Brown -
Star athlete, who believed so much -
- in exercise that he made many a girl walk home.
"I didn't think you would call for me in the rain. I'm sorry you are all wet."
"Young man, it's time you graduated.
You've been here seven years."
"I know you are going to be as popular at Clayton College as you were here."
"It is my pleasure to present this diploma to our most brilliant scholar."
"- and your scholastic record richly merits this honor medal."
"Ronald will now speak on the 'Curse of Athletics'."
"The secret of getting a medal like mine is - - books not sports."
"The student who wastes his time on athletics -
- rather than study shows only ignorance."
"Future generations depend upon brains and not -
- upon jumping the discus or hurdling the javelin."
"What have Ty Ruth or Babe
Dempsey done for Science?"
"Where would I be without my books?"
"Your speech was ridiculous.
Anyone prefers -
- an athlete to a weak-knee'd, teachers' pet."
"When you change your mind about athletics, then I'll change my mind about you."
"Mary is going to enter Clayton ...
I wish I could go."
"I'm afraid we can't afford it, dear."
"I can work my way through. Other boys do."
So the following term, Ronald arrived at Clayton, and was met by ...
Clayton
BOY WANTED
"I need another clerk as good as he is."
"You can commence tomorrow."
"Well, if it isn't the student prince."
Slow
Narrow Bridge
DON'T SMOKE
DON'T SPIT
How to play Baseball
How to play Football
How to Sprint
"I am Dean Edwards. Your principal writes me what an excellent student you are."
"A boy like you can make this athlete-infested college -
- a seat of learning once more."
"You boys will do well to follow the example of this young scholar."
Sunday found Ronald taking
"fizzical" exercise.
BOY WANTED
"You play third base for the second team."
"You forced two men out and you're out too."
WANTED
Colored Waiter
"Bring me something you can't stick your thumb in."
Clayton's wonder track team training for the intercollegiate meet.
"I admire his spirit.
At least, he's trying."
"Don't get too interested in that campus clown. -
- You're supposed to be going with me."
"You take an awful lot for granted."
"Attaboy, you made a hole in one."
A call to the Dean's office meant only one thing -
GRIEF
"You have been a miserable failure in all your studies and I know the reason why."
"I took up athletics because the girl I love thinks I'm a weakling."
"I love her and would do anything to please her."
"I understand, my boy. The same thing happened to me, -
- but I was stubborn.
That's why I'm a bachelor."
"Here's a list of the men eligible for the rowing crew."
"Coach, I'd like to have you make this young man coxswain of the crew."
"His size and weight are perfect and he has brains."
"My request is final."
"Clayton can't lose the boat race now.
I've just been appointed the 'Coaxer'."
"Boys, get out the smelling salts - -
- Little Lord Fauntleroy is your new coxswain."
"It's the Dean's orders. He'll be in that race unless -"
"- unless something happens to the poor boy."
The day of the race.
"Hey, coach - nothing has happened to Mama's boy!"
"Don't worry - you're coxswain.
Give him this and -
- he'll wake up just in time for the football season."
"Please leave! If you were seen in my room it would mean expulsion for me!"
"That's just what I want. I was expelled this morning -
- and thought I would like to take you with me."
"I'm going to stay here until we are discovered - -
- then you might change your mind about marrying me."
"Boys, we've got to win!
If we don't, rowing -
- will be a thing of the past at Clayton!"
"Is Ronald our coxswain to-day?"
"Certainly not. I've taken care of that pest in a big way."
The rival crew, ready for their most important race of the year.
THE BULLET
"Go on, they are waiting for you.
They've just been kidding me."
"Maybe it's halitosis -
Four out of five have it."
OFFICIAL
DAMFINO
"Go get a boat with a strong bottom."
OLD IRON BOTTOM
"Ready all!"
"Hurry - Jeff has me locked here in my room, and he -"
"Young lady, do you know what this means?"
"Yes - it means we are going to be married."
THE END
Subtitle By Reza Fa
[INAUDIBLE DIALOGUE]
[WHISTLE BLOWING]
[WHISTLE BLOWING]
[PLAYING MESS CALL]
[BLOWS WHISTLE]
[PLAYING ASSEMBLY CALL]
[BLOWING WHISTLE]
[PLAYING ASSEMBLY CALL]
[PLAYING ASSEMBLY CALL]
[BLOWS WHISTLE]
Director:
Screenplay:
Art Direction:
"Do you know, Father - what happens only on one day all over the world?"
STOCKINGS
"I insist on an immediate search!"
"... in any case I'm not as easily swayed by a pair of beautiful eyes, as my father is!"
"...how could someone come up with such an idea?"
"I was so desperate and in need - 
...and I once read it in the newspaper -"
"We are not victims yet officer - let her run on!"
"As constable I must pursue the matter further!"
"-there you have the difference between old pros and an amateur!"
"...a handkerchief!"
"Nave mercy on me - I swear, it was my first time -"
"I was behind with the rent -
I should be thrown out tomorrow - onto the streets..."
...and I have such fear of the streets!"
POLICE STATION
"No, no - let me at least get my papers..."
"...it's just near here:
Kirchstrasse 11 ...
...you can come up there with me!"
"None of this belongs to me anymore...
...tomorrow I must be out of here!"
"I am so bad..."
...please, get me a cognac...!"
"Would you also like one..."
"You wanted to get your papers.
Please do so!"
"The excitement was too much for me... Officer -
...I feel so ill!"
"I will let the ambulance take you away!"
"You please me… you really do!"
"Come in, your supper is waiting, my boy!"
"l was with friends having a beer - "
"What's going on, boy - is something the matter?
"Is the street work perhaps too tough for you?"
Identification papers
Albert Holk
"Consul General, here is your passport and plane ticket to Berlin!"
"There's a letter for you from
Paris - from him!"
"My dearest Else..."
"Let the boy sleep, whilst he has a free Sunday!"
"l have brought you back your present, Miss..."
"...or do you believe you can pay me off?"
"- perhaps because I didn't take you to where you belong!"
"So was that not meant -"
"I was until yesterday evening a dutiful constable -
...and now -"
"You must stay with me - forever - as my wife -"
"Do you even realise what you've said? - policeman and thief -"
"Thief? Desperate people may do wrong but that doesn't make them bad!"
"Go, go! It's better for us both - l won't see you again!"
"- Won’t you go?"
"Do you truly believe that l need to thieve?"
"Is this need?!"
"Is this need?!"
"- If the officer still wishes to marry me – please…"
"Don't give up on me! 
Don't let me down!!"
"Good evening!"
"Leave it mother, our boy knows what he's doing - he should be allowed to have some fun!"
"- I have - killed - a person!!"
"Mother -
"...the law's the law!"
"She will testify - it was self-defence - she will testify!!"
"My name is Else Kramer and l live at
Kirchstrasse 11 ."
"l want to tell you everything: l was at
Bergen the jewellers and..."
"The HoIks can go for the time being, however it is the authority's decree that...
...the woman be taken into custody!"
"I'm waiting, dearest one -"
Film Restoration:
Martin Koerber
Intertitles Translation:
Jonathan Lomax
Digital retouching, Restoration,
Remastering and Subtitling:
IML Digital Media Melbourne
IML Digital Media 2005
PANDORA'S BOX
Based on the play by Frank Wedekind
A Nero-Film
Directed by Georg Wilhelm Pabst
Scenario by Ladislaus Vajda
Produced by Georg C. Horsetzky
Photographed by Günther Krampf
Sets by Andrejew & Hesch
Assistant director Mark Sorkin
Lulu..........Louise Brooks
Dr. Schön.....Fritz Kortner
Alwa Schön....Franz Lederer
Schigolch.....Carl Goetz
Rodrigo Quast.Krafft-Raschig
Countess Geschwitz.......Alice Roberts
Dr. Schön s fiancée......Daisy d Ora
Jack...........Gustaw Diessl
Marquis Casti Piani..Michael won Newlinsky
Stage Manager........Siegfried Arno
Act One
Schigolch!
You've come a long way
We haven't seen each other for ages
Do you still dance?
You've forgotten ewerything.
You should have stayed with me
In the old garret? I'd have run away
Chief Editor Dr. Schön looks after you nicely but he can't guarantee our future
You deserve to appear before a big audience. I've brought along just the man for that
Rodrigo Quast. He wants to stage a variety act with you
Dr. Schön is coming!
I'm getting married
Won't you kiss me, just because you're getting married?
Our relationship is the talk of the town. I'm risking my position
Don't you understand it's all over between us?
You'll have to kill me if you want to be free of me
He was my first ... patron
One does one's best
End of Act One
Act Two
The Minister of the Interior,
Dr. von Zamikov, wishes to announce...
...the marriage of his daughter
Charlotte Marie Adelaide...
...to Dr. Ludwig Schön
I warn you again: Dr. Schön's behaviour makes this marriage impossible
Father, I'm not bothered by what people say
Here are the costume designs for your revue, Alwa
What is Lulu doing?
Father must give her up. His wedding cannot be postponed any longer
The famous Rodrigo Quast wants to do a big variety act with me.
We're rehearsing
Alwa is my best friend. He is the only one who wants nothing from me
Or perhaps you want nothing from me because you don't love me?
Dear Geschwitz, you must design such a costume for me
Is she really this beautiful?
I forbade you to come here!
I haven't come to see you
Alwa
Please get me Volume K of the dictionary
Very well. Come and see me tomorrow
Why don't you marry Lulu, Father?
One doesn't marry such women.
That would be suicide
What did she want?
She wants to be in variety. Someone wants to do a trapeze act with her
No trapeze! Use her in your revue.
My newspaper will guarantee its success
One thing more: beware of that woman
End of Act Two
Act Three
Nonsense! Wouldn't you rather do the trapeze act with me?
I'm not going on!
Bring her to her senses!
We'll do our variety act after all
I'll dance for the whole world, but not for that woman
Tell them to start
Where is Lulu?
Smoking forbidden here!
Satisfied, Alwa? Now I'll marry Lulu.
It will be the death of me
End of Act Three
Act Four
I'd be a right scoundrel if I didn't lay a rose on my little Lulu's bridal bed
Father, I'm going away tonight ... for a long time
He's my Father!
If only you'd come with me
I can't live without you any longer
You'll miss your train
Take it
Kill yourself!
Kill yourself, so you don't make me a murderer as well!
End of Act Four
Act Five
Your Honours. I have painted a picture of a tragic life
Members of the Jury.
Look at this woman
Have I not shown that this woman did not commit murder?
Her husband was the victim of tragic circumstances
Did not the son of the deceased speak in her defence?
No, this unfortunate is not a murderess.
You must acquit her, she is innocent
Your Honours. Members of the Jury
The Greek gods created a woman:
Pandora. She was beautiful, charming, versed in the art of flattery
But the gods also gave her a box containing the evils of the world
The headless woman opened the box and the evils were loosed upon us
Counsel for the Defence portrays the accused as a persecuted innocent
I call her Pandora, because she brought evil upon Dr. Schön
The arguments of the Defence do not sway me. I demand the death penalty
Prosecutor! Do you know what would have become of your wife if she had spent her nights as a child drifting around cafés?
... sentenced to five years in prison for manslaughter with the four and a half months already served ...
Fire!
Fire! Fire!
End of Act Five
Act Six
Passport.: Alwa Schön
How dare you come here?
Where else can I go but home?
If you feel at home where my father bled to death ... I must leave!
Is that the District Court?
I want to speak to
Prosecutor Von Bodungen
This is Alwa Schön. Have you any news of the escapee?
We'll go away together. Countess
Geschwitz will lend me her passport
Passport.: Countess Augusta Geschwitz
I have the lady's baggage
"5,000 Marks Reward'
Received with thanks.
Marquis Casti Piani
Marquis Casti Piani
May I prove my friendship by giving you good advice?
Do not go to Paris, there are so many prying eyes. Come with me.
I know a place where people are hospitable ... and discreet
End of Act Six
Act Seven
Lulu has been living here for three months
A fine hotel. Hospitable and discreet
What's wrong? It's how we live
I've just got engaged. I'm going to stage a fantastic variety act with my fiancée
But we need 20,000 francs to stage it
You must give me the money
Ask Alwa, perhaps he has won today
If I could carry on playing
I'd win it all back
That boy gets everything
You should only play when you're sure of winning
How much?
300 pounds
The German police would give me 250 pounds
300, then. I'll go and book a cabin
He's acting as if he wants to buy me
I need money urgently. You can't give me any.
The Egyptian will pay me 50 pounds more than the German police. You're lucky
I'm securing your future.
The police will never find you in his
Cairo establishment
Get ready quickly.
You're leaving in an hour
I won't be sold. That's worse than prison
I need money. If you aren't ready in an hour I'm calling the police
Alwa, you must win, you must.
Otherwwise I'm lost
If I don't have the 20,000 francs by tonight I'll report you to the police
Money ... everyone wants money
Cry, my child, cry
Rodrigo will report me to the police.
Save me
I'll show him!
I know how we can all get out of this mess
Countess Geschwitz fancies you and she has money
Be nice to her, then I'm sure she'll cough up
Only you can save me
Rodrigo is madly in love with you
Throw yourself at him, he'll do anything for you. Otherwise, he'll report me
Calm down, you'll soon have your money
Police!
Police! Police!
Hurry! I'll find a boat!
We must find a ship to take us to London
End of Act Seven
Act Eight
We only take in order to give.
Brother, how can I help you?
No one can help me
It's funny how you can get booze on credit, but not bread
Why put on the paint?
We like you as you are
What a pity! I wanted to eat Christmas pudding once more in my life
Warning to the Women of Londonl
For some time now...
...a man has been trying to lure
women and girls to dark places...
...in order to murder them
Women and girls should not
go out alone at night
I have no money
Come on, I like you
You're under the mistletoe, you must let yourself be kissed
The End
PANDORAS BOX
Germany 1 929
Directed by
Georg Wilhelm Pabst
Scenario by
Ladislaus Vajda
Photographed by
Günther Krampf
Sets by Andrej Andrejew and Gottlieb Hesch
Costumes by
Gottlieb Hesch
Production
Nero-Film AG, Berlin
With
Krafft-Raschig, Alice Roberts,
Michael von Newlinski
Siegfried Arno, Gustav Diessl
Music
Peer Ruben
Adaptation
Matthias Suschke
Played by the Kontraste Ensemble.
Conducted by Frank Strobel
Chief sound recordist Thomas Schmölz.
Sound engineer Peter Collmann
Recording studio
Colosseum Schallplatten GmbH
Video
Magenta TV
Editing
Wolfgang Ripperger, Andrea Baghul
Programme editors
Christoph Drese, Nina Goslar, Mario Lauer
A ZDF production.
In collaboration with ARTE
Copyright ZDF 1 99 7
ZVENIGORA
Cinematographic poem by M. Yogansen, Yu. Yurtik
Adapted by
Oleksandr Dovzhenko
Director
Oleksandr Dovzhenko
Cinematography by B. Zavelev
Production designer - V. Krychevskyi
Starring: Old man - M. Nademskyi
General - M. Nademskyi
Tymishko - S. Svashenko
Pavlo - L. Podorozhnyi Oksana-Roksana - P. Otava
Ensanguined national assets of the country, buried treasures sealed by a mystery and shrouded in legend lay in the Ukrainian land for ages.
A centuries-old sentinel, guardian of the past, a moss-grown old man is still guarding them the way he did it in times of the Haydamachyna - for three hundred years... a thousand years...
- Have you seen Poles?
- The damned are wandering near zvenyhora!
They dig soil in search of vaults, want to steal our Ukrainian treasures.
- Harness a horse, get on a horseback, you will go with us.
- Give a sabre to the old man
- He will be a Haydamak!
- Here is Zvenyhora!
- I will go straight ahead, and you, old man, will lead a company of comrades and make a detour.
But mind! Do not dig the soil without me.
Do not touch treasures... Come on! Ahead!
- Where are your Poles, old man?
A Pole was sitting on an oak... there will be no more Pole...
- Use knives, lads!
- Mount!
- Where are your vaults, old man?
- The same place where the treasures are.
Centuries passed by...
People were born and died.
Trains began to travel in Ukrainian steppes...
And the zvenyhora-mountain and forests and rivers kept the old man's secret.
The destiny flows by...
Oksana watches on it.
For centuries year in year the old man's senile mouth put down maidenly destiny on the Ivan Kupala night...
Fern blossomed at dark nights...
The old man had a grandson by name Pavlo.
The old man had a grandson by name Tymishko...
- Spit, boys, spit thrice: the devil is in the house.
- Cross yourself, cholera, cross: the devil is in the house.
Do what I say - cross!
We would live and grow the way corn does in the field, unless...
More than one mother cried for her son both on the German and Ukrainian soil.
- "One people rose against another people, kingdom against kingdom.
The enemy of the human kind reins over us..."
- The treasure is in here.
Dogs are fed not before hunting... They construct roads, when they wage the war.
- Nobody can cover treasures up with earth.
It is impossible to build a road by unclean hands.
Zvenyhora can not be defeated.
On Sunday at daybreak.
- Your the brightest, kindest, the most just
Excellency! Stop or the treasure will perish!
- You, old man, are a genuine engineer, but I forbid digging.
Cast away the old man. Place under guard.
And Tymishko conceived, the Cossack intended...
- Freeze! Name yourself?
- It cannot be! Align!
- I will talk to them personally. I will work wonders with them.
- Hello, young fine men!
- Hello, young fine men!
- Hello, eagles!
- Hello, eagle...
- Your Excellency, may the former
Knight of the George order command its own shooting... personally...
- On the standing in front...
...platoon fire...
- P-l-a-t-o-o-n...
- Raise the bayonet up...
- Fire.
- My hand works wonders.
And one people rose against another one, a kingdom against another one, brother against brother.
Sit down, my only consolation and hope.
- Listen to a secret... A great treasure is hidden here in zvenyhora... that time when aliens trod upon our land...
They were lead by chieftains...
People dwelt in villages, just like us...
There was a girl named Roksana among them...
Oxen perished and people perished, and the chieftain decided to make a stop on zvenyhora and to impose a levy...
- Unharness people.
A shield.
Roksana betrayed her people, she fell in love with the chieftain... but not for long...
He cursed Roksana and his treasures with a terrible word.
Waterflooded into a lake, the place where Roksana fell... soil gave way down into that ravine...
Tresses turned into humming reeds, eyes turned into wells and caves.
Our family will get the treasure...
We know the secret.
Be aware, native village. Pavlo advances riding on a white horse.
The sun did not rise yet - red guerrillas left the village, abandoned their native village to the villain Pavlo.
- Come back.
- I will not, my dear Tymishko, will not.
- Come back, crazy woman.
Or I will get mad!
- Speed up.
Hey, leave women there.
- Oh, this is my death, Tymishko. I cannot come back! Go back, Tymishko! Kill me or go back!..
The revolution is in danger.
The revolution is in danger.
The revolution is in danger.
The revolution is in danger.
Proletarian - Mount!
Proletarians, move to engines. Open fire-boxes wider. Fire!
The revolution is in danger.
Eh, it was time when...
- And in a foreign land
- in Prague - a Cossack walks along a street, sweeping it with his wide trousers...
And Tymish? He is studying on a worker's faculty, burdened with scientific figures and formulas, striving to find a real secret of zvenyhora, the secret of the Ukrainian treasures.
Prague - Paris- the Poltava region
- The Ukrainian prince will deliver a lecture about the death of Ukraine due to the Bolsheviks.
At the end of the lecture...
Before respected audience's eyes he will shot himself dead with his own revolver...
- Gracious ladies and gracious gentlemen!
I appreciate your attention very much...
I know that you are not interested in Ukraine or Bolsheviks...
Ladies, especially...
For this reason I will try not to bother you...
Gracious ladies and gracious gentlemen. Thank you... I am finished...
I beg your pardon, I forgot to tell...
- Six thousand dollars. Fine.
You have the fund for a new treasure expedition.
We are sure that we will be lucky this time.
- The treasure is ours. But be quick. Restrain a fire serpent who wants to crush your treasure.
- Stop, evil spirit. Be gone. Vanish.
Stop, fire monster!
- Gracious ladies and gracious gentlemen...
Thank you. I am finished...
The film was restored on the "Mosfilm" studio in 1973.
Music, conductor
V. Ovchinnikov
THE END
The Communard's Pipe
Episode from the Paris Commune in 6 parts
From a short story by Ilya Ehrenbourg
Director:
Cinematography :
Set designer :
Producer :
Cast:
Roux, the mason:
Aunt Louise:
Little Jules Roux:
Costumes and sets are modelled after the collections of the 
Georgian Revolution Museum
In the year 1871
Germany and France fought a war to gain to head position in Europe
The youthful Prussian militarism crushed Napoleon III's unstable empire
The French Army surrendered to the invader
The Parisian gouvernment fell
In Paris, a Republic has replaced the Empire
Out of bread
- BREAD !
Jules, the son of Roux the macon
Roux, the macon
There is nothing ...
Give me bread ...
Take my pipe and make soap bubbles
Let's get out of here
They're pillaging the bakery
Down with the Republic !
Long live the Commune !
Citizens, we won't be holding back those who want to leave Paris
The "Republic" withdraws ...
From Paris to Versailles ...
To defend itself against the German Army
What she is offering is practically worthless
Thanks to God or the Devil the Republic is gone
We're left alone
We
The Paris Commune
We're cut off from France ...
Aunt Louise lives in the same house as the Roux family
Poor little thing without a mother and always left alone
Where is Dad?
On the barricades.
He is fighting for the Commune.
I've been looking through the window.
They have been fighting.
I'll go see Jules
Or maybe Juliette?
Look, I have been eating well
Aunt Louise brought it to me
Let's go, fellow Communard, take your pipe and go to Louise
I want to go with you, to the barricardes
Halt. Who goes there?
You don't recognize your friends?
Here's my Communard ...
I'll be a real Communard
The Commune wants :
The collectivisation of production, the right to work, etc 
But at Versailles ...
The Marchal MAC-MAHON
Germany is willing to stop the war but demands Alsace and Lorrain and a ransom of 5 milliards
In return we'll get their prisonners back and ammunition to crush the rebels
The burning issues that are facing us are smudged by the tricolored banner and the Prussian eagle at the same time
The rebel scum who have seized Paris willbe punished by sword and fire
With Germany's help we'll give Paris back to France
Marchal, the nation depends on you
..."The victory" over "the ennemy of the nation"
There will be no slavery among us
The Commune will throw down the 
Vendome colonna, emblem of despotism
In one of the Versailles salons and her lieutenant
My dear, you were brilliant at the Paris
Opera the other night
The Commune
The Commune will defend herself
As there will be blood, lint is prepared
Long live the new Germany!
For the restauration of France
I'm looking out for the ennemies
Those scumbags are even teaching their children how to kill
And that rabble is already smoking !
Hoist the white flag and then ...
They've hoisted the white flag
The soldiers are with us
Daddy, get up !
The captain told us to catch him alive
What have you done ?
To the barricades in the city !
The Republic is returning to Paris
When is the Opera season starting ?
The Communards are beasts: 
They were teaching their children to kill
Why are you blocking? Let me pass
They're bringing along the kid
I know how to make bubbles with my pipe
The kid is here
You'll see the little rascal
Don't cry ...
Look at my fine pipe
He'll be shot like the others
I seldom miss my target
I will hit that kid's pipe
Have you seen my little Jules ?
Run ... I'm shooting
I'm not afraid, I'm a Communard
The pipe is intact.
But your goal was hit
Darling, life is beautiful ...
English translation: Knappen
Danish Meacenas: Scharphedin 

Emil Jannings in
Josef von Sternberg's
THE LAST COMMAND
Hollywood - 1928!
The Magic Empire of the
Twentieth Century!
The Mecca of the World!
To this Hollywood had come Leo Andreyev, a Russian director ...
"Every Russian in Hollywood is in that stack!"
Sergius Alexander
Claims to have been commanding general ...
... of Russian Army and cousin to Czar.
Little film experience --
Works for $7.50 a day.
"Have him report to work tomorrow morning ..."
"... and fit him into a General's uniform!"
"The Eureka Studio calling ..."
"Six tomorrow morning ... studio gate!"
The Bread Line of Hollywood.
"Quit your shovin'!
Who do you think you are?"
"One Corporal!"
"One General!"
"Quit shakin' your head!
How do you expect me to make up?"
"Excuse me, please ...
I can't help it ... I ...
I had a great shock once!"
"Where'd you get the gadget from ... steal it out of a hock shop?"
"The Czar gave it to me."
"What do you know about that? The Czar gave him this beautiful medal!"
"I'm your pal ... I want to show it to everybody ..."
Imperial Russia - 1917.
Proud, majestic, haughty ... seemingly eternal at the ages!
On a dozen far-flung battle fronts, Russia was engaged ...
... in a death grapple with the enemy.
Tireless in the defense of a crumbling empire was the ...
... Grand Duke Sergius Alexander, cousin to the Czar ...
... and Commanding General of the Russian Armies.
"Everything is in perfect order,
Your Imperial Highness ...
... There is no need for you to tire yourself with an inspection."
"The revolutionists have intercepted most of our supplies."
"Let him strut a little longer!
His day are numbered!"
"The days of all who are dragging Russia down are numbered!"
"Only a few weeks more ... but they seem an eternity!"
"We have waited too long to be impatient now!"
"You are ordered to report for passport examination in the morning."
"They are actors playing for the troops and their pasports are in order ...
... but our reports show they are revolutionists ..."
"... she is Natalie Dabrova, the most dangerous revolutionist in Russia!"
"Let's have them up!
He's dangerous enough ...
... and she's pretty enough ... to merit my personal attention!"
"The second time this week you've worn my coat and smoked my cigarettes!"
"If he does it again ...
... remove the coat and shoot the contents!"
"So you two are serving your country ... by acting!"
"A fine patriotic service... when Russia is fighting for her life!"
"Why aren't you in uniform?"
"My lungs are weak."
"Perhaps it is your courage that is weak!"
"It doesn't require courage to send others to battle and death!"
"Put him under arrest!"
"What is this man to you?"
"Nothing at all. He is Leo
Andreyev ... the director of the Kief Imperial Theatre."
"Orders from the General Staff,
Your Imperial Highness!"
"You will, of course, honor us with your company?"
The new Headquarters.
HIS MAJESTY THE CZAR
WILL VISIT YOUR HEADQUARTERS ...
... THIS AFTERNOON
TO INSPECT THE TROOPS
"Recall a division from the front ...
... His Majesty thinks the war is a parlor game."
"We can't spare a division... we need every man!"
"Don't argue! Have a division deloused and re-equipped... and send it here immediately!"
And so, with the flames of war crackling along ...
... a two-thousand mile front, troops bitterly needed ...
... to defend Russia played parade for the Czar.
"Your Imperial Highness, you are urgently needed to dispatch instructions!"
"The show will be over in a minute!"
"Russia relies on you, dear cousin."
After a week ... after thousands of men had spilled their blood...
... to defend a few inches of earth ... there came a lull between storms.
"Where is the lady?"
"I beg you to accept this expession of gratitude for your company."
"That sort of thing should always be done after caviar!"
"The General Staff,
Your Imperial Highness!"
"Hiss Majesty plans to visit the front tomorrow! ...
... It might be advisable to stage an offensive for him ...
... in the morning ... not too early!"
"My troops are not prepared for an offensive! ...
... I will not sacrifice them merely for the entertainment of the Czar!"
"That's what provides fuel for the revolution!"
"Can't you see the man is very ill?"
"I'll show you dirty revolutionary dogs!"
"Aren't you taking a terrific risk in defying the Czar's wishes?"
"I would take any risk to prevent a needless sacrifice."
"Then why do you continue this stupid war?"
"We must have victory! ...
... Defeat means revolution ... and the collapse of Russia!"
"Then you love Russia so much?"
"I would gladly die tonight ... if it would help Russia!"
"Before you die ... won't you at least have coffee with me ... in my room?"
"You are very beautiful!
One could easily fall in love with you!"
"Your hand is trembling!"
"Will you get me my cigarettes, please?
Yours are so strong!"
"Why didn't you shoot?"
"I don't know why
I didn't kill you ..."
"... I suppose it was because
I couldn't kill ... anyone ...
... who loves Russia as much as you do!"
"From now on you are my prisoner of war ..."
"... and my prisoner of love."
A group of obscure people meet to decide the fate of Russia.
"Train Number 476, carrying the Grand Duke Sergius Alexander ...
... and staff, has left for the front!"
"Communicate with our agents at once! Tonight Russia becomes a republic!"
"If we get the right news at the next station ...
... His Imperial Highness will long remember this ride!"
"His Imperial Highness will be here in five minutes! ...
... Let's give him the greatest reception he has ever had!"
"All out, Masters of Russia!
Last stop!"
"People of Russia... you are being led by traitors!"
"We have been slaves too long! Now we are the masters!"
"I'll be your servant just once more! ...
... I'll place the noose around your neck myself!"
"This is the end,
Your Imperial Highness ...
... It is our turn now!"
"Let's hang him in Petrograd... for all the world to see!"
"Look at him! ...
The greatest man in Russia...
... greatest even than the Czar!"
"Make him sweat as we have sweated! ...
... Make him stoke our train to Petrograd!"
"Would His Imperial Highness care for one of his cigarettes?"
"To the locomotive!"
"That woman belongs to me ... she goes with the coat!"
"Don't you understand?
It was the only way
I could save your life."
"I love you!"
"These pearls will pay your way out of Russia!"
"I love you!  I love you!"
And so the backwash of a tortured nation ...
... had carried still another extra to Hollywood.
"Get the extra people on the stage!"
"The director has an important part for you, Pop. You've got to look nice!"
"Is that beard supposed to be Russian? It looks like an ad for cough drops!"
"In Russia, that was worn on the left side. I know because I was a general."
"I've made twenty Russian pictures. You can't tell me anything about Russia!"
"Get me a whip!"
"I have waited ten years for this moment, Your
Imperial Highness."
"The same coat, the same uniform, the same man ...
... only the times have changed!"
"This is supposed to be a trench scene of troops just before a battle ..."
"You are the General in command!"
"The troops are tired of war ... tired of listening to our pretty speeches ..."
"One of them becomes violent ... you strike him with this whip!"
"We won't have to rehearse that scene ...
I know you can use a whip!"
"Music please ... the
Russian National Anthem."
"Wind machine!"
"Lights!"
"Camera!"
"What's the difference who wins this war? ... We're sick and tired of fighting ..."
"You've given your last command!
A new day is here!
Down with your Russia!
"People of Russia, you are being led by traitors ...
... we must win or Russia will perish!"
"The command is forward ... to victory ..."
"Long Live Russia!"
"Have we won?"
"Yes, Your Imperial Highness ... you have won!"
"Tough luck! That guy was a great actor."
"He was more than a great actor ... he was a great man."
THE END english subtitles transcribed by
.:: Norgen (norgen@centrum.cz) ::.
The film, HAUNTED CASTLE (Schloss Vogeloed), was restored in 2002, using the following material: an original negative of the Federal Film Archive, Berlin and a celluloid, tinted copy, with Portuguese intertitles from the Fundacao Cinemateca Brasileira, preserved in the Federal Film Archive in Koblenz.  Most intertitles were kept from the original negative and have been extended for reconstruction.
The missing intertitles were reconstructed using the script and a list of titles Decla-Bioscop filed on 31 March 1921.
The new intertitles used the original format
And bear the logo FWMS.  The work was done in collaboration with the Federal Archive -Film Archive, Berlin / Koblenz and Friedrich-Wilhelm-Murnau Stiftung.
The reconstruction was done in collaboration with the Berlin Federal Film / Koblenz archives and Friedrich-Wilhelm-Murnau Stiftung, Wiesbaden.
Vogel Castle.  The revelation of a secret.
5 Acts
Based on a story by Rudolf Stratz. published in the journal "Berliner Illustrierte Zeitung"
Adapted by Carl Mayer
Direction - F. W. Murnau
Tailored menswear from the S. Adam House.
Schloss Vogeloed.
First Act
In the Vogel Castle after the rain
It has been raining all through the hunting days of October.
The lord of the castle.
The Guests.
"Count Oetsch!"
"You...  Count Oetsch?"
"You forgot to invite me?"
The Retired County Court Judge
"Rumor has it that he treacherously killed his own brother three years ago!
He thus became the only owner of all the inheritance ... "
The Frightened Gentleman
"Yet, all those who were able to follow the trial at the time, are convinced that he is the murderer."
"I would remind you once more that I am expecting this very night the widow of your brother as my guest!"
"The widow of the victim?
The widow of the victim.  She married Baron Safferstätt a year ago.
"I would like to spare all of us the situation... of the Baroness's meeting you here, my lord!"
"So, you are staying!  But, you will take all responsibility for what happens."
Waiting for the Baroness.
"They may arrive at any moment, and Count Oetsch is inside..."
"So, you pretend to have learned the art of prophecy in India?"
"Will you then tell us whether, considering that this is a hunting party...
"Whether one shot will be fired!"
"There will be ONE shot ...!"
"...  Maybe ... even two?"
"Oetsch is here!"
"You will understand that - under these circumstances
- we cannot stay with you..."
"No, you cannot leave!  Do you know who else will come here to see you?"
"Father Faramund, from Rome!"
"Father Faramund ... from Rome?"
"Yes, I almost had forgotten it in all this excitement!
I must go at once and get his letter.  I'll bring the letter to you soon."
"Father - Faramund?"
"You do not want to show me the door?"
"She will stay!  She will wait for Father Faramund!"
... it fills me with great joy to know that the wife of my late relative,
... will be invited into your home.
Blessed are the circumstances that bring me back to the north, after being so long in Rome.
I shall arrive in the coming days at Schloss Vogel, to meet with all of you in person, my dear friends ...
End of the First Act.
Schloss Vogeloed.
Second Act.
The next day - a surprise: The Sun!
"Finally!"
Weather forecast: Today, sun.  No risk of rain.
"Are you not coming hunting with us?"
"I only go hunting in rain and storm!"
"Tell me, why is your husband always so quiet? "
But, alas, only fifteen minutes later ...
The day.
"His Reverence, Father Faramund, has just announced his arrival for tonight."
"Look, the adventurous Count Oetsch is actually going hunting in such beastly weather."
"He should know why he is shunning the arrival of his relative, the Father!"
"I have ... many things ... to talk about ... tonight ... with the Father ...!"
Nightfall.
"If the Baroness permits it, I would like to present her my compliments tonight."
"Now our house is truly blessed."
"Whatever happens,
Do not stop loving me!  "
"The Baroness will see His Reverence now."
"Tell me, dear child, tell me ...!
"How strange, Your Reverence... this meeting."
"...for all these years I have fought with the idea to speak my mind to you, Your Reverence - the only man...
"who was a friend and relative of my late husband..."
"It has been four years now..."
End of the Second Act
Schloss Vogeloed.
Third Act
"Our marriage was - at first - like just one continuous day of happiness."
"So we lived for months in blinding happiness. "
"One day, he went away ..."
"He returned a few weeks later and ... He was someone else.
He buried himself in his writings ... sacred books ... "
"Believe me, dear child, true happiness lies only in the renunciation of everything worldly."
"He wanted a saint ...
And he wanted to see in me only the qualities of a saint ..."
"So for months ... I froze ... the purer he became, my attachment to the mundane seemed more terrible..."
"I was craving ... to do something evil ... wanting something evil ... "
"That's when I met Baron Safferstätt ...
"My husband wanted to give away all his possessions, and distribute his assets to the poor, and that brought many conflicts with his brother ... until, one night, a complete breakup occurred."
"The next night ... something terrible happened ...
My husband ... was shot dead."
"I cannot continue ... not now ... maybe tomorrow ... "
"Will you please excuse me for today.
I will pay my respects tomorrow to the owners of the castle.
A conversation about hunting.
"Would you also believe that I once killed a lion?
Evening.
"Please ask His Reverence to come see me!"
A quarter of an hour later.
"No, nobody left through here!"
"We looked all over the castle!"
"This is becoming very sinister!"
An hour later.  No one has found a trace of the Father.
"A crime?  Maybe ... Committed by ... Count Oetsch!"
Dreams.
"Enough is enough!  Tomorrow I'm leaving!"
But the assistant in the kitchen dreams of what happened in the last few hours ...
End of the Third Act.
Schloss Vogeloed.
Fourth Act
The morning of the third day.
"So, try to understand!  Suddenly there are important affairs to be attended to!"
"They don't feel quite at ease any more in my house."
"I have informed the authorities of my suspicions about this Count Oetsch...!"
A happy man.
"She is so strange... she doesn't say a thing, even not about the Father who disappeared?"
At noon.
"Have you ever murdered anyone?"
"What ... did you say ... that?"
"Gentlemen!
Why not let me finish speaking?"
"Last night I had a dream!"
"Count Oetsch!  The present atmosphere in my house does not seem appropriate for that kind of joke!"  "
"Believe me, my investigating eye is experienced!"
"...and yet, Count Oetsch is involved in the Father's disappearance."
"He is acting so superior in order to conceal his new crime."
"He will have to apologize for his inappropriate joke in the presence of all the guests!"
"You absolutely have to speak to him.
"You already know everything, Sir!"
"Perhaps you also know who is suspected of causing the Father's disappearance?" causing the Father's disappearance?"
"Me!"
"But, I know even more, Mr. Ex-Justice.
I also know how to discover secrets."
"To give you an example, I am now going to give away one of the Baron's secrets."
"Count Oetsch!  If you know other people's secrets, you are not allowed to disclose them in front of everybody." to disclose them in front of everybody."
"My compliments for your opinion!
I just want to whisper a few words into Baron Safferstätt's ears."
"No. ... no ... I am ... not a murderer."
"What are these suggestions?"
"Do you perhaps suddenly accuse the Baron of the assassination of your brother?"
"Perhaps?"
"I will question Baron Safferstätt."
"Today I'll find out!"
He murdered my husband ...!
He shot his own brother during an argument!
End of the Fourth Act.
Schloss Vogeloed.
Fifth Act
Half an hour later.
"What do you know of that day, my dear - speak!"
"My Lord, the Count, preferred to run away!""
"And so I tell you, he has the disappearance of the Father also on his conscience."
"Father Faramund... has returned again!"
"Yesterday I was seeking comfort, and you did not come!
- Today - I will make my confession to you!"
"Because you, as a priest, must keep silent!"
"We must not do anything now!
The events of these last days will now probably clear up!"
"A few days before the murder of my husband ... "
"I am appalled at such holiness ...!"
"I'd like to see something evil ... something very very evil!"
"A murder ... !"
"Baron Safferstätt, burning with passion for me, had terribly misunderstood me!"
"He killed my husband!"
"He confessed to me two days later."
"Then I realized I was guilty. "
"The Count was arrested.  If he had been convicted ... "
"...  We would have been poisoned ... to prove his innocence ... "
"But, he was not convicted!"
"Thus accursed, both of us!
Fearing life!  Fearing death.  "
Tied together by our guilt!"
We got married!  That is our marriage!"
"So we became two comrades!  And today I have saved him!!"
"I implicated Count Oetsch in the murder of his own brother!"
"I have followed my destiny so far!"
"Now you know everything!  And you must remain silent!"
"...  I ... I understand!"
"Act like a man!"
"I ... was ... not happy ..."
"A shot ...?"
Evening peace.
"His struggles are over!"
"I, who was innocently accused, had always guessed..."
"So, some way had to be found for me finally to clear myself from this ignominious suspicion!"
"So, I arrived before Father Faramund, who was also expected at the castle!"
Thus I came to the castle to await Father Faramund!"
"We have to beg your pardon for so many things!"
Nightfall.
"I am Father Faramond of Rome."
The End
The story, "Vogel Castle," by Rudolf Stratz was published by Ullstein.
The Unknown
This is a story they...
...tell in old Madrid...
...it's a story they say is true.
"You all know me...
...Antonio Zanzi... and my gypsy circus..."
"...and now, the sensation of sensations!
The wonder of wonders!
ALONZO, THE ARMLESS!"
"Assisting Alonzo in this...
...death-defying act, is my...
...daugter...NANON!"
MALABAR THE MIGHTY.
"You are right, Alonzo...
...brute strength does not...
...mean everything to all women".
"Alonzo, all my life men...
...have tried to put their beastly hands on me...
...to paw over me".
"I have grown so that I...
...shrink with fear when...
...any man even touches me".
"You are wise, Nanon.
Always fear them... always hate them".
"And remember...
...I am always near you...
...ready to help you".
"If it takes ten million years, Nanon...
...I will keep saying 'I love you'...
...until you believe me".
"No one will get her...
...no one but me!"
"See, Nanon! Eyes that adore you...
...hands that long to caress you...
...and strength to protect you!"
"Why do you always draw away from me?"
"Why isn't he different... 
...from other men!
Why doesn't he keep his hands of me?"
"Hands! Men's hands!
How I hate them!"
"Men! The beasts!
God would show wisdom if he took the...
...hands from all of them!"
"Forgive me, Alonzo...
...I did not mean you".
"You are the one man I...
...can come to without fear".
"She is with Alonzo again!
Are you afraid to deal with him?" 
"Putting crazy ideas in her...
...head again!
I'll settle this!"
"A thousand thanks, Malabar.
I will try to repay same day".
"You have Nanon in your heart,...
...haven't you?"
"In my heart... in my soul...
...in my blood!"
"You are fortunate.
You have arms...
...and strength that she loves".
"Go take her in your arms...
...and let her listen to the...
...song of your blood".
"Cojo... I said no one is going to have her!
No one but me!"
"There is a time for fear, Nanon...
...and a time for hate...
...and a time for love".
"You worry, Alonzo, that sometime...
...will find out you have arms?"
"What would the police give...
...to know I have hands...
...and who I am?"
"There they are, Cojo...
...and Zanzi may be another...
...to find how I have them".
"I have been waiting for you... to teach you...
...that my orders are law!"
"Stop them!
They've burned enough clothes to keep twenty...
...gypsy souls out of hell!"
"The same hands that strangled Zanzi...
...committed the robberies in other towns...
...where this circus played!
They're somwehere in this troupe!"
"Get your finger-prints taken!"
"What will happen, Alonzo...
...if they sell the circus to pay...
...my father's debts?"
"Do not worry, Nanon,...
...I promised your father I would...
...always take care of you".
"The circus has gone... every caravan.
Why did we not travel with them, Alonzo?"
"Because I want to take you...
...away from the things you hate, Nanon".
"I could not go away without...
...telling you again that I will...
...love you always".
"I am so sorry Malabar put his...
...hand on you again... so sorry".
"Cojo, did you see her?
She kissed me!"
"You must never let her touch... you that way again".
"She will feel that you have arms!"
"Cojo will never tell!"
"There is nothing I will not do to own her! Nothing... do you understand? Nothing!"
"You are a riddle, Nanon.
You shrink from me... yet you kiss my flowers when I am gone".
"Then if you do care for me, why won't you ever let me hold you in my arms?"
"I know now what you fear".
"Some day that fear will die.
You will find me near you always...waiting...loving hoping".
"Cojo, I've got to have her!
She has got to marry me!"
"No Alonzo! On your wedding night she would see your arms....and hate you!"
"No, Cojo....she would never hate me... she would forgive me".
"But you forget....she saw her father strangled by a hand with two thumbs".
"You are forgetting that you have arms!"
"No, no Alonzo! Not that!
Never do that!"
Leave the door to the operating room open and be there at midnight - alone.
Remember Algiero, 20 years ago!
"Why this letter... and who are you?"
"You're here to backmail me!
It's money you want!"
"Well....what is the price of your silence about my past?"
"And be careful that I do not die in this operation.... because I left a letter telling who you are".
"I am afraid any more, Malabar.
All my foolish fears are gone".
"You're recovering rapidly.
You'll be able to leave in a few weeks".
"But we must wait until...
...Alonzo returns.
I want him with us at our wedding".
"Perhaps the landlady knows where she is.
Go ask, Cojo".
"But it's strange I've never heard from Alonzo... not one word since he went away".
"The landlady says she is at that theatre on the plaza".
"You are thinner, Alonzo!
Have you been sick?"
"No not sick... but I have lost some flesh".
"How is Cojo?
You love him best of anyone, don't you?"
"No, Nanon... not best".
"I am happy you have returned
Alonzo, now we can be married".
"Oh... I forgot. You have been away.
I well call him".
"Has Nanon told you the good news,
Alonzo?"
"Remember how I used to be afraid of his hands?"
"I am not any more.
I love them now".
"Alonzo is laughing at the way everything has happened".
"I did what you told me, Alonzo.
I took her in my arms..."
"I'm all right now".
"It was just something in here that stung like the lash of a whip".
"They said you were rehearsing.
Is this your rigging!"
"See... I have a horse hitched to each hand and they pull in opposite directions".
"You see, when the horses are tugging he could not let go if he wanted to".
"It's very dangerous.
Suppose the treadmills broke or stopped suddenly".
"If that happens the horses would tear my arms from my body".
"Do not say that! You make Alonzo worry that something will happen to you".
"Do not worry, Alonzo...
Nothing will happen.
We have been rehearsing for weeks".
"I couldn't reach Nanon's robe.
Will you get it for me?"
So... for Alonzo there was an end Hate called Death... and for Nanon, an end to Hate... called Love.
"Malabar, if I live ten million years,
I'll always say, 'I love you.'".

THE DOCKS OF NEW YORK
The waterfront of New York
- the end of many journeys, the beginning of many adventures.
Miles of docks wait day and night for strange cargo - and stranger men.
Ships come in from the sea - tarrying a day or two in the endless journey from port to port.
These were the days before oil fuel made stoking a lady's job - when stokers earned their pay in sweat and coal-dust.
"Well, Bill! We brought the ol' barge in right on time!"
"Pick up that waste!
Nobody goes ashore till this hole is cleaned up!"
"This packet sails tomorrow morning."
"You've got one night ashore.
If any o' you muckers come back drunk, you'll do double shift!"
"He's the most even- tempered guy I ever knew - always sore!"
"He thinks we're goin' ashore to play marbles!"
The Sandbar, a cable's length from the wharf, has vanished now - wiped out by commerce and reform.
But that night it was wide awake and roaring.
Save his soul and money comes to Hymn-Book Harry
"Meet my husband!"
"Well, Andy! I guess you never expected to run across me here!"
Night and fog met the stokers coming ashore.
"Hey, Bill! That's no place to take a lady!"
"Come on, Bill. They'll take care of her!"
"Okay, Bill! Be a hero an' leave your pal!"
"But just remember Singapore - - an' recollect Shanghai!"
"Well, you gave me the air.
It's been three years - what did you expect me to do?"
"Take that out o' here - before you draw the police!"
"Get her a hot drink!"
"One hot toddy!"
"You're not goin' in there!
That's the only rag she had to her back!"
"So you're the guy that saved my life?"
"You could have saved yourself the trouble, an' let me die."
"All right! Make believe you died - make believe you're startin' all over again!"
"You left all that slush in the river, Baby. All you need is a good time!"
"I've had too many good times."
"You ain't never been out with Bill Roberts."
"Dry up before you catch cold!"
"Would you care?"
"Well, I might..."
"After a month in the stoke-hole,
I got no sympathy for anybody that wants to quit a swell world like this!"
"Throw yourself into them new rags an' give me a chance!"
"All right, Bill Roberts,
I'll give you a chance."
"Anyway, I can always make a hole in the water."
"Are you goin' to let me have a good time in my own quiet way - or must I take this place apart?"
"Thought you might want your tie - Bill."
"Pretty, ain't she?"
"You better take my tip - an' stay away from that dame!"
"Shove off, my lad! I want to talk with your lady friend."
"You may be big game aboard ship, but you're only an animal-cracker here."
"Gee, but you're strong!"
"I guess you've known a lot o' girls."
"I ain't braggin' about my love-affairs."
"I'm not braggin', either."
"Ever been married, Bill?"
"Say, who'd marry a guy like me?"
"Oh, I don't know.
A lot o' girls might."
"You ever been married, Baby?"
"Say, who'd marry a girl like me?"
"I've sailed the seven seas, but I never saw a craft as trim as you."
"I don't think it's fair of you to kid me."
"Say! What makes you think I'm kiddin'?"
"What did you ever do that makes you worse than me?
I'd marry you in a minute!"
"An' come to think of it,
I'll marry you right now!"
"You don't know Bill Roberts!
I'll try anything once!"
"Get me a parson - I'm goin' to get spliced to my girl friend!"
"Come back here, Bill - don't make a fool o' yourself!"
"Meet the bride!"
"I better get Hymn-Book Harry - before he wrecks the place!"
"I'm goin' to do right by our Nell!
I'm goin' to marry her - here an' now!"
"Do you think he can make you decent by marryin' you?"
"I don't know what to think, any more."
"Until I got married,
I was decent!"
"We'll give you a marriage you'll never forget!"
"Where's your license?"
"Are you goin' to queer our fun just because you got to have a little piece o' paper?"
"If you got to have a license,
Bill will get one first thing in the morning."
"Won't you, Bill?"
"Word of honor, Parson.
First thing in the morning!"
"Let the old fusser go!
I'll marry you."
"If any of you eggs know why these heels shouldn't get hitched, speak now or forever after hold your trap!"
"Does it mean that much to you?"
"Dearly beloved, we are gathered together in the sight of God and in the face of this company -"
"- to join this Man, and this 
Woman, in Holy Matrimony."
"Matrimony is an honorable estate .... and is not to be entered into lightly -"
"Do you take this woman to be your wedded wife?"
"Will you love her, comfort her, honor her, and keep her in sickness and in health, forsaking all others
-- as long as you both shall live?"
"Sure, I will!"
"I will."
"Give me the ring."
"Here's mine - I hope it does you more good than it did me!"
"Here's your wages, Parson.
Easy come, easy go!"
"I expect you to bring me the license in the morning. 
Pay me then."
"What's the meanin' of this jamboree?"
"Oh, I thought I'd get married, and settle down."
"But how are you goin' to get rid of her?"
"Who says I want to get rid of her?"
"I know you, Bill Roberts!
You might fool her, but you can't fool me!"
"What lady threw that shoe?"
"You don't know what this means to me, Bill!"
"I'll be a good wife, Bill."
Morning.
"Got a match, Chief?"
"I s'pose you've forgot all about last night?"
"Wasn't you never young, Chief?
I was just havin' a good time!"
"I s'pose you've forgot about gettin' married, too."
"Chief, last night's over.
Today's another day!"
"Mebbe for you, but not for me.
That sock in the jaw will cost you your job!"
"One ship's as good as another,
Chief. Any port in a storm!"
"Get out o' here - or my husband will kill you!"
"Don't kid me!"
"Don't let Bill Roberts stand between you an' me - you know he ain't comin' back!"
"You're a dirty liar!
He is comin' back!"
"Rustle that stretcher - this guy's in bad shape!"
"You won't get nowhere keepin' your mouth shut!"
"I warned you! Now beat it
- while you got time!"
"I'm her husband."
"She didn't shoot him.
The kid wouldn't hurt a fly!"
"I shot him, an' nobody else is goin' to get the credit for it."
"I'm his wife. He gave me the air once too often!"
"Why didn't you say so before?"
"I didn't care - before."
"I hope you have better luck than me - - but I doubt it."
"I didn't figure on your comin' back to help me."
"You didn't need my help, Baby."
"Goin' away - Bill?"
"Sorry, Baby. Sailin' in an hour -
- I never missed a ship in my life."
"Could you give me a minute to - to get used to it, Bill?"
"I never even thanked you for pullin' me out o' the water."
"That's all right!"
"An' I never thanked you for them swell clothes you bought me."
"That's all right, too."
"An' I guess you expect me to thank you for bein' decent enough to make me your wife."
"Now listen, kid - you can't get me sore! I never did a decent thing in my life."
"I've always been like this.
There ain't no power on earth that could ever keep me ashore!"
"Why get serious about it, anyway?
You knew all I had was one night ashore - you knew I was just a dirty stoker!"
"You ain't so bad, Bill Roberts!"
"But it would have been kind o' funny if this had been on the level
- even for a couple o' months."
"Maybe if I ever stayed ashore for as long as a couple o' months
I'd get to like it."
"Get a move on, Bill.
Time's up!"
"So long, Baby."
"Well - goodbye - Bill."
"Come on out o' this - before you get into another mess!"
"I'll fix it for you, Bill.
You can't go to sea like this."
"What are you tryin' to  do
- bring me more bad luck?"
"Superstitious, are you?"
"The nerve of that dame - bawling me out after all
I done for her!"
"I could of told you before that she was no good
- like all females!"
"Lucky for you I happened along!
If I hadn't pried you loose, she'd of stuck like a barnacle!"
"Buck into it, you two!
I want steam, not talk!"
"I'll have you put in irons for this!"
"Where's my wife?"
"In jail, where she belongs."
"What's she in jail for?"
"Why don't you go to the
Night Court an' find out?"
"Thirty days. Next case!"
"You are charged with having in your possession clothes stolen from the Harbor Pawn Shop."
"How did you get them?"
"My husband gave them to me."
"Where is your husband?"
"He left me this morning."
"How long have you been married?"
"I was married last night."
"Thirty days. Next case!"
"Just a minute, Captain!
I'm her husband.
I pinched them duds myself!"
"Break in anywhere - take anything you want - - that's your idea, I suppose?"
"No, sir, I rung the bell!
But there wasn't no answer, so I helped myself."
"I see - man of importance
- no time to waste.
Just what was your hurry?"
"Well sir, I'm a stoker.
I only had one night ashore, an' I wanted to have a good time."
"Sixty days will slow you down.
Release the woman. Next case!"
"Sixty days ain't a long cruise,
Baby - an' it'll be my last one, if you'll wait.
"I guess I'd wait forever, Bill."
The novel by Felix Holländer, "Der Eid des Stephan Hull" 
Script - Leo Birinski 
Photography - Scenography 
Director 
In "Luna Park" in Hamburg 
Boss, owner of the booth 
The steamer "Berta Maria" docked at the port of Hamburg that evening.  
Boss and his companion do a number together.
We had a gypsy on board with the company. Everyone left at the last port,  ... but they abandoned this ... girl. 
You say that she dances well? 
In this group, we all do, too. 
She stays! 
It has a very strange name. We call our ship the "Berta Maria" 
Are not you tired of this monotonous life? 
How much better would it be to do our acrobatic act and travel the world
I know I'm a burden. I know I try but I fail. 
If you're jealous of that girl, tomorrow we will tell her go. 
It looks as if I am.  We're not married. 
I will do whatever you want.  
The show is over. 
You've finished! - Do you understand? Completely, forever! 
I leave tonight. Will you come with me? 
The Berlin Wintergarten.  The new acts program. 
The Artinelli Brothers 
Sir: The Artinellis await you in their study. 
Unfortunately I must terminate my contract. My brother is seriously injured. 
Klerck: try to obtain a replacement quickly. 
I found an excellent number.  Boss is back at the plaza. 
Are you kidding? I cannot associate with such a low-class acrobat. 
"... but if you saw .... his companion ... " 
The famous Artinellis want to sign you ... if you made it our debut. We would do the "Wintergarten" 
Joining the Artinellis is a good omen.
Not only is he a great artist, but he is also an interesting man. 
Artinelli has invited all the artists to the Wintergarten to celebrate our success. 
A souvenir of our debut 
END OF PART ONE 
PART TWO
Artinelli - And where is he? 
He is still sleeping 
Our success has enabled us to go to America. 
Is this your way of thanking me?
Mine should be ... It was I who has made you successful ... I even took you to the booths at the fairs.
You're as lucky in cards as you are in love. 
I am sorry, but tonight I cannot be at the Reunion of the Artist's Circle 
What a pity! I have never seen such a party. 
If Mr. Artinelli wants to accompany you... 
I was surprised myself ... at the party in Linderpark ... 
That night, the fabulous trio will perform, on the night of honor, 
The exciting "triple somersault". 
Tell Berta Maria not to be late again tonight. 
I have invited my friends from Hamburg. 
Pick it up and defend yourself! 
I will count to three ... 
Where is the nearest police station?
The mother of your son has made a request to the Ministry of Justice and requested that you be pardoned to be with your son
... I do not want my request to be ignored.  You should return to our son, and forget everything that has happened 
Every day he asks for his father.  I tell him he is in a distant land ... 
The pardon has been granted. Make certain that you are grateful for this generous act. 
END
The Hunchback of Notre Dame
Notre Dame, the Cathedral Church of Paris
... a spiritual haven in a brutal age ... a sanctuary where the persecuted could find protection.
The enduring monument of a mighty faith.
It was in the broad cathedral square that the people met to celebrate-
The Festival of
Fools ...
The one day of the year when the people, crushed by tyranny, gave themselves to unrestrained pleasure.
Ten years before Columbus discovered America, there dwelt within the rocky fastness of the cathedral a creature whom the Parisians of that day knew as "the Hunchback of Notre Dame"-
Quasimodo.
LON CHANEY
Deaf - half-blind - shut off from his fellow- men by his deformities the bells were the only voice of his groping soul.
To the townspeople he was an inhuman freak, a monstrous joke of Nature- and for their jeers he gave them bitter scorn and hate.
His most Christian
Majesty, Louis
XI.-a crafty oppressor of his people, whose dungeons were always full, whose executioners always busy.
"We like not this ribaldry.
It savors of disrespect to both God and King."
And Paris had an uncrowned monarch-
Clopin, "The King of Beggars"
-the enemy of kings.
Dom Claude, the saintly
Arch-deacon of Notre
Dame.
The Cathedral also sheltered the Arch- deacon's brother, Jehan, who had foresworn a priest's robes for more worldly garb-
"So even you bow your head to my reverend brother!"
"Our day is coming - when we'll bow our heads to no man!"
"That freak is my slave. He will be useful to us.
"Esmeralda! Esmeralda!"
Esmeralda, a child of mystery, whom Clopin had bought from Gypsies and raised as his own.
PATSY RUTH MILLER
"Cursed gypsy! Daughter of
Satan! Hell take you-"
Marie, Queen of the Gypsies.
"That poor, mad creature was once rich and happy-"
"While she was away-"
"Her child was never found.
She secludes herself in this dark place, and lives but to curse and pray."
"Give her back to me, O Lord
-if only for a moment. Give me back my baby!"
The festival continued on into the night.
Gringoire, a poet of the streets.
The climax of the Festival came when the ugliest man in Paris was crowned
King of the Fools.
"Let Esmeralda dance!
Call her out!"
"Esmeralda! Esmeralda!"
Clopin's fierce heart burned at the injustice of the world; but it became tender only to his foster- child.
With the noise of the revelling mob still ringing in his ears King Louis tried to find peace in his favorite lodging place, the fortress of the Bastille.
"Send in that young rascal,
Phoebus de Chateaupers."
Phoebus de Chateaupers.
Men yielded to his sword
-and women to his smile.
"This commission makes you
Captain of our Guard. You see how we reward loyalty to the King and watchfulness over his safety."
The home of Madame de Gondelaurier.
Fleur de Lys, fiancee of
Captain Phoebus.
"Fie! I know your reputation.
You would say as much to any maiden."
Madame de Gondelaurier, aunt of Fleur de Lys.
"Phoebus - see that pretty goat."
"Very pretty - indeed!"
"Your company is waiting at the barracks!"
"Au revoir!"
To Esmeralda, this dashing soldier had long been the Prince Charming of her dreams.
Each time that Jehan beheld Esmeralda he longed to possess her.
Jehan knew the lonely streets where Esmeralda had to pass on her way home.
"Tie up this varlet!"
Alas, for man's ingratitude!
"It isn't safe for a pretty child like you to be out alone at this hour!"
"I am not afraid - now!"
The Court of Miracles - the city of thieves - a hideous blot on the face of
Paris - a sink from whence escaped every morning, and to which returned to stagnate every night, that stream of vice and vagrancy which ever flows through the streets of a capital.
Called the Court of
Miracles, because here the "blind" saw-
... because here the
"lame" walked ...
It was here that Clopin reigned supreme.
At the sign of the
Pomme d'Eve.
"Just a bit of supper - a sip of wine - before we say good-night?"
For Phoebus it was just another girl to hold in his arms. For Esmeralda it was a golden dream come true.
"Then it is true - what the fortune-teller told me -"
"... that I should be wooed by a noble Captain of the
Guards."
"It was put about my neck by mother, I scarce remember her. But I know that so long as I wear it, no harm can befall me."
"If mademoiselle will permit me, I shall see her safely on her way."
Those who strayed near the Court of Miracles were in danger of losing their lives - Gringoire lost his clothes.
"Here is a spy of the aristocrats. We found him at our very threshold."
"Who are you?"
"Merely a poet, a singer of sweet songs ... by name.
Gringoire."
"What shall we do with this singer of sweet songs?"
"Hang him! Hang him!
That's what the aristocrats do to us!"
"Have you so little misery that you must create more?"
"Cut him down, I say!"
The hunchback, for the attempted crime of kidnapping, had his first taste of the King's justice.
"For that, add twenty lashes to his punishments!"
Again was a slave to suffer for his master's crime.
"... for nocturnal attack and disturbing the peace of
His Majesty, our King."
Swift run the sands of life except in the hour of pain.
Thus was "Justice" rendered in the reign of King Louis XI !
"I thirst!"
"Cursed gypsy! You should be whipped!"
To celebrate the honor conferred by King
Louis upon Captain Phoebus,
Madame de Gondelaurier gives a ball.
"Where is that young jackanapes, Phoebus?"
"The ball in honor of my promotion takes place tonight.
You promised to go with me."
"But - my clothes!"
"I have prepared for that."
In Quasimodo's soul was born a bitter hatred for his betrayer.
"Esmeralda! --- The Captain of the Guards!" ---
"Be calm-"
"Be calm, my lord, and do not stir - 'Tis he who is entrapped by her!"
"An aristocrat has taken our
Esmeralda. To the rescue!"
"You are fairer than any lady in France!"
"Her Highness, Princess of Egypt!"
"She descends from a line more ancient than that of the Kings of France."
"I have a message for
Captain Phoebus - I am commanded to bring it to his own hands."
"Hold your blades! Our quarrel is with only one of you - this time!"
"There he is--!"
"Stop! This is my affair - and mine alone!"
"What do you mean by this outrage?"
"Do you think you can take our Esmeralda for your plaything? Leave her alone
-or I'll slit your throat!"
"But I tell you,
I love her!"
"-for my sake!"
"My place is with my people.
I do not belong here."
"Keep to your own women!"
"Esmeralda, would you forsake me now? Did you not promise to be my bride?"
"I do not love you."
"You nobles have lorded it over us and trampled on us
-but you can't do it forever."
Just when Phoebus had decided that life held no further interest ...
Monsieur Phoebus de Chateauper could heal a broken heart before a last farewell, let him come to Notre-Dame this eve at Angelus.
Esmeralda
"She saved my life in the
Court of Miracles."
"And you saved my life by bringing me this message.
Let me command this honor of the Prince of Poets."
"She gave you the letter with her own hand?"
Slowly it dawned on
Clopin that he was losing Esmeralda.
"As if the cursed aristocrats were not enough, the girl now talks of taking the veil."
"I will give myself to the
Blessed Virgin - and She will give me peace!"
"What say you then? Half of the treasure of Notre Dame to you - for the hand of
Esmeralda in marriage."
"See you - 'tis gold that makes kings and keeps them on their thrones."
"Gold - gold and steel! My people in the places of the mighty!"
"Strike quickly, then, else the treasure may be gone."
"The hour for an uprising is not yet! There lacks the spark to make my people flame."
Angelus.
"Phoebus, it was only to see you once more - and say good-bye!"
"Dear heart, can you not see?
I must give you up for your own sake - for your future!
Even your life itself!"
"You speak of trifles when
Heaven itself is at stake."
"By this sacred emblem
I plight my troth."
Again the King's justice-
"Girl! Do you persist in denying that you stabbed
Phoebus de Chateaupers?"
"Of course I deny it! How could I? I love him more than my own life!"
"It was he - he who stabbed Phoebus!"
"The girl is bewitched!"
"Put her to the question!"
The "question" - the system of the Middle
Ages to force confession.
"Do you still deny-?"
"I do - I love him!
I love him!"
"I confess ... I confess!
I confess to anything you wish!"
Through nights of delirium,
Phoebus of Chateaupers wondered if the charge brought against Esmeralda were true
-whether it was she who stabbed him.
"Monsieur, the brother of the
Archdeacon inquires the health of Captain Phoebus."
"The wench who stabbed you has confessed her crime. She has been ordered hanged."
"I come to get Esmeralda."
"She has been carried to prison by his Majesty's servants."
"I'll get her if I have to tear down Notre Dame rock by rock."
"You - in the robes of the Church!"
"Only in these robes could
I pass the prison-guard.
Quick - come with me!"
"I'd rather die!"
"Phoebus died of his wound last night. I promised him to save you!"
"Oh, Esmeralda, pity me! All
I have done was for love of you!"
"Assassin!"
"Very well, then hang!"
Suddenly the date for
Esmeralda's execution was secretly set ahead, and orders came to the hunchback to toll the death-knell.
For what poor soul he rang, he did not know.
When the great bell tolled like that, all
Paris knew some prisoner was on the way to execution.
"Let me kill the gypsy! Her life for the life of my child!"
"Cursed gypsy! Cursed-
Cursed!"
"My baby! My baby!
Save her, O God!"
"Requiescat in pace!"
A pleasant diversion for the workmen who were repairing the Cathedral.
"... and first appear on the steps of the Cathedral of
Notre Dame ... there to do penance."
"Sanctuary! Sanctuary!"
"Would you violate the sacred law of Sanctuary?"
All Quasimodo knew was that this girl had once been kind to him.
"My daughter, the law of sanctuary protects you pend- ing an appeal. Until then,
Mother Church will give you shelter and clothing."
The night had brought a dreamless sleep.
Esmeralda's presence inspired Quasimodo to express his wild joy in the only way he knew.
With plans all made for rescuing Esmeralda on her way tot he gallows, Clopin was awaiting the day that had been announced for the execution.
"They feared an uprising to rescue Esmeralda. To prevent bloodshed the King suddenly ordered he hanged today!"
"The hour has struck. They are about to surrender the maid to the officers of the
King."
"Hear me, you two-legged cattle, and learn how to become men. Were you not also born of women after the manner of kings?"
"Long enough the aristocrats have treated us as sheep.
We'll show them - we are wolves."
"Follow me to Notre Dame!"
"To arms! To arms! Rescue
Esmeralda! Sack the City!"
"Ere dawn my people will live in the palaces of the aristocrats."
Clopin's call to arms reach all the hidden corners of Paris - a kingdom was the stake.
"To arms! To arms! 'Tis
Clopin who calls you!"
Through all the man- made rat-holes beneath the ancient city.
Phoebus had recovered- but the wound in his heart still ached.
"Clopin and his rabble have risen!"
"They've sworn to bring back
Esmeralda! She's in the tower of Notre Dame!"
"Esmeralda! Alive!"
"Rouse the garrison!"
Preparing a fiery baptism - MOLTEN
LEAD!
"To arms! To arms!"
"The hunchback has sent us a battering-ram!"
"My children, I would have set you free ... Fight on!
Fight on!"
"Why do you struggle?
You are mine, now!"
"Never! - God will protect me!"
THE FALL OF THE HOUSE OF USHER based on stories by Edgar A. Poe sick... worried... my wife Madeline...
"I need someone to drive me to Usher tonight. "
In the nearly decaying manor-house,
Slr Roderick kept his wife Madeline in a strange seclusion, dominating her through his tyrannical disposition.
"No. I would not make my horse take a step further for all your Lordship's gold."
The oppressive melancholy of USHER'S surroundings seemed supernatural.
"The doctor."
The illness of Lady Madeline,
Roderick Usher's wife, baffled the skill of her physician.
As a result of a curious hereditary flaw, every Usher devoted himself to painting the portrait of his wife.
"It is there that she is alive."
"My dear Roderick, you are burning with fever."
"Her Grace is feeling tired and begs you to excuse her from the table. "
"It is there that she is alive."
Roderick was seized again by his strange impulse to paint.
His only thought was to be alone with Madeline, his sole model.
How could he get rid of his visiting and now unwelcome friend?
Twisted as by a tempest, the Usher's ancestral past weighed upon Roderick, who was the last survivor of the race, with all the weight of his heredity.
"My dear and only friend,
I am touched by your concern.
"But you too must take care of yourself.
"A few steps outside will do you good before you go to bed. "
Roderick's brush was like a magic wand.
Each stroke gave more life to the portrait while making Madeline more pallid, as though the young girl gave to the painted picture the very strength she was losing.
"This is indeed life itself."
Obsessed by all mysteries, Roderick had long meditated upon the theories of Magnetism.
"I tell you, Doctor. She may not be dead."
"She shall not leave me.
We shall bury her right here."
"I forbid, do you hear,
I forbid anyone to nail the coffin."
After the burial of Madeline, the hours, the days went by
In frightening dreariness and oppressive silence.
Tense and nervous, Roderick seemed to be waiting for a sign.
The slightest noise exasperated him...
Roderick dared not repeat the insane thought that oppressed him... Madeline...
This was a stormy night, charged with electricity.
There is a two-fold Silence.
One is bodily silence; be not afraid.
But should some urgent fate bring thee to meet his shadow, nameless elf, that haunteth the lone regions where hath trod no foot of man, commend thyself to God.
"Now can you hear her?"
"Roderick, you should not see that.
"Let me read you something to amuse you. "
And Ethelred uplifted his mace outright, and, with blows, made a path through the boards of the door for his gauntleted hand; and now pulling therewith sturdily, he so cracked, and ripped...
And Ethelred uplifted his mace, and struck upon the head of the dragon, which fell before him, and gave up his pestilent breath, with a shriek so horrid and harsh, and withal so piercing...
And now, the champion approached valorously over the silver pavement of the castle to where the shield was upon the wall; which in sooth tarried not for his full coming, but fell down at his feet, with a mighty great and terrible...
"Yes, I can hear. I have heard for a long time, since the first day... "
"We have put her alive in the tomb."
Despite having more or less always been in circulation,
DIE NIBELUNGEN has never been presented in any complete German version, whether by way of any extant release print, or anything struck from an original camera negative.
This photochemical restoration is based on incomplete camera negatives.
Missing sections were supplemented by various extant prints of the period along with archival copies.
Colouration follows the conventional method of then-contemporary prints, and is based upon original tinting technique:
The production of a B&W print, with subsequent staining performed in a dye-bath.
The German intertitles were taken from extant prints and flash-titles restored digitally from the negatives.
Missing titles that have been reconstructed are designated by the Murnau-Stiftung logo.
For this HD mastering, the image has been corrected in places, and heavy damage to the film has been retouched.
THE NIBELUNGEN
Director: Fritz Lang
Scenario: Thea von Harbou
Cinematography:
Carl Hoffmann and Günther Rittau
Set Design and Construction: Otto Hunte
Set Collaborators:
Erich Kettelhut and Karl Vollbrecht
Costume Design: Paul Gerd Guderian
Make-Up: Otto Genath
Music: Gottfried Huppertz
Costumes and Props for the Huns:
Heinrich Umlauff
Cast:
Kriemhild: Margarete Schön
Queen Ute: Gertrud Arnold
King Gunther: Theodor Loos
Gerenot: Hans Carl Müller
Giselher: Erwin Biswanger
Volker von Alzey: Bernhard Goetzke
Hagen Tronje: Hans Adalbert Schlettow
Dankwart: Hardy von François
The Priest: Georg Jurowski
The Noble Boy: Iris Roberts
König Etzel (King Attila):
Rudolf Klein-Rogge
Blaodel, His Brother: Georg John
Werbel, the Bard: Hubert Heinrich
Margrave Rüdiger von Bechlarn:
Rudolf Rittner
Dietlind, His Daughter: Aenne Röttgen
Dietrich von Bern: Fritz Alberti
Hildebrand: Georg August Koch
Thea von Harbou's script for thefilm Die Nibelungen, with 24 images from the production, is published by
Drei Masken Verlag, Munich.
THE NIBELUNGEN
Dedicated to the German People
KRIEMHILD'S REVENGE
The First Canto:
How Kriemhild Mourned Siegfried, and How König Etzel (King Attila)
Courted Her
Through Rüdiger von Bechlarn.
King Gunther, Margrave Rüdiger von Bechlarn asks for an audience!
I come as ambassador to King Attila.
He who is called the Lord of the Earth -
He who seeks the hand of your sister Kriemhild in marriage.
I am afraid King Attila knows not whom he woos.
In the name of Siegfried, who was murdered and whose murderer lives!
Keep in mind how Siegfried died!
Lord Attila sends me, O Queen, to ask for your hand on his behalf!
You seem to know quite well, Rüdiger, that I have been exposed to grievous wrongs in the house of my clan!
Brother! Where is your brother Siegfried?
Deliver unto me the murderer of my husband, O King!
He has remained loyal to me; so shall I remain loyal to him.
This, Kriemhild, is my final word!
Lady Kriemhild, Margrave Rüdiger, wishes to speak with you after evensong!
Now, Gerenot, is the time to keep close watch over Burgundy!
Speak to me of Lord Attila, Rüdiger!
You court a dead woman, Rüdiger!
He who murdered my husband flaunts the greensparkling sword that he stole from the dead man.
If ever you were done wrong at Attila's court, my lady,
- Lord Attila would know how to avenge you!
Lord Margrave, swear this unto me in your and in King Attila's names!
Not on the cross, Lord Margrave,
- on the sharp edge of your sword!
My lady! Lord Hagen has stolen the Treasure!
You have my word,
Lord Margrave Rüdiger!
Hagen Tronje, where is the Treasure?
Thus spake loyal Hagen:
Somewhere, my lady, where no-one might use the gold to forge arms against the kings of Burgundy!
Thus ends the First Canto.
The Second Canto:
How Kriemhild Fled Her Homeland, and How She Was Received by Lord Attila.
You have drunk Siegfried's blood, O Earth!
One day I shall drench you with Hagen Tronje's blood!
I shall return! Rest assured, I shall return!
My daughter, shall you not proffer your hand in farewell to your brother Gunther?
No, mother.
You are heading far away, Lady Kriemhild.
Don't you want to make peace with your family first?
No, my priest.
Don't you even once want to hail your people, my lady?
No, Rüdiger.
As Kriemhild approached, springtime blossomed in the land of the Huns.
That sack full of gold is mine!
The queen is coming!
Meet her, brother!
Royal jewellery!
My lady, King Attila's brother,
Blaodel, gives thee welcome!
Choose for yourself a kingdom from my lands, Rüdiger, in gratitude for this woman!
Ask King Attila, Margrave Rüdiger, whether he is prepared to make your oath his own!
Upon my oath, O Queen:
Any man who insults you or does you wrong shall die a hundredfold death!
Thus ends the Second Canto.
The Third Canto:
How King Attila Besieged Rome and How Kriemhild
Summoned Her Brothers.
Lord Attila swore he wanted to turn Rome's churches into stables for our horses!
Why does Lord Attila no longer uphold his oath?
We traipsed headlong into war!
Why don't we ride further onward?
Why is Lord Attila's horse tethered to his tent?
A great horseman was King Attila!
A mighty mare for him was the world!
Lord Attila whipped the world - his mare!
What does Lord Attila do now?
He sleeps! He sleeps!
Lord Attila, Attila sleeps!
This white woman has stolen Attila from underneath our noses!
With her tresses does she bind up the horseman,
The great horseman, Lord Attila!
This white woman has stolen Attila from underneath our noses!
With her tresses does she bind up the horseman,
The great horseman, Lord Attila!
My lord -! Kriemhild...
My lord -! Kriemhild has borne you a son!
O Earth... sacred Earth...
One wish, O Queen!
One wish that I might fulfill for you!
If you would honour me and make me happy, Lord Attila, then summon my brothers as guests to your court!
To Worms, Blaodel, to request as guests to our court the royal brothers of my wife!
Thus ends the Third Canto.
The Fourth Canto:
How Kriemhild Received Her Brothers.
For more than one moon's time your brothers stayed as guests of Rüdiger in the house of Bechlarn.
The minstrels sing a new song of the love between your brother Giselher and Rüdiger's only child, the beautiful Dietlind!
And so I bind in faith -
Bechlarn and Burgundy:
One heart, one life, one death!
To honour your brothers,
Lord Attila has sent the noblest of his knights -
Dietrich von Bern - to greet them.
Once more, Nibelungen, before Lord Attila comes to greet you:
Forget not to whom Attila leads thee!
How could we forget, my lord, that we come to visit our sister Kriemhild?
Whoever wants to win my gratitude shall bear my sorrow in mind!
It was the day of the summer solstice, and the Nibelungen arrived at Attila's court.
King Attila, I now exhort you to your oath!
Siegfried's murderer is in your hands!
Think upon my sorrow!
Will you never forget
Lord Siegfried, my lady?
Hagen Tronje shall fight me for his life!
You mustn't fight with the murderer, Attila!
You must have the murderer killed!
Have our guest killed?
You swore to me, Attila!
On the life of your child:
Make good upon your oath!
I hail from a desert land, O Queen.
If only one thing is sacred, it is a guest!
So long as Hagen Tronje regards the peace of my house, he shall be left in peace!
She spoke: Whoever wants to win my gratitude shall bear my sorrow in mind!
Whoever brings me the head of Tronje,
I shall fill his shield with gold!
But I beseech you:
Do no harm to the sons of my mother!
Play on, bard!
Thus ends the Fourth Canto.
The Fifth Canto:
How the Huns Celebrated the Summer Solstice with the Nibelungen.
Is it the fashion at Worms upon the Rhine to sit at table armed from head to foot?
Lord Hagen Tronje knows why he never lays aside his sword!
Methinks that at such a feast the heir to all Attila's crowns mustn't be absent!
Methinks the boy will not live long.
Scarcely shall we as guests attend any court of his!
Treason!
The child!
The work of your guest, Lord Attila!
Now, Nibelungen, you are fair game!
I demand safe conduct from this hall for myself and my men!
Thus ends the Fifth Canto.
The Sixth Canto:
The Nibelungen's Distress.
Alert Lady Kriemhild of what it is you see!
Open the gate!
No Hun survives any longer in Attila's hall!
Avenge thy dead, Huns!
O Queen, it is impossible!
Avenge thy dead, Huns, and the royal child!
Sister!
Sister! Consider your mother!
Hand over Siegfried's murderer - and you shall be free!
The fight is too uneven!
Not one of the Nibelungen will gaze upon this next dawn.
In Giselher does my own child die!
Stay out of it, Rüdiger!
Blood shall follow blood!
Get me Rüdiger!
The time is nigh, Lord Rüdiger!
Make good upon your oath!
Lord Margrave Rüdiger,
I demand from you Siegfried's murderer!
You do not send me against Hagen Tronje,
- you send me against your brothers, my lady, who defend him with their very lives!
You've sworn an oath, Rüdiger!
You've sworn it upon the sharp edge of your sword!
I engaged my only child to Giselher!
Blood shall follow blood, Lord Rüdiger!
My lord! Do not force me to kill my only child!
Thus ends the Sixth Canto.
The Seventh Canto:
The Nibelungen's End.
Lord Rüdiger stands before the gate!
He will bring us peace!
What do you bring us, father?
Death!
My lord, do not allow they who love one another to kill one another!
Tell them:
They must deliver unto me the murderer of my child
- and they are free!
You know not the German soul, Lord Attila!
The oath I made to Kriemhild is older than the oath between myself and you!
Don't force me to break my oath! Fight!
Do you wish me to lose my honour?! -
Defend yourself, Hagen Tronje!
O sister, what you have wrought!
Deliver Hagen unto me - and you are free!
Exalt in your revenge, Kriemhild!
Your younger brother is dead!
Rüdiger and his men are dead!
But Hagen Tronje lives on, who slew your Siegfried!
Hurl fire into the hall!
My lord! The Queen bids the hall be bombarded with fire arrows!
The palace is burning!
Lady Kriemhild is right, she is more than right!
I myself will stand at her side as the fire flushes the murderer Hagen from his hole!
You have my thanks, Kriemhild!
Although we were never united in love, we will, in the end, yet be united in hate!
Never, King Attila, was my heart so filled with love as now!
I don't want King Gunther of Burgundy to die a smoky death!
I shall offer Lady Kriemhild my head!
Speak, ye Nibelungen, will you buy your lives with Hagen Tronje's head?!
Loyalty, unbroken by iron, also will not melt in fire, Hagen Tronje!
Look! Volker prepares his fiddle for one final song!
I call it a shame and a disgrace,
Lady Kriemhild, that you let these heroes whom you could not defeat in battle be annihilated in fiery distress!
Do you hear? Lord Volker is singing!
O, that we were on the cool, green Rhine!
Do you hear? Lord Volker is singing!
You are no human being,
Lady Kriemhild -!
No! I died when Siegfried died...
An end -! An end -!
One vassal still lives, Lord Attila!
I cannot go home to my dead Siegfried before having atoned for every wrong...
Here is the sword, Lord Hagen.
Where is the Treasure?
I swore never to betray the location of the Treasure so long as one of my kings still lives!
Now, Kriemhild, no-one knows anything of the Treasure other than God and myself!
And God is no more discreet than I!
Now, Earth, drink your fill!
Deliver her home to Siegfried, her dead husband!
She belonged to no other man!
Here does the myth have an end.
Restoration:
With the collaboration of:
The following partners also contributed to the restoration:
Film restoration laboratory:
Consultation on image quality and tinting:
Original score:
Reconstruction and synchronisation:
Music in ZDF/Arte Edition:
Recorded with:
Musical director:
Sound mixers:
Synch editing:
Sound engineer:
Musical production of:
Editorial:
Director of production:
A co-production of:
Improvements by (c) dCd / July 2014
Original by (c) tai_tan & MaRio & Others (thanks!)
THE TREASURE
From the novel by R. H. Bartsch 
Adapted for the screen by W. Hennings and G. W. Pabst 
Director: G. W. Pabst 
First Act 
The house bell maker. 
Rebuilt in 1683 after the Turks were expelled from the country with the help of the Lord. 
What an odd guy you are, Svetelentz! 
... however, I hear secrets, while you hear nothing. 
Now there's a carefree boy! 
To Arno, the goldsmith, in the Himmelmayer house in Graz 
And that's me by name! 
We hereby inform you that we received your letter. My work is already so advanced that you may start yours. I have taken good note of your budget for the ornamentation work.  Please start to work without further delay. Awaiting its arrival, 
Balthasar Hofer, master bell maker in Marburg. 
Yes, it was terrible here. The Turks had plundered everyone ... 
At the time, there was nothing left of the homes but the columns and some foundations. 
Curiously, there are still rumors about a treasure that the 
Turkish Emperor's men had buried somewhere ... 
Look, Leni, when you the son of a wealthy farmer and expect a large inheritance, one does not sit with the homeless ... 
End of Act One 
Second Act 
Master, are you certain of these rumors about the location of the treasure? 
And if the treasure were in your own home? 
The diving rods must be cut a hazel bush in the spring or autumn, three days before the new moon, between eleven and midnight.
The most favorable months are September and December. You must select a branch that is one to two years old. The best bushes grow in the mountains, where the ore is. 
Yes, I have always traveled the world ... and when my work on the bell is completed, 
I will continue on my way! 
You know, Svetelenz is going to drive me completely mad... now he will try to persuade me that the treasure is here, in this house ... 
He is searching ... he knows where the treasure is ... 
I also know one ... 
The stones are silent ... 
What would you have the stones say? 
What is buried within you ... 
End of Act Two 
Act Three 
Master, did you know that there is a ghost going about in your house at night? 
Well, tonight ... 
He knows about the money ... 
What if Svetelentz was right ...? 
He must know things are hidden from us ... 
Master, believe me, it is gold ... 
It is you who should find the treasure, not him ... 
But not with a divining rod! No! 
I will discover the secret of this house by logical deduction... and then ... 
During the night ... 
A treasure dating from the Turkish presence should be hidden in the foundations ... because they are all that remain from that time. 
Let's leave it for today! And not a word to the master ... 
I found the treasure ... 
But the goldsmith knows about it... 
End of Act Three 
Act Four 
He must disappear.  He won't keep quiet ... 
Go and fetch him. 
Hey, you, get ready for work! 
We must get the stranger out of the house so we can unearth the treasure ... 
I will send him with Beate to the cellar for wine. He will not say no ... 
I have something to tell you ... 
Not now, he is listening to us ... 
Well, I'll go with her. 
End of Act Four 
Act Five
Let them have the treasure.  You have me ... 
The only reason I want the treasure is because I love you. 
Lady ... lady ... What if I surrender my share of the treasure for your daughter? 
... then all the gold remains with us. 
You belong to me, I've traded the treasure for you ... 
I found the treasure. 
I am not for sale. 
Arno ... let them have the gold.
THE WEDDING MARCH
VIENNA - Anno Domini 1914 with its oldest guardian,
St. Stephen's guiding - comforting- consoling and its so contrasting symbol, the "Iron Man"- a remnant of the Middle Ages heartless - soulless - threatening where Hapsburg's throne stands -
Glorious and Proud.
In the shadow of the Emperor's Palace - aloof, feudal, imposing but crumbling stands the residence of the
Princes von Wildeliebe-Rauffenburg.
Maria Immaculata,
Princess von Wildeliebe-Rauffenburg.
"Your Highness, today is 'Corpus Christi'..."
"All right!"
Prince Ottokar von Wildeliebe-Rauffenburg
His Majesty's Chamberlain and Lord Steward
General of Cavalry - Captain of all Guards.
"...and get the hell out!"
"Well - say it!"
"Come on - say it!"
"You - ugly old fool!"
"If you could only see yourself!"
"It's pitiful!"
The "love child" of this ideal, blissful union slumbered still.
His Highness, Nicholas Ehrhart Hans Karl Maria,
Prince von Wildeliebe-Rauffenburg
His Majesty's Chamberlain and First Lieutenant of the Imperial and Royal Life Guard-Mounted.
"Your Highness, today is 'Corpus Christi'..."
"Why this unusual pleasure?"
"I thought - I might drive over with you, Papa!"
"If you think you can touch me - forget about it!"
"I'm in a terrible hole!"
"Blow out your brains!"
"...or..."
"...marry money!"
"Well - I'll see Mama about it!"
"How much does the hand kiss cost this morning?"
"No joking, Mother -
I'm in a terrible hole!"
"Stop your poker and your expensive girlies..."
"...or marry money!"
"Marry money - that's all I hear!"
"I'll tell you what we'll do..."
"...select the bride, Mother - and I'll walk down the aisle with her..."
"...to the Wedding March - tomorrow!"
"But remember - she must have money..."
"...mountains of money!"
"Meanwhile, if you can let me have a little..."
Then, Corpus Christi - the greatest religious and military celebration of the year.
"Just stick around me, folks!"
"That's the truth, Frau Schrammell - my boy, Schani, always gets the best place!"
"You said it, Herr Eberle - the girl that gets him for a husband is lucky!"
"Did you get that - Mitzi?"
"Didn't you hear your mother say you're lucky?"
"Are you harpin' again on the same old thing?"
"What do you think I'm hangin' 'round you fer - huh?"
"I thought we came here to see the Procession - an' not to talk!"
"Well - if Herr Schani wants to talk about it now..."
"I don't see why you shouldn't wanta!"
"Saphead! You're goin' to lose the best chance you'll ever have!"
"You don't want our Mitzi to marry a man she doesn't love?"
"Ain't that a nice view?"
"Ain't we got no right to see nothin' a-tall?"
"That's one o' them swells that don't do nothin'..."
"...lots o' gold tassels an' plumes..."
"...and we're payin' fer it!"
"But he looks nice - don't he?"
"Just gimme his masquerade - an' watch me!"
"Don't they smell sweet?"
"I ain't smellin' nothin' - but the stink o' horses!"
"Married?"
"If it weren't for old man Schweisser's corn-plaster business..."
"...his daughter would not be such a bad match for Nicki - would she?"
"...and old Schweisser himself is so very ambitious."
"I'd thought of it myself..."
"...but - the girl limps!"
"What's a little limp - with twenty millions!"
"Is she badly hurt?"
"You are under arrest!"
Then, the Procession - the Procession that Mitzi had waited so long to see.
There is no such thing as accident.
It is Fate - mis-named.
"My father."
"How are you?"
"Much better - Thanks!"
"I don't know how to thank you."
"Herr Oberleutnant!"
"My name is - Nicki."
"Nicki - what?"
"I'll bet you have a name - a kilometer long!"
"So let's make it - just Nicki!"
"I thought - you might like them!"
"I might like them!"
"...the best I ever had - was when father bought for me..."
"...a five-cent bag of jelly beans!"
Then, dreamy Nussdorf.
"I ain't goin' to let that skirt-chaser ruin Mitzi's chances with Schani!"
After the guests had gone.
"You owe me a kiss, Mitzi."
"You blew out the match!"
"Our beautiful 'Blue Danube'!"
"Down there - the 'Danube-Maids' come to the shore - some times..."
"...to see them means happiness - an' luck..."
"...an' love!"
"I never saw them - an' I s'pose I never will!"
"But I'm satisfied just so I don't ever see the 'Iron Man'!"
"What do they say about him?"
"They say - some nights he comes to life..."
"...an' drags away a 'Danube-Maid'!"
"An' to the ones who see him..."
"...comes Sorrow - Grief - an' Death!"
"You believe that, Mitzerl?"
"It is nothing - but the people's foolish fancies!"
"That's my Fairy Coach..."
"...where I dream an' wish I'd see the 'Danube-Maids'!"
"Perhaps I'll bring you luck - and we shall see them!"
"A drive through Paradise!"
"You were made for love - Mitzerl!"
"You mustn't say the things to me..."
"...that you say to your fine ladies..."
"...because I might believe them."
"I want you to believe them!"
"An' - you'll come again?"
A few days afterward,
Schani was released from prison.
"Jailbird!"
"Seen Mitzi yet?"
"The way this woman-hound's been chasin' Mitzi is somethin' awful!"
"Well - he believes in workin' fast!"
"She's out in the buggy!"
"Oh - so that's the way you feel - huh?"
"...that's what I get fer goin' to jail fer you!"
"You mushin' 'round with this here sow-bone!"
"Just let me get my hands on him!"
"I'll kick his glass-eyed mug to goulash!"
Then, in that little crooked house - in that little crooked street.
"...a kiss all around - and then I leave you."
"Are you leaving before old Schweisser's party?"
"Tonight I crave apple blossoms!"
"Apple blossoms! What do you mean?"
"I'm going to meet a real nice girl."
"At this hour of the morning?"
"It's when her parents snore the loudest!"
"I was afraid you would not come."
"I was on duty - I couldn't get away!"
"This-h is - my party!"
Schweisser's Red Raven Corn Plasters
"...now listen... Highness... I... h-have... a... p-proposition..."
"...y-you... h-have... a n-nice son!"
"...a-an'... n-no - m-money!"
"...u-understand?"
"...a-an'... I h-have... a n-nice... g-girl..."
"...a-and... l-lots - o-o'... m-money!!"
"...u-understand??"
"...N-Now... h-how... a-about... m-my d-daughter..."
"...a-an'... Y-YOUR -- son...?"
"...u-understand??"
"I-I'll... fix... your... s-son... u-up - right."
"...u-understand??"
"How much do I get?"
"Five Hunder' Thousan' Kronen!"
"HOW MUCH?"
"One million kronen!"
"...t-thass... a... gentleman's... agreement..."
"...u-understand??"
"...an' you will come again?"
"...an' love me always?"
"Always!"
"The 'Iron Man'!"
"Nothing but shadows, dear - and fog!"
It was mid-morning before Schweisser dragged himself home- to face his daughter.
"I... I was with His Highness
Prince von Wildeliebe-Rauffenburg..."
"We have arranged for you and his son Prince Nicki..."
"...to get married!"
"But I have never even met the Prince!"
"You will - soon."
"How could he be in love with me?"
"You have twenty millions!"
"Money couldn't make a man feel love!"
"Don't be a silly little goose - love will come - in time."
"Princess Cecelia - doesn't that sound nice?"
"A limping Princess!"
"I presume you even proposed to the young lady..."
"...or did you leave that insignificant little detail to me?"
"Did it ever occur to you that I might be in love with somebody else?"
"You - in love?"
"You idiot!"
"Of course, you two wouldn't know - but some people do fall in love - really!"
"But marriage is one thing and love another!"
"N'est-ce pas - Ottokar?"
"I am tired of this nonsense!"
"I command!"
"The wedding is on the First of June!"
"How dare he talk to me that way!"
"But, Nicki..."
"...this would mean so much money!"
"How much?"
"A huge fortune!"
"Seems to me that girl limps - on both legs!"
"Peace be with you, my child..."
Then, Nature mourned - the birds were hushed - it rained, rained, and rained.
"Your father wants you at the Inn, Schani."
"I wanta show you somethin'..."
"...here's good news o' your Prince Charmin'!"
"Now he's gave you the kick - how about an honest offer?"
"There ain't many guys as broadminded as me!"
"Let's get hooked up proper, an' for good!"
"I love you - Mitzerl!"
"I hate you!"
"I hate you!"
"I love him!"
"And I always will!"
"I'll kill that dirty dog..."
"...when he comes out o' church today!"
"...until death doth you part!"
"Nicki..."
"I love these apple blossoms."
"So do I."
"Please don't! I'll marry you..."
"...honest I will!"
"So... I'm good enough now?"
"All right - we'll get married!"
"Say your last 'Ta-Ta' to him!"
"Who was that sweet girl - in tears?"
"...and that awful looking man?"
"I - I never saw them before!"
"How beautiful - these apple blossoms are!"
"Won't they always remind you...?"
"Yes - always!"
A filmed tale in five chapters, based on the third and the fourth chapters of
Jerusalem 1 by Selma Lagerlöf.
In the parish, where the old Ingmar clan lived, they stuck to their old ways.
When the clock struck six o'clock, all work was halted both indoors and outside
Everyone stood still for as long as needed to say the Lord's prayer.
It was told in this parish, that the Ingmar clan had lived for so long in this world, that they knew, how our Lord wanted it.
He, who now was Big Ingmar.
He, who now was Little Ingmar.
Big Ingmar also had a daughter, who's name was Karin.
Halvor Halvorsson was a young farmer, who had opened a shop in the parish.
He was from Gimsgarden and was therefore usually called Gims Halvor.
It was so that Halvor had proposed to Karin Ingmarsdotter.
He had proposed many a time, there had been many ifs and buts.
The wife, whom he had once upon a time went and gotten from the prison, had died during the winter.
Ever since her passing he had wanted to follow her.
But on the other hand his son was still too young to take over the farm.
He had to keep going for the boy's sake.
"I guess you should try doing this one more time.
When something goes wrong we Ingmars do it all over again till we get it right"
"Father will be the one to decide how it's going to be"
"You know I'm not stalling because of money, you have enough.
But your father is quite known for his drinking, and it could just be that he passed it down."
At last it was decided,
Halvor would get Karin.
The day of the wedding was set.
Karin and Halvor travelled to Falun to buy the wedding ring and a hymnbook.
"You go get the package, while I go back to our quarters and get everything in order for our return home."
It was Elias Elof Ersson and his father.
They were from the same parish as the sons of Ingmar.
The father was mean and had always been strict with his son.
"Has there been an accident?"
Well home Karin told her father she could no longer marry Halvor.
"My only problem with him is that he got drunk.
I'm afraid he might turn out like his father"
"You shame me so much that I can't bear it.
What would people think of me?
How can you throw me away like this?
One doesn't do something like this to an honorable man!
"It can't be helped,
I've made my choice!"
"In this matter it's up to her.
I won't force her."
Ever since the breakup last summer,
Halvor had been miserable and gloomy.
He could not forget the injustice done to him by the sons of Ingmar.
Have you heard?
Elias Elof Ersson has been courting over at the Ingmar Farm.
It is said he and Karin will be wed this fall!
"I have raised him to work and save his money.
He will be the perfect son in law for the Ingmar clan"
"But Halvor, what are you doing here?"
Karin and Elias Elof Ersson had now been married for a year.
He had not gotten to be his own man and had moved to the Ingmar farm to work under his father-in-law.
When he lived with his father
Elias had barely had enough to eat, and at the Ingmar Farm there was nothing but work and thrift.
That spring the snow melted unusually fast, causing the river to overflow.
Ingmar son of Ingmar stood alone at the river bank.
It was as if the river wanted to mock the farmer for his slowness.
It was almost as if the river was saying
"It won't be you who get what I carry with me"
"At least it will be salvaged down at the village"
"Yes, I've been expecting that."
"Yet again someone lacked the sense to get back on shore before they were taken by the river"
Big Ingmar knew that the currents could take them over his beach.
If only God would allowed it to be so,
Big Ingmar hoped.
"You're not a young man anymore, Ingmar.
This is too dangerous for you."
"It will end up how God wishes it."
"Now it's all over for you,
Big Ingmar."
It was the little children he had rescued who went for help.
People came to Big Ingmar's aid and he was brought back to the farm.
"Pastor, soon I will die.
I only wish I could see Strong Ingmar first.
Big Ingmar had a good friend, who was a tenant farmer on his land.
His name was also Ingmar.
To separate between the two, people had come to call him
Strong Ingmar.
"Do you remember, Strong Ingmar, when we went down to the church bridge, and saw heaven opened?
I go there now."
"I'll come after you soon enough myself.
But you know I can not come until your son can stand on his own two feet"
"Yes, I know."
His son in law started drinking and partying the moment Big Ingmar was in the ground.
He stopped working and got drunk every day.
"Come let's go into the living room instead!"
"This is God's punishment for doing Halvor wrong"
She saw that he was doomed to decay, and that she would never get any support or love from him.
"What would Dad have said if he saw this?
He would have done the same as me!"
Elias turned a new leaf and set out to prove himself worthy of Ingmar.
"Jump on and I'll let you come with me to the store"
Karin was glad her husband took the boy with him.
Now there was less of a chance he'd found lying in a ditch by the highway or driving a horse to death.
"You swore we wouldn't go further than to the store!"
And instead of keeping his word, he took the boy with him to the inn in Karmsund, one of his usual hangouts.
"Where is the boy?"
"Wake up, Ingmar, here's something to warm yourself with!
Drink this, it's just water and sugar!"
It was eight o'clock in the morning, when he came home with Ingmar.
"You better come here and get him inside.
The poor boy got himself drunk, he can't get into the house on his own.
"You better get yourself a good meal, because if you have drunk my brother to death you will never get another one on this farm!"
"If he dies you'll get 20 years!"
"Do you think I'll die, Karin?"
"Do you think the whole parish knows I've been drunk?"
"But if I die, father will know of it too.
I will have shamed him!"
She thought it would do Elias good to hear this as well.
"If father was alive, Karin, if only father was alive!
Don't you think he would have killed him?"
As soon as Ingmar was healthy,
Karin decided to get him out of the house.
She could not let him share the misery she herself lived in.
"I'm not just talking about schooling.
I would like to ask you if he could live here."
"It would be a great favor."
"We will do everything we can for the Ingmar clan"
I thought I would show you my new watch.
"Does the schoolmaster know a lot about watches?"
"This watch is far too damaged.
How in God's name have you treated it?
Looks like you hammered a nail straight through it."
"It was father's watch.
It was ruined when the log hit him."
"I was the first to reach father when he was laying down by the beach."
"Now it's over for me, Ingmar.
I'm sorry that the clock is broken, because I want you to give it to someone I did wrong, and send him my regards."
"Who was supposed to get the clock?"
"I'll give you my father's regards and leave it here."
"I don't think Halvor could have asked for a better apology!"
"No one will take this clock away from him!"
"As I have received your father's watch from you,
I think it's only right that you would get mine!
From this day no farmer came to the village without stopping by Halvor's store to hear the story of Big Ingmar's clock.
"Owning this watch is a great honor, Halvor."
"Don't beat me!
My back hurts, I need help."
"No, he's not drunk.
He fell and injured his back."
Elias had broken his back and would never be able to walk again.
From then on he was always in bed.
But he could still speak.
Night and day he would beg for brandy.
"You know that the doctor has forbidden me from giving you strong liquor."
Karin lived through this misery for one winter, one summer, then yet another winter.
Now it was spring, and she said that she could not survive another summer.
"I could very well be dead.
It seems my only purpose in life is to stop Elias from drinking himself to death."
"I thought I'd find you here."
"I've been over at the house talking to Elias.
I asked him if he wanted to stay with me for awhile."
"We decided that you would drive him down tomorrow.
He thinks he'll be allowed to drink, but as you know, Karin,
I would never even consider it."
How could Halvor be so good to her?
He had to be in love with her,
Halvor had to be in love with her.
Why else would he come to her aid like this?
She felt something she had never before experienced.
She wondered what it was, until she suddenly realized that Halvor's goodness had warmed her frozen heart.
"God bless you, Halvor!
God bless you!"
Elias moved down to Halvor.
He lay in the storage room all summer.
"Remember: no liquor!"
"Halvor probably got a little impatient.
He may have helped Elias on his way."
"But it really was a good deed freeing Karin from the terrible human being."
"It's not that hard to believe that Halvor killed him so that he himself would get Karin."
"Now, Halvor, promise to have plenty of patience with Karin.
She's someone well worth winning, even if it would take you seven years."
But it was not that easy for Halvor to be patient.
He soon heard that Karin was getting proposal after proposal.
One Sunday afternoon he saw one of the inspectors from Bergsana drive by.
Then he saw the innkeeper's son from Karmsund.
Then, last but not least,
Berger Sven Persson drove by.
He was the richest farmer in the county, a wise and highly respected man.
"I know it's stupid, but I would probably like to know why all these men have taken to the road."
"This is Halvor son of Halvor from the Gims farm.
"It is quite exciting to meet such a notorious man."
She knew at once how bad it looked that he would visit so soon after the death of her husband.
"Why does he have to be in such a hurry?
He's making it impossible for me to marry him."
"What are you laughing at, Inspector?"
"He's thinking of a hunting dog, who drives up the hare, but allows someone else to catch it!"
"Cheers, Halvor!
You've done Karin here a great favor taking care of that scoundrel she was married to!"
"Yes, yes, you've been a great help!"
"The evil gossip has already begun.
I do not know how I could bear losing him!"
"Tell Karin goodbye for me.
We're through!"
"We in the Ingmar clan do not need to bend for people.
We need only walk the ways of God!"
"Please, stay and finish your coffee."
"I think it best that you know
I would rather marry Halvor than anyone else."
"People may say what they want, but Halvor and I have done nothing wrong!"
"When I got your father's watch
I thought nothing greater could ever happen to me.
But what you have just done surpasses all else!"
"Then we congratulate
Karin and Halvorto.
And it should to all be known that he who Karin chooses is good and fair!"
"See, Karin?
Everything goes well for the Ingmar clan!
"I don't think they need any coffee!"
The End
Subtitles by: hirvi14 and Gloede
CHEMI BEBIA
MY GRANDMOTHER
Written by
Georgi Mdivani - Kote Miqaberidze
Directed by
Kote Miqaberidze
Photography:
A . Polikevich - V. Poznan
Art direction:
Iraki Gamrekeli
Story:
A. Takaishvili
- E. Chernova - E. Ovanov
Ak. Khorava - G. Abesadze
In production of
Goskinproma Georgia, 1929
We decided to restore this film not only because of its artistic merit.
We are convinced that even today it will be able to combat certain sheme of practices still present in our society.
Restoration directed by
Leyla Gordeladze
Titles:
G. Mdivani - L. Gordeladze
Music by
Oleg Karavaychuk
Sound engineer:
Shoshitayshvili N. Mount: O. Gevorgyan
Photo effects, photography:
K. Sarishvili
Edited by
A. Dzhugeli
Production manager:
S. Sikharulidze
This film was restored at the 'Order of
Lenin Winning', Gruzia Film Studios, 1976.
THE T.O.R.K. TRUST
REGISTRAR
CLOAK
BUSINESS MANAGER
'Conserve paper!'
OFFICE MANAGER
CONTROLLER
ACCOUNTING
CASHIER
CHIEF ACCOUNTANT
'No handshaking!'
GENERAL COUNCIL
SECRETARY
BOARD MEMBER
VICE CHAIR OF THE BOARD
'When your business is finished, leave!'
The early bird.
Already working away.
POLITICAL EDUCATION PRIMER
And as for the senior executives...
CHAIRMAN OF THE BOARD
'No admits! 'Meeting in progress.'
No fair... You got a car and
I got nothing.
Shhh... I don't need any deputy for this.
OFFICE MANAGER
"Nothing aggravates a busy man more than a loafer."
She loves me. She loves me not.
She loves me. She loves me not.
She loves me!
BUSINESS MANAGER
'Conserve paper!'
TYPISTS
'No admits under any circumstances!'
Fighting for a promotion.
The man with the briefcase.
Acting rationally.
BUSINESS MANAGER
'Conserve paper!'
My position!
No, mine!
To the director of the Trust....
Confidential...
Wow. With such connections he could be the director.
A petition to the T.O.R.K. Trust from the worker, A. Khorava.
Please, allocate 50 rubels for the needs of our production team.
Work is being held up..
Petition No. 78903 from a worker.
To be circulating.
Expedite.
More discussion.
Bureaucrats!
NO SPITTING. NO SPITTING.
BUSINESS MANAGER
'By appointment only!'
DON'T INTERRUPT!
BUSY MAN AT WORK!
The busy man was working.
NO SMOKING
- Soon?
- No, the plan is still being developed.
When nothing happens, even time stops.
But the Youth Communist League our 'Junior Cavalry'.
THE IRON BROOM
DO LESS IF YOU DO IT WELL
The new business manager.
FIRED FOR BUREAUCRATIC ACCESS
About time. At long last by Order of the Workers and Peasants Inspection
business manager Deliagin has been fired, for being a notorious idler
and bureaucrate. About time.
Workers reporter: Gaika
And the fired manager doesn't know what to do with himself.
Everything she has ever dreamed on she got on the black market.
Oh, is there another husband like mine?
What are you doing up there, daddy?
Practicing.
See how funny our papa looks there...
You've never introduced me to the worker reporter, Gaika.
You're so possessive!
Fired! Then, no more car!
No flat! No free tickets!
A divorce!
A diivorce! Or a job!
The bastard has already found to set up. Maybe he'll help me?
Be a pal! Teach me how to set myself up.
No job and no family!
You idiot! All you need is a grandmother.
No 1. Find a grandmother.
No 2. Be a pest.
No 3. Be pushy.
Sum total... a job.
NO CIGARETTE BUTTS ON THE FLOOR!
BUSINESS MANAGER - SECRETARY
NO CIGARETTE BUTTS
ON THE FLOOR
Find a grandmother. Be a pest.
Be pushy. A job.
I am a great employee. Could you write a note to the director of the Trust?
Dear Comrade Sasha!
This letter will be brought to you by a certain...
To the director of the Trust... </ i >
Personal.
Urgent.
Confidential.
Thank you my friend!
Thank you my dearest!
You are now like a father and a mother to me. You are my dear grandmother.
REGISTRAR
- Oh, come back to me! - Ah, what about the divorce? Did you ask for one?
Invoice for the future.
...stockings...
...dress fabric, 30 m...
...shoes, 4 pairs...
At his destination.
I am an ex-executive.
And I am the wife of the future executive.
I have a letter of recommendation.
I'm an experienced administrator.
Here is a recommendation.
I'm an experienced administrator.
Here is a recomm...
I'm an experienced administrator.
Here is...
Directors are changed.
The jobs remain.
I'm an experienced administrator...
I am an...
Wait... Where the hell are you going?
Shhh... Quiet... He'll fly away.
Here you are. An impressive recommendation.
Dear Comrade Sasha! This letter will be brought to you by a...
Dear Comrade Sasha! This letter will be brought to you by a...
a certain scoundrel who pushed me over the edge
with his endless pestering.
Kick him the hell out of there!
With Communist regards...
...to bureaucratic delays...
...to sloppiness...
...to bureaucrats...
...Death!
Death to bureaucratic delays, to sloppiness,
to bureaucrats!
THE END
Music composed by Beth Custer
Performed by
The Beth Custer Ensemble
Transcribed by mitbrille
Karagarga@2014
Well, we finished earlier than Ike and I expected.
- Are you going anywhere?
- No, I don't think so.
So the next time, I changed to another tailor, but found out that he was no better than the first.
I bought some pretty expensive cloth and took it to him and you should've seen the mess he made of it
I told him I wouldn't pay for the thing, but the trouble is, he's got my material.
Well, I left the suit with him and it's been there ever since.
- Good evening Miss White.
And how are you?
- I'm all right, thanks.
- I haven't seen you for a long time.
Have you come to take Frank for a walk.
Yes
- That's right.
- Well, I must push along.
- Good-night.
- Good-night Frank.
- Well dear.
- I've been waiting here half an hour for you.
- Good-night Sean.
- Good-night Frank.
Good-night George.
- Sorry sir. Full up. You'll have more room upstairs.
- Goaaannn.
I think I told you, there's more room upstairs!
Sorry Sir. Full up here. There's more room up...HEY!
Frank. I've lost one of my gloves.
I think I left it at the other table.
- Is this it?
- Yes, thanks.
Thought so, there's a hole in two fingers.
Would you like a pair of nail scissors for Christmas?
- Funny, aren't you?
- Oh Miss, Miss!
It's no good being impatient, you'll have to wait your turn.
What's the matter with you today?
Got out of bed the wrong side?
-I don't like waiting about for you.
Oh, don't you? Oh, Miss!
Do you expect the entire machinary of Scotland Yard to be held up to please you?
You and your Scotland Yard
If it weren't for Edgar Wallace nobody'd ever heard of it.
Funny, aren't you?
Anyway, what's the hurry? We're only going to the pictures, we've got all evening.
- Well, I don't think I want to go to the pictures.
- Oh, and why not?
-I've seen everything worth seeing.
- You haven't seen "Fingerprints".
I'd like to see that.
Still it's about Scotland Yard! might be amusing. They're bound to get all the details wrong.
I don't see why. I did hear they'd got a real criminal to direct it.
- So as to be on the safe side.
- Oh, oh Miss!
Oh, blast!
Well, I've ordered.
- I'll go to the pictures with you, if you like.
- uh, changed your mind.
Have you got an ashtray Miss? I never seem to get an ashtray where I sit.
Frank, Frank. I've changed my mind again.
- About what?
- About going to the pictures.
- You mean you don't want to go again?
- No, not particularly.
- Why not?
- I don't know , I just don't want to.
- Isn't that enough?
- No, it's not enough … oy, Miss!
- What are you going to do?
- I'm going to get the bill.
I'm about fed up with you. lf you don't want to go, I do.
- Oh all right, I'll come too.
- oy, Miss!
Oh, don't let's have a row. I'm sorry.
I know I've been rather beastly today.
- Miss!
- Frank, I've said I'm sorry.
Here, that will cover it.
Hold on. I live here.
Do you? Then you needn't come any further.
Oh, no now I said that I'd see you home, and I will.
But I'm only just around the corner.
Do you know Whites? The newsagent?
- Yes?
In the Kings road?
Yes.
- That's my father.
No!
Yes.
Now isn't that fine?
Then we're neighbors.
- Have you ever seen an artist's studio?
- No, I'd love to.
- Come up and see mine.
- Oh, I can't now. Another time.
- Why not now?
- Why, it's so late.
- Are you frightened?
- No, course not.
Then why not now?
No, really. Thanks awfully.
I must be getting home.
- You are frightened.
- I'm certainly not … take more'n a man to frighten me.
Yes...that's what I thought....at first.
- What is the time?
- Not very late.
- Come on. What's the harm.
Oh, no harm really. Besides, I always think a girl knows instinctively when she can trust a man.
Yes, of course she does.
Do you trust me?
- Alice? May I call you Alice?
- If you like.
Come on.
- Oh Mr. Crewe. Before you go in, could I...?
- Excuse me, miss.
No!
That chap's nothing but a sponger.
Always pestering people up and down this street.
Well, here we are.
I'm right up there. Top!
Excuse me a minute, will you?
I say, I'm awfully sorry. I won't be a minute. You start walking up.
That's all right.
Oh good evening. Sorry to disturb you.
About this note, did he leave any message?
No, he wouldn't leave any message.
-Have you seen him before.
- Yes, the same gent what called here several times.
Thanks very much.
Goodnight.
Bit of a climb, wasn't it?
What a lovely room. Did you do it all yourself?
Hardly. I say, do you feel cold?
I think I'll light the fire.
- I say. That's good, isn't it?
- Oh that? Yes, that's a new one, just finished.
- How do you hold this?
- What?
Oh, that.
That's easy. I'll show you.
Oh Lord, not like that. Let me show you.
You take this and hold it like that, you see...Then you get the brush and hold it there. You try.
- Like this?
- Yes.
- Oh, look what I've done.
- Ooo, yes
- Draw something Alice.
- Shall I?
- Yes.
Rotten.
Never mind. We'll finish this masterpiece together.
Now you hold the brush. Steady.
There we are.
You are awful.
Wait a minute.
There. Already a pick ahead of me.
I'll go and get those drinks....Right you are.
I say, how would I do for one of your models?
That's an idea.
- Let's see it on you.
- Do you mean, put it on?
Yes, why not?
- Oh, it's so strong!
- Go on.....
Oh no, I don't think so. Besides I have to go home soon.
I see.
Pity. I would have like to have sketched you in it.
- Would you have really?
- Yes, but perhaps you are right. It wouldn't suit you.
I bet it would.
- Shall I really try it on?
- Yes, will you?
- All right.
- Good.
- Think this will be big enough for me.
- What?
- I said, do you think this will be big enough for me.
- Yes, I think so.
- Go on, play something.
- Wait a minute, how does that thing go?
I know.
And that's a song about you my dear.
You haven't said how you like it.
Marvellous.
- I can't do it up.
-Wait a minute. Where is this trouble?
- I can't do it all up.
- Never mind.
- How do I look?
- Wait a minute, it isn't quite right.
Put your hands there.
- I better go.
- I say.
I've got it.
- Please give it to me.
- All right, come on out.
There it is.
Don't be silly Alice. Don't be silly.
No, no, let me go! Let me go!
No, no....
- Who did you say it was?
- Mr. Crewe!
- Mr. Who?
- No! Crewe, I tell you! It's horrible!
- All right. Don't you worry. I'll send round straight away. What number did you say?
Seven or eleven?
- What?
- 31, I said.
- No, no, 31.
- Ah good. Just take a look around, will you?
- Right you are sir.
- Alice, wake up.
Anyone'd think you hadn't been asleep all night.
What do you think!? There's been a murder last night, round the corner.
They tell me the police are round there now.
We'll all be murdered in our beds, soon, I'm sure we will.
'cause I don't  think the police are what they were.
Morning, Alice. 'eard about the murder?
- Yes, I heard.
- Do you remember Frank's telephone number dear?
- No, but here, you'll find it in the book.
- I mean, some murders are so different to others aren't they?
Pushed his lady friends under the water when they was having a bath
What was his name? you remember?
I think that was ever so beastly.
It gave me the shivers.
After I read about it, I didn't dare 'ave a bath for a month.
An' for weeks after that I only used to 'ave a rinse down.
What was his name? You remember,
Smith, wasn't it?
What's wrong Alice? You don't look very cheerful this morning.
-You do look a little bit peeky, I must say.
- Dad, Alice, breakfast.
Good-morning, Mr. White.
- Good-morning, Sir, good-morning.
Breakfast!!!
I couldn't look bak'n in the face after what happened last night and under our very noses.
Mind you, I don't think, meself, it's all together the police's fault.
What I mean is, they 'ave to wink at some things.
I mean it's one thing to buy chocolates out of hours, but it's quite another to stick a knife into a gentleman.
I must say I feel the same way about that too.
A good, clean, honest whack over the 'ead with a brick is one thing....
...something British about that. But knives?
No. Knives is not right.
I must say that's what I think and that's what I'll keep.
Whatever the provocation,
I could never use a knife.
Now, mind you a knife is a difficult thing to handle.
I mean any knife.... knife.... knife.... a butcher's knife!
- Alice, cut us a bit of bread, will you?
Knife.... knife.... of a knife.... 
...you come up against a knife!
I mean, in Chelsea you mustn't use a..
KNIFE!
- Dear, you ought to be more careful.
You might have cut somebody with that.
Customer.....
- No news of the murder yet?
- No, not yet.
- Thank you. Good-morning.
- Well, I must be going. I can't stand here gossiping all day like some people.
Chatter, chatter, chatter.... give
'em a chance to talk about other people's business, and they'll take it.
- What's the matter Alice?
Had another row with Frank?
- Another customer Alice.
- Good morning, Alice.
- Dear, it's Frank. Hello Frank.
- I say, have you 'eard about our murder?
- Yes, they put me on it.
- Did they? That's good isn't it?
Well, I hope you get him Frank!
- If they do, that will mean promotion, won't it?
- D'you reck'n you'll get him soon?
- Well, uh, I don't know.
-Well, I came in here to phone.
- That's all right.
-  Alice? Come here a minute will you?
- Well I must be going now. Good-bye,
Mrs. White, good-bye,  Mr. White.
Now you two.
- Sssshhhh.....Be careful...
What happened last night?
Why don't you tell me?
Look, you know where I found that?
It's the only piece of evidence that you were there. I'm keeping it back at present.
For God's sake, say something!
- If you're not using the phone...uh, may I?
I, uh, I want to get on to Scotland Yard.
- I say.
- I want the best cigar in the shop.
Certainly sir. Perhaps you'd like to telephone while I get it down?
- No thanks, that can wait.
- What does he mean?
- Very well sir. Now, uh, what sort of a cigar would you like sir? I've got..
I' ve got 'enry Clay or Corona, Corona?
- Corona.
- Certainly sir.
- Any news of the murder.
- No, nothing yet.
- Have you heard anything?
- No, no news.
- Are you, uh, quite sure?
- What the hell business is it of yours, anyway?
- You know, I looked everywhere for that other glove last night.
But, of course, you detectives are better trained at finding these things.
- Ah, here we are sir.
- Excuse me, will you?
Thank you.
Oh, they look good.
- They ought to. I've had ' em for years.
Is it all right sir?
- Yes, I thought the top was broken, but it's all right.
- Have you a light?
- Yes, here you are.
- How silly of me, hadn't noticed it.
- Uh.. all right sir?
- Oh, ha, of course, sorry.
Extraordinary actually...
I can't quite...
I say... would you pay for this?
Is this gentleman a friend of yours, Frank?
Well, we're not exactly friends. At least not yet.
But we're going to do a little business together, aren't we, Frank?
I'll look after the shop, Father.
You go and finish your paper.
What for?
Oh....all right my dear, all right.
Rather unfortunate that poor man died around the corner last night.
Look here you....
Perhaps it's rather fortunate, that your little secret only came into the hands of a man like me.
D'you know, there are some men who would make money out of a thing like that.
What a chance for blackmail.
Oh, oh that's awful.
I couldn't do a thing like that.
Morning, Miss. Two of each there.
By the way. You're a detective.
Let me give you a tip.
Don't wave important clues in telephone boxes. They've got glass doors.
You know, uh, detectives in glass houses shouldn't wave clues.
Come on, out with it. What do you want?
What do I want?
Oooooh, well, uh...
Couldn't we discuss that over breakfast?
Mother this is a friend of Frank's. Mr.?
- Tracy.
- Pleased to meet you.
- Mr. Tracy, would you like something to eat?
- Thank-you.
- Lovely weather, we're having.
- Yes, splendid.
- Who did you say that man was?
- He's a very important friend of Frank's.
I'll get the breakfast for him.
- Here! Aren't we rude?
Won't you take my chair?
- Oh, thanks.
- Did you see, or hear anything during the night?
- No, sir.
- What time did you go to bed?
- About half past ten, sir.
- Did you write this?
- Yes.
- How old would you say this man was.
- I'm afraid I couldn't tell you, sir, he had his hat on.
- Did you notice anything particular about his clothes?
- Well, uh, he had a black hat and a loose kind of collar.
'nd a tie and that's about all, I think.
- Was he dark or fair?
- Well, you couldn't say he was a blond and you couldn't say he was a brunette. He was a bit of both, you know, kind of mousey.
- Anything else?
- No.
- Except when he spoke to you, he went like this.
- All right.
Give me records.
- Well, bring him along. Let's hear what he's got to say.
- Understood?
-Yes, sir.
- Right, get along with it..
- That'll do to go on with.
- How much longer is that man going to stay? Don't tell me he'll be here to dinner.
- Don't make things awkward mother.
It means a lot to to me and Frank.
- Well, I don't see why they should carry on their business in my parlour.
- I'll take it.
- Very well.
- But I don't like that man and the sooner he goes the better.
You are very clever.
I can see that all right.
- Frank? Just a minute will you?
A pal of yours at the Yard, said he thought you might be here.
- Oh, all right.
Hello?
Yeah. Yes.
Well, I thought you wouldn't mind if...
What?
Who?
- Any news Frank?
- Alice, lock that door.
As you were saying ... rather unfortunate the way that poor man round the corner, uh, died last night.
On the other hand, perhaps it's fortunate. For us, that is... that a suspicious looking man, with a criminal record, was seen hanging around the place.
- You....
Look here, don't you try and swing this thing on me. That won't get you anywhere.
- Also rather unfortunate, that Scotland
Yard, are at present looking for that man.
- I say, Frank!
- Just a minute Alice.
- But there's one thing you seem to have forgotten....
- Oh, and what's that?
- Before we get to any hanging,
I shall have quite a lot to say.
And the first thing I shall say is, that she was there too.
- Oh, you will, will you?
Isn't there one thing you seem to have forgotten, that our word's as good as, or perhaps a bit better...
...than that of a jailbird.
So we'll face that when the time comes.
Meanwhile, we'll just sit quietly here until the squad van arrives.
- That surprises you doesn't it?
- No, it doesn't surprise me in the least.
When it comes, the surprise won't be for me.
- Very well then, we are both satisfied.
- Yes, we're both satisfied.
It's my word, against hers.
- Frank, you can't do this.
- Why not?
- Well, because...
- Now, now, don't interfere,
Alice, I know what I'm doing.
You don't, you don't.
- Please Frank.
- Oh, for God's sake, be quiet Alice.
- Why can't you let her speak.
- You mind your own business.
In any case, she'll speak at the right moment.
- Look here Frank. Why can't we, both of us, chuck the whole thing now?
I've got nothing against you.
You've got nothing against me.
Except, of course, I had some cash from you, but I wasn't serious.
Well, look here, have it back now.
Well can't you see, that she wants to chuck it up too? And so do I, you know.
Look here, Miss. You tell him.
Tell him that he's playing with fire and...
And we shall, all of us, burn our fingers.
I'm not bad really, I only... things have gone wrong lately, and one's got to live, you know.
All right then. It's still my word against hers.
That's it?
Oy!
You men meet me in the back, Frank, follow me!
I say, it's not me you want.....
It's him.....ask him.
Why his own....
Hello. Not very often I see you so early in the day as this.
- Called to see Frank?
- No.
No, I want to see lnspector Walls, please.
-Then you'll have to fill out one of these forms, you know.
- All right.
- Do you know something about this?
- Yes.
George, just a minute.
Take this along to inspector Walls.
Well I suppose you're going to tell him who did it, Miss.
Yes.
- You can come along now
- Here you are, Miss.
- Come in, please.
Won't you sit down?
You've something to tell us about this case.
- Yes.
- Well, what is it?
Well, you see. I know who did it.
Is this worthwhile sir, now that everything has been cleared up?
Let's hear what she's got to say.
What I was going to say is this...
I'd better say, what I have to say now...
I would rather not wait.
What I wanted to say is...
- I was the one.
- One moment please.
Hello.
Yes, yes.
Yes, hold on. Will you deal with this young lady,
I shall be busy for a minute. Yes, sir.
This way Miss, please.
Alice, whatever made you come here?
I did it.
- I know.
- You don't know.
He tried oh, I can't tell you.
It's too terrible. I was defending myself.
I didn't know what I was doing and then...
- My dear.
- Ha, ha! So you found him,
Miss. Did she tell you who did it.
- Yes.
You'll want to look out, or you'll be losing your job my boy.
I suppose we'll soon have lady detectives up in the Yard, eh.
And I shall be all right on the dole, won't I.
THE PHANTOM CARRIAGE
A tale told in moving pictures under the direction of VICTOR SJÖSTRÖM
At the camera - J. JULIUS
Once there was a poor
Salvation Army sister at death's door.
She'd been stricken with galloping consumption and had only held out for the space of a year.
When there was no hope left, she'd gone home to her mother.
Waiting at the foot of her bed was another Salvation Army sister who had worked alongside the sick girl.
Don't fret over those poor souls now, Sister Edit.
You've done enough for them.
Send for David Holm!”
Please don't!
My daughter was yours as long as she had a spark of life.
Now that she's dying, let me have her to myself.
Sister Maria, why don't you do as I ask?
Send for David Holm!
I shall go find him at once. ”
You can't be serious!
Asking David Holm to attend to a dying person!
I wasn't able to find him, but Gustavsson is looking too.
He'll bring him here if it's at all possible.
Poor Mrs. Holm!”
03 p
It wouldn't do for her husband to see her if he should come here.
The evening on which these events took place was no ordinary evening.
It was New Year's Eve.
Well, we'll certainly know when it's time to toast the New Year. ”
It's a spooky place to wait for midnight, here among the dead. ”
You gentlemen aren't afraid of ghosts, I hope'?”
Then I'd like to tell you a story while we wait for the midnight hour. ”
„I once had a pal named Georges, who was generally a jolly fellow.
He came from a good family and had studied at Uppsala University, so he knew a bit more than the rest of us.
But a change would come over him on New Year's Eve. ”
Remember that it's New Year's Eve, the last day of the year!”
Whoever dies on this eve must drive Death's carriage. ”
There is an old, old carriage... ”
It is no ordinary driver who holds the reins, for he's in the service of a strict master named Death.
For him, a single night is as long as 100 years on Earth.
Night and day he must Carry out his master's business.
END OF PART 1
THE PHANTOM CARRIAGE
PART 2
Wherever he goes, he's greeted with sorrow and despair. ”
There is no escape.
He must perform his forlorn duty. ”
Though horse and carriage are always the same, the driver is not. ”
The last soul to die each year- the one who passes over at the stroke of midnight- is destined to be Death's driver for the following year.
Now you know why I'm afraid of something fatal happening to me on New Year's Eve.
And the odd thing is, you see, that Georges apparently died last New Year's Eve.
Why hasn't Gustavsson arrived with David Holm?”
Come with me, David Holm!
Sister Edit is dying, and she has asked for you.
If Sister Edit wants to see you, you must go to her at once!”
David, I can't believe it's you!
It is you who is to relieve me!”
You should take me to the hospital in your carriage as quickly as you can. ”
No living soul rides in that carriage.
By the time I arrive, it's too late for a doctor.
You know full well that
I am no longer among the living. ”
But worst of all, you must face the consequences of the evil you have wrought during your lifetime.
David, do you think I'm unaware that it's my fault you've met such an end'?
If you hadn't fallen in with me, you'd have led a good life with your wife, children, and brother.
By tomorrow you will have served your time for drunken behavior.
But before you leave, a harsher punishment awaits you.
Behold your brother.
While you were here, he killed a man while intoxicated, and now a long prison term awaits.
But we feel that you ought to serve the sentence in his place, since you and you alone led him astray and made him a killer.
Does this not make you want to turn from your wicked ways, David Holm?”
Yes! Only now do I realize how it feels to have brought great misery upon a loved one.
What about your wife and children?”
Now I know how miserable they've been, but I will turn over a new leaf.
They need never despair of me again.
END OF PART 2
THE PHANTOM CARRIAGE
PART 3
No, she's not ill.
She was well enough the other day when she left.
And here I thought
I'd come home to her with such joy!”
If she had gone openly,
I would have understood.
But to slink off like that, to let me come home to an empty house - that was heartless!
I'll wipe those smiles off your faces.
I'll find her and show her how it feels when your heart freezes to its very core, like mine has now!
I'll refrain from reminding you of your search for your wife, during which your feelings of hatred and revenge grew ever stronger.
I will take you to a time a year ago, to last New Year's Eve, when you came to this town, bringing such misfortune in your wake.
A Salvation Army station had been set up here in town, and it was ready for use on New Year's Eve.
Keep your food!
I just want to sleep. ”
Leave it alone!
It may be full of germs, and our sterilizing oven isn't working yet.
Don't you realize, Maria, how happy I am to help the first guest God has sent us?
Please go to bed.
It's been a busy day.
Let me attend to this.
Dear Jesus, let our first guest be blessed with a happy year. ”
All night long she bent over the coat, never giving a thought to the germs and filth she inhaled.
By the time she went to bed, the icy chill of winter had thoroughly filled the room.
Was it you who mended my coat'?”
Would you mind calling the person who did this?”
It's a shame you went to all that trouble, miss, but I'm used to having it like this.
Before you leave, I'd like to ask you to visit me again next New Year's Eve. ”
You see, I prayed that our first guest would have a good year, and I'd like to know if my prayer was answered.
Oh, I'll be here.
I'll come show you God didn't give a fig for you or your twaddle.
The time has come to honor that promise before you take over here.
From you she contracted the disease that put her on her deathbed, and now she awaits your visit.
You possessed all that is most wonderful, but you lost it!
You cannot avoid the torment of remorse, just as you cannot escape taking over as Death's driver for a year.
"Captive, come forth from thy prison!
Ye spirit that left thy body at the stroke of midnight, thou wilt relieve me of my office.
For a year thou wilt set souls free from the earthly realm.
END OF PART 3
THE PHANTOM CARRIAGE
PART 4
It is Death, but he has come too soon. ”
You see that I'm not afraid of you.
I will gladly heed your summons, but grant me a day's reprieve, for there is someone
I must talk sense into.
You do not know what terrible misfortune I have caused.
I cannot approach the Lord until I have set it right.
The person I'm waiting for is the man I love.
Do you understand?
The man I love!
I would grant you that reprieve if it would avail you.
But you have no power over this man!
Believing he was good, you've tried to make him mend his ways, but your hopes have been dashed time and time again.
It was you who enticed him away from his home and work!
You made him the drunkard he is!
Don't let yourself be dragged under!”
SALVATION ARMY RALLY
Run along and be saved, and I'll be sure to come watch!”
Why turn away so carefully?
I'm a consumptive myself, but I cough in people's faces in hopes of finishing them off.
Why should they be better off than us?
He's merely amusing himself.
He's not as wicked as he pretends to be. ”
How can you be filled with such bitter hatred for your fellow man'?”
You needn't worry about that.
I'll be leaving town in a few days. ”
No, you mustn't do that!”
I would rather you stayed so I may challenge you again. ”
Tempting as that may be,
I still can't stay. ”
You see, little missy,
I'm on a journey throughout Sweden in search of someone
I must find at all costs.
Who is this person you seek?”
You'll know that when I find the person in question!”
I am the one
David Holm is looking for. ”
I am his wife. ”
I couldn't endure the life he was leading.
I deserted him.
I took my children and crept away in secret.
I moved to this town, for it was so far from our old home that I never expected him to come looking for me here.
You must take him back! it's his only hope!”
„I didn't mean you must make up your mind on the spot.
Only promise you'll listen to your heart, and let us talk again later.
She had gotten the better of herself and asked for none of the things that belonged to this world.
Just come with me!
A surprise awaits that will make you happy.
END OF PART 4
THE PHANTOM CARRIAGE
PART 5
She hoped to replant in good soil the seed that had fallen among thorns.
And she may well have succeeded had it not been for...
The doctor says it's pneumonia.
And her resistance is poor, for she's been in ill health since last New Year's Eve.
Yes, that David Holm has been her undoing.
She worries so about the situation between him and his wife, but she mustn't know the truth.
You might at least have the heart to refrain from infecting the children!”
It wasn't so easy to run away this time!”
Haven't you had your fill of revenge, David'?”
If only I hadn't brought them together again.
His sin would be of lesser magnitude were it not for me.
You must grant me a reprieve!
I cannot die yet!
I must see him turn over a new leaf!
Just spare me a few minutes!
You know I love him!
I've never loved him as I do today. ”
Captive, ye of loving head, come forth from thy prison!”
Come along.
We have no business here.
Those who are to receive her will arrive shortly.
You know, David, if I could send a message to mankind,
I would like to send them a New Year's greeting.
„I would like them to dwell on a single New Year's prayer:
'Lord, please let my soul come to maturity before it is reaped. '
Why are we here?
Surely no one here is going to die!”
No, I can't go on!
I can't go on!”
I'm sorry, but I must go away, and I cannot leave them behind. ”
Please don't be angry with me. it's not my fault. ”
This will do, David.
It will suffice for the children and myself.
"Yes, David, I see what's coming.
I'm obliged to watch.
I will not shirk my duty.
You mustn't let this happen!
This mustn't come to pass!
Don't let those poor, innocent creatures die!
„I have no power over the living.
Where should I turn?
Should I pray to God or to Christ?
Who can tell me where to direct my plea'?
I'm a poor, miserable sinner, and I beseech the Lord of life and death!
I'm not worthy.
I've broken your every commandment.
Condemn me to eternal darkness!
Let nothing remain of me!
Do what you will to me, my Lord, but spare the three of them!
"David, I see that I no longer need grieve for you!
"Captive, return to thy prison!
She didn't do it yet!
I made it in time!”
Sister Edit is dead.
I was at her side.
I promised her I'd become a good husband and father.
You're lying!
Sister Maria told me you refused to go to her!
Are you owing, David'?”
No one believes I want to reform.
I want to be good, but no one believes me. Is it any wonder I cry'?
It's hard to believe, David.
But I do believe you.
Your tears have convinced me.
I can't help crying too.
I won't be truly happy until all my sorrow is drained.
Lord, please let my soul come to maturity before it is reaped. ”
THE END
THE HEIR TO
GENGHIS KHAN
A MEZHRABPOM-FILM Production
Screenplay by O. BRIK
Based on the novel by I. NOVOKSHONOV
Directed by V. PUDOVKIN
Vast and deserted are the lands of Central Asia.
Your master ready to go to the market?
Master is sick.
The flag indicates...
...that praying for the health of the yurta's owner are...
...a lama...
...a learned monk-healer...
...and a collector of taxes for the monastery.
Very sick!
My son will go to the market...
The son.
Get ready to go to the market!
Saddle the horse!
Furs for sale.
A fine skin!
We'll get flour!..
We'll eat well every day!..
Five hundred silver coins.
For healing the body...
...and the soul...
...a feasible reward.
Not enough!
Not enough!
The lama lost...
...a sacred amulet.
For the road.
Marketplace.
THOSE who buy for pennies...
...and gain millions.
THOSE who guard...
...the capital's interests.
A wonderful fox for sale in the marketplace...
Furs are bought up here.
We'll eat every day!
Next!
Give back my fox!
LET GO!
A WHITE MAN'S BLOOD
HAS BEEN SHED!
Go away!
Run!..
If in 24 hours...
...the criminal is not delivered to the authorities...
...all population...
...will be exemplarily punished...
...and fined.
To the taiga.
In 1920...
...in the mountains...
...for the power of the Soviets...
...partisans were fighting.
They're closing in!
We got to go!
Must try to break through!
They're closing in!
The commander.
A miner from the faraway Donbass.
Without any noise...
An accidental witness.
Thank you, comrade!
Watch out!
WATCH OUT!
WATCH OUT!
We got to run!
No horse.
Get on!
Camp.
Maintain communication...
...with the Red Army...
Listen to...
...Moscow.
Listen to...
...Moscow.
To strengthen ties with the population...
...the chief of occupation...
...and his wife...
...with the staff...
...are going to visit a big monastery.
Diplomacy demands...
...special forms...
...and preparations.
Before leaving.
The chief ordered to quickly collect two hundred heads of cattle from the nearest settlements.
Set out immediately!
It's a long way from the city to the monastery...
The ties are planned.
The ties are worked out by diplomacy.
The ties are strengthened in practice.
Ride and tell them that the soldiers are coming...
SACRED DANCES.
Before the sunset, gather here all the driven-away cattle!..
...or...
By the animal trail.
Be prepared...
...to speak on behalf of the Empire...
...with the great, immortal lama...
...whose soul is forever passing from a dead body to a new one...
BE PREPARED!..
...Himself...
...The great...
...IMMORTAL...
...WISE...
LAMA.
The lama's soul recently moved to a new body...
Although the Great One doesn't speak, he understands everything.
Diplomacy demands mutual respect.
My government sincerely regrets your recent passing away...
...and gladly welcomes your new reincarnation.
The road is dangerous...
...the Reds showed up... leave immediately...
The Empire is confident of the strong friendship of the Mongolian people.
We will hope...
...for the reciprocal observance of our common interests.
You have to hurry... very dangerous...
In case of an encounter with the friendly people.
Calm down!..
They're ours.
In view of a serious danger we sent a convoy.
A Mongolian partisan has been caught...
This is what we found on him.
Are you a partisan?
A Red one?
Moscow?
Shoot this beast.
Take him out of town and shoot him.
Interpreter.
This is either a code, or is written in an ancient language that I can't understand...
A missionary specializing in the ancient Mongolian language.
This is...
...an absolutely extraordinary document!
The deed indicates that its owner...
...is a direct heir to Genghis Khan!
Bring him back!
Bring him back!
Maybe he's alive!
There is no body!
Alive, alive!..
ALIVE!
Gentlemen!
We must do everything possible...
...to be able to take advantage of the lucky find.
We'll make him the ruler of the country.
Through him we'll strengthen our power.
Let's try!
We'll get support!
Ready!
Long live...
...Asia...
...under the powerful patronage of the king!
The ruler is getting better.
We're training the soul of the future ruler.
Explain to him that he became famous.
Translate that the messengers of sovereign princes are here.
My prince...
...sends his submissiveness...
...and two thousand horsemen.
It looks like we got it well in hand?
He's thirsty.
The ruler has recovered.
Let him take a walk.
Tell him that tonight we'll demonstrate him.
From the depth of the country, after a successful trade...
...at last...
To his cultured compatriots.
The master isn't home.
Hey, anybody here?
The lieutenant is at the Assembly.
Change and come here.
Just a minute...
At the Assembly.
A daring hunter...
...FROM THE WILD STEPPES...
...With a skin of a killed animal...
We brought him.
I demand...
...that the honour of white people...
...be protected from the encroachments of colored scoundrels.
By the power invested in me...
...I ORDER...
...you...
...TO LEAVE!
It's necessary to prepare...
...for the ceremonial meeting and...
...the announcement of the agreement.
Paragraph four.
The ruler of the country binds himself to let us have...
...the best goods at a minimal price...
The Empire binds itself...
...to bolster his power...
...to indefatigably care for the people's welfare...
Add: piously observing mutual interests...
THE ARRESTED MAN
IS IN THE BASEMENT.
But I gave an order...
Piously observing mutual interests.
Me not shoot!..
NOT SHOOT!
NO.
SHOOT HIM!
He's biting!
DEVIL!
SHOOT.
SHOOT NOW!
SORRY, MADAME!..
Down with the robbers!
Down...
...WITH THE BANDITS!
DOWN...
...WITH THE THIEVES!
To arms!
CATCH HIM!
DESTROY HIM!
DOWN...
...WITH THE WATCH...
...DOGS...
...OF IMPERIALISM!
THE FAITHFUL HEART
Scenario and Direction:
JEAN EPSTEIN
Petit Paul: EDMOND VAN DA脣LE
Father Hochon: CLAUDE BENEDICT
Mother Hochon: Mme. MANFROY
The Crippled Girl: Mlle. MARICE
The Woman of the Port:
MADELEINE ERICKSON
Cameraman: PAUL GUICHARD
Sets at the Studio des Vignerons in Vincennes
Exteriors at the Vieux Port of Marseille, and in Manosque
Marie was a foundling...
...whom Father and Mother Hochon brought up harshly, overwhelming her with work.
On top of all the hard work, Marie had to put up with the desire of a man who only ever instilled her with fear.
The whole neighbourhood was afraid of Petit Paul... a man who didn't have the best of reputations.
But each evening genuine love inspired Marie to tell little tales.
- Where do you think you're going?
- I'm going to go fetch some oil.
Petit Paul had an inkling of suspicion.
- I'm afraid. Father and Mother want to hand me over to Petit Paul.
- I need a change of scenery.
I'm taking the kid.
We'll go exchange vows at my sister's, in a town I'm actually familiar with!
- I've got a couple things
I'd like to say to you, sir!
- I know Marie's not your daughter...
- That's Jean - a real charmer.
They're even saying him and your Marie get along pretty good together.
- We love each other.
I'm going to marry Marie.
- Nice job, you ingrate! Pack your bags -
Petit Paul's taking you away from here.
In vain Jean waited for his girlfriend at their usual meet-up.
- Do you know where Marie is, the server from the tavern?
- She's gone... gone...
- We're going to marry one another up on the wooden horses.
- She's gone... with Petit Paul.
Petit Paul dodged charges.
Jean, found guilty, ended up spending a year in jail.
True heart...
And at night, nothing...
Finally, one morning...
Because of this child, he dared not approach her.
But he followed after her...
- Is that her child?
- Who is it she's living with?
- With Petit Paul - y'know...
He's making her pretty miserable.
- I haven't got any money...
- Quick, go quick!
- Go on! Get out of here!
If he finds you here, he'll kill us both!
He always comes home drunk!
- Look out! Petit Paul's back!
He's been drinking!
- Get out of here! Let him sober up first!
Let's get out of here while we still can!
But it doesn't take long for folk to start gossiping.
- Just get a load of this.
A whole slew of gossip.
- Ah! here we go - I got something to tell you that'll knock your socks off.
Listen close: you've got no idea...
- Jean's been spotted over at home with your wife.
- Jean's been seen here!
If I ever find him here again,
I'll take care of the both of you!
- Come on: the soup!
- I haven't had time to make any food.
I spent the whole morning in hospital with the baby.
- I'll go somewhere else to eat.
Once Petit Paul had gone off, the crippled girl was going to give Jean a signal they'd both agreed upon.
While Marie regained hope of seeing her child grow up...
...As for Petit Paul...
- Jean just left to go find your wife.
He's over at her place.
- Jean's over at Marie's.
They're even writing love letters to one another on walls in the neighbourhood.
- You've got to get out of here.
Love allows one to forget everything.
